36	I forgot the name of the place.  1st floor of Gallery Hotel?  It's probably me, but I like the noodle form Ajisen.  Their ramen standards aren't top notch compared other Japanese places, but I eat there just for their noodles.  I like them the texture they are.
114	Sapporo Ramen Miharu? Oh I haven't tried that either. Has anyone tried it yet? So I guess they will be better known for their miso ramen?
26	you can try ichibantei at robertson quay... very good!
45	yeah , i like ajisen ramen alot too.. very spongy.. haha..
39	where else?
123	Yup the one at gallery hotel is Miharu but I don't know why I seem to find Tampopo's Kyushu Jangara Ramen more tasty although they're different variants. My all time favorite is still Noodle House Ken.  There's a review of tampopo here:
5	Tampopo Ramen! Especially if u have watched that movie   went last week to and ordered the black pig ramen  the soup base is perfect  and not as salty as ajisen one imo
1	I've yet to kind a decent kyushu style tonkotsu ramen
208	I usually ask for extra toppings with gyoza at ken's place. Ended up paying a lot more
854	Oh yes it is called Ichibantei. Maybe I should try that!  Tampopo is the one in Meidi-ya. Is it better now? I have tried their Hokkaido style ramen a while ago but I didn't find anything special with it. Maybe I should go and try their Kyushu Jangara Ramen.  Yes sometimes the Ajisen one is very salty. But the worse saltiest ramen I had was the Miso Chasu Ramen from Musashi Ramen in Tokyo. My tongue went numb.  Oh I think I prefer the gyoza from Ohsho much better.
10	Its gotta be Miharu @ Gallery Hotel.  No doubt! Have been eating there for the past 2 years
51	I didn't like gyoza from Ohsho  Taste-wise it's good, but it falls apart much too easily.
72	It's quite nice lah, but I think it's over rated.
105	i like the soup from Ajisen, big big bowl of noodles also
295	i like ichibantei, pretty value for money as well
595	try Ramen Ramen Ramen at Rall Mall near Bukit Timah.  I find the noodles pretty good and the soup is very rich.  Pricing $7.90-8.90
82	try marina square level 3.. forget the name liao. a shop that specialise in Ramen only.   affordable. n the soup base can choose normal or thick(plus collagen).   Go for thick soup base. (+$1)
218	Beppu Menkan @ china Sq
641	i tried a couple of new ramen shops in a week.  here's the low dwn of most ramen shops in singapore tt ive tried.  personally i think the noodles they serve in  sucks. they taste like spagetti. wtf?! price? compared to the shops below.. ill recommend u eat @ other places or save your money.. value for money definately. u can get a bowl of ramen for 9 bucks only. but trust me. it isnt as filling as the rest of the ramen ive tried. u could however top up a little for the set meal which i think is very value for money. noodles n soup's average not bad. u pay for wat u get. last time was here, they served super tenten ramen (chilli bean soup) and tonkotsu (white pork bone soup). +1 for them cos they serve free kimchi appetitisers. chashu here isnt fatty  10 per bwl!! has nice gyoza. i havent tried their chahan (fried rice ya?). noodles here are not too bad but i'm sure there r better ones like miharu. soup is a little on the thin side but they come with lots of other ingredients in soup. 1 bowl can make u full. think here is more for the japanese zi-char. i like better the chashu here mainly cos it's damn fatty but too bad it's kinda dry and not really fresh. avg 11 per bowl. best imo of all in this post. noodles spongy jus nice. soup isnt tt salty and rather thick. ingredients r a too little in the bowl tho and for tt the price is slightly more ex than other ramen shops. the chashu here is better than ichiban. come here for the soup n noodles. avg 12 per bowl not as good as the rest of the above shop. maybe can fight with ajisen lol. the only thing good here is tt the soup is damn ****ing spicy... tt is if u wan it to be. dont bother coming other for the novelty of burning your tougue off.  ps. all above shops have service charge and if the stewed boiled egg does not have a orange  slightly watery center then wat your eating isnt ramen. dont bother going back.
189	aijisen is good?omg!thats not even food to me!!  is ichiban and ichibantei the same??   is the galley hotel the one shown on tv some weeks ago?the one near city hall mrt is it??if thats the one.i think many said they are the best in SG.everythere there is imprted from japan-even the chef  personally,i like beppu.not so much of high standard of ramen but rather i love their spicy soup.i always take the level 8 hotness which is the max.at least once a month while my gf is still stuck ay level 6  for this,the best is at far east sq.somehow,i dunno why,i feel tiong bahru and suntec's ones arent as spicy and nice.beside,f.e.s is the very first one
306	wahh why so extreme?   ajisen is cfm too salty for my taste  but somehow it attract loads of customers  should be ok for most people
216	Wow!! I am impressed! You had ramen 4 times in a week! Power!  How to eat ramen:  1) Admire the arrangement of the different condiments in the ramen - egg, chashu, negi (spring onions), etc. A well prepared ramen should have everything arranged aesthetically. After all, the packaging is everything in Japan!  2) Whiff in the aromatic smell. The soup should be hot and steaming. I have had ramen in Ajisen where the soup was just lukewarm! Oh and if you are eating with other people in Japan, remember to say your Ittadakimasu now.  3) First just drink the soup. Yes just only the soup. Depending on the region the ramen is from, it will either be shio, shoyu, miso or tonkotsu. See which one you like.  4) Then take a bite of the noodle. The noodle is very important. I always find the noodles too dry and starchy in Ajisen. Perhaps their noodle is not truly fresh? Enjoy the texture. After the first bite, you can eat normally.  5) The egg. Most ramens have either a boiled egg or a stewed egg. I prefer the stewed variety. It is much harder to do and it taste better!  6) The chashu. Of cos not all ramen come with chashu. But good chashu seems to be a difficult thing to get here. Try the one in Ohsho.  7) Slurping. Well slurping is optional here in Singapore. But you should eat your ramen hot.
25	Level8 hotness? U are power man  . I tried 6 once and regreted and struggled to finish the bowl. Tried 4 the next time and still si beh hiam....go to 2 and its just nice.
57	last time i tried uma uma men at century sq... they claimed their noodle and stock followed as close as authentic jap style.. damn.. first visit i regretted and never return since.  when served, the soup already not piping hot, the texture of noodle is bad(like overcooked), tonkotsu stock tasted mostly of MSG and salt than pork..
49	level 2?i think laksa also hotter than that lei bro    can one lah.you know the first time i tried was while i was in HK.yes they have brances over there also.first time tried level 6,took me around 45 mins.next day go back try level 8,took 1 hr 15 mins
7	so where is this Noodle Shop Ken ? n hows their price?
11	Ken Ramen House  Noodle House Ken  Orchard Plaza #01-17/18 (opp cuppage plaza)  Tel: 6235-5540  Opening hours:  Weekdays Lunch 1200-1430  Weekdays Dinner 1800-0200 (that's right. 2AM)  Sat 1200-0200  Sun/PH 1200-2200
270	Different tolerance lah....but u really good...   The level 6 is the most spicy stuff I ever had, maybe chung ching steamboat can fight with it.  Anyway just went to Miharu (again after reading this thread)....soup/noodle is very good but eat till the end find it a tad saltish. Chasiew is dissappointing though, comes in very large chunk so not soft enough. And the place is super hot (temperature), eat n sweat all over. But will go back again, just for the soup.
177	ichibantei and ichiban is not the same. ichibantei is @ robinson quey which is almost beside gallery hotel.   there's only one miharu which is located outside gallery hotel not city hall. the place is not tt hot to me.
2	anyone tried the one at..now i remember,grand plaza hotel.heard thats supposed to be the best here lei
6622	true lah...anyway i dun find chung ching's spicy lei.ya want real mala can try that famous one..forgot the name but its at bugis that side,think ya will know which one.  dun worry,im sure one of this day you will finish level 8 with ease  .but everytime i order level 8 the staff sure ask me are you sure?or have you tried before.damn shiok
1944	I just went to Miharu and I tried the Miso ramen. As you reported, the soup is very good and the noodles were cooked to perfection - springy and smooth. I think the chashu is a disappointment. It is dry as the one in Ajisen. Does it means only Ohsho knows how to make a proper chashu in Singapore?   One thing I noticed on the menu is that they even have tsuke ramen. More a gimmick than anything?
920	I just came back from Ichibantei. The place is much like a family restaurant and there are lots of family having their meals there. They have a variety of other food as well.  Well I tried their tonkotsu ramen which was not bad. I would rate it above Ajisen for sure. The soup was flavoursome but a tad too much MSG I think. The noodle was better than Ajisen, but I find it not as soft and springy as the one in Miharu. The chashu was pretty good this time, not as hard and dry as the ones in Ajisen and Miharu. Still if I want to be picky, I find that it crumbles too easily.  So my ratings:  MIHARU  soup:*** noodle:*** chashu:* egg:**  ICHIBANTEI  soup:** noodle:** chashu:** egg:**  OHSHO  soup:* noodle:** chashu:*** egg:**  AJISEN  soup:** noodle:* chashu:* egg:*  I shall revisit Noodle Shop Ken and Tampopo soon.
346	My favourite one is Tanaka Ramen at Shaw Tower, Beach Road but it is gone now. If any knows  if it has relocate, please pm me or share over here...;((
8831	i tried  @ liang court yesterday. service sucks and not prompt when i asked for my green tea refill cos they made me ask twice. my friend was having this red chilli spicy tonkotsu ramen but they forgot to add the chilli inside therefore it isnt even red. how can u **** such a thing up? server can even remark "they forgot to add the chilli for u huh?". wtf is "sorry"?  anyway the spicy tonkotsu is jus a gimmick, the only diff is tt u add red chilli flakes and replace the chasu with thin pork belly slices.  the good thing here is that the soup broth is not too salty and is v flavoursome. i wouldnt know how this compares to the one originated in japan tho for i have not been there before. but i can say for sure tt the chasu can fight with the one @  albeit it's slightly smaller but the meat is less tougher. the egg is damn well done.  the noodles... isnt really good. they r using the ajisen like spagetti noodles. but of cos the noodles here tastes much muc better than ajisen.   avoid the orange jelly dessert ($5 so ex) which basically tastes like orange jelly with chucks of orange pulps.
4198	Tried Ramen Ramen today at Rail Mall.. my first visit.  Will be my last.  If the quality has always been so, it's shockingly bad since there has been much talk about it when it first opened.  Noodle texture is bad.. Soup is lousy and grossly understaffed.
19	When all else fails, or you are just a lazy bum, here is something that taste good and cheap...  Get it from Meidi-ya. Full of the MSG goodness! And a real change from local instant noodle!
41	ill second tt. this instant tonkotsu ramen is quite some good ****. how u going get the chasu... i have no idea. u can add bean spouts, spring onions and the hard boiled egg (boil for not too long. needs practise).   but i disagree w/ something. it isnt cheap. a pack of say 5 cost 8 bucks? wtf for instant noodles.
48	well it is cheap for an Japan imported instant noodle
1407	Haha I tried benpu over the weekend.  Level 6. Quite shiok, stomach was growling a bit after finishing everything up though. Sprite solved the problem though. I love spicy stuff, going to try level 8 next time. Shiok =D.
342	Went Ichiban Tei today and ate the tonkatsu ramen....no fight wif Miharu imo.
508	I went to Noodle Shop Ken today and had their signature Aji Tama ramen. I must admit it is a lot of ramen for $12. The 2 slices of chashu was thick and generous (but I would prefer it marinated much better) and the noodles were generous. The noodles here have a different quality from those of Ohsho and Miharu. I still prefer how Miharu done it, but Ken really does have LOTS of noodle, so I won't argue with that. And most importantly, the tamago (egg) was superb. It was just done perfectly! Nothing compares to this!  And there were garnishes of bamboo shoots, seaweed and more vegetables. The soup was just nice as well, neither too salty nor too watery.  The direct competitor to Ken is Ohsho which is just in the building across the street and the similar dish on their menu is the Tamago ramen. I think I prefer Ken's to Ohsho despite it being $2 more. The only regret in that case would then be in the gyoza, cos Ohsho is still better and they have a special sauce to go with it. So you have to decide if you like the ramen or the gyoza more?   And the rating:  Soup: ***   Noodle: **   Chashu:*** (for size, ** for taste)   Egg: ***   Ah yes Ichibantei is never as good as Miharu, but they has a bigger range of food if you have picky friends with you.
91	My two cents worth.  Ichibantei and Kado Men are worth trying out.  I would recommend Ken Noodle.  Beppu and Kyo Nichi arent exactly good.  Try Shimbashi Soba at Paragon. A tad expensive but the quality of their noodles is fantastic.
8	Where is this Ken Noodle located?
70	Ken Ramen House Noodle House Ken Orchard Plaza #01-17/18 (opp cuppage plaza) Tel: 6235-5540 Opening hours: Weekdays Lunch 1200-1430 Weekdays Dinner 1800-0200 (that's right. 2AM) Sat 1200-0200 Sun/PH 1200-2200
348	Where is Kado Men?
89	Thanks h030831, that will b my next target...
88	think it's at grand plaza park royal.   just beside sg chinese chamber of commerce &lt;-- dunno correct name or not    anyway opposite armenian church/hill street fire station  i haven't tried yet.. you go tell me nice or not!     Big Ramen fan
591	Okay I will try by this weekend!
444	tried this last week.not bad lah.but the tempura is power!!err the price also power lah,think is $30 ah
1547	$30 for ramen? More "power" than Miharu?!
1274	I went to try 2 places!  This is the terrific Jyangara Ramen at Tampopo. They were advertising this new pork they were using for their ramen - Kurobuta (Black Pig). And I must say the Kurobuta Chashu is really good! In fact it is really the best chashu I have tasted till now! The soup is a very nice tonkotsu base (though i think it is a bit salty?) and the egg is also marvellous (losing just a bit to Ken's egg I feel). The only thing is I don't really like the noodles. Miharu also claims they use Hokkaido noodles and theirs is so much better.  Nevertheless, the whole place was crowded with Japanese eating noodles and it is really good.  The other place I went to was Kadomen. I think the place is more like a small izakaya cos they have lots of other dishes as well. And it is a really small place. When I was there, I only managed to try their very common chashu men (shoyu soup base) but they have a wide range of other ramen, and some very odd flavours too. They seemed to be very proud of their tantan men cos they were recommending it to me, perhaps someone here can try theirs and compare it with Ichibantei? As for their chashumen, the chashu were very very thin slices not to my taste but the noodles were very nice. I think they might do better with their more unique ramen or chanpon type of dishes.  Okay I shall round up all the ramen I have tried in these few weeks:  MIHARU (tokusen miso ramen)  soup:*** noodle:*** chashu:* egg:**  ICHIBANTEI (tonkotsu ramen)  soup:** noodle:** chashu:** egg:**  OHSHO (tamago ramen)  soup:* noodle:** chashu:*** egg:**  AJISEN (tokusen ramen)  soup:** noodle:* chashu:* egg:*  KEN's NOODLE SHOP (aji tama ramen)  soup:*** noodle:** chashu:*** (for size, ** for taste) egg:***   TAMPOPO (kyushu jyanngara ramen)  soup:*** noodle:** chashu:*** egg:***  KADOMEN (chashu men)  soup:** (shoyu) noodle:*** chashu:* egg:N.A.
5621	thanks for the effort kifo!!
704	Havent tried Tampopo but will try thanks to the good review here. Anyone tried Ramen Ramen at Rail Mall?
7611	I saw there is a Ramen Ramen branch at PS now. I shall try that place soon!
4908	Thanks for the info and so sad to know.
8934	Finally went to Ken Noodle Shop....comment abt the same as Kifo but I forgot his advice and asked for big size for extra $2.....I'll skip dinner today.  Soup is as good as Miharu but less saltish/sweet which is just nice for me. Setup of the place is also very traditional Japan small ramen shop. Guess it serves the night crowd more cause there's only me n my wife eating there this afternoon.
4513	i went kadoman just now at Grand Plaza Parkroyal... the ramen not nice, both noodle and soup not nice.  It's being struck off my list of nice ramen..    Will go again:  Miharu  Ichibantei  Ken Noodle House  Tampopo  Yet to try:  Ohsho  Will not go again:  Ajisen  Uma Uma men  Ramen Ramen  Kado Man
136	Thanks everyone for recommending Ken's, it is a really nice place to go. The ramen was nice, although i am not a ramen expert, but both my gf and I found it nice.  we shared the charsiew rice and big portion of the noodles, the rice was very nice as well.  The next time i can go and try the miharu
1243	rice @ ken's is good? wat did u eat?
336	hmmm we ate the char siew rice, which is basically charsiew with rice and an egg and 2 pieces of seaweed.  I am not really a gourmet expert but its just that my gf saw a group of japanese eating it and it looks nice to her so we jus try lor. Then we jus found it nice as well, haha.... and it cost $5 a bowl.
146	the traditional 1 ... located at orchard plaza... i tink ... the boss is a japanese .. the concept of the store all follow japan .. RAMEN ... BEST
21256	no lah,the tempura bro
1055	sounds good...might be trying ken noodles this fri or weekends...  other then ramen do you guys order sides? or would the ramen itself be enough for you?
19135	Gyoza? But I don't like Ken's gyoza that much...
327	ha i m surprised by the favourable comments about ken noodles.   The noodles portion is filling, the egg is not too bad, the chashu pretty big pieces, but soup is so so, noodles is ordinary.... also tried the gyoza which is ordinary to me.  Perhaps the cook had a off day but my guest and I were not impressed with their ramen.  Overall 3/5.
62	sorry to disturb this thread. I just came back from Tokyo and very good ramen can be had for around 500yen only, ie. about $7. The ramen sold in singapore is so over-priced!
13460	This reminds me of having prata in Australia where the prata with curry is priced at $8plus.   Guess like how prata is a local dish, ramen is very much Japan's dish so it is usually cheaper and better.
63645	Agreed!!!  Last got my ramen fix at Tokyo too at 600yen...  The experience is DARN SUPERB...
1148	Hi guys, thanks for the recommendations. My friend and i will be trying out miharu next monday. Before it, may i ask what is the opening hours for it? and is the place at Gallery Hotel at robertson quay? If so, is there any specific attire that must be adhered to? or just t-shirt and jeans is sufficient?  Also i would also like to know Ken's noodle shop's opening hours as well.  Thanks
2489	I have a disappointing experince with Miharu last Sat.  After reading  many forums and most give a thumb up, I decided to try it.  Ordered 3 different soup base namely, miso, pig bone(cant remember the exact details) and garlic/sesame. Overall the soup base is very salty and oily. The garlic/sesame soup got a strong taste that make my throat uncomfortable.  I think I will nvr visit it again. Just my 2cents. IMHO I still think the Ramen at Tampopo (Liang Court) is the best.
854	wow that bad? lucky my friend and i haven't visited yet. will probably try ken's noodle. And have anyone tried Waruku? the chain of Jap restaurants:   their menu also got ramen but given they also have lots of other jap food so how is the quality?
29	one ramen shop was featured on tv recently (like...1 or 2 months). i duno wad's the chinese show's name nor the shop's name. but the shop is suppose to look like real jap shop.  anyone noe wad shop is it and where?
2948	SECOND THAT!  The Kyushu Pork Bone Ramen blows a non-Ramen lover away! Superb soup base and very nice pork chasu
548	Went to Tampopo after reading this thread again....my ranking goes Tampopo, Miharu followed by Ken. Miharu would b top if not for being too saltish but the charsiew from Tampopo is the best.
148	Near my working place, there's a lot of Japanese restaurants...but for Ramen in particular...Miharu at the Gallery Hotel is really good, bowl starts from S$12 and they only serve Ramen
1224	Never been to Miharu. Gonna give it a shot next time.
1304	Went to Ichibantei on Sat and it was a return visit.  I was pleasantly surprised by the quality.  The first time i went, it was average but this time round the ramen seemed to be much better.  The stewed egg i had with the tonkotsu ramen was excellent. Dont know how it is to be done actually but having the slightly hard boiled exterior to half-boiled interior to the yolk was heavenly.  The pork bone soup base was good although the spicy soup base was not as good.
967	wow lau.i tried the one at ichibantei last nite.damn nice!!the kimchi is very nice!!one of the best i tasted so far,even better then those from korea rest.!!will try the rest asap and contribute my view
10	Sorry Spinelli,  where is ichibantei ? N how much is the ramen ? Thanks.
85	It is at quay side. Near gallery hotel. Ramen ranges from 9 to 13.
457	I feel Petite Nouille at Marina Square is VERY NICE!!  Its actually a fusion of italian and japanese cooking.  The noodles are soft and just have the right amount of tenderness!!  Moreover, its cheaper than Ajisen, a decent meal is an affordable $8!!
566	seriously hor...i dunno how come got the idea its at clark quay...walked and walked cannt find.my gf damn dulan me cos i always like tt one    end up called my fren who's at work to google the address for me
30	near the colourful bridge. opposite got one SPC petrol kiosk..hotel miramar.. seems like all the good ramen places crowd around there..
2557	can't remember.. but their ramen are not pork bone stock right? i remember asking the owner she said it's chicken stock!!  anyway, her attitude also not too good... keep pushing the more expensive stuff on her menu. perhaps she didn't know i was there just for ramen. she gave me a lousy look after taking my order.   that's about 3 months ago... heehee
451	i've been looking for good ramens for a very long time.. i think i'll give tampopo and ichibantei a try.. may i know the pricing of tampopo?
2816	Tampopo is the pricest among most Ramen shops I know. The Black Pig Pork Kyushuu Ramen is about 13.50 if I am not wrong.  Anyway, anyone knows how to get to Miharu Ramen by public transport? Damn got lost today and the freakin rain spoilt the whole connoisseur mood
25	Well it is just within walking distance from Liang Court... keep walking till you reach Gallery Hotel...
23	U can walk down Mohd Sultan Rd.  Head straight after Double O.  Gallery Hotel should be within sighting distance up ahead.
12740	oh, i have no issue with the food there, ramen or others. As for the attitude, well she's ok and will always recommend stuff to anyone. As for lousy look, maybe because she looks like that but generally quite ok service from her. Have been there a few times and so far so good.
25	tried finding ken's noodle shop over the weekend but to no avail, are there any landmarks around the area?
150	you know orchard plaza??btw orchard plaza and the new OG there's a road right??dont cross the road,instead turn right and you see this row of indian tailor shops.just walk st all the way its at a corner.and weird,went last sun and they were not opened!!
1700	Tried the Black Pig Ramen finally on Sat and was thoroughly disappointed.  Noodles not springy enough and soup was just soup filled with spice.  Pork was thinly sliced but fatty though quite tender.   Think Ken and Ichibantei is still better.
7979	SomehoW after trying the ramen in japan I find those so-called jap ramen here really dun match up closE...always end up disappointed~
8273	I think weather plays a part also...most of my trips to Japan are during winter and nothing beats a steamy hot bowl of ramen in sub 10 degrees C kinda weather.
14	I must say the recent smoked Sapporo ramen they are having at Tampopo is quite interesting. It is quite a change from the usual and the noodle is unique.
164	Yup but main poinT ish also the stocK n ingredienTs~in japan the ramen shops takes pride and efforts to prePare them for customerS~here?....half baked effortS.  Next time if U have chance since U travel to japan frequently, Go to a seaside town namely hayama. It is very very close to a statioN named Zushi where U can access by taking the yokosuka sen from narita airporT. Just take a cab(unless U know how to go there by bus) near the station and tell the driver U wan goto hayama's ramen-Ya, it is there that you will find wat is superb japanese ramen that eclipses even their high profile shops in the cities~
16	Thanks for the tip...next trip probably end of the year, will give it a try if got chance though...
40	1st time I ate at Miharu is last week. So so only. The ones I ate in Japan is still the better ones. Even those occasional ramen stall @ Japanese fair in Takashimaya taste better than Miharu.
7404	i would certainly prefer ramen from hokkaido region over its tokyo counter-parts ^^  just my preference.... and ohh, not all japanese ramen establishments takes pride and efforts to prepare them, at the end of the day, its all about profits...
1101	where is tt place u bros mention with the spicy level wan?? i wanna go there try lvl 8 at first try!!!
1030	You are talking about Beppu Ramen?   Located at Far East Sq, Tiong Bahru Plaza (2nd or 3rd storey beside Sakae Sushi is) &amp; Suntec City (B1 if remember correctly, near Carl's Jr)   Personally love their ramen but I find that the taste abit different from outlets. Best is Far East Sq, the not so good is Suntec City.  You sure you want to try level 8? At most i take level 4, have not try anything higher . Will be able to enjoy my ramen at level 2.  Rec: Prawn, Salmon, Fried Chicken Ramen
118	thx man..will try them and tell u my feel for it
64100	yes best is far east sq cos thats the main branch.and matchy,unless you always eat damn spicy stuff,maybe you can try level 6 first and there's quite a jump btw 6 and 8.the best thing about their soup is that despite its hotness,you still can taste the sweet part  dunno why,i find HK's much more spicy than here lei    rec:no.13 and 14.forgot the exact name cos i always order the same no. w/o looking at the menu heh heh
589	i tried ken noodle house today.. Heard super good reviews from you people but hmm.. I only think that the egg is nice.. nothing else..  The ramen taste lk the tzi char noodles..
1736	What's the cost of getting to this ramen place? Thinking of visiting it.
143	Been to Marutama @ Central twice, second time was just last night. Still maintaining its standard, shiok. All the people who've gone with me enjoyed the ramen there. Their house special with the 7 nuts blended into the soup is particulary interesting with a twist of lemon. Their stewed egg is done to perfection, their pork belly is power (might be too power for some people). Haven't had their char siu though.
1063	another good recommendation in tokyo is one near sugamo station. its the best ramen i have tried so far in sg and tokyo ...... i dare not take a pic of their best seling ramen cos i cant speak japanese
1041	to me ken noodles taste like maggie mee
3427	Wow I must go check out Marutama judging from the reports here!   On another note, I think Tampopo's standard has fallen. I am tired of their Kyushu Jyangara Ramen and the Kurobuta Shabu Shabu Ramen already.   And I recently just tried the Sendai Ramen I bought from Meidi-ya. That is shiok!  It seems nowdays it is easier to find those instant noodles using fresh udon. Good news for all noodle lovers!
432	Which Central r u all referring to huh?
365	I just went to try Marutama. I had the Aka Ramen (with 7 nuts blend) and I must say it is quite unique.   I will want to go back to try their other Ramen. In the meantime, go try it out!
24	Exit at Clarke Quay MRT station.
667	wanna bring my gf go eat ramen at clarke quay area. tampopo gd? if not are there anything else to eat at clarke quay?
141	Ahh...ok, found it in streetdirectory.com...thanks.
18	My wife like it too but not me, I find it too oily.   She'll be going back to try the spicy version and she'll be bringing me along.
952	yup... went there b4... the ramen is nice.. but better to go earlier in the evening.. if not it tends to be crowded... especially during wk ends
419	Oily? I didn't notice ... but if the oil is from the nuts, it should be fine, those are healthy fats
2511	She doesn't find it oil too. But my preference is pork base soup over chicken! Must say that the texture of the noodles is good.
1080	Went to Marutama today...lots of people, must que up outside.  The ramen like narrower than norm, more like mee kia. Had the Aka ramen as recommended by bros here. Taste wise is OK but I would rank it below tampopo n miharu...somehow not so sweet n tasty. But the pork belly n pan fried charsiew is power...will go back again to try other soup base.  Lots of Japanese there.
3126	I went to try to normal chicken soup base. Yes I think it is a bit oily.  Maybe next time I will try the karashi version.  Oh yes the pork belly is terrific!
4001	Went back again to eat the chicken soup base...much better than the first one I tried...and ate both the charsiew and pork belly again...wooohoooo
89	I thinK may go down to marutama later to try try~
70	What level is Marutama on?
710	Its on level 3.
98	Lucky u. I was the last week, the guy came running out and told ME AND MY FRIENDS they were closing soon. The people in front of me were the last people. Geez. I HATE life like this.
471	anyone tried the ramen shop in the hotel opposite Peninsular plaza? It's a small shop at the corner.. i love their tan tan ramen...
66	Thanks. Any idea if they are open for lunch? Thinking of trying on labour day
20080	Yes, both times I went are during lunch...
192	The best ramen i have eaten so far.. But errrr.... in Tokyo.
13	anyone know their opening time? i went there two time but they are close  dun know if i am sway or wat
318	My besT tried rameN in japan~
1354	1 of the best meal i have in tokyo
391	Just had Jangara Ramen in Tokyo and seriously think it is one of the best ramen i've tried.
136	u guys are lucky.. jangara and ichiran are the top 10s in tokyo...
28	seriously i dun think their food is nice.. but well.. I went there 3 times and only managed to eat the 3rd time..  Somemore alot of stuff on the menu were no longer no sale.. hmm.. but the time.. I suppose u can go try ur luck at ard 630pm they will start at ard that time..
170	how can the ramen we find here compare to jyangara and ichiran in tokyo? I wish...
301	aiji sen good anot
402	When they start out initial was good, now the standard drop a lot~
74	This is the legendary best Ramen from Asahikawa, Hokkaido.   And its coming to Singapore very soon, seriously.
47	rEALLY IS A die die must try LIAO
117	so which ramen you recommend now ? i am more particular in the soup
138	ken's ramen taste like normal maggie mee imo.... after i ate their ramen.. i tot to myself 'so real japanese ramen taste like that?' after then on my perception of ramen dropped tremedously' i guess only only the jangara ramen can arouse the ramen interest in me... maybe i wasnt into the shoyu and shio ramen stock.. i prefer the tonkotsu stock and stock that need hours of stewing..hehe
18	huh. why coming? owner gonna open shop here
932	yes. opening very soon. more news stay tune to this thread.
29682	i have nv heard of this asahikawa ramen before. what is the establishment
476	I went to try Baikohken today and ordered the Miso Chasiew ramen.  The soup was very nice and the charsiew portions were generous. I agree with an earlier poster that their egg wasn't as nice, especially if you compare to the egg at Marutama or Tampopo. The egg I had was a bit slightly overcooked I feel.  I had the full bowl and because I was not that hungry to begin with, I couldn't even finish it. Some of you might want to go for the half-bowl versions if you are not that hungry instead. I think their portion is even bigger than the Miso Deluxe Ramen from Tampopo.  I will probably go back and try again. Definitely much more worth it compared to overpriced Marutama.
439	tried it with my friend yesterday. Had the shoyu chashu and he had the shoyu butter corn. kifo was right in saying they're very generous with the chasu. i counted 6 pieces myself. One gripe that i had was that the ramen they used was like maggi mee. But the soup was tasty and didn't have the msg thirst. Will be back to try their shio and miso ramen. overall a nice experience.
593	Looks like mixed response to this new place leh....nvm, will still go try...
56	lol, i think i'm on a ramen binge nowadays. Dropped by Muratama Ramen earlier last evening for dinner.  Overall, i can say i'm quite disappointed about this place despite the slightly nice reviews be others. has the Chilli chicken soup base while my date took the aka ramen. also ordered a side of Tamago. the tamago was nice, But the soup was a total letdown.   One taste and i had to drink water to push down the msg taste. The aka tasted quite strongly of coriander, so it didn't sit really well with me. tasted alot like tom yum too after my date squeezed the lemon in.   The only redeeming point might be the men itself, as it wasn't the generic maggi mee kind that baikohken uses, more like a slightly thicker mee kia. Chashu was abit hard, and tasted way too salty.  overall, quite a lousy experience. I still stand by BaiKohKen with their superior soup, Followed by Osho for overall experience. will try Tampopo today.
98	you should try ichibantei and miharu too.. but not too bad..  just avoid ajisen, uma uma men or ramen ramen..
9	I didn't find Marutama that good as well. Too much MSG.
352	i see a lot of great misconception here.  Hokkaido ramen like Sapporo ramen are supposed to be salty.  It is tailored for their cold weather condition that's why most of us could not stomach it here.
41	My best ramen experience is still Ichiran I had in tokyu. Nothing come close here in Singapore, at least, I still couldnt find one at the moment..
69	did u try marutama , ken noodle , baikohken etc?? how does it compare to ichiran in scale
21	I prefer marutama over the rest.. but still pale in comparison to ichiran. There is a form for you to fill in ichiran, to state your preference in soup aroma, spiciness, noodle texture.. etc.  In term of perference...   Marutama - Tampopo - Ken - Baikokhen  There is another good one if you happen to be in tokyu.  Chabuton Ramen at Yodobashi building in Akihabara.
22	how is the rating like.. upon 10.. for both ichiran and local ones
81	hey so hmm.. in singapore which place sells the best ramen.. how come recently keep toking abt japan.. haha.. i'm nt that rich till i can buy an air tix to japan to eat a bowl of ramen? lol..
10	Akiba? No thanks. It's a better place for electronics. You can simply take a ~45min train to Shin-Yokohama where they have a Ramen Museum there. Simply fantastic. They've gathered all the famous ramen shops from all over Japan to setup in that Ramem Museum.
837	Another nearer option...take yamanote line and drop @ Shinagawa station in central Tokyo...down there also got one row of Ramen shops...supposed to be best of the best too...
9348	i ate the devil ramee before @ fareast .. quite okie. i like their mushroom spread... very mushroom/healthy feel.
99	bumpity bump bump. Anyone have any other recommendations for good ramen?   already tried tampopo and i must say their shabu shabu ramen is very subpar. maybe need to try other soup bases.
2125	The Shabu Shabu Ramen in Tampopo is quite disappointing, with fatty bacon-lookalike pork and chilli flakes all over the soup, it's quite bad.  You should try the Kyushu Ramen. It's the one that everybody's talking about
6491	i see. will drop by when i can to test it out.
28	I went back to Baikohken to try their Miso Butter and Corn Ramen. I think I like this ramen, especially after adding charshu to it. However their Ajitama is still nowhere near Marutama's standard and the one I had was almost fully cooked.  Still, Baikohken's bowls are pretty big and filling so I would still recommend this place over Marutama.
283	One man's meat is another's poison. Japanese generally are not as health conscious as Singaporeans. They go for the taste and worry about fats later. My Japanese colleagues happened to love the Shabu Shabu Ramen at Tampopo.   I have to agree with them. Those so-called katsu don sold in commercialized Japanese restaurants and food court has no kick compared with those that comes with a layer of fat on top of the pork cutlets
338	Yes. I would heartily recommend Baikohken as well. The Japanese chef there very funny guy!
800	I agree that the Tampopo shabu shabu ramen is quite disappointing! So the Kurobuta meat they serve really is fatty and baconlike - I thought I kena a bad serving or something.
5135	Kurobuta supposed to be more fatty than usual pigs we are accustomed to.  Not to mention it has this very porky aftertaste. My mom thought the pig has turned bad LOL. It is an acquired taste.
52	Had Baikohken last night. Ordered a half size Miso ramen with char siew and egg, came up to $11. Found the soup thick and satisfying, the char siew was a good cut and tender (the taste not as strong / power as Marutama though some people find Marutama's char siew salty), and I'm glad to report the egg was nicely done, not overcooked at all. Only gripe is the egg felt "colder" than the soup and noodles? I'm assuming it was pre-prepared and they didn't warm it up properly.
79	theres an article on ramen in todays newspaper rite?
31	No, this is the correct style. When I ate at Japan the egg was cold as well.
56	Help needed, anyone know where to get the tea they serve over there?  Thanks
116	Oh! I've never paid attention to be honest, when eating the eggs from other ramen places, except last night's was noticeably colder
247	Today's sunday lifestyle newspaper page 24 got a full page about ramen  any comments about their recommended ramen shops?
108	yeah , recommend some good and not so expensive?
6686	Plain half-sized ramen $8  2 pc Char siew $2  Egg $1  I actually find this quite reasonably priced for a good ramen liao. It's the best balance of taste and price   How cheap you want??
23	I am also curious where to get the tea. I know its called something like   Roasted tea?   I drank it numerous time b4 in japan. got this 'chao ta' taste. very unique
23047	i way i describe it, it your green tea with some kopi-o scent..
113	Tot the one at kyo-nichi is quite good and they have a set menu @ $12.90++ which comprises of a selected range of ramen + 1 drink and 1 side dish.... quite a good value for money
227	hokkaido fair @ tampine got sell ramen @$11.  quite pricing...  however i shall update all, if anyone try. please do a detail review.
1356	I tried liow...dun put all the condensed soup unless u have a very big bowl. Very salty. N the solidified fats are quite a turn off. Taste wise is ok lor. Would say dun bother, wanna have good ramen just go to those places mentioned in this thread.
78	I went back baikohken. This time round I ordered the half bowl instead to leave room for their gyoza. I must say their gyoza is not bad!
822	tompopo or somethign like that. something "popo" one. it's at the basement of liang court.   the broth is supposely cooked for 48 hrs or so.  it's nice!
18808	Awesome, I'm also a die hard fan of baikohken already.
519	We went Marutama. cant taste nuts but coriander in their Aka Ramen (7 nuts blend base). personal fav is chix base with green chilli (like jalapeno). v apt for cold rainy days.  //cos i like Jalapenos
14	baikohken got a review from wobao last few days back
20	Just fyi, Ichiban Tei has moved....but not far lah, from one corner of the building to another...
68954	the older oulet?  @ robertson quay..?
23	WenT eat few daYs bacK~~jus before they closEd at 3pm~notch bad but stiLL not as gooD as wat I had in japaN~but could be the besT of the croP amongst ramen shoPs here~and I see got few jap speakinG staFF there dun knOw they jap or locaL speak jaP~
217	Short of Ichibantei, I've tried Marutama, Tampopo, Ken's Noodle House, Baikohken, and Miharu.  So I'm wondering where you get off saying 'Marutama sounds like a whole bunch of hype' when you haven't even tasted it for yourself?
2131	Just went to this Hakata Nihon Ryori to try their Kyushu Ramen...OK tasting but can't really match up to these ramen only shops. Wanted to go Miharu actually but then its closed on Wed.
386	where is this hakata nihon ryori place?  anyway, i am going japan in nov! both hokkaido and tokyo! anyone wants to recommend their favorite there?
1177	Personal favorite ramen is Kado Man, at the Grand Plaza Parkroyal (I think).
300	Its along Mohd Sultan lor, quite near to UE Square.
475	it seems like u never tried what they are famous for leh.. the tonkotsu ramen  the soup is not salty at all and taste very nice  i am not a very salt tolerant person but if this taste ok to me  should be ok for most people  yes the deluxe miso sucks
1899	Anyone tried Men-Tei @ Robinson Center? Maybe you can check them out - .
42	is tampopo that bad?  my friends and i went last night  the whole lot of us who order ramen was terribly disappointed with the taste of it  some who visited marutama before was dissing it   my order of kuro-buta shabu shabu ramen tasted like chilli water ramen
6	You ordered the wrong one liao. They are more famous and specialised for its Kyushu Jyangara Ramen, as well as their Sapporo-based Ramen. The Black-pig Shabu Shabu is basically just overgulfed chilli over tonkotsu-soup base, spoils the overall ramen eating experience. The other time I brought Jimmy and Timothy they all to Tampopo, all tried the Kyushu Ramen as recommended by me, all are singing praises for it. I went there more than 3 times liao so far, can say their Tonkotsu Ramen has consistent taste unlike some other places. (*coughichibanteicough*)
6	eh aaron we went w jac n gang last night  the rest ordered kyushuu(8 orders of that IIRC)  they are so angry over the taste of the ramen stock  din have time to go baikohken to try their stuff  ramen n dumplings
1035	Chef screwed up on a busy sunday evening? lmao really have no idea, the previous occasions for my Kyushu, all were consistent and gd. Perhaps it's because I went in the afternoon, and u guys had the leftover servings from the pot as they didn't bother to rebrew it since the day is ending liao, considering how late u guys usually go for dinner after jac they all close shop.  I heard for Tonkotsu-based ramen (meaning pork bone soup), Hakata has the best so far, been hearing alot of praises of it on local food blogs. Will try to find one day to feedback here by giving my own personal experience. So far for now, I'm trying to avoid Ichibantei as much as possible liao, their ramen just isn't consistent anymore.
19053	far east sq also got one...
1227	anyone tried Menya shin chan at robertson quay? juz tried it on sat wif my other half....its along this small alley, can't really spot it along the main row of shops ard tt area...i must say, its pretty cheap ($11 per bowl) and it has this "seafood" base which includes either bonito flakes or sardines. u folks can go try it! oh ya, we tried the gyoza and it comes with this thin flakey top (tastes bit like wanton skin) covering all 5 of the gyoza. quite a unique way of presenting this dish.  it comes with 10% service charge but no 7% gst!
346	I am also gatecrashing this thread to show you Tokyo's Kyushu Jyangara Ramen!  BEST EVER!!!!
502	tried baikohen recently...my gf had the butter corn soup while i had the charsiew soup...both of us felt tat the ramen taste more like instant noodles. and the soup stock was nothing to rave, pretty diluted in fact. marutama gets our vote for the better ramen. the only + from baikohen is the gyoza... which i felt was really nice.   so far only tired this 2 places.  marutama - good soup stock, average ramen, pricey  baikohen - instant noodles, diluted soup stock, nice gyoza
75	I tried Hakata but found it very disappointing. Hmm.
453	Been to a few places after reading this thread. Before this I only knew of Aijisen   Baikohken: Noodles I agree with most that at first look it reminded me of instant noodles. I had the miso charshu ramen. I thought it was pretty ok. Soup was a bit on the salty side but then it is miso so I can't really complain.   Ken's Noodle House: This is the place you'd go if you like big portions of noodles. The soup is pretty ok. I like the Charshu. Most people talk about melt in your mouth kind of charshu, but I like mine with more bite. The charshu here is thicker than most of the other places. No GST so thumbs up for Ken.  Ichibantei: I had their miso charshu ramen and even upsized it to 1.5x but still the portion was small. I would commend them for their generous portion of bean sprouts if it didn't spoil the taste of the soup. The taste of the bean sprouts killed the soup. There is a difference between melt in your mouth and disintegrate in your mouth and what we have here is the latter for the charshu. Terrible. I don't blame Ichibantei considering that it isn't like the rest, a restaurant specialised in ramen.   Ramen Ramen: Aijisen clone that serves deep fried dumplings and masquerade them as gyozas?! Do not go. Period.  Kyonichi Ramen (Marina Square, Opp Pasta de Waraku): Been there twice. Nothing special. Yet another Aijisen clone. Think they ODed in the salt dept for the karage.   Marutama: Overpriced. Definitely. Some people like the chicken soup base but really it reminds me of Knorr Chicken stock cubes. Only saving grace is the $1 for extra serving of noodles but even then still too expensive.   Some more places yet to try out that are on my list are: Tampopo, Miharu(everyone is raving about it!), Men-tei.   Recommendations are welcome!
3142	I find Miharu to be the most salty of all those listed (except Men-tei, never been to before), so be prepared.
7925	I am not eating any ramen here until i go to tokyo and sapporo in NOV!!!
27	man miharu.... i dont know what to say...it as so salty...  i mean i have a really high tolerance lvl for salt...but miharu was over the top.....  im sorry, i rarely crticize food publicly but miharu was really disappointing to me..  especially after all the rave reviews i got here... i was really looking forward to it..  though i must say when i tried it, a couple months back... i told myself maybe its just thier "off" day  so i will return to try again and let u all know =)
19	TamPoPo stiLL the okays one after all~
5928	Hello, erm just to ask, which is more salty? Miharu or Tampopo's tokyo ramen? I went to try Tampopo's Kyushu ramen, while my bf tried its tokyo ramen. We switched and I felt that the tokyo ramen very salty.
1474	Kyonichi Ramen (Far East Square): Nice soup stock (supposed to be rich in collagen) and good selection of other side dishes and desserts.   Marutama: Pricey but I like the soup stock and the Rutan (al dente braised egg).
30	Two reviews on my blog.    I have been to quite a few others as well. Just that I didn't have a review up for them.  The latest one I visited was Baikohken. There is one short review on it coming up. But it is not going to be nice I expect.
1757	Ajisen? Well, after u hv gone thru those that are recommended here, u won't go back Ajisen anymore....at least that is what happened to me.
2721	anything except ajisen..
24	went to Baikohken yst .. hmm during lunch time .. qued for awhile, ordered the syoyu ramen and gyoza.   Was quite disapppointed. Not really fantastic, however serving was satisfying ..   prefer marutama.. at least is abit diff from the rest and the egg their is superb..   should haven gone to try tampopo instead =( ..
1603	If you noticed, Baikohken and Osho has a very similar, if not the same miso ramen.  Osho uses off the shelf miso soup. Go figure.
6	didnt try their miso leh ..
1054	Any way I suspect the shio and shoyu ones are just like what you get at osho as well.   Tried Bie Fu today. Can only taste the hotness in their spicy soup = =" maybe some people just like the sheer spiciness.
1523	second that!  every visit was a disapointment. no more ajisen for me
77	To be fair Ajisen ain't that bad lah...at least when it first appear I quite like it.
54	Ajisen by all means is not horrible. It is the classic "not so good and not so bad" kind of ramen. Which is both its strong point and weakness.   You can always count on Ajisen to deliver the "standard" expectation of ramen, even though it might not taste fantastic. The taste is sacrificed for the sake of standardization across the franchise.   I still visit the chain once in a while.
0	bie fu .. the spicy one okay lar .. the spicy ramen can eat.. their normal soup one .. oh no.. cannot make it..   if u have 'feel' tat day, wan to eat something very spicy can go bie fu .. other then tat .. not a wise choice..
289	Seriously, there are other ramen chains with better standard, so can't blame it on standardisation. I haven't stepped into Ajisen for ages...
3	Yeah, I agree. Maybe some people just like the hotness. But if you add so much chili you can't really taste anything else besides the soup.
351	Half the ramen shops here are chains. Some are better yet there are also many that are worse. You can't fairly say that Ajisen is the worst of the lot.
3	great world city - sapporo ramen?
46	pardon me but i like Zhong Hua Ramen  its a franchise all over singapore and even in Hawker centres also  thier crispy chicken ish god-like
100	Ichibento @ Nankin Row.  Not too bad IMO
695	Okay, just to clarify, Ajisen is among the worst among those I have tried. I can't tell for sure how many are in this worst lot, but now I usually gather reviews before going off to try a new place.
743	Xingan87 and Dreamer75, more info pls...  great world city - sapporo ramen - shop name?  Ichibento @ Nankin Row - address?
102	I think the one at GWC is Sapporo Ramen Bishamon. Haven't been there before but I might just add that to my list of places to go.   As for Ichibento...I think he meant Ichibantei (China Square Central outlet) based on Nankin Row.  I had a bad experience at Ichibantei but that was Robertson Quay outlet. Not sure if the one at China Sq will be better.   Haven't been able to go for my ramen fixes due to work. A pity Miharu is closed on Wednesdays...my off day...
160	maybe i will be going on sat, n give u guys some feedback.. haha =)
568	Thanks for the link...will go try out Ramen Bishamon. Ichibantei is OK mah, been there a couple of times.
917	it will be gd if there is a list of all the ramen...all the restaurant names are all over the place..very messy
33	Hope this help
2906	Great list. I think I will update the one on my blog and post a review for each one that I visit!
357	I can't remember the name but there is a very good ramen shop at Central Mall...  Level 3 or 4...there are 2 or 3 Japanese restaurants there  I will repost when I remember the name
266	Marutama Ramen.  I think most ramen fans have visited that place already, but thanks any way.
449	Ramen Ten is on the list? Geez...
399	IMHO Marutama too expensive and over rated la...
373	Depends on individual...I hv brought different frens n colleagues to Marutama, some loves it, some say too oily and some say pork bone soup better than chicken soup....
1009	not true.for bie fu's even though its really spciy(depend on what level ya order) you can still taste the sweetness of the soup.Im addicted to it till its a must try at least once every month
3171	Sweetness? Of course you can taste the soup, whatever that's left in there besides chili. If not it will taste the same as chili paste in plain water.  My point is most "soup" will taste just like that after you added the same amount of spices into it just like Bie Fu. And I personally don't think that's a great way to go.
131	Saw that Men-Tei @ Robinson Center is open for dinner. Anyone check it out already?
897	Serious? Men-tei opens for dinner? I thought they close when they run out of noodles?
1807	Okay... back from Mentei. Checked with the staff and yes, they open at night as well. They just started opening in the evenings this week. 6:00-10:00pm So those who don't work in the CBD area can go there and try it out for yourselves after work.   I had the Tonkotsu Ramen. The soup was pretty alright. Noodles were ok. The yakibuta was a little thin and the bowl had only 2 slices.   The best part about the whole thing was probably the tamago. The yolk was semi solid and semi runny. Interesting experience for me considering that I never had tamago done this way before.  Damage to wallet was still quite ok: $13. No GST or service charge.   Might go back there to try out the Miso Ramen.
81	there is sweetness unless there's something wrong with your taste bud......
72093	Unless you can't read, I have already stated what I think in the previous post.
8	Any Recommandation for Ramen... my di is going for another hunt of Fantastic Ramen in S'pore with me tomorow... i heard there's on in Upper Thomson road or sth... can anyone tell me the name or... how to go ???   Tried Ken House Ramen... so far is best... still finding the BEST OF THE BEST ramen in SINGAPORE !!!
1509	Sharksfin ramen topped with char siew, mushrooms and beansprouts,
6241	Marutama is nice but comparatively more expensive.
1015	I would like to recommend Menya Shinchan Ramen (and no its not Crayon Shinchan), its located at a quiet corner at Riverside View. There are seats outside the shop (with table fans if it gets too warm) and also the usual seats in the shop itself and the bar tables and seats right in front of the chef.   The service is good and the food comes in reasonable time. Theres quite a fair bit of condiments on the table for your ramen soup. It was my 3rd time at this place and i ordered the Shoyu Tonshio Ramen (Rich) - Soya Sauce Pork Bone  The noodles were springy and nice, a very good compliment to the soup. The soup itself was thick and not overly saltish. It also came with some garlic flakes, spring onions and some bamboo shoots and not forgetting the egg as well. Because of the good blend between the noodles and the soup, the bowl always ends up empty when we head there for a meal. Did i mention about the char shiu? It was very good....and the fats and meat blended perfect with the rest of the dish and unlike some places where the char shiu either left a bad aftertaste, tasted too pork-y or overly dry, this was well made, very tender.   Vegetable lovers can also take note of the Sanjiro Ramen, which has plenty of greens stacked alongside a big bowl of noodles. You can also add noodles and it comes in 1/2 and 1 ball extra of noodles. Trust me though, you probably would be stuffed without the additions as it is quite filling. Extra Char Shiu can also be added although it doesn't come out to many extra pieces as well.  Overall i find this ramen better than marutama for the price (because it costs around 11 per bowl of noodles), the selection, the environment (i dunno, i seem to like a small corner shop ramen concept) and personally i feel chicken broth is too common in a chinese family dinner menu.   Anyway pipz who are interested to explore and eat good ramen and haven't given this place a bite yet, give it a try!  Location : #01-05, 30 Robertson Quay, Riverside View  Singapore 238251
4128	Went and did a mini review.  It is pretty alright and the broth taste different. Definitely deserves more attention from ramen lovers.
25930	I tried Menya Shinchan Ramen too. It's worth the trip. Ramen price between 11 to 14 bucks per bowl. Add noodles from $1 to $4. Depends  how much u can fill ur stomach. U can add the chasiew with a extra charge too.   The soup comes with 2 types (thick or thin) I tried the think soup based, it's not over-powering. =) The egg like a standard ramen resturant does pretty good. Fully boiled but the yolk is still cream-like. Just like jelly. Char siew is nice and tender. Noodles is Q and not too think. Not those kind like maggie mee.   The staff was patience to explain to us wat's good in the menu.   Overall, it's a worthwhile trip.
157	After coming back from Japan, I gave Singapore's ramen stores a break until I tried... Ramen Santouka at Central Level 2. I had the shio version and I must say their tonkotsu base is really good! This is now the TOP ramen in Singapore for me. Marutama will start suffering until they cut their price!
534	Agreeee!!!~~~trieD it las weekenD an must say it is fabulouS~!Esp their fatty slices of porK ramen dat cost $18(dun know wat call)
1770	Looks like I've got another ramen place to try out. Wanted to bring my friend to either Miharu or Menya Shinchan, though I've tried both before, for Ramen Santouka what are the opening hours during the weekends? seems tempting to try the Tokusen Toriniku ramen over there.
1305	Sounds good. Thanks for the heads-up bro, I have been looking for new places for good ramen other than my regular hangouts (Marutama and Tampopo). Thx to u now I got new places to venture and try out liao, hopefully it lives up to expectations.   Will try it out soon and feedback to this thread, how the price range for the ramen at Ramen Santouka?
77	I recommend Men Tei which is near the the MPH [Tanjong Pagar] - actually quite near Hans. They have 4 types of ramen - Tonkotsu, Shio, Shoyu &amp; Miso Its pretty nice and affordable. $13 per bowl with free flow of green tea/water + no GST &amp; service charge. I find it worthwhile to eat there.
700	Santouka is excellent....just as Kifo mentioned, top tonkotsu based ramen for me too....but its still very new and many stuffs on the menu are still not avail.  If u intend to order the toroniku, its a little too salty for me... But the soup is really to die for...
16277	I had the A set which came with spring onion rice and an egg... which was 15.50 I remember?  The egg was very good (as good as Marutama's) although the rice was nothing special.
985	just like to give a mini review for sapporo ramen bishamon @ B1 Raffles place Marketplace. My advice is to stay away, as i feel the standard there very lousy. Had the shoyu ramen, which was very tasteless. The men did not have a QQ feeling to it, more like undercooked hard and chewy. chashu was normal, the only redeeming point of the whole meal was the ajitama, which was cooked to perfection. Gyoza was terribad with a very thick layer of skin (i think they didn't recieve their salt stock that day, everything damn bland), the agedeshi tofu skin was thick also.   friend had the miso which didn't taste as rich as Baikohken and Osho. Their spicy Miso ramen was just ordinary ramen with rayu added on top.  overall, damn bad experience. i had to go to that Marce style Jap food bazaar located nearby to finish off my meal.
1037	I like Ramen Tei. It's good.   Esp the Tom Yam Beef Noodles.  Lol.
1559	Just went to try Menya Shinchan Ramen. No where near as good as Santouka imho. Probably I hv a heavier taste bud, the soup is not sweet enough...and they put beansprouts in their soup (which spoils it for me really).
2937	Yeahhh! I was astonished when visiting Santouka ramen's Asahikawa's original outlet during our Hokkaido trip in 2006. The toroniku ramen was so fabulous that we had no choice but to extend our stay for a few hours more in Asahikawa just to have another bowl for dinner.  I am going to try the Singapore outlet, hopefully it won't be a disappointment. $18 is quite expensive, consider its 1000 Yen price in Japan, but if it's good, it's well worth the price! BTW, I checked my photos taken in Asahikawa, there were 9 pieces of toroniku meat in the plate, but when checked the Singapore store, it seems only 7 pieces...
12863	Just went and tried the Marutama Ramen...pretty good but quite exp too...   overall 8/10
247	Any new reviews of Santouka? Most blogs have yet to visit this place, and I was thinking of bringing a date there this Friday.
632	bring date eat ramen?? i wouldnt recommend thou.. ramen is men's food
482	mind giving e exact address for no. 1 to 5 ?
40	Prefer  a) Ramen Ramen  b) The Ramen store at central beside waraku ( Forget name )
116	Here you go. Just a matter of using   1. Marutama Ramen  6 Eu Tong Sen Street  #03-90/91 The Central @ Clarke Quay   2. Ichibantei (Has more than one outlet but giving the Robertson Quay one since all around the same area)   60 Robertson Quay  #01-04 The Quayside   3. Sapporo Ramen Miharu (One of the hardest to find IMHO)  1 Nanson Road  GF The Gallery Hotel   4. Tampopo   177 River Valley Road  #B1-50 Liang Court Shopping Centre   5. Noodle House Ken  150 Orchard Road  #01-17/18 Orchard Plaza   Sounds like Santouka is a place not to be missed. Need to save up before going to eat there.
93	She loves ramen to death, so I don't think it's a bad idea.
1139	Hv been to Santouka 3x since my last post. The menu is now complete...n still think is the best of those I hv visited. My wife thinks its a little oily but ramen are mostly like that...
1946	just went Santouka last night with my gf as she is a ramen lover, i must say the service is good and the food aint bad at all. overall she was happy so its ok haha
1104	How to make reservation at Santouka? Called their number and it doesn't work.
14	Having very bad ramen craving, going at 2+ pm to try Santouka
10	IIRC Santouka dun allow reservation...must go there n queue.
146	Yah managed to call through earlier, no reservations allowed...  Thankfully my female parter does not mind, hopefully dinner time not too crowded.
121	Came back liao. Had the special order from Santouka which is the $18 order, some special pork cheek or something. Think I had 6 or 8 pieces of pork, served on a separate plate with the usual condiments. They braised it damn well, don't know how many hours man, the pork is completely suffused with the taste and flavor of the braise, and it's so tender and soft it falls apart. The fat on it is shiok too . But those with a light palate might find it salty. The miso soup is extremely rich, think comparable with Maratuma's special nutty soup base. When the bowl is served, you can see a thin layer of oil. They use sesame seeds liberally. The noodles remind me of Tampopo's ... on the thin side, a bit like maggie mee which my friend doesn't like (but he said in this case he doesn't mind because the soup makes it all worthwhile ), but it's cooked al dente so that's fine. Overall very hearty and flavorful, can imagine how lovely this would be in a cold weather. But my friend and I kept clearing our throats after leaving the place ... so maybe a bit overdosed. Will go back to try the shio and shoyu base, might be easier on the throat.
465	Hope you don't mind me adding in this  6. Santouka  6 Eu Tong Sen Street  #02-76 The Central
717	I m sure ur partner wun mind after tasting the soup...think its certified good by so many forum members here.
474	Me and my partner had a nice time. While I find the egg's yolk not done well (not soft) enough, the ramen was fantastic. The toroniku was fantastic, flavoured very nicely, and the ramen base (shoyu) was just nice. Seems like a lot of the patrons there obey the 10 minute ramen rule also since I didn't have to wait long!
44	Never heard of a ten minute rule? Is this some kind of official rule? I know japanese will usually not linger after meal as there are usually people wanting to sit down waiting outside...
10331	Santouka Ish numban ichI!!!~~
25	tried santouka this week and i like it better than marutama! the pork fats with salt fused into it is not recommended for folks who dun like saltiness  the amount of salt in the shoryu stock i took is child's play compare to the pork cheek  the gyoza can be missed(even ohsho @ orchard cuppage has better gyoza to offer imo) the main point @ santouka is still the pork cheek(else u can visit other ramen joints in sg) pics later
88	i love the ramen from the japanese restaurant at the basement of paragon.. there's a glass window to show how the chef makes the ramen
514	That one in the basement of Paragon is a soba restaurant. Soba uses buckwheat.
14	Strangely enough, there's only buzz about ramen, but there isn't any buzz on udon or soba for that matter.   Still waiting for end of month paycheck to come before going to Santouka. T_____T
202	Yeah man ... wish there are some udon speciality restaurants. I like udon.
4207	my mouth almost drop to the floor when i saw the bill after i dine @ santouka  27 with gyoza and shoryu ramen(premium pork included) but its good stuff
665	Spicy Cha Shu Ramen but the soup is really a bit salty
11435	yummmy.....
639	Marutama Ramen's service sucks.. It turned me off totally that I cannot remember if the Ramen is nice or not.. Totally spoilt my day when I went there the last time.. and I will never go back as the ramen did not leave an impact on me anyway. Ken Noodles is not bad.. one of the most frequent ramen stall i go to..  Tampopo has nice eggs and soup base.. Miharu is not bad too.. can be abit salty but can request to add more soup so that it wun be too salty.. It leaves me craving for more..  Have yet to try Santouka though.. heard good ratings for it.. will try it someday.. beri soon..loL
10	Sapporo Ramen Miharu Fish-based soup ramen Sapporo Ramen Miharu Garlic Char Siew ramen Ken noodle Char Siew ramen Ken noodle cold ramen
405	Personally, I think that Marutama's ramen sucks. Tastes like Ajisen. Have tried Santouka before and I rather like it.
28800	hmmm isnt the saltiness infused in the soup?by adding more soup the level of salt shld be the same no? or they prepare the soup and other soup condiments on a per serving basis?
2	Not really. The soup has a base level of saltiness. What really add on to that is the other sauces/ingredients added into the soup to make it the flavour you want.  Miso, Shoyu (soy sauce), Shio (salt) all adds to the saltiness. So if you order a miso ramen with more soup in it it will dilute the miso and make it less salty. Assuming the soup is less salty than the miso.
1652	Ramen Santouka looks good, will be sure to try it out soon. Will post a review on my blog after doing so.
1200	Actually there is one udon specialist. Curry udon though. Wakashachiya, also at The Central.  Wonder if there are any more others that we still don't know of. Udon when done well can be very tasty!
12	Does the udon soup taste as good as those in ramen? Most I hv eaten do not.
255	Different 'cos udon soup is usually plainer.
974	Yeah, thats what I thought
3347	Tried Santouka yesterday. Found it very salty.
159	This is how the egg yolk should look like (I took this when I was in Japan a few years back)  This is how pathetic the egg at Santouka look like. Notice the egg yolk towards the bottom. Its not the flash or the lighting - its a solidified egg yolk!
1013	There are many ways to do the egg. I have eaten many ramen in japan and not once was the egg the same.  I think Santouka's egg is perfectly fine. On another note, Tampopo has shifted to the ground floor and it is definitely a better place compared to the cramp restaurant downstairs which is now occupied by Ichiban. And they now have different variations of their favourites ramen; they newly introduced the Black Pig Shabu Shoyu ramen and the Kyusha Jyangara Shoyu ramen...
1491	Yes yes....most important is the soup, then the noodles, then the charsiew ...but then that's just me.  Kifo, thanks for the update, time to revisit them...for that matter, thanks for starting this thread.
1343	As promised, a trip to Santouka to try out the noodles. Detailed review at my blog.
1180	Hi guys   I always had this question in my mind, for those that had tasted ramen in japan before,  Can you list out those shop in Singapore that can or almost match their standards?  I mean, gods know for sure, if what we makan in those japanese name shop here really know what/how  JP Ramen been made/cooked/
14	Both myself and my wife are ramen fans, and we had eaten many bowls of ramen during our trip to hokkaido. If you ask me, I would say that Santouka is the best ramen outlet in Singapore, which is very very close to its Japanese standard. But to be honest, the Japanese outlet, at least the one we visited, the very first original outlet of Santouka in Asahikawa, is still better. Yes, it's salty, as many said in the forum, as well as my friends told me. But it is as salty in Japan if not even more. So, if you want authentic Japanese taste, it's like that. Another one I feel quite close to Japanese standard is Miharu. Well, I am not fan of  Marutama though.
190	shio ramen based soup in japan is indeed salty, sometimes too salty for me so i prefer miso based and syouyu based. imo
166	okie, thanks rebook and info, I will go try try
320	One thing money cannot buy in Sg is Winter....ramen tastes better when eating in cold weather.
119	I remembered I had my first authentic ramen at this place in tokyo back in 2003, I had miso chashu and it was sooooooo salty that my tongue was numb after I walk out of that place!
1182	well for me i prefer spicy ramen =D
24	where's the Santouka restaurent you mentioned... i maybe go there try out their Ramen compairing with Ken House Ramen...
173	went Santouka today. Had the Shio ramen and the soup's indeed great. Ordered the Shio ramen set meal with the egg and the rice, and shared the choice pork with my friend, and walked out feeling really full and satisfied
1196	found a review on Santouka   well, everyone have their own say, so, for people enjoy it, good.   For those who dont, better luck else where
111350	Oh now the place accepts VISA... finally!
249	naruto love ramen... so do i
460	Damn this looks yummy
2639	any idea how to be member of Ajisen Ramen
624	There are a few places for ramen depending on your taste. for me, its Ramen Santouka, menya shinchan and noodle house ken for their cold ramen. I did not try a lot of places so not very sure how their standards are.   I like ramen that is a little al dente, slightly chewy and of course the meat (char shu) must be nice and tender.
63	I thought the curry udon at Wakashachiya was decent. Just that the ingredients were terrible. I went for the SPH thing somemore. Can't imagine how it would be like if I were to go myself. Can see my post on it .
2016	I thought . It's better than most udons I've tried and the curry is spicier than the usual japanese curry. Not to mention the cheese options which was the main draw for me.
31	Cheese option? Didn't saw that when I ate there. Had the ebi tempura curry udon. Quite ok.
67082	Tanpopo at Liang Court offers Kyushu Jangara with stock that slightly resembles the one in Japan. Of course, still nowhere comparable to the real thing.
29	Santouka gets my vote
12	Marutama quite pricey.  Gonna try Tampopo
758	anyone tried this b4? so far me and my gf like this place..  prefer it to the ramen place at central and tampopo
1952	Been there once long long time ago...din give a lasting impression, think the char siew are very huge.  Any new ramen shop opened recently?
46	I love the ramen from minstry of food at bugis. Although it may not be an authentic jap restaurant but the ramen there is one of the best i've tasted...
1495	theres 1 ramen shop at the basement of jp.. i think the char siew and egg is pretty good..
686	try marutama and santouka if you are in the mood to splurge definately better than most sg ramen offering period
55	Ah. MOF.  I tried the Marina Sq outlet and it was good and reasonable price. Recommended. Service was very good too.
1565	It makes me want to kick myself for not buying a packet of instant ramen instead.  Hmm it's the one near Raffles place right? Among one of the shop houses....pretty bad impression of it.
173	best ramen i have tasted is in tokyo shibuya tenkaippin ramen. We can ask for thick soup and it is very nice and high in collagen. Not sure if they have it here in SG.
2737	i like marutama....  daiskii des..
7775	santouka stiLL ds bestest choiCe!~~~
1017	Yeah, at central, the ramen are the best. Before rating which is good, Firstly you all should find out where they came from. In Japan, there are alot of state. Different place bring out different taste. For Santouka are base from Hokkaido. The chef was from China, but he went to learn from the master which was from hokkaido. Marutama also very nice. The chef was from Japan. You must try their egg. It's very special. firstly, it's hard boiled egg, secondly, the yolk isn't like our chinese Lu Dan, the yolk is still in liquid form! Not harder at all! I was wondering how they made it.
8665	I went to try Ken san ramen at noodles house. Not bad, the soup is nicely cook. Rating 7/10
2	I like the ramen at the basement of liang court!
137	Marutama Ramen  The heavily populate restaurant sees a heavy stream of crowd for this bowl of delightful pleasure
985	just ate there again for dinner..
175	i think it's itchibantei  Here's Tonkotsu Ramen  A favourite of the young and old, the signature Ramen follows the same recipe from Japan.
52	Ajisen not bad mah...  i bought a pack of ramen from hokkaido.  no time to cook leh..
3556	Central got one stall quite nice leh.. 3rd floor i think forgot name liao.
530	i tried this. the soup isnt very good
35	That one quite ex. For $12, you only got a thin slice of char siew + ramen
454	3rd floor is Marutama...2nd is Santouka.
1065	Ajisen standard has dropped recently   well, thats my findings ....
356	santoka ramen! very very strong soup base.. heeeee nt suitable for most singaporean... but personnaly i love it. esp the "hard" boiled egg...
71	Firstly you must know Ajisen chef are from where. The best ramen of course will from Japanese chef.
1542	i take the girls over any of the ramen....
3359	How come this thread suddenly smells of EDMW pcw-ers ah. Btw, Marutama is a nice change once in awhile whenever I drop by Central Mall for ramen, but most of the time when I'm there for my ramen cravings I would pick to go for Ramen Santouka instead. There's just something special abt the soup base and its noodle texture which suits me. But the egg there isn't the base, if u want those inside the egg is soft type with yolk that's already soft instead of harden, try Tampopo or Ichibantei instead they are better with those kind of eggs cos it's their style. (not trying to say Santouka did the egg the wrong way though, as there's many ways of preparing the egg)
859	Santouka ramen still the best for me.  Tried Ippudo ramen in japan but soup base lose to Santouka.
22	actually their first establishment originated in Asahikawa since 1988, which is part of the Hokkaido region in Japan. If you did read up some tourism articles or guides about Hokkaido, Santouka in Asahikawa is actually quite an old establishment famed for their ramen, so they do have their reputation and it's hard to knock off by the other domestic competitors me thinks, afterall Asahikawa is a famous place for ramen.  I think if anyone's heading to Hokkaido the next time, the  is also a must-try judging from what I had heard from my friends. Personally I haven't been to the Hokkaido region before but I will definitely go to Asahikawa one day to try out their miso and tonkotsu ramen, cos I'm really a big ramen fan. ^ ^ Oh btw on a related note, for those who aren't aware of this, Marutama Ramen (originally located at Central Mall) has opened a new outlet at Liang Court just further down a walk from Central, near MOS for those who don't know where is Liang Court. Just thought I will bring this up, may prove useful the next time if u guys find the weekend crowds at Central Mall too much of a long wait just for your bowl of ramen cravings. Cheers!
563	for me santouka is the best in Singapore for now. Really like the Shio soup, the special meat and egg is so-so though. I frequent Ken's ramen more often due to its location at orchard, can they please please expand and open an outlet in orchard   marutama seems a bit instant noodles like, not very nice.  if im not wrong,baikohken's egg is quite nice.
187	If you believe the japanese, every other state is famous for ramen!   They have famous tokyo ramen, sendai ramen, hiroshima ramen, nagasaki ramen, sapporo ramen...   I guess the bottomline is their commitment to honest cooking without shortcuts, no added chemicals, fresh water and ingredients, skilfully handmade noodles, etc. Any shop that commits to these values will generall produce a solid ramen.
60	gimme Marutama Ramen @ Central anytime! Really taste like those I ate in Japan
1278	Hey hey feryl bro, nice to see ya around here. ^ ^ Haha not sure if u remembered me, but we met in real life before previously when u bought a Nintendo DS fat off me sometime back (think was in 2006, can't rem exactly). Yup yup, I do agree with u on the point that almost every other region are good for ramen. However Hokkaido's Asahikawa region may be considered the most famous in the eyes of japanese people for their traditional reputation for ramen taste, it's just like how miso ramen originally originated from Sapporo so Sapporo region is a great place if u're hunting for miso-based ramen. I heard this from my japanese friend though since I haven't been to Asahikawa, but yeah Japan's definitely an overall great place for ramen fans like us. I'm just glad that now with great japanese establishments like Santouka and Marutama over here locally, I won't have to travel to Japan just to have a bowl of authentic style japanese ramen anymore. Of course in the past there's Aji-sen, and I often had Ichibantei for their Super Tantan-ramen (quite shoik if u like spicy stuff), but they are definitely no where the standards of ramen from Santouka or Marutama, all in my honest opinion. Good ramen IMO is not only abt the soup base, it's also abt the noodles texture and additional ingredients that comes with the ramen that the ramen shop offers, that makes it an overall satisfying taste-bud experience. In this aspect, I would say both Santouka and Marutama managed to get it pretty right on the spot.
466	u can try tempopo.. at liang court there.. ramen taste not bad.. and they serve good desserts too..
600	Ramen is all about the soup and the ramen must satisfy you after the first bite. The soup from the restaurant are cooked for at least 8 hours. I was wondering what will it be like just for only 5 mins.
116	Hi es0teric,  The 8+ hours cooking had been done in a factory and packed as "soup paste".   Soup paste is different from the "soup powder" of instant noodle.    Most Japanese restaurants use "soup paste" pack in large containers,   we pack them in small packets with the noodles instead   Many people don't know this and that is why I must clarify the use of "soup paste".  The same with the noodles.  Many ramen lovers pays exorbitant price at Ramen restaurants.  I want to champion  the cause that you can still have delicious ramen at home if you just go for the ramen  and not restaurant ambience and service.  For you only, drop me a email and I can mail you a complementary pack to try   Cheers,  Andy Wong  andy.wong[at]apexgroupasia.com
6	yup, im aware of Santouka in this Asahikawa Ramen Village. In fact, my fren told me there's another ramen shop from Asahikawa Ramen Village which has opened its dorrs in circular road. i am not sure whether is it true cos i dont rem the ramen shop name.
1174	Santouka also have very nice char siew....yummy!
197	I have done a number of ramen reviews on my blog and I am interested to see how good your product is compared to the ones found in restaurants, where can I purchase this product? Besides at the Expo of course.
404	Yes bro. Your nintendogs DS is still going strong and has brought to life to many dull evenings. I'm playing the latest castlevania on it now!   I guess it is a matter of taste, even among the Japanese. Some prefer tonkotsu, so would sway their votes to Kyushu and Chugoku. Others love the shio ramen taste of hakodate and tohoku. The shoyu version is common to all parts, but particularly perfected in Kanto. It is very difficult to say which is a best ramen, because there is just so much variety and method, as well as environmental factors. For example, good inaka/village hokkaido ramen tends to have a layer of oil on the soup. This is to help keep it warm in the icy weather. Kyushu ramen tends to be more hearty because they believe it keeps them going in the sweltering weather. Kanto ramen tends to be lighter, because the merchants and nobility of old favoured delicate flavours of slow boiled fish stock and seaweed, as opposed to animal bones.  I would say that Santouka rates as my favourite in SG currently, and I will be looking forward to try its outlets in Hokkaido (but unfortunately not in asahikawa coz it's out of way for my itinerary) later next month.
46	Hi Littlewild,  Great! Email me your mailing address and I can mail you a complementary pack to try.  Cheers,  Andy Wong
2349	Its not exactly along Circular Road if im not wrong..   U gotta walk thru all the pubs and bars at the end of circular road... then there's this adjoining road u will come across.. i think South Bridge Road?  Turn right and less then 30steps u will come across a Ramen Shop.. i went there once with some clients.. SHIOK is all i can say..   But i forgot the name of the shop... hmmmm.....
164	Is that really so good? There always long Q.  I am going to try out soon.
1538	have ramen at a few places b4. i still love santoka shoyu ramen...  hmmm...  i prefer that kind of heavy taste. as for Marutama ramen, the noodles is gd. but soup base is another style. It light n nice.  cuppage lvl 2 there is a very old skool japanese shop. any1 try there b4?
9	entry on santouka, got soft egg yolk in tsukemen..
641	Please note that this forum is for your personal and non-commercial usage.
802	think its that one but u also 4got the name...sigh....
134	Miharu is good. Heard it's from Hokkaido that's why soup base is thick a bit oily.
2866	went santouka yesterday afternoon... tried the miso based ramen and char siew rice with egg. in my opinion the soup base is good but the noodle itself is so so.. will try the pork cheek next time ..
4	you may try tampopo at liang court
4	Sorry bosss   I only remember the good food.. LOL
114	maybe repeated, but my preference still sapporo ramen miharu at gallery hotel
11	any recommendation for ramen that is not so salty?
218	bookmark for reading later
26793	Marutama and Ramen Sabtouka both located at Central on the 3rd and 2nd floor respectively. Must try the pork cheeks over at ramen sabtouka and the eggs at both outlets!
166	Just a heads up for people who like Kado Man/Kadoman or were thinking of trying their ramen; they've moved. They are no longer at Coleman Street. Kado Man's new location is at 83 Circular Road.  Their old number still works (63394333), so it may be a good idea to save it, and call them for directions.  They seem to have a limited stock of cold noodles; if you go at a late hour without calling to reserve a plate of it, you might not get to eat it. I've tried it (yes, I did call) but I still prefer Noodle House Ken's cold noodles as the latter has more ingredients, and it always looks appetising. Plus, it's always available even if I go at 1 a.m.!  But at Kado Man, you should really try their Tan-tan Ramen that comes in an aromatic soup that tastes as good as it smells.
12	I believe it's called Baikohken @ 7 North Canal Road but haven't got the chance to try it though.
36267	The pork cheeks are a little too salty for my liking but it's good that they standby each table with a jug of water.
335	which restaurant ramen is the most spicy?  today i tried the ajisen volcano ramen.. overrated lei. 4 chili rating. more like 1 to me.
468	My all time fav got to be ... Relatively cheap and good! Not sure if they are still running the Citibank promotion for 2009 tho...
29	got very spicy ramen ?
3	agreed, i think the only one that is spicy is the Beipu (not sure if i got the name correct).  The one outlet at Tiong Bahru.  Try their 6x chilli soup.  Have not tried their 8x.  Only max 6x chilli.
54590	Don't remember coming across *VERY* spicy ramen in Menya Shinchan...  Then again, I am not a spicy ramen person, so I didn't look for it specifically.
55	Ramen fan here,  Been to many ramen shops throughout the years... Long time back Ajisen's ramen is quite good especially its volcano ramen, quite shiok.. over the years standard drop a lot...  KyoNichi ramen, Used to be very good at raffles place area branch.. Last tried at marina square branch.. so so only... commercialized liao ba.  Osho, Not bad, Average only, better than Ajimen  Ken Ramen, Slightly better, but the serving is dam huge!  Tampopo, ok only but i haven't tried the jangaran Ramen. (tried the black pork one.. ok only)  My vote goes to Miharu at Gallery Hotel. The what Pork Salt ramen... Superb sia. but quite salty (Which i like!).   Been to Santouka today tried the Shio soup... ok only, Miso better.... good but not as good as Miharu in my opinion.   I am going tokyo this coming week, going to try Ichiran Ramen that tokyoites rave about... Any forummers got any recommendation for ramen at Tokyo?
69	Tried the ichiran ramen before in shibuya.. they have a form for you to fill to indicate your preference of choice of taste...
275	Super authentic ramen shop run by japanese.
128	Beppu Ramen at Tiong Bahru Plaza.. 2nd level, next to Rajah Inn, opp Sakae Sushi.
23	I'd recommend you try the ramen musem at shin-yokohama, it is about 10-15 mins walk from shin-yokohama, about 45-60 mins trip from tokyo station. It has a collection of about 9 famous ramen shops from all over japan. Everything from kyushu to hokkaido. But i prefer hakata style ramen, which is kyushu style pork bone soup base. Ajisen is suppose to be kumamoto style and it is similar to hakata. If you like hakata style, i would recommend ichiran  there are couple of branches in tokyo, kanto area. you can ask for refill too.
344	Try Ramen Jiro, it is pretty good too 2-14-11 Mita Minato-ku, Tokyo 10am - 4pm daily closed sundays and holidays
114	i prefer santouka over miharu.
6	just had santouka shio ramen today with the pork cheek absolutely delicious
1757	I've got this recommendation too and I'm gonna try Ichiran when I get to Japan (1 more month!)  My personal recommendation is Jangara Ramen. Their Kyushu ramen is simply the best ramen I've ever had. Went to their Akihabara branch twice and had the same thing.
626	I heard a lot about Ramen Jiro.. Anyone knows the directions to This Ramen Jiro in Tokyo?? Near which station?
822	Went to try Menya Shinchan ramen over at Robertson Walk. Ordered the one with black seseami and garlic favour. The soup was very favourable and nice and I think the texture of the noodles is better than santouka. One of the better ramen shop you can find in Singapore.
83	Ichiran is nice cause can customise to your liking (i dun like too salty) but the portion is small therefore might find it a bit pricey.
800	Eat at beppu menkan? Lol the ramen is so so- not very nice because its just overflowing with spiciness. Finished level 8 once and drank down everything =D. Didn't went back because already finished level 8, the food is just so-so. Though it took me like 20 mins to 30 mins to finish the whole bowl simply because its pretty spicy.
5641	the main branch is near MITA station.. i would recommend hirugao.. near shinjuku goen mae.. if dun mind can walk from shinjuku ...  writeups here
5441	Kyushu Jyangara Ramen at Akiba?
50	for me i think menya shinchan serves the best ramen..  so far only tried santouka and marutama the sinjiro ramen from menya shinchan.. ramen jiro style...
202	i like ichibantei - will always order gyoza there and spicy tonkatsu ramen, marutama (chicken stock base not pork rite?)  didnt have the chance to try the remen place at gallery hotel cos it was packed during lunch hours.  hate beppu as i feel that it's cooked by tiongs and standard dropped alot.
753	I was in Cityhall basement and walked pass a ramen shop selling Saporo ramen...anyone tried that and how is it?
75	actually I think Ramen taste is really very subjective.  I tried marutama but did not think that it was that great.  I like the ramen at Tampopo though.  Going to try Ken's noodle next as it is somewhere near my office.
4	I go to work by Mita EVERYDAY. Which exit? THere are like  7-9 exits here.
95	Honestly, I HAAAAAAAAAATE THIS RAMEN. Sorry caps.   Not really my cup of tea - oily and reeks of the pungent aftertaste of cabbage.
3371	den u shld nt try ramen jiro.. directions here
948	update on menya shinchan, had the niboshi shio ramen, which is seafood base for non jap reading guys here.. good, and their additional order of chashu $3 is damn worth it, almost like 10 or more pieces.. unbelievable.. their aji tsuke tamago is also very good, nearing the one i had at hirugao, thou in sg they use local chicken eggs la so no orange yolks...
5	Sapporo Ramen Bishamon!  After I tried the one at Great World, it was quite a @____@ experience. I wish I had taken my $17 and spent it at Baikohken or Menya Shinchan instead. I doubt the other outlets are any better. A quick search on HGW shows the raffles city outlet with the lowest ratings. Lol.
402	The 1st time I had it with my friend, we added extra veggies and it came as a mountain. My friend was complaining, " I thought you say bring me eat ramen. How come we are eating rabbit food?" Even after 10 minutes into eating, still cannot see the ramen because of the huge amount of veggies. Lol. But it's pretty good. Usually I skip the bean sprouts and ask for all cabbage. Yums
3	anyone tried the one below centtrepoint?
1529	Sumi Yakitori #B2-101/104
117	How much for 1?
241	I tried menya shinchan today and I was shock when I see the size of the bowl, only my mother would give me a bowl of noodles this size at home! I am a noodles freak and love my noodles but still that size is a bit too much.  - nice big bowl of noodles with plenty of veggies for $13/=, very reasonable!! - proper wet towel which is very useful because I was sweating non-stop after eating even sitting inside with aircon.  - very generous options of sauces to choose from, chilli oil, vinegar, soya sauce etc etc. - the soup is very oily and not much flavour, just salty. - pork is quite hard - the noodles looks a bit like our yellow noodles but more Q - location is abit out of the way. I would definitely go back again to try other noodles and maybe other food. Looks like they have dandan mien as well. Lunch time can be quite crowded. It was quite empty when I reached there before noon and all the tables outside were filled up by the time I left at about 12.30pm.  Meantime santouka still my favourite mainly because I like the texture of the noodles which is curly curly and QQ.
797	the soup is oily because this is how ramen jiro is made.. the pork used for jiro style ramen is specific to the thick type.. u can request for extra firm noodles..  the soup is flavourful, but not the super heavy flavour, more to the balanced side..
689	I always felt Ajisen noodles are mass produced, so in terms of quality it will lose out to the other players. As for marutama, I have tried it twice and i felt that it is a little expensive for the amount of ingredients and definitely msg poisoning.
45	IPPUDO is opening in orchard, according to yesterday sunday times life section.. opening this year... power sial... early on i saw the boss touring singapore and visiting santouka and the ramen shops in singapore.. now they opening.. SINGAPORE no 2 japanese food outside japan...
190	Ippudo sounds interesting, by far, santuoka's one of my food palate's favorites. Hope ippudo will impress late this year.
32	Bros here can also try Yoshimaru @ Holland Village.
139	Is it any good? Maybe can provide some details?
328	My favourites are Baikohken (springy noodles and great stock) and Ken's Noodle House (best charsiew! can ask for less salt and oil).  And yes, Ajisen sucks. I also can't stand Mentei.
487	baikohken up price allot already hor... half size 13bucks full size 16
323	Indeed. The last time I went to Baikohken, I was like @____@. I guess have to resort to cheaper alternatives like Ken's or Menya Shinchan
115	Baikohken ChaSio Shouyu's ramen still ok lah. Acceptable, for that pricing, I rather go Maratuma or Soukuken.
70750	Soukuken? Is it a new place too?
13	upp this thread... any updates?
48	Yoshimaru Ramen Bar in Holland Village is pretty good. I haven't tried some of the places people recommended but so far Yoshimaru's Tan Tan Mian is my favorite ramen in Singapore. IMHO on par with some of those I tried in Japan (I really miss Ichiran and Jangara ramen). I've only tried their Tan Tan Mian (twice!), my gf tried the Roasted Garlic Ramen (also on both our visits to the place -_-"). I didn't like the Roasted Garlic Ramen so much. The Tan Tan Mian is nice but don't expect it to be spicy. The eggs are really nicely done too, runny but still stays together in the soup. Some blog posts on Yoshimaru: Their website:  - they're managed by Jumbo Seafood.
42	wow... looks good... there's a new ramen place at illuma rite? anyone tried it yet?
8882	wa , i wanna go try the yoshimura liao.. haha
22	Isn't yoshimaru also a kyushu tonkotsu ramen place? I noticed they even opened another branch at East Coast Big Splash. I saw the review on ieatishootipost and it was reported to be good.
616	Yup it's Kyushu tonkotsu ramen, more specifically the Hakata variant.  Couldn't find anything on ieatishootipost for Yoshimura though, would love to read his review!
10325	ooops wrong blog!
1195	Tried the all-in-one... So-so only and relatively more ex... Still prefer Ken's, Baikohken or Ichiban-tei anytime than this. Even Tampopo's Shabu Shabu also much better.  They freaking charge me 2 dollar for hot ocha and 3 dollar for cold ocha... -.-""""  Will not visit that place again, unless all the ramen-ten close down.
1588	Marutaman (i think) @ Central Clarke Quay is good! but its abit pricey. i looovvveeee runny egg!
1177	yes! love marutamen for the eggs and good broth! (:
3379	hm any reviews of the ramen at tonkichi? Might be going down to try soon.
1855	Went Yoshimaru today and had the standard hakata ramen, thought it tastes not bad. The soup are less saltish vs Santouka and the noodles are Marutama type (thinner ones).  They have mini burgers too and its a good appetizer...definitely worth a 2nd visit.
447	the burger onli the chicken is nice...
770	Ramen from Manpuku's Aoba stall
160	Is it? Thats the one I had, lucky me Where is this place?
37148	manuku aoba stall okay la.. i dint really like it very much... tampines 1...
1383	Yoshimaru here is as bad as Ajisen. I recommend you FORGET it. I tried the one at ECP.
428	Aobo in ION Orchard's Miso Cha Su Ramen is pretty salty but it was ok la. the one in Liang Court (Ichiban Tei like most forummers commented), that one is good. the Tonkotsu ramen is pretty authentic. but depends on the shift I think and the ppl that makes the soup base for the day / week.
79	This Aobo @ ION is the one that got Japan ramen champion? Think it was mentioned somewhere in this thread...so its opened already?
1267	yup open liao and long Q last wkend at ION. Nothing to crow about, Santouka remains the best in singapore yet. BUT BUT...the noodle at Aobo is far better than Santouka, which remains its only weakness in their ramen.
113	Ah...will still go try, ate too much of Santoka n Marutama ...thanks.
53	Any nice ramen at orchard?
39	How much dmg ar???
593	13bucks onli..i think most people who have patronised there b4 are more familiar with this picture the   WOW
35	I tried before but don't like it, the amount of cabbage and beansprouts on the top is enough to fill your stomach before you reach the noodles. Also the noodles are more like chinese noodles.
84	wah the ramen looks good.  I like leh.
5	That's because that is how jiro-styled ramen is:thick noodles with lots of veggies and raw garlic on the side. If you don't like the thick noodles then I think you should go for the other types of ramen. I love it, especially with the garlic. Really brings out the flavour.  Personally I find the jiro ramen portion shrinking (anyone else feel the same?)   If I want lots of veggies, I'll go to Shinchan.   If I want meat, I'll go to Baikohken.  If I want value, I'll go to Ken's.
763	Actually I believe that the noodle from ajisen is the authentic one, but their soup base and ingredients aren't that great compared to those I ate in normal stores in Japan. But the noodles' texture is pretty much the same, different from those chinese shou gong mian.
2512	i remember they put spring onion oil over the soup..that blows me away..i tot i was eating chinese mee soup..first n last..but i guess preference is the btm line..
244	Din get to go ION but ended up in Tampines 1 and saw AOBO...not a restaurant but just a stall inside a Japanese foodcourt or something. Shop was mend by a couple of young local guys. Din give me a lot of confidence but tried it anyway.  Lets just say even Ajisen taste better.
5437	Experience @   was mind blowing &amp; unforgettable  The food arrived promptly..probably 10min after order was made the noodle is rather springy resemble maggi mee on e surface soup is pretty aright, thick but dosed with generous amount of MSG The  of the nite  we have 5 customer waiting outside. for a few moments, there was awkward silence and my frn politely askd for the bill she mumbled something as she was walking away from the table sorry? (raised voice) PAY at cashier! I didn't want to make a big fuss at the restaurant and just quickly settled the bill and left. anyway there were 7 of us occupying a table meant for 6 and when e uncouth incident occur, my frn jus finished his less than 5min ago. would i go back again: NOT in a light year!
442	Many years back I was happy to patronise Ajisen. Then one fine day (actually few years ago already), I noticed that they altered their noodle. From Japanese ramen it became Chinese noodles (made with lye). From that day onwards I stopped patronising up till now. Heard about Beppu and visited the Suntec branch (also few years back). Once was enough. That bad. Maybe it's because it's their worst branch but how much does it say about the company?
183	toking about short change... i saw mc cafe toping up their cocoa powder tin with MILO~
533	Anyone knows where can I order this type of Dry Ramen in Singapore? I tried it in Japan I LOVE it!
7873	I assume from the picture that is Tsukemen where the noodles are meant to be dunked into the soup in the bowl next to the heap of noodles you got there?  I recall seeing Tsukemen on Menya's menu. Taste wise I have no idea. Never tried before.
11	Ken's ramen have closed down?
3	Went there last Thu during lunch it was closed. Not sure just close for lunch or permanent closed!
4	I remember some time back I went to Santouka they have dry ramen that you dip in the soup. Look nice but I didn't order it.  I tried the chicken soup base ramen it wasn't nice, the soup is too light! should have just ordered the usual pork base ramen.
886	Went to Ken's house alot of times but never see them open. About 2 weeks already
4	When you go de... and what time... ? they open odd hours de, like 11am - 2pm then 6pm to 2am - closed on Monday. if you go there around the timming i said then still close... most prob. close down le
5	Can anyone list out the list of Ramen restaurants in sg as in those recommended by us de... PS: i think Ajisen Ramen's ramen need some make-over don't you all think ? the taste is not as nice as last time le...
94	I have Just visited them 2 times for the past week at dinner time, they are open for business
320	Oh? I went there every wed from 12pm to 2pm, it's closed leh. Today is the 3rd week liao
4	ahhh....i was telling my fren that i would go back to Ken again after trying the not-nice-ramen at B4 ION .....hope its still open.
45	List down those Ramen restaurants that had Japanese patronising them?  1) Santouka  2) Noodle House Ken.  3)  4)  5)  Pls add on.....
61	*OT a bit*  Is yr avatar Uchiha Sasuke?
2	Hahaha, its Final Fantasy Versus XIII main character, Noctis Lucis Caelum.
45	If u're referring to  at ION Orchard B3, then I'm sharing the same verdict as you as well. Totally disappointed with their soup broth and noodles quality despite hearing so much hype abt them in the news and on some internet blogs. Furthermore Aoba was supposed to be famous from Asahikawa origin from Hokkaido region, similar as Santouka @Central. Charsiew Santouka trashes them, noodles Maru-tama trashes them, I really cannot think of any reason why I would return to Aoba ever again.   Also, it was only after patronising them, I did a search online and realised they are owned by Ajisen Singapore afterall. That probably explains very well why their ramen are of sub-par quality. &gt;____&lt;;I think no point listing down, I have seen alot of outlets here having japanese people patronising them. Some other ones worthy of mention are Tampopo @Liang Court, Ichiban-tei @Robertson Quay and obviously Santouka @Central of course, which is my fav. I'm not sure abt House of Ken but are you talking abt the one located at Orchard Plaza at Cuppage? I think that one's called Noodle House Ken.
23	oic, i go do research on him. hehe
21	Menya Shin-chan has Japanese patronising them as well. Saw 2 of them having the Jiro ramen when I was there on Monday
642	exactly, its a place frequent by japanese!
200	yah went to eat Ichiban at Robertson quay and when we walked by Menya Shin chan, saw 4 japanese sitting there.  When we finished and walked back, saw the 4 japanese leaving the place to go take a cab back to their office? or somewhere else.  Will be going there to try soon.  Am always looking for good ramen.
1657	ThinK SantouKa stiLL the best from waT i trieD~
2	the one that im refering to is at B4...totally cmi....  had tried Aoba too...really not gd   Santouka still my fav now.  how's Ichiban-tei?  is Noodle House Ken closed? yup, me refering to this.
33	would like to try this place too.
465	IMHO, menya shinchan is best, i think   tried all in central...some good in meat, some in eggs, some in noodle. menya shinchan has the most good
27	where is house of ken?
517	Actually it is Noodle House Ken.  There's a map at this link.  It's a little hard to find and now their entrance is at the side.
42	so there is onli 1 branch of house of ken??
225	Santouka is still the best I think. But still nothing beats ramen from Ramen Alley in Sapporo
1029	Dude, it's Noodle House Ken not House of Ken. Since the owner is the one doing the cooking himself, there's only 1 outlet.
582	These 2 food blogs are some that I read frequently, judge for yourself. Actually Ichiban-tei has already been mentioned several times in this thread before, quite surprised you still haven't checked the place out for yourself considering u're an old time regular ard HWZ liao.  My key recommendation is their Super Tantan-men, hav just enough spiciness inside to bring out the whole flavour but not to the extent of making your tastebuds numb like eating some of the local laksas or tom yum soup dishes around here. For those who really know how to intake chilli, do not expect it to be uber spicy like some local spicy food, but those who do appreciate spicy food, let's just say you will definitely like their Super Tantan-men. (not to forget IMO Ichiban-tei serves some of the best eggs ever, at least from all the ramen sampling I had done in Singapore so far myself) They do have another outlet at Liang Court itself, but personally I had never patronise the Liang Court outlet yet ever since it opened there, as I always go to the Robertson Quay one. Do not be surprised if the Robertson Quay outlet doesn't have any crowds when you drop by there on weekends, as opposed to the usual crowds u may be used to when you drop by Marutama or even Santouka for ramen. I would say the patron crowd there is usually pretty much minimal even on weekend evenings, so it's really quite a nice place for couples to hang out and have a nice evening dinner there if you're ever around that area.
403	thanks man..i shall head down next week to robertson quay n give it a shot..looks good
2546	thanks! one day i should go try the ramen!
72	Just tried Ken's ramen few days back, immediately went back the next day. The ramen is so delicious and the ambience of the place feels really japanese. Not to mention the mangas!
114	Looks like Ken-san just got himself another customer.
20	Good to hear that Ken's still around....still rem the huge chunks of char siew.
16	But why I so suay, always go, always closed?
8	YES! And how the noodles complement the broth so perfectly. AHHHH, I think i'm gonna have ramen again tmr.
887	Noodle House Ken more of an evening/night-time ramen restaurant, their opening hours usually is from 6pm to 2am de. Cos noticed during the day they only open for 2 hours in the noon from 12 to 2pm, Sunday are their offs. Maybe the timings u visited them are more like during the day-time probably that's why they are closed?  This ramen stall is quite a convenient place to go makan for dinner/supper wif yr friends sometimes when you finished work late or something, definitely a good place to hang out also since it's just in town area, easy to drop by Orchard area if u're catching a movie later.
1605	Fully agreed
35	I might be going there this Friday or maybe Sat "after my gym work-out" ! wanna join in ?
278	Gallery Hotel Ramen.
679	Hmm... I take it that you are referring to Miharu? Been there once, never returned. Personally, I think it's a place to visit if you want to get kidney failure. The salt content was too much for me to take. I think someone here warned me but I had to go try it myself . I think it was quite pricy too. Ken still the best for value.
416	Anyone's up for Ken house Ramen Today or tomorrow ?
407	Santouku Ramen at Central Mall.  Wonderful ambience and lovely soup stock and meats. Quite authentic Jap too and most importantly, affordable and value for money. Their egg is a must try.
852	I remember last time I went there after 3pm, they are open. Only recently never seen them open.
719	That's very strange. Because IIRC, Ken closes at 2 which makes sense since I'm sure he needs a break before opening at 6pm all the way to 2am.
2111	YESH!!! Santouku is one of the best ramen store in singapore!!  Their egg is a must try
38	I might just try this one day. However, my vote still goes to the Tonkotsu Ramen at Ichiban-Tei where you pay only about $13 nett with accompanying free Ocha and the melty cha su with nice golden flowy marinated shoyu egg  milky broth and well balanced noodles to the al dente at Liang Court. to me, price versus value, this is my thumbs up.  Me and wife = $28 nett. if we chose Santouku one day it should be ~$47 .... see how it goes.
185	what happened to marutama? their soup base is so bland and the noodle reminds me of maggie mee... and for $12 only get one miserable slice of char siew not worth the money imho
96	Anyone know if Ken is open at 6pm today?
346	Ken should be open today since it's monday. His rest day is on Sunday.
410	but the sign-board if i recall correctly it stated that Monday closed
51	Agree agree, ate last week at Liang Court. Maybe that's why quite empty during lunch time, only one slice of pork eat already also buay song!
2	was at ichibantei@liang court yesterday. surprisingly, their current space used to be occupied by tempopo(now@level1). anyhow i ordered their highly rated tonkotsu ramen, i opt for the w/spice though, i like the smooth broth, egg and melting pork that just glide over your tongue and down the throat while my other frns orderd MISO and black pork ramen(as a comparison to tempopo) but i guess they werent 'wow' by their bowl of noodles. overall good, loosely packed..i guess weekdays thats why
38	so overall.. the most japanese style ramen are santouku and marutama? or have the standards drop?
1475	the abalone ramen at itei jap restoran plaza sing notch bad.
11497	i went to ken's today... not really nice lei... the charsiew hard hard one the egg not runny..
412	liang court's charshu is godlike yummy !
512	is Tampopo at liang court good? anyone at big splash theres this new ramen bar, tried it yesterday and it wasnt really that good. $12 for a bowl of ramen with 2 slices of pork... the soup was below par with other restaurants and it was pretty bland actually.
938	Tampopo is good, not as good as Santouka imo. But they hv much more varieties other than ramen so thats a plus.
36788	Tampopo is famous for their black pig shabu ramen, and kurobuta fried pork cutlet. Like what hoks has mentioned, in fact their restaurant got quite alot of variety of food and not just ramen-concentrated like other typical japanese ramen outlets here locally, so that's their plus point. But if u're strictly just craving for ramen, I would pick Marutama or Santouka instead anytime of the day IMO, partly because I think in terms of noodle and soup base quality, both of them does it better than Tampopo. But runny egg wise I still have to hand it over to Ichibantei, they are the best for me so far. (Robertson Quay one not Liang Court one, since I haven't tried Liang Court's branch before yet)
154	hmm  why is Santouka affordable?  it cost me $50 for 2 bowls of their best selling pork ramen...  but must admit its the best ramen in town imho
21	Actually, for the same bowl of black pig shabu shabu ramen, I find that Tomton does it better than Tampopo. And while Santouka's soup base is really flavourful, it can get a bit too rich and for regular eating I prefer Yoshimaru.
50	Santouka is actually pretty much affordable if u're just ordering a bowl w/o additional add-ons or toppings, I think yours costs 50bux for 2 person is because u probably went for the set meal or something, that comes with a seperate plate of their pork char siew which is pretty heavenly. While it's true they are not the cheapest around town for your ramen cravings, IMO it's alot cheaper compared to Marutama, which can set u back to ard 30 dollars for just one person after including the necessary svc charge.And may I ask where is this Tomton/Yoshimaru restaurant u're talking abt? Would like to try them out sometime other than the usual raved restaurants been recommended on this thread already. I do agree on Santouka's broth been alittle too rich for regular tastebuds here, some people might not be able to tahan or take the taste if they're used to more 'watery' ramen broth. (like for example Marutama, I would consider their soup broth to be those watery kind)
1378	Yoshimaru's the one at big splash that Erwinlow was referring to. I've only tried their Holland V branch though. It's not exactly watery, because it's still tonkotsu style, but if you're a big fan of Santouka you might find Yoshimaru a bit bland, but for me it's perfect to eat often without feeling too unhealthy. Tomton's at Central, and it's opened by Tampopo. The menu specialises more on black pig stuff. Besides the ramen, I find that they do the tonkatsu much much better than Tampopo too.
223	the best is coming, ippudo...  tink they already started hiring ppl
376	Ippudo? New one? Where?
20840	After try n try shoo mani here~Santouka stiLl da besT for flavouR!~
16	Anyone tried Sapporo ramen before at Takashimaya B2 and Hokkaido Ramen at Ion B4? Comment please
324	Bishamon is crap. Aoba is better, but still crap.
915	+1 to crappy Aoba.
173	kind of like the beppu ramen at china sq... slurp...
109	Bishamon? Where is Bishamon? I don't mean Aoba in ION. Aoba at B3 but there's another ramen shop at B4. It says Hokkaido Ramen.
935	Ah pardon me, I thought you were referring to Aoba. The B4 one is Menya Kaiko which I haven't tried, but have read nothing but poor reviews of. The one at Taka B2 is Bishamon.
602	Anyone know spicy ramen ? i tried the volcano ramen at ajisen.. bluff people, not spicy at all.
1248	beppu ramen at china sq
159	I'd recommend the KaraMiso Ramen at Santouka (Central level 3).
117	thanks hoks and isky. i will try both.
127	The one at Taka B2 is gone. I think it's temporary on as Hokkaido fair had end. Menya Kaiko don't know taste nice or not but it's very expensive compare to ken's house and ramen shop in central
5	I find Marutama quite expensive too
3	Dmm China Square got ramen meh?
1584	It's at Far East Square not China Square
25495	Sorry, seePyou is right....always mix up the 2 places.
120	Hi, u can try Liang Court Level 2, there is a Ramen stall near the escalator, i don't remember the name. Not much choices but the taste is not bad.
7351	I believe that would be Marutama. I haven't gone to Marutama ever since I went to the one at Central. Speaking of which, I wanted to go to Ken's last Saturday and there was a crazy queue! @____@ Guess he must be getting popular with all the good reviews?
300	time ti visit Ken's House again
15444	central has some joints
43	Hi all ramen lovers,   Just read the papers today that Ippudo is here. I wonder how will it fare against the rest.   Has anyone tried it yet?
1037	Ye Ippudo sounds good. The ramen bar at big splash so over-rated sia. somemore say from japan.
1721	You are absolutely right man. Ajisen Ramen is total crap. For the same amount of $$$ you can go to Santouku at Central Mall. It's the ramen place I swear by.
32	Ajisen ramen is the best I've ever tasted. Best than some ramen from japan..
5	Are you being sarcastic?
3	SanTouKu rulez nOw as Best RameN in SingaPoRe IMO!!!!!!!!!!!
3	No I'm not when I'm eating almost every week. Their best is the clay fish ramen. Is there other better ramen in singapore that I do not know of?
0	Ajisen ramen have 2 layers on their noddle. SanTouKu got how many layer?
116	I like OhSho at cuppage, not too pricey and open until very late
12	Just to name a few, have you tried any of the following: Santouka, Marutama, Noodle House Ken, Menya Shinchan? Sorry, because I'm kinda taken aback by your claim that it's the best you've ever eaten.
48	Mmm... I'm quite interested in this comment. What do you mean by 2 layers on their noodle?
11	Any good ramens around Paya Lebar area? Or east side?
1	I have tried all but they are nowhere near the standard of ajisen ramen. When's the last time you eat in ajisen?
39	Ajisen ramen contains 2 layer of noodle. One inner and the other outer. Have you ever eat at ajisen before? How come you never know?
563	Haven't touched it in ages. Have they improved that much over the last few years?
11	I recommend you continue to stay away.  Ajisen is BY FAR the WORST ramen you can have in Singapore. I think many will agree once they've tried others. They'd have to pay me to eat it, even if they have ten layers in their noodles.  The noodles are too soft, ingredients are mediocre and overall just, plain unauthentic and overpriced ($12-15!?!)  However, I've tried Ajisen Ramen in Tokyo before, and it was much better than what we have here (but still nothing to shout about). It would be wise to avoid the chain in Singapore and go for the much better ramen available in Central/Liang Court/Orchard area.
114	And how does this....two layer noodle make it nice? I've eaten at Ajisen before. I guess it's a personal preference. At the end of the day, you eat what you think is nice isn't it? Nobody eats anything that they don't like.   On a side note, waiting for Ippudo to open officially. Apparently they are open already but they are still in the process of ironing out the kinks. 12 Dec!
139	Ippudo open at whre?
132	Ippudo is at Mandarin Gallery #04-02/03/04
9	ajisen isnt cheap either might as well spend the same amt of money at other ramen ten
217	r u kidding?? ajisen  worst ramen ever, if u can call that ramen at all! try this place called mentei ramen, their egg is cooked to perfection and the chasiew melts in your mouth! and their tonkotsu broth is out of this world!
129	Ajisan in Singapore worst ramen, can agree.  But happened to taste Ajisan Ramen when I was in Zhuhai, taste way better den the ones in SG. Quantity is about the upsized version of what you see in SG. Price wise, fantastic! $4-$8 per bowl, NETT!
633	anyone tried ippudo yet? comparable to the ones in japan?
22	article bout it in business times today
308	can post???
65	NEW RESTAURANT Ippudo Singapore #04-02/03/04 Mandarin Gallery 333A Orchard Road Tel: 6235 2797 YOU'D think that Singaporeans would have stopped getting excited about ramen by now, given the number of ramen shops that have sprung up here over the past few years. But the line outside the newest joint in town, Ippudo, suggests otherwise. During the restaurant's pre- opening trial last week, we had to wait 30 minutes to get a table at 2pm in the afternoon, and the queue at dinner the following day was even longer (service was efficient and polite though, thanks to the experienced and mostly Japanese staff). Then again, Ippudo isn't just any ramen shop. It's one of Japan's top brands and it's doing extremely well in Manhattan too, where it set up its first overseas outpost last year. The company is helmed by Shigemi Kawahara, who is known in his home country as the 'King of Ramen' - he's the only person there to have ever won a nationwide ramen-making competition three years in a row. The chef-restaurateur specialises in Hakata ramen, a thin straight variety of ramen not unlike mee kia, and that's what Ippudo Singapore serves. As in the company's Japan and US stores, there are two flavours of the dish here: akamaru (red) and shiromaru (white), named after the colour of each version's broth. We tried both and found them to be distinctly different but equally good, with the glossy noodles consistently cooked to perfect springiness in every bowl. The Akamaru Modern (served in a matching fire- engine red dish) comprised ramen in a very tasty, garlicky scarlet broth made with the restaurant's custom-blended red miso and black garlic oil, and heaped with a mound of chopped scallions. It was a nicely balanced combination, but what really made the dish was the creamy bura buta (pork belly) - cut into thin rectangles and rimmed with melt-in- the-mouth fat - laid atop the noodles. The Shiromaru Classic, on the other hand, is ramen in an ivory-white broth made from thoroughly cleaned pork bones that have been boiled for at least 15 hours. The soup was suffused with a rich, creamy porky flavour and was slightly sticky with collagen - and yet, once more, did not overpower the delicate taste of the noodles. This traditional Hakata dish was served with rosu chashu (pork loin) instead of the fattier belly cut, which should please the more health conscious, and topped with soft cabbage. Both versions of ramen are $15 a bowl, and add-on options such as an egg for $2 or extra pork for $3 are available. Noodles aside, Ippudo does some good side dishes too, which you may want to set aside some space for. We especially liked the pork bun ($3 per bun), which is basically more of that delicious bura buta slotted into a steamed mantou, and the mentaiko gohan ($4), a petite bowl of Japanese rice topped with spicy cod roe, egg, seaweed and Japanese mayonnaise that made for a clean-tasting snack. Also worth trying are the desserts, in particular a lovely, intensely flavoured yuzu sherbet (at $5 for two scoops that aren't even the size of ping pong balls, it's a little pricey though) and a smooth, wobbly tofu-like cream cheese slice sprinkled with pistachios that goes nicely with the accompanying berry compote and honey dressing. With its focus on a simple menu and good cooking set in a comfortable, casual atmosphere, it's easy to see why Ippudo Singapore is drawing the crowds, even if it isn't officially open yet (the last day of its trial period is today, when it's open for dinner only, after which the restaurant will close and open for full service on Saturday). And if it continues dishing out the delights, it's safe to say that akamaru and shiromaru won't just be flavours of the month. Rating: 7.5/10 By Audrey Phoon
1554	Gee...sounds expensive. A bowl with extra charshu will easily cost $20...
12688	how come nobody talks about the Ramen Ramen at bukit timah railway mall station there anymore? boycott riao? last time very hot topic wor...
55	i too do not like Ajisen Ramen.  Tried many times and still do not like it.
2352	Or best Spaghetti in town.
1250	U gotta be kidding me  Is this the only ramen place u eat before? How abt doing a comparison of the ramen joints u went?
1141	Maybe he'll say all joints are equally nice. All are the best in the world
67	Obviously he has never been to Japan.
309	For my tastebuds, Yoshimaru kinda good actually, despite the not-so-good comments here. I personally recommend the Tantan Mian @ $13.
193	Is Tampopo good? Passed by it at Takashimaya earlier. There was a queue so i diddnt try it.  They had like black pig ramen ;o
356	Marutama Ftw
122	I've tried the shabu shabu ramen and its rather nice
46	Tampopo is well known for their Jyangara Ramen.
14	Eat n eaT but stiLL find Santouka winsssss them all~~~
433	noodle house ken
16	Ajisen food getting more crap. The companies that went IPO, like Ajisen, all showed quality drops. They seemed to favour investors rather than customers, by using cheaper subpar ingredients. Another chain which quality keeps going down is sakae, another company that is listed.
26	sakae std has never been good how to be going down?
59	OMG. Ajisen RAmen is one of the worst. I've tried Ramen when i visit Chiba and Tokyo last year, anyone of the Ramen restaurant is better than the AJISEN "BEST IN THE WORLD" ramen
391	It still can continue to go even crappier. I retried 6 months back just in case they improved, their Japanese rice in the Don seems to be a almost non-sticky rice. Not sure which cheapo China short grain rice did they use.
386	ippudo anyone try already?
27	Ok will try that.  Thanks
28	I agree with that and I only liked their Tantan Mian
2	i tried santouka and have been regretting it ever since......  no other ramen seems to satisfy me now   any other ramen shops to intro so that i crave for it less? i've tried ken's ramen &amp; marumaten (spelling is confirm wrong here) before but still think santouka is nicer. the only thing about santouka is that the broth is slightly on the salty side.
2	u can try bishamon @ raffles city shopping center
3	go get new taste buds.
12	oooh, i rem that. i tried the bugis outlet. it was quite nice. but i ate on a full-ish stomach so i think i didn't rate it as highly as it should. should go and try again on an empty stomach. haha
1961	no offence, but your 1st and 2nd line contradicts each other
458	I usually read read read, this time buay tahan also must login to post. Cui la, just look @ the egg, how to be best? Ajisen ramen has always given me average standards. Like mcdonalds. Well, good enough for the number of outlets it has in singapore. How do you even train that many chefs to work that many hours in that many outlets. I would not recommend anyone ajisen ramen but I wouldn't dissuade anyone from going there for a meal either. Anyone recently tried Aoba @ Ion? I haven't tried many ramen places but it delighted me with its miso soup base with quite well done egg (albeit not to perfection). The cha shu also lacks the "melt in your mouth" kind of feel but it does have pretty good texture. I think it's first chain is in Tampines 1 Manpuku. Worth a try I believe. [P/s, I also tried the shishamo, crispy on the inside, really soft inside and totally filled with roe! good shishamo!]
454	Imho Aoba is sama sama as Ajisen.
2367	yesterday went to try Ippudo (hope got spelling correct) at Mandarin Gallery.  Ordered the flavoured eye expect it to be runny but instead it was like hard boiled.  Does all eyes from Ramen stores supposed to be the runny type or does it differ.
140	Ippudo is awesomeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee
287	I rather eat Bedok 85's chinese ramen than ajisen any-day.
16	what's this in Chinese?   also, anyone heard of Yi4 Feng1 Tang2 in Singapore? Where's located?   i tried the branch in Osaka and i must say it is very GOOD!
373	Ippudo is nice, but I find the portion too little and the price is high. Their Tamago kinda disappointing, hard yolk and not those runny type and they are charging $2 each.
69	that is ippudo
81	ippudo only has one branch in Singapore? I briefly see through to the website, didn't say got any other branches or not.
213	Ajisen use to be very nice and the food portion is good when the first outlet is opened in   Bugis junction . My recent visit to Ajisen is horifiying because the food portion shrunked , and the taste is reduced to the standard of normal food court .  I boycotted Ajisen ever since the last visit I had this august.
14	what's the price of a normal ramen dish?   need to make seat reservations?   do they offer free flow of green tea?
20	Ippudo currently only has 1 branch in Singapore, and that is at Mandarin Gallery beside next to Meritus Mandarin and Cineleisure Orchard. I'm not aware of if there are any other branches, but considering how they had just opened on Dec 3rd, I don't think they will be opening another local outlet so soon? The last time I went on a Saturday evening with my friends, they were already sold out by 8pm even though it closes by 11pm. Maybe because it has barely opened for a month only, there's been alot of patrons at their restaurant, so I think give it abt another 2-3 months, business prob wouldn't be so busy as before.  Not sure if they allow seat reservations, best is to call and ask. I will be trying my luck again this Saturday there with my friends, cos the other time I went it was sold out so I didn't get to try them at all. Hopefully their ramen really live up to its name, if not I would be damn disappointed lol. (first time go make wasted trip)  Cheers.
1257	Santouka is based from Asahikawa origins that has a really long history back in Hokkaido, Japan, I already shared before once in my prev post . Given their long establishment, I think their taste is quite hard to knock off. But yeah, generally I think most Singaporeans would find their broth quite salty, this is due to their thick tonkotsu broth which also gives off a milky color, giving tonkotsu ramen its characteristic richness. I think if you go there eat on a rainy day, you would appreciate it more definitely. No no, I think you should tell Connoisseur-1976, to go upgrade his own taste buds instead, LOL.
1960	try the stall in the same coffeeshop as AMK Botak Jones.  if i remember correctly the normal ramen starts from $3.90 and the scallop or mixed ingredients cost around $5.90 or $6.90.   taste is not bad...the egg is those half cooked ones.  the tako yaki cost around 6 for $2.50 and the chicken skewer cost around 80 cents nia.  one of the better economical value stalls around
666	e one they advertise on radio? the so called ramen king rite  seriously overpriced. waraku still better
6	Yes I really agree with this! They used to be nice, but now their food standard really dropped.
1	Just had Ippudo.  In fact I just walked out and I swear not to return.  Had to q awhile, but the wait was not long, maybe 20mins.  Ramen is NOT fantastic at all to me.  Seriously overpriced, $17 for a ramen, exlcude gst and tax. I tink partly due to it's location.  Serving not big also.  The worst was the gyoza, size of a wanton. Swear to you, smallest gyoza I ever seen.  $6 for 6 tiny pieces.  The best for me is still Santouka
2	actually it doesn't...   i 'regret' eating it cos now i can't settle for anything lesser. pamper my taste buds too much liao.
13	Santouka tastes exactly the same in Japan. Went to their Gyoen (Kyoto) branch. Except the char siew is hot whole the ones in Singapore is cold (directly imported from Jap). Good ramen broth is usually salty. That's why they always have free flow of water at your side.  Nothing beats eating a nice hot ramen during cold days....
1	Whoa, that sounds bad. The reviews that I've read during the soft launch week were good, as the owner from Japan was here to personally cook the noodles. Maybe he's flown back already.
6	Santouka broth taste like plain water after u have tried Miharu.  Tats what I call salty
0	really? it's that bad?
21	I don't want to say it really bad. But I felt it did not gave me the wow feeling when I first tried Santouka.  Taste is up to individual.  But seriously someone need to tell them their gyoza is sooooooooooo small
8	No lar, what I meant was Miharu's broth are the saltiest I tasted so far
9	That's quite scary...I thought Santouka was really salty already. Later blood pressure explode
30	Santouka not really tat saltish to me.  But when me and and my frds had Miharu, we were scrambling for the ice water :p
9	Miharu is the place to go if you want to get kidney failure.
150	Their miso quite saltish.. I usually go for Shio soup based ramen
87	After reading the past few pages, Ajisen ramen taste real nice BUT only in Fukuoka.  For the SG Version, I don't even wan to go there.  Just to add Ippudo broth is slightly more garlicky which I like.
40	i had the spicy chicken. $9 for 6 TINY PCS. each pc is like only half of a tiny wing. its almost like food tasting
45	but, the original jap soup base are suppose to be god-damn salty i heard. That's what they like back in jap.  But, well guess sg are more suited to less-salty instead.  Tough decision for them to go for their original recipe or tune/adapt to local liking.
23	It's much colder in Japan too. I think they should tone down the saltiness a bit in tropical places.
7	Serious ?!  Why are their portions so small.  Even ramen portion also smaller than most places I've eaten.  For me, food, be it exp, be it small portion, as along as I feel that it's worthwhile after eating, I will definitely go back
126	Just had Tampopo. Not bad, quite good. A little pricey too. I had their ramen which was supposedly the top 10 ramen, black pig shabu shabu ramen IIRC. $13.80 excluded gst/service charge.
4	i think all ramen taste like cheap maggie mee leh
1559	how does expensive maggi mee taste like then?
638	i had ippudo on monday...pretty good but not yet santouka standard. Definitely potential to be one of the top 10 ramen places in Singapore. Its better than the Orchard Plaza ramen shop but the portion is smaller as well
2	It is the same level as Japan.  I usually avoid Shoyu and Miso
269	instant noodles was invented in Japan by Nissin.   What do you think o_0
399	then you eat shio ramen only?
71	I second this. Tried Ken, Marutama, Baikohken and Santouka. Santouka stands out among them due to the rich flavour of the soup.
406	Most of the case.   Unless the shop only serve Shoyu Ramen. (Not uncommon)
166	I like Santouka because of the curly curly noodles and its texture! some might think it look like maggie mee
190	Santouka stiLL rawKs besT~~~after shoo manY attempTs~
157	Santouka  seems to be highly recommended...  may i know what's the general pricing like?  also, does it have a site where i can seek for its phone number, so as to make seat reservations?   thankks
17	why do you avoid shoyu/miso ramen and only go for shio?
16	Guys... where is Santouka...try both Baikohken and Marutama and i feel at the moment baikohken is the best in my opinion...haa craving to go try Santouka....Btw Baikohken serving is good ...
32	Santouka is at Central i think.
43	Santouka is at Central.
38	Thx pal haa
96	ok now we know where Santouka is, care to share where Baikohken and Marutama are?  and also, what's the general pricing for the ramen is like?   maybe we can compile a list too...  - Ippudo - average $18  - Tampopo - average $15  - Ajisen - average $12
14	Just tried Baikohken yesterday =) portions are huge for the full bowl, chashu was really nice that day. Raffles place MRT, walk towards OCBC building and it's opposite at the first row of shophouses! (North Canal Road) Approx $17 for full bowl, $13 for half bowl. Beware, full bowl only for ramen lovers and people with relatively big stomachs!
162	After having ippudo twice in japan during the recent trip, I was so disappointed when i went to ippudo at mandarin. The portions look smaller, it is more expensive, the ramen was sloppily arranged/made, the eggs were overcooked, no self-service water jug on the table and the most important thing was - whatever happened to the 4 kinds of preserved garnishing on the table that freely available for customers to help themselves??? The queue was also super long in japan but at least they make their ramen with more pride!
8	yah, Ippudo portions are so damn small.
134	Murutama is at Central and Liang Court.  Both outlets are of walking distance within each other.  Do you all know their soup based is not pork based but Chicken based.  their grilled charshu melts in yr mouth
27	Went to this restaurant at Central on the 2nd/3rd floor some time ago, after you finish you can add like $2 for extra noodles. Anyone knows the name of this stall? Their ramen is pretty decent too.
96	No matter how nice the whole noodles might be, it will put me off from going to a place again if the serving portion is too small!  Why go to a place and eat a bowl of noodles when you don't feel full afterwards? unless you eat 2 bowls ofcourse!
467	Should be level 3..that'll be Marutama...  I just had it..and asked for more noodles too!   Nice soup...though they said its chicken..but tasted like pork lol
6	Add noodles is called kadaema(pardon me if I got the spelling wrong).  Murutama has it, Ippudo too
15	As for the noodles, Santouka has slightly thicker ones, follow by Ippudo, Murutama's have thin noodles
61	Now that you remind me again.  Their gyoza was atrociously small.  If you compare with other gyoza/ramen places, theirs is 1/3(!!) of the usual.  As for eggs, my wife's wan was resembled more a hard boiled egg, while mine was still runny
254	i too went to Ippudo ytd at thoes ghost timing, no que just head in and order. my gf order the miso soup thingy while i order the other one. i tried her ramen soup seriously not my type   heng i stick to mine. eggs was horribly done. char su they gave only 2 small round piece abit pathetic . anyone tried their cheese cake? i saw many ppl ard me order it.
1	Had read so many bad reviews of Ippudo....!! No way i gonna try it...
620	Santouka is at Lv 2 at The Central.
262	yeah, got to admit ippudo portion is really small. they nearly forgot my ice water until I was almost done with the ramen IIRC, they only had shoyu and miso, and their miso soup (from my friend) wasn't that good. their noodles are the slightly thin/white kind, same as the buckwheat noodles (ban mian)
24	There's buckwheat ban mian??
42	Had miso cha su ramen at Baikohken few weeks ago...I feel that it is 1 of the best ramen I had ever eaten. For the price I'd tink its quite worth it...in fact I can hardly finished the half bowl..luckily din order the full bowl else confirm will waste the food..  Anyway any butties know if Baikohken is opened on weekends also?
15	where is baikohken. thanks for the help
0	Does anyone else find Menya Shinchan not salty enough?
22	lol...not really...anyway, the ippoudon noodle is white, not yellow. seems like buckwheat but not too sure.  any ban mian not buckwheat?
41	Buckwheat is Soba woh...
107	Its directly opposit OCBC centre
338	I tried it awhile back and I think it's a tad salty already . . .
14256	either they toned it down or my tastebuds are screwed...
156	Worse than aijisen?
79	My personal favorite thus far:  1) Santouka (runaway favorite..no horse run)  .  .  .  .  2) Maratuma (distant second)  .  .  The rest came in tied last. Sorry about that. Ajisen/Baikohken/Ippdo..taste wise is something subjective i must say, but Santouka tasted as close to japan already.
104	Whoa, that's the most scathing opinion I've read so far! Worse than Ajisen can close shop already.
6	I object. nothing that be worse than Ajisen. Even if the noddles from ippudo is not good, the good is definitely better but i tried the shoyu, normally I don't eat miso based ramen. Even santouka's miso ramen not nice. its the miso fault, not the ramen fault
358	Ajisen here is terrible but tat in Fukuoka is superb
407	Imo Ajisen is not the worst. I think that honour goes to ramenten or something. So many bad review on ippudo.
185	Ramen is featured in this wk's 8 days.  I bought it but just glanced thru it.  Santouka, Marutama had the highest ratings of 4.5/5.  Places like Ippudo, Shencha, Baikohken,  were given ratings of 1-1.5/5.
56	No one tried Miharu before? It's darn good and patronised by Japs.
1	If u read back all the pages, Miharu is a place to go if u wan kidney failure.
4	NaCl overdose~~~  Actually, I consider Marutama broth NaCl overdose liao.
62	Santouka and Miharu are my fav places to go for my ramen fix.  Ippudo sucks! in my opinion after i tried it.  Even 8 days mag gave a low score for it.
56	I forgot, it's there any mention of Ajisen ? Hehe
12	"Baikohken" for me, i like its generous serving if order large. Enough to fill up hungry ppl like me and my frens who were big eater.  Marutuma - good but not filling, santouka same - no filling enough.   Ajisen also good for me, enough side dishes to keep me filled up.
6	I finally tried Miharu and I thought I was gonna faint after the meal cos my organs would stop working. But if you can get past the initial explosion of NaCl, the broth is pretty good, very tasty. That said, current favorite now has to be Baikohken. Generous servings, right amount of flavor without being too heavy.
55	.. nonsense. They gave it best soup. You're probably talking about the post heart-burn meter 'rating', which is just their rating of how unhealthy the ramen is. If you wanna go by that 'rating', Baikohken got an even lousier 'rating'
7	U can order large size for Santouka and u can request more noodles for Marutama too.
734	Haha. I think they are aware of it also which is why there is a part of the menu that says "please tell us if you want less salt in your ramen".
2195	Maybe I explain further. Santouka "Large" ain't large enough for us while Maratuma for extra noodle (extra $$). Of cos, $$ isn't the problem, its the after serving the extra noodle, by that time its either ur soup is cold or too little or slow service Totally sianz after extra noodle came. Individual peference - baikonken happened to be nearest to my drinking joint
241	Still LOVE Marutama best.  Must try the melt in your mouth Yaki Char Siu, and the havenly egg.  Yummy yummy  A little more pricey but love the quality.
436	ippudo is definitely super overhyped  went there some 2-3 weeks ago.  so so tasting ramen ,price also not cheap for the portion.  still marutama and santouka anytime thrash this overhyped joint.
31	even some of japanese here also thinks ippudo overpriced liao!!
52	I tink the price is partly due to the location but no excuses for the quality
3241	Unless they increase the serving portion or quality, very soon you will see no queue liao. Having said that there are probably fanboys who will still insist they are the best just because of the name!! hahahaha
163	That would be me. I had the rich tonkotsu broth, which in my opinion is 1 zillion times less salty than Miharu. Maybe my tastebuds are really spoiled!
10	Ajisen's quality has dropped too much since 2 years ago. The soup is too diluted to my taste and the char-siew are so-so. I hope the franchise holder in Singapore realize this quality control issue and fix the problem rather than obsessed in pricing issue.
5795	Maybe the owner saw your post and decided to increase the salt level  Although I think Baikohken's Miso Charshu pretty salty too, its not the salty until you cannot eat kind.  I seriously don't think anyone can fight Miharu in the salt department.
95	Good news for fans of Santouka!    They will be opening a new branch at Orchard Cuppage Terrace this coming April!  And this branch will have a later closing time of 11pm!  Great for supper after shopping at Orchard.  By the way, they're having a promo on their Char Siew Pao and Toroniku Pao.  (check out the bottom left corner)  Just grab this flyer from the escalator there.
185	wow, thanks for sharing.
62	See the picture liao also hungry!
752	i also see until hungry and it's past midnight already..  liang court got a lot of nice ramen!
60	Just asking - maratuma still serving the egg in ramen? I do know once I go there, no more such egg and tats it, I barred that place since.
3	No egg in ramen then u order ala carte.  Many places I go, the egg has to be ordered also.  The one at Liang Court basement also dun have
7	looks super good!!!
19	their shio ramen been there all along....is the price reduced or something?
27	I toking abt maratuma only. Yes, i understand the rationale behind having ala carte for egg. Maybe I not clear enough - mid last year, i go maratuma with my frens, got the spicy ramen but no egg, not even on the menus. I ask for the waitress for egg, she says not serving. I feel weird and kinda let down for my frens who is trying it 1st time. I would have order egg off the menu but if not serving, we were sad plus when we order for more noodles, it took so long b4 they serve the bunch of mee. Kinda turn off and so never visit maratuma ever since.
9	Oh...my bad.  Guess they didnt had eggs that day.  Hmmm, I nvr encountered any ramen shops that dun served eggs on the day before though.  I definitely need runny eggs for my ramen
10	No offence and no hard feeling.   True, it definitely a must for a ramen with "runny" egg. I was so embaressed that I actually commented to my frens (never tried b4) how good the place was. Then we tried it without the egg plsu slow service. The place wasn't pack at all, its week day dinner btw.  Unless they improved in service (at the very least) and speed, me still barring the place from my list. Huh!
22	I've already struck Marutama off my list after trying there once. My Nissin instant noodles taste more exciting.
7	Last saturday, I went to my favourite Ajisen Ramen restaurant and it was fully packed. I waited nearly 1 hour before I was shown the seat. However I have no complain after tasting the food, it is still the best Ramen in singapore. My Jap friend who is with me agreed.   As usual, the double layer noodle complement very well with the pork broth. I had my usual seafood ramen and my friend ordered Ma Po toufu ramen ( newly listed in Ajisen). Did I mention that their mango pudding is out of this world? I suspect they hired italian for the dessert making.   All in with side dishes and drinks/dessert, our bills turn out to be less than $50. Being a member of Ajisen, I was given 10% discount. Who says you cant get good food with decent pricing in singapore? My Jap friend and I definately did.   My favourite ramen.
9	Ajisen u treat me, I also wun eat
5	Not funny anymore man.
26	Trolls are never funny to anyone Except to the troll.why do you say this? can elaborate? Are nissin noodles that nice? i have never eaten nissin cup noodles in my life before.
10	Ajisen is a piece of crap. Tried it years back and never went again. Just last week, went for a lunch gathering and had Ajisen (tho i didnt want it) .... F***ed. lol
1302	I just had the ramen 2days ago, they had eggs as ala carte.
1470	I usually get the spicy or the 7 nut. in fact, i recommend everyone who goes there to do the same. No point getting the normal chicken soup version as its nothing special
3631	1. Menya shinchan 1. Santouka 3. Ippudo 4. Noodle house ken 6. Ajisen 6. The one in liang court Other ramen shop dont leave any impression. Based onwhat other people say Miharu could be the best Ramen place for me. Like it salty, I hate it when food tried to adapt to local style.
394	Miharu at gallery hotel is the best to me.
777	Had aoba yesterday. Soup was too salty, egg and char siew like ajisen.
82	Aoba is really salty, but without any depth to the soup, unlike Miharu.
354	nobody tried the ramenplay @ 313? any comments?
290	the one in liang court is which one? got a few le.  i give tompopo in liang court thumbs up.
573	how's ramenplay?? also, there's a tampopo in Wisma but not sure the quality
0	Tried Miharu, and re-test menya and santouka, my current ranking  1. Menya shinchan (shoyu porkbone/seafood porkbone tsukemen)  2. Santouka  2. Miharu  4. Ippudo  5. Noodle house ken  6. Ajisen  6. Aoba  6. Tampopo
697	Anyone tried ? Soup looks thick and yummy to me. Maybe next week...
805	The usual complain about Miharu is that it's too salty. But you can request for less salt - it's stated in the menu. Other than that, i think it's the best ramen around.
66	Ken's standard drop alot...  My fren went and complain that it is totally tasteless.
40	Not too salty for me.. I like ramen the way it is, if they drop the salt it will go down lower. What bring Miharu down in my ranking is its noodle. It looks and taste just like a mass produced noodle you can get easily in the market.  Miharu have one of the best soup taste, otherwise it wont be up there in the ranking.  Ken's standard drop eh ? I havent been visiting ken for quite sometime, dont like to go to orchard area
3432	Tried the 7 nut at Marutama last week, don't really like the gluey texture of the soup. Think I still prefer the chicken soup with loads of veggies in it.
1	Hey this is a little off topic, but does anyone know if Ken Noodle house is open tomorrow during lunch? Going to bring some Japanese guests but dont want to embarass when its closed.  I have been calling them whole day but noone's picking up the phone. Any idea?
66	They don't do lunch anymore n standard drop alot too
11	When I visited Ken on January, the note in front of their shop said they are only open during night time and closed on Sunday. I recommend Tampopo's Kyushu noodle at Takashimaya B2 for your alternative target nearby.
7	Ahh....gosh...any alternatives? I mean there's no time to bring them to the other ones I like , like the Baihoken at North Canal Street. I tried Tampopo ramen at Liang Court, i dont find it fantastic. How about Aoba at Ion? I dont see any good reviews on that. Gosh, I wonder why my Japanese guests wants to eat RAMEN in SG of all things!
2	Miharu at gallery hotel is quite near from Ken noodle if you are driving
5	Miharu is a good choice, should suit the Japanese taste.
18	Yah I know Miharu...its on my top 3 list. Well the problem is they just want a quick lunch in Orchard area and head for shopping before getting on for their flight in the late afternoon.
7	Try Daikokuya at Paragon. Personally, I feel Tampopo's Kyushu ramen is one of better ramens in orchard road, however everyone has his/her own taste.
35	Santouka! Never dissapoint me !
6321	Have you tried Daikokuya before? Btw Tampopo and this one, which one would you recommend?
39	I suggest you bring them to Ippudo so that they can be totally disgusted with the glaring lack of standard in the Singapore branch.
29	Ippudo sure got pple go de, becos of the location, sgporeans love to be seen
68	today mypaper B9 got Daikokuya Ramen write-up
2839	how was their review?
30	yesterday went to try ippudon , quite bad imo .... the serving is so small that i have to refill 4 times to make myself full :\
73	lol, yeah, that serving is pretty small. how much is it to top up 4 times?
25	The tamago egg is quite disappointing at ippudon. Just like normal hard boiled egg.. So far the best i had is at Muratama, and it only cost $1
19	Heng u all nvr tried the gyoza at Ippudo.  It's like the size of a wanton u eat in the hawker center
11	talking about this makes me angry , 6 bucks for 6 pathetic gyoza .  i think the filling is smaller than a wanton in a hawker center ... overall i rate 5.5/10  i have high expectations for ramen .... especially i ate alot of famous and good ramens in tokyo itself .....
2	Wah lau, u shld have read my review, previous pages back.  I already warn u all not to order the gyoza liao
25	i went to try miharu the other day. quite nice, their egg not bad as well.
354	didnt really read this thread ..... yesterday went orchard then decided to try ...   very very disappointed
13240	I saw a Ninja Ramen opening at Great World City.  Saw the billboards covering the shop, dunno when open
4	yes Muratama's egg is damn good and i like the ramen better than tompopo. plain and nice and can add on things.  their pork belly is nice too. hot and nice with fats! i seldom eat this kind of pork but i did eat it anyway coz it was really nice!!
43	Go Marutama MUST try the roasted cha siew. GODLIKE!
609	On the contrary, I found the servings very reasonable, and the refills are value for money. If you need to eat 4 times to feel full then obviously you aren't an average person and as such making such a statement is unfair to the establishment
109	oh yes, it's called char siew...  very nice right?? hot and soft with some chilli powder. the only fatty meat i bear to put in my mouth after these years.
43	Ok, just a side note, but don't you think on average, Ramen establishments in Singapore are charging prices that are a tad high?  What is essentially a soup based noodle dish with moderate amounts of garnishing sets us back in the $15 zone inclusive of GST and Service charge.  I'm not fat or skinny but I always find the need to order an extra dish to go along with my Ramen to have a filling meal.  Ate at Marutama Ramen and ordered marutama ramen + additional Char siew toppings, one gyoza and a dashimaki egg dish that costs $8.....Total cost for 1 person = $34...Definitely not worth it but since I'm craving for ramen, I've got to bear with the price.... Since marutama is really near my place, I tend to frequent that place often and usually will order just the ramen and additional char siew but yesterday proved to be one of the days I was feeling really really hungry.... I don't remember ramens that I've tried in Tokyo to be so expensive...
55	i do agree that eating at these kind of ramen places is a bit pricey.  but if u choose ajisen ramne, it's cheap like only $12 or $15.  i think at the end of the day, it's the restaurant standard.  the good ones can afford to price high and still command crowd, just like any other restaurants.  there's cheaper ones around too.
116	Marutama's portion is way too small. And IMO, it ain't that good either.  For me, I tend to frequent Baikohken, where the portions are huge (sometimes too huge for average eaters). Sure, it's a little more expensive, but the quantity and quality makes it worth it.  But I'll have to agree that in general, ramen in Singapore is kind of expensive. Which is why I can only afford to go once in a while
223	Yeah...Have to agree with you. For me, I prefer Marutama's chicken soup stock to the usual miso, shoyu, pirikara pork bone based soups from the likes of hokkaido or sapporo ramen establishments. But then again, its definitely not a taste I'll queue up for.  If I happen to see Marutama packed, I'll probably head of elsewhere.
2204	internet assumption  .  im like anyone normal here . you probably think im bui bui but im not   i do agree the refills are value for money ... but food standard wise its not
18795	I just tried this Yoshimaru Ramen Bar in Holland Village and it was pretty decent. The char siew was melt in the mouth, and the flavored egg was really nice (with the gooey centre).  one thing though, as we were sitting infront of the chef (cook?), we always see them scooping 1 very small teaspoon of stuff into the ramen, then my wife overheard 1 of the stuff (who was ordering her own dinner) and saying she don't want the msg.  i'm not sure if that is really msg (scarly its not) but is it normal to put msg into ramen like this?
174	ok after so many bros recommended Santouka, i finally went to try the ramen there.  Of course i ordered the famous toroniku (pork cheek) ramen and my choice was shio.  Got to say, the ramen and the broth (shio) was superb.  However the toroniku was way too salty, don't really like it although the pork cheek is sot.  May go back to try the char siew but would anyone know if the char siew is also so saltish?
12	I tried the Char-siew one... some time ago... i think i got some pics... i go find it then i post it... depends on your taste Kahlan... for me it's just right... the soup... everything, although the portion is abit small for me xD...
19	The set meal and my personal fav
3431	ok FireAway thanks for info and the pictures.  will try it one day.
3	Baikohken was featured on tv just now.  The owner actually has a ramen factory at Pandan Loop.  Btw Santouka's 2nd outlet at Cuppage is opening at 7th Apr.  For first 100 lunch/150 dinner customers, free toroniku voucher
53	7th april!! can't wait
116	8 Days Ramen article
45	This week 8days?
17	This was 2-3mths ago
143	I see.. thanks.. thought of grabbing 1 afterwork =D
206	I passed by the new Santouka outlet just now.  It's at the row of shop house towards Starhub ctr  Almost ready, the space is not big.  I would say, almost same the one at Central
99	not yet open right? if open, going there for lunch tomorrow!
790	Not yet. 7th Apr
36	whats GWC?
115	great world city. over there got nice ramen. don't think so
13	recently i tried this at Paragon, not bad. went back the following week.   DAIKOKUYA RAMEN, Paragon #B2.
34	is it the one opposite ding tai fung? saw it a couple of weeks ago but didnt go in and try.
276	ah well nearly every ramen outlet here is pretty bad, and i've tried most of them. i find myself going to aoba most often for convenience and value. $6.50 is reasonable for quality. best would be santouka and miharu so visit those if you've the time. ajisen is alright too in the more established outlets. marutama for novelty. rest are ter-ri-ble value for money.  ippudo is bad. havent tried ramenplay but i know it's going to be bad because no self respecting ramen-ten would call themselves that.  in fact even ippudo in japan is mediocre. if you're in tokyo search out sumire and junren - outlets in shinjuku / ikebukuro. 900 yen and a lot of flavour. best ramen i've ever tasted hands down. makes ippudo sg's akamaru broth taste like sludge. or visit sumire's sapporo outlets, they're rated the best.
70	I just came back from Marutama Liang Court  Farking lousy and a rip-off.   $15 spent and I could not recall which part of my stomach was filled.   When I sat down and saw that the kitchen helpers were all young punks I already felt apprehensive liao.  I ordered the tan-men, which turned out to be . I tot got shreds of chicken one, but only got maggie mee and veggie.  I asked for spicy soup, the soup base did not taste hiam at all. I only saw teeny weeny shreds of chilli floating in the soup.  I went cos my fren ish a ramen fan. Frankly, I'm not. I always think ramen makes very badly balanced meal choice in terms of nutrition.  My fren's ramen was maggie mee + 1 piece of pork with a layer of fat + some teeny weeny shreds of veggie.  Sorry, but this shop totally destroys my already fragile impression of ramen liao.  NO MORE ramen and definitely nv ever Marutama.  My worst dining experience so far this year.
53	mistake no 1 spotted. most people know the Central 1 is the good one.  if you think ramen = maggie mee in the first place, I don't think you will ever like ramen
631	hello sir i suggest you learn how to order ramen first tip: DONT ORDER TAN TAN MEN
1390	Anyone tried nantsuttei at parco millenia walk ? heard its damn famous in japan
156	tried today, not bad, charsiew is thick so abit tough.
1497	first time tried baikohken last sat... find it kinda over-rated... so-so only... the noodles may be alot but not the charsiew... my fav currently is still santouka... which so far is the only one that makes me feel like i'm in japan...   haven't tried others like ippudo or miharu yet though...  regards,  wacky
52	i also tried baikohen last sunday. i order the shio ramen the soup like not much taste kinda plain but the cha siew is nice but still prefer the shio ramen  over at santoka. will prolly try miharu this week
4211	charsiew not allot cos u ordered the normal ramen? abt 3pieces onli... u wan allot go order the charsiew ramen
781	I read it too several days ago.  Think the reporter made a mistake about Tonkatsu Shinjuku Saboten - there's no ramen on their menu, I just dined there on Thu.    Though they are known for their tonkatsu, If they do offer ramen, I'd have tried it.
2928	isky, are you iskandar leng?
233	I agree that Santouka is one of the top Ramen in SG.. the noodles and the Shio soup base is somehow "made for each other". Not forgetting their pork cheeks.. v yummy!! As for baikohke, their char siew's fats have this v rich and delicious taste.. really heavenly!(sinful though!) otherwise Santouka still is top in my list..
72	Just lunch at Santouka's new branch at Cuppage Terrace, today's is their opening day. They have this promotion now. A thing to note - untill Apr 11, the new branch only offers 'basic' ramen dishes like Shio/Shoyu/Miso/Kara-miso Ramen, Char-siu Ramen, Toroniku Ramen etc.  Only from Apr 12 will they start offering the full menu like the first branch. The new branch closes from 3-5pm daily but they will close later. Mon-Wed: till 11pm Thu-Sat:  till 12am Sun:  till 10pm
331	cuppage quite far for me...im at wheelock side. go there and come back 25 minutes at least in the lunch hour crowd.
635	I just visited Nanstuttei in Millenia Walk. I was very disappointed with it.  See my rating: Ramen: 5/10 (Not Q, very soft) Soup: 6.5/10 (Smell nice but isnt as tasty as it smell. taste better when raw garlic is added) Egg: 1/10 (FAIL!!!!! The egg is almost cooked, so dun mention abt how's the taste of the egg yolk) charsiew: 6/10 (So-So, not fatty, quite thick but isnt soft) Service:8/10 (Well-served) Overall:5/10 (Dont feel it worth the queueing time)
4	so not nice?
134	I tink it's best u go n try for yrself.  Muratama has it's own fans and detractors also.  All up to individual
139	yup, might as well go eat sg prawn noodles, ha ha........
600	When you went there on the opening day, was it very crowded with long queues? Cause my friend is thing of trying out the ramen today but hates the queue.
940	Nope, no queue at all, not on the first day anyway.  There's much less lunch crowd compared to the first branch, prob becos not so many people know abt the new branch yet.  Tell your friend that the new branch is only serving limited menu these few days.  Some other minor differences:  - you can pay your bill at your table, no need to go to the cashier counter.  - no more big jar of water occupying the small table, the waitress will refill your cup from time to time.  - you can now see the chefs at work more clearly, this is important to me, cos I like to see the energy and attention put in by the chef while cooking.
107	Well, everyone has their own preference.  Personally, I find doing differentiation more interesting than drinking shio soup. It's just so darned boring.  Shoyu and miso add more dimensions of flavor to the soup. A well-brewed soy sauce is a lot more complex than just saltiness.
47	AH!!! exactly! I was there yesteday and there were 4 customers outside and I was 1 of the 3 people inside. So when my friend and I were eating, there were like 5-6 staff at any 1 point in time standing near the chef (behind the glass panel making the ramen) and sort of like watching us eat. Our water glasses were refilled very fast though but its sort of pressurizing with so many people watching us eat The service was really good as a result though but I already felt slightly intimidated even though I was with a friend. Can't imagine going there alone like in the Central outlet. I guess this situation will ease up when the crowd improves though
405	been to santouka @ cuppage tonight w my kaki the miso soup equally tasty compare to the central outlet but the Tokusen Toroniku is not as nice compare to what i get @ cental PS: that means the full menu is ready as of 09/04/10
48	Finally went to Nantsuttei on Wednesday. A relatively small place so there was a queue formed up quite quickly when I reached @ 730. Waited for about 15 minutes before being asked if I would like to sit at the counter.  Service was pretty good. I had a charshu men and gyoza while my partner had a basic ramen.  When the noodles arrived, the presentation was pretty alright. Had a taste of the soup. I think it went well with their signature black oil, but a few more spoons later, slightly on the salty side but still managable. Charshu was quite ok but slightly on the small side. Counted roughly about 6 pieces. Noodles were pretty well done not mushy or soft.  I don't normally order gyozas because I feel they are a little too pricey but since I was here to try it out, just got one plate to try. The gyozas were juicy and the flavour of the garlic went very well with the pork. Maybe because I like garlic so it was pretty good for me.  My only gripe is the price. I paid $40 for a charshu men, basic ramen and gyoza. Slightly on the steep side probably because there's GST and service charge. For roughly the same price and since I'm more of a meat person, my vote still goes to Baikohken for the amount of charshu (~ 6 nice thick slices) they give for the charshu-men.
63	^ most places charge GST &amp; service charge as well. In fact, $40 for 2 ramen + gyoza is pretty cheap already. The other day I went to Santouka, it was $40 for 1 charsiu ramen + 1 shio ramen + 1 egg. think of it as paying for quality.
1282	2 ramen + gyoza would have cost u $60 at Ippudo and yr stomach would only be half full
66	Last Friday I went to Mandarin gallery to try the famour Ip ramen. The queue was too long.
786	@haro_goodbye: IIRC, 3 of my favourite places do not charge GST only service charge: Baikohken, Menya Shinchan and Ken's Noodle House. Not too sure if things have changed.
67	Highly recommend nantsuttei. Went with my folks tonight. Prices were reasonable, portion was great, very unique ramen with plenty of garlic and black oil in tonkotsu soup. Chashu was well marinated, a little tough but meaty. As usual, if you like meat, get chasu men. Generous serving for $16. Japanese quality with Japanese chefs...felt just like I was back in Tokyo.  Long queue and tiny glasses of water, so be prepared to wait.
3674	Not sure about your expectation but you can try: - Kara Miso Ramen of Santouka - Spicy Maze Ramen of Daikokuya
585	If you're too stupid to make use of the 2 refill you deserve to leave unsatisfied.
94	that's a joke, right? kaedama should be for especially hungry occasions, not the norm. most ramentens i've been to, both in tokyo and singapore, make it a point to offer portions that are just right for ordinary people. ippudo has portions the size of a happy meal.
410	Mind yr language wateveryrnameis  kadeama or not, the portion are outrageous  Duh
649	The 10 Best Ramen in SG!
152	Not too sure which places offer kadeama.
7210	I know Murutama has it
33	another new ramen opening???.....
246	Suntec right? Saw it the other day when I was exiting Carrefour. Seems like more ramen shops are springing up. I wonder how this one will fair against the rest. Opening on 1st May apparently.
41	ANOTHER FAKE JAPANESE RAMEN SHOP! There is no such establishment as shin sapporo ramen and no one in japan will ever name their ramenten shin-xxx-ramen anyway. If you want to know the real hokkaido ones that are famous it is sapporo ramen junren, sumire, ikkokudo, baikoken (here), santoka (also here), aoba (here too), hakodate ramen zundou (here once in a blue moon) dont sarpork fake ramen shop in sg like ramen-ten, ramenplay, ken noodle house, also ippudo, ajisen, tampopo are still ok but getting more and more china-fied. best is go miharu, bkk, nantsuttei (the best!), santoka, etc.
653	Not trying to nitpick on your phrasing...but which of those exactly are you referring to as fake?  Btw...if you can read Japanese, the top window panes say shin sapporo ramen. This is in Hokkaido.
13	actually is "shin sapporo" even a name of a chain?? it's just like opening a "hainanese chicken rice" or a "fried hokkien noodle" stall i believe?? since sapporo is place name (capital of hokkaido) ... not sure what "shin" means but u get alot of shin-something japanese restaurent so i don't think it is a particular chain name or something...  regards,  wacky
83	if you look more closely that is not the name of the store...what is funnier is that the real name can be seen clearly in ur photos. and yes i can read japanese. n my engrish louzy lah the first 3 is not authentic where u csi pic one?
136	I found it weird too, but according to directories, the 'shin sapporo ramen', together with ryu-ryu, seems to make up the shop name. It sounds absurdly like 'new chicken rice loy kee' or something, but...whatever rocks their boat man lol. Probably not the same shop coming over though.  Woot, I thought Ken's is authentic?  Just google lor haha.
1752	Ken is not 'authentic' in the strict sense of the word given that he's a local chef and he sort of adapts his ramen to local taste and ingredients instead of using a traditional japanese recipe. His ramen not too bad but I can't really say its good.  I heard he trained until a Japanese chef though but no idea if its true or not. Anyway, with Santouka in orchard now, that's the only place to go to if you want good ramen in the area. Tampopo &amp; Ken's might be good but can't hold a candle to Santouka
32904	There's a Sapporo Ramen shop at Funan 1st floor, any buttie tried?
370	I tried, probably won't go again. Just average. Anyone find any place better than Santouka pls post here hor
57	Ok I'll give a detailed breakdown of ramen in Singapore. My hobby is scouting and eating ramen. I'm most familiar with traditional Japanese ramen so in other words I'm used to it being salty and oily and I can almost always tell instantly whether the ramen is authentic or not. Rated from best (and most authentic) to worst. 1. Nantsutei: This is one of the ramen chains in Japan that has gotten very popular lately. Their speciality is mayu tonkotsu ramen. Don't be taken aback by the black garlic oil floating at the top of the bowl - it's delicious, try it! It is reasonably priced at 12 bucks in comparison to the other chains. As usual, you get only one slice of cha-su unless you order more which will be $16. Me, I'm used to getting only one slice. Excellent value if you order extra nori, they give you a whole bunch for only a dollar. They're currently a very dedicated bunch, don't know if they'll still be in a year when all the Japanese chefs have left. This is probably the most authentic ramen I have eaten here. Generous portion, lots of bean sprouts, excellent soup. Some find it slightly oily, but having eaten real sapporo ramen in Japan I find it really alright . Seriously, best soup here. Their cha-su is meaty and chewy. Not the most fragrant I've eaten, but not too bad overall. I prefer less fatty meat anyway so you get a pretty good deal. Ajitamago is disappointing and cold. Don't know if they've improved on that, but overall it should not mar your experience if you don't order it. And not to forget the only drinks here are water and beer. Geez, they would make more money if they sold soft drinks . Nantsutei is by FAR the best ramen ten in Singapore imo, because it feels and tastes just like ramen does in Japan. Go early at 5.50 p.m. for dinner, especially on weekends. This is a must unless you have a thing for long hello kitty queues. 2. Santouka Also a good place to have ramen at. Shio is the best option. The soup is light (for me) yet tasty. Their tokusen toroniku pork cheeks are melt in the mouth sinful - so yes, this is the place for that. Prices about the same as Nantsutei. Ajitamago is ordinarily done with not much to write home about. Miso was comparatively poor, funny for sapporo ramen.  If you order a set which is good value you get some funny salad with wasabi in the dressing. That's not the point of salad so maybe you can ask for no wasabi. They also have a nice but pricey pudding for dessert. Comes with a nice flask of water like in some Japanese establishments so help yourself to it. Second best, quite authentic. 3. Miharu Sapporo Ramen First of all don't try getting here without a car unless you live nearby - I tried it. Long walk. Looks like a very no frills establishment at first glance, and you can dine Japanese style sitting on the floor if you like. Tiny indoor space so come early or very late - don't eat alfresco although the option exists. Trust me, you don't want to.  Ramen is salty and rich - even for me. I had tokusen tonshio. It's tonkotsu style, and I think they put a nice mix of fish and pork bone stock if I'm not wrong. If your tongue is sharp you can detect a hint of ginger. The menma here is strong, but tasty to me, so prepare yourself if you happen not to find menma tasty. Noodles are chijire, hokkaido style. Again, prices are about the same. Reasonable quantity. Oh, and the salt-flavoured cha-su is very good, worth a mention. In fact that should only be the reason why you are here in the first place. For people who like your cha-su meaty, this is the place to go to. Finishing the soup is difficult. Expect to be thirsty. Service is generally okay - they give you a glass of water and top it up, but atmosphere is rather laid back and that includes the waitresses. I don't care, do you? 4. Baikoken Not tried by me, but by my friend, who finds the atmosphere rather stuffy and not sparkling clean. Butter ramen with corn is uhh, like butter ramen and corn. But it's done well. Rest, he mentions, is rather ordinary. Prices also the same, etc. There's also a chain in hokkaido, but I never tried it out. Asahikawa style - I expect the noodles to be chijire. 5. Menya Shinchan This place is done by a Japanese chef. Not easy to find admist the rest of the quay buildings but you'll get there. It has a nice atmosphere, neat and tidy and not very big. Popular also amongst the Japanese. They serve the ramen jiro style dish which is basically lots of toppings on top. Shoyu ramen is $13...we're seeing a trend here, aren't we?  Cha-su is decent, ajitamago is well done, soup is average. There's some chinese vibe going around with this place also, but for the most part the ramen doesn't stray too far from the traditional, making this place worth a visit at least once if you are in the area. 6. Marutama This is a very famous shop here. It's chicken broth. Light, tasty and the noodles are decent. I haven't tried the aka ramen, but I heard that it is unique, so check that out. Nutty flavour. Does not scream out must-try, but if you're tired of tonkotsu this could be the place for you. Plus points for a pretty cashier? 7. Ippudo Big chain in Japan. Ridiculous ambience and you're paying for it. Glitzy and ornate, too bad you can't eat the decor. There's only two things you can eat here and it's shiroi or akai. White is some light tonktosu soup with pork loin cha-su, lean but not generous. Cha-su version is $17 I think. Portions feed no more than a nigerian kid so this is truly expensive, but what would you expect from a place in MG anyway? Red is $18 and has fattier cha-su with richer (not really) miso soup. Not a lot of depth to the soups in general, I've had much better miso in sapporo chains. Noodles are a plus, hakata style which is very thin and fine, al-dente. Miserable amount of black fungus. If you come here hungry, you want to order kaedama, which is extra $2 I believe. Add in service charge and tax and you're staring at $23.50 for a simple cha-su men. Obscene prices so I try to avoid this place like hell as a rule. 8. Tampopo Serves a wide variety of ramen. Nothing special about most of em, but surely you're here for the kurobuta shabu-men. It's probably a waste of black pork in the soup because it doesn't taste too different lmao. Better fried as tonkatsu, but I digress. Miserly amount of pork, but the tonkotsu soup is not bad at all - even better than Ippudo's, and sweeter than most. Comes with chili flakes - better ask for it in a seperate small dish, they can do that. Too much in the soup and it spoils the taste. Comes with cabbage, and is generally filling enough. Also a little on the expensive side iirc. The rest are not worth checking out, although I'm partial to the tontoro at ajisen. Don't mind that. And, that's about it. Btw, don't listen to most of the other top 10 ramen reviews by 8 days or foodieblogs, they're not really dedicated especially to ramen. I am - I hunt for ramen in tokyo and I know how real Japanese ramen tastes like. If you're heading there you can ask me here or PM me for places to go to, I'll suggest you go all over tokyo to wierd places like menya kissou in kiba and sumire tokyo bay in chiba.
2290	Whoa massive WOT! Thumbs up for the sharing though.
291	Good review! My favourite is not Nantsutei however, cos i prefer Santouka noodles to it. Hopefully, we will see more and more Ramen Ten in Singapore (the good one that is...)
2598	Very nice write up.  Went back to Ichiban Tei recently after a long while. I find their soup is one of the least oily ones around and still taste good.
68	any meni chi fans?
1966	me.. i feel that its pretty good.. but have not been there for over a year since i ord..
1059	Taste is something really subjective, but to put Nantsutei above Santouka IMO is not really acceptable, sorry about that. Their over-generous bean sprouts just make it worse and not a bit better. The pork-base soup has too strong porky smell and with the type of hype being built up before i went, it just fell flat on my face.   Any 'Golden Dragon' ramen in Tokyo can beat 80% of the ramen in SG already and of cos IMHO only. Santouka is very close to what is being offered in JP and really in SG cannot complain liao. Till now, to eat sth better than Santouka, only JP can offer that at this moment.  Sorry if i sound harsh on the above. Just a input from a ramen-lover.
1284	i haven eaten nantsutei either but i do agree that santouka can really compete with wat is offered in jp... it's the closest to jp ramen i have eaten in sgp... even the restaurant itself (at the central branch) feels exactly like those u find in japan..!  regards,  wacky
482	i see. Great then, forget about Nantsutei. Save your money for other things.
1416	been to nantsutei a few days ago. not a super ramen guru myself but to me the soup base is really nice at the start but it tends to get alittle too oily and strong pork smell towards the end of the meal.
4155	I had Nantsutei today for dinner. Had the cha shu ramen, missus had the negi i like the negi with the lotsa shaved spring onions toppings. Soup was nice BUT till now, i still so thirsty, tats 6 hrs ago. Wonder why i usually like counter seats as we like to see how they cook. To my surprise, they use automated machines that lower the uncooked noodles into the boiling water, then cook use chopsticks stir stir, then 60s later(i used a timer), basket comes up and noodles done. Interesting the gyoza was cooked using a timer  Overall was ok, but my taste buds still prefer Santouka
6	Sapporo Ramen Sanomaru opens today!  @ TripleOne Somerset #02-15
0	Got promo???
289	Its the building behind cineleisure ?  The building open liao huh ?
224	its not the one behind cine.. its the old singapore power building. opposite pan pac serviced appt
21	Oic, sp power building, i know it revamped with a few cool cafes, din noe it renamed lol
358	just tried the new Marutama outlet at united square today. not too bad but not as good as the one at Central. Still better than the one at liang court though
657	Woot another new outlet, thanks for SIC! Someone do go makan and come back give FR pls!  Or maybe next week if free I will go check it out and give my own review!
148	M
1546	I don't really understand why Marutama would actually have their outlets situated so near each other though I'm not a big fan of Marutama in the first place. Apart from having an unique soup base, the rest just seems average to me...
147	Marutama soup base got msg or not?
938	should not be....but ask the chef?
121	Nope. I happen to be in the same food hygiene course as their manager.
11295	Actually the only thing I like from Ken is . Nothing else there.
40	which one will u prefer for ramen? Muratama or Tampopo ?
145	Muratama. Tampopo is over rated imo
53	dont u guys feel heaty eating ramen in singapore??? ramen is best enjoyed in the cold
543	Same as laksa mah, u dun eat everyday
896	Muratama is famous for which ramen?
55	marutama only has 4 kinds of ramen....the normal one, the spicy one, the 13 nuts version and the chicken soup one go for the spicy or the nuts versions
231	I tot Marutama soup base is only chicken
16	For me, their ramen ain't as fantastic.. but the YAKI CHA SIEW.. . .GODLIKE!
1183	I agree !  The grilled char siew is melt in yr mouth
68	u are over confident about yourself in tasting and rating ramen.  eating and scouting as your hobby does not mean u are good.  in your earlier post abt positive comments on ajisen, already know you dun know what is good. no need to say anything more abt ajisen.  Nanttsutei, u get sick of the soup after a short time. the bean sprouts, after a while u duno if you are having a bowl of bean sprouts or ramen. its too much. only the soup is ok. but i agree with u that the egg is not well done.  hmm....and u complain about having just water and beer. no soft drinks?  and u wanna talk abt being authentic. i know i sound rude but, i guess u are a teenager, or someone who does not drink at all?  ramen with soft drinks...hmm.....
33	^  seriously, thats his opinion, why the personal attacks?
36285	apologies for the personal attack, but that's because he sounded too cocky.
907	new in town!
10745	Looks good! Will try out in the next few weeks and let everyone know how does it fare against my favourites so far.
2024	Tried Kusabi last week.  Unfortunately, they are not as good as   Tonkotsu+Miso  Tonkotsu+Shoyu  This comes with the set.
835	Miso tonkutsu ramen lunch set.  Soupbase - quite an oily soupbase. Ingredients - 1 thin slice of miserable charsiew, some menma and spring onions. Noodles - looks like meepok kia, not so tasty like yellowish noodles. Meat rice balls were tasty.  Set lunch $16.55++  Overall, I don't like oily soupbase and noodles.
16	@japsfx: where is this?
19854	Should be Kusabi, I recognise the bowls that they are using according to the pictures uploaded. They seemed to have took up the stall location where Azabu Sabo ice-cream used to be I think. Was ard at The Central earlier last wk one of the evenings and was flipping thru the menu intending to go in, however because my other dining partner was suddenly craving for burgers, we dropped the plans for ramen that day so I didn't get to try it. May try it out sometime this weekend and give my verdict, but from what japsfx and and isky has shared in terms of pictures, doesn't seem to look that appealing to me. (well looks can be deceiving though, so I will not pass any judgement yet until I try it)
76	juz had ippudo at 1/4 the price.. lol
421	Maybe I cant take the true Jap taste of ramen soup base, find it too salty Does authentic Jap ramen contain collagen as one of the ingredient? Personally I like the ramen at Kyo Nichi and one ramen stall in Toa payoh Koufu food court... can give it a try if you haven done so
487	i am no expert in ramen but having tried Ippudo, Marutama, Tampopo, Santouka, Nantsuttei..i'm more inclined towards Nantsuttei, the garlicky oil soupbase suits me fine
274	yep, use to like the TYP HDB hub koufu ramen,  the char siew is not bad... budgeted price as well.
309	Ha, same. Santouka, Nantsuttei &amp; Miharu for me.
9	i thought ramen all taste the same....
1221	/facepalm...
340	shiok should try 1 day/
66	there are many types of ramen..Hakata, Tokyo and Sapporo etc..
55	got this from japan!
2665	Cool! How much does it cost you? I'm still depending on Sapporo Ichiban Tonkotsu for my occasional ramen fix at home.
1220	Instant Santouka!    Cool!
85	The last time I went Meidi Ya @ Liang Court, they have the Santouka toroniku vacuum packed.....
1	you might as well say all ramen tastes like instant noodles.... and if you agree to this.... means you probably never ACTUALLY tried ramen -- those places where you had "ramen" probably really try to pass off some ordinary noodles or instant noodles... and cook them with instant noodle like stock... as ramen...  regards, wacky
102	but it doesn't comes with instant pork cheeks does it?? i tot that's wat that is REALLY outstanding from santouka...  regards, wacky
1216	think was less than 300yen....
8404	are the ingredients plentiful?
47	I found Nantsuttei to be pretty fragrant, thanks to the burnt oil. The flavor of the tonkotsu broth was not really there, but perhaps that is to be expected given the overwhelming heaviness of the oil.  Enjoyed it quite a bit.
83	absolutely recommended. must eat with the egg-dip for a more flavorful bite !
1261	how much per bowl?
1	my take on Shin-Sapporo Ramen @ Suntec City  Hakata Tonkotsu Ramen (Non-Spicy version) $15++  Served in thin and firm noodles with Tonkotsu broth, simmered from white pork bones. Very flavourful stuff going on right there.  Huge cut of Yakibuta (Char Siu). Doesn't come with too much fats, which is always a good thing for the health conscious.   What is ramen without the slightly runny tamago?   The noodles.   Shin-Sapporo Miso Ramen $15++ (Non-spicy version)  Consists of 4 miso pastes from Sapporo. Similiar to the Hakata Tonkotsu Ramen, comes with white pork bone broth but served with the traditional thick curly noodles freshly made by the restaurant each day.
95	Chicken Karaage $4++ Gyoza $5++
9	i just went to Nantsuttei   overall is notbad man
705	i love ippudo ramen! ramen santouka is not nice!!!
2302	Just had a  over the weekend. I like their ramen!
552	ippudo at madrian orchard right  last i passsed by i saw wow a horde of queue
20	hmmm you seems to be one of the few ppl who doesn't like santouka... i think most ppl think it's nice... which ramen did u order?? i went there 3 out of 3 times i ordered the pork cheek ramen.... the pork cheek is........ heavenly.... i'd love to have just a BIG BOWL of the cheeks alone...!  dunno if their other normal ramen at santouka are any good or not... i've not tried the others b4... maybe that's why u dun like...?  regards, wacky
2117	Ippudo has 1 more outlet in Mohd Sultan
2387	just tried it today and like it as well. i think Santouka's noodles is nicer but i really like Nantsuttei's soup! my friend prefers this than Santouka in overall. i ordered the chashu ramen, would definitely go back again
1997	Just had lunch at Ramenplay. Had the sanpo ramen with 3 different types of pork. The charsiew is one of the softest I've had, melt in ur mouth type. Tonkotsu soup is not bad too, not as thick as santouka but close. Worth giving a try.  They got all sorts of chicken side dishes and the bamboo chicken is not bad.   Thanks for the recommendation seizure_
452	y did u say quality not as good?
733	why u all like tonkotsu...its like instant giving urself a sorethroat in this kind of weather. anyway different ramen shops have different way of doing tonkotsu.. so if u think that only good tonkotsu means thick thick , salty salty, heavy on pork taste then u are wrong.. different shops have different way of doing the soup.. some shops prefer to lighten the pork taste and heaviness to achieve a balance.
208	Most authetic ramen I had in Spore is from Miharu at Robertson Quay. Ippudo is over-rated even in Japan, IMHO.
521	Hmm, Ittadakimasu! At Millenium Walk.  Authentic ramen, really good, you should try if you love ramen, alothough its expensive, really worth it
22313	Yoshimaru Ramen Bar
1383	Are there any new ramen bars worth drooling over? I've already tried most of the better ones out there...
345	any ramen restaurant that can upsize the portion ? so far the ramen i tried, the portion is about 1 packet of maggie mee or the most 1.5 packet.
51	Both Marutama and Santouka can. Infact I think most can if u ask.
217	thanks. cause i got ask upsize at other place before, upsize like no difference to me.  sorry ar. big eater here.
207	Yoshimaru Ramen Bar can also.. additional $3
42	this is eat halfway then take picture right. don't tell me this is the default portion. can't even see the noodles.
2823	I believe it is pre-eating photos. The noodles are below the soup mah.
12118	Pre eat portion. Inexperience taking food picture . Better shot next time
71	Beppu Menkan! their spicy ramen is superb. about $14 max.
117	14 dollars....  how big is the bowl ?
8518	Ippudo Tao at UE Square. They have some exclusive flavors not available at the Mandarin Gallery outlet. My favourite is the Tao Aka - thin curly noodles with a thick pork broth that's slightly spicy.   It has displaced Tampopo as my usual ramen place
271	it's pretty decent.
410	try Baikohken ramen at north canal road. their full portions are really huge
233	most ramen resturant can add noodle FOC as long as you have soup...
92	Ooh, I like Beppu Menkan as well although it's not really authetic Japanese ramen. Their ramen with fried chicken is pretty decent and good portion of serving. And you can choose the level of spiciness for their ramen.
29	order full size charsiew ramen jiak already welly welly full one
24505	i tried baikohken once... although i find it kinda over-rated... the portion may be huge but that's like more noodles (or lots of bean sprouts if u choose to add them) than char siew.....   in contrast... santouka pork cheek ramen may be more $$$ but it comes with generous amounts of pork cheek.... moreover pork cheek should be more ex.... so in comparison i dun think baikohken is as value for $$$......  regards,  wacky
189	Just tried the new Kura Ramen at PS. Another Hokkaido Miso based ramen. They have both white and red Miso version. I tried the white one and it is not bad. The chashu is nice but the slices are really small. The noodles are cut strangely short for my liking. Worth trying.
2467	Shin-Sapporo Ramen store found outside the main suntec building near to carrefour (#01-223) is quite nice
11	Ippudo at mandarin gallery  -----  This message is sent from
11	I tried Ippudo Tao at mohd sultan.  More rounded dinner menu, but portions still very tiny.  I had the Aka Tamago which is thin noodles in fish broth.  The noodles is exactly like wanton mee, broth with the miso taste like very a thicker version of prawn mee soup.  I dunno if it's authentic anot, but I quite like it
852	I have tried the Char Siew Noodle at Nantsuttei ramen @ Parco. Value for money!
440	now like so many ramen restaurant like so confusing. wonder if anyone can compile a list so we could all go try one by one. but personally i still like santouka.
1	i like santouka's soup! and the pork cheek   but the noodle itself tastes wierd ( at leat least to me...)
284	current favorite:  miharu @ gallery hotel
9314	current favourite: Sanomaru @ TripleOne I'm loving their shoyu ramen!!
7925	New Ku Ra ramen at plaza sg.  1st look of soupbase, oily! but after tasting a few times, kinda like it. Its a thick red miso soupbase(after taste slight bitter).  Ingredients: thin slice of char siew - taste quite normal, seaweed, egg, bamboo shoots, shredded minced meat.  Overall, its still worth trying.
1566	Ippudo is still the best in town.. imo
20054	i've been to the one at Paragon, and i must say it got me going back almost every visit to Paragon now.
460	Their new branch opening soon @ NEX.
11681	this 1 by ajisen leh...
586	ajisen=boycott/siam  their flavours are too mild/localised  no difference from eating a overpriced mee kia soup
111	they like to mislead people.. i order the 4 chili rating of volcano ramen.. to me its half a star chili rating..
94	jap food most are not hot even they mark very hot. Bought jap curry at supermarket label v hot but when taste is not hot at all.
26424	by mild i mean their saltiness
1	tot i should bump this thread up and keep it alive... while re-post my photos from ippudo tao @ UE Square here:  anyway anyone tried ippudo @ mandarin gallery and ippudo tao @ UE Square and compare the 2 b4?? i've not tried ippudo @ mandarin gallery b4 due to the crowd... so i tot i'd go to UE Square one to try first... i must say the soup is excellent... i had the aka below... it's now my 2nd fav after santouka.....   sake:  chashu chisha maki  shiru ramen  aka ramen  apologize for the lousy photos taken from cheap-low-end phone's camera...   regards,  wacky
4	the ramen can upsize or not ?
3	we never asked... none of us are mega eaters...... but i supposed can ba.........   regards,  wacky
4	how you find the portion.. got 3 packets of maggie mee or 2 packets of chu qian yi ding ?
8	i dun eat maggie mee/chu qian yi ding nowadays... i eat koka or samyang korean no-msg noodles... urm i would say maybe 2 packets of instant noodles at most ba..... chashu is quite alot... the noodles + chashu + egg + soup already enough to fill me...   regards,  wacky
3	1 thing, the soup can refill or not ? or must charge extra.....?
1	actually we never asked that too.... all of us were full liao to ask for refill..... basically we just ate wat we are given...   anyway overall service is good...   regards,  wacky
4	ok. will go there when i get pay.. bring 50 dollars to whack for the nett price.
8	maybe u can order all 3 types of ramen...?? den u can review which one u like better...   regards,  wacky
14206	i tried mandarin gallery one b4. nice but frankly not worth it for the price. i think its $3 or $4 more than other japanese ramen stores here.
349	Has anyone tried Mizushima Jap Restaurant? It's along those Tanjong Pagar Shop houses... the ramen there i like a lot.. The soup's very tasty and the noodles are just right.... it ain't expensive too..
967	Te best to me is the Shinjiro ramen at menya Shincan Robertson Quay followed by the ramen place at 1st floor Gallery hotel.
237	have u guys tried the black pork cheeks ramen at liang court??
57	oh for those who like the Sapporo Ramen @ Suntec, yesterday i saw them having a signboard that says "Any Ramen for $12 on Monday".
3	looks good, I've tried ippudo at Mandarin gallery a few weeks after it's opened.  Was not impressed with the ramen.  Also was so disappointed that the egg (which i paid extra) was not runny.
0	by the way i also went to nantsuttei (did not take pictures) and i still think for me, i preferred santouka ramen followed by Tampopo.
61	I've been to the one at UE Square couple of times.  The Aka ramen is much spicier and has a much stronger taste as compare to mandarin.  I prefer UE square version, I actually quite enjoy it
60	ok will pop in to try the ramen when i'm at UE square.  Give them another chance.
137	Sure, I dun really like Mandarin, the queue made it worst.  I was plesantly surprised with UE Square's, AKA Ramen.  Not the most traditional, but the prawn broth was spicy and tasty, like japan laksa, watever tat is lol
471	the aka is spicy??? i had the aka but i didn't find it at all spicy even though i knew (or thought) it was to be spicy...??  i had to try to think very hard to sense a bit of the spicyness...  but yeah the strong is pretty strong... and i loved it...!!  regards,  wacky
8	U mean Mandarin or UE Sq?  Mandarin not spicy at all. UE Square's ver more spicy
335	i mean UE square... i tot aka and tao ramen is exclusive to UE square branch...?   regards,  wacky
526	Yeah the queue at ippudo mandarin can get very long at times. i recently went to river valley ippudo, pretty nice place
18236	Try zundo seafood ramen at isetan hokkaido fair, not bad... $18 - miso soupbase, corn, hairy crab(half), 2 scallops(fresh), char siew and egg(half)... (^&lt;&gt;^)
87682	Hi people, I still need to confirm if the opening hours is still the same?  Ken Ramen House  Noodle House Ken  Orchard Plaza #01-17/18 (opp cuppage plaza)  Tel: 6235-5540  Opening hours:  Weekdays Lunch 1200-1430  Weekdays Dinner 1800-0200 (that's right. 2AM)  Sat 1200-0200  Sun/PH 1200-2200
51	bump up this thread to keep it alive...  are there no more new ramen places liao...?   dunno why... i am craving to have nice ramen again.... maybe at santouka again... anyone interested...?   regards,  wacky
13	Wacky, have you tried Ramen Play.  My friend told me it's nice, I check hungrygowhere, not many ppl reviewed the place and reviews were mixed.  I too like Santouka, the ramen and the soup, although i prefer their normal char siew as the pork cheek was a bit tad saltish for my taste.
188	hmmm... ramen play not tried b4.... but is by breaktalk right?? with not much good reviews + feels like very commercialized ramen = doesn't interest me as much...   maybe 2 apr outing.... can extend to dinner and jiak ramen...?   regards,  wacky
77	wah you think i got digestive power like Swordsman.  ha ha
210	ish dinner wor.... u still nid to jiak dinner that day after recce chinatown over rite?? we are not like having buffet on that day... is more like we can have many small meals in 1 day (breakfast tea, lunch, afternoon tea, evening tea, dinner)....  regards, wacky
4255	i may not be able to join for dinner as i got dinner plans (but after eating so much may not have stomach for dinner)
344	I actually don't see what the hype is at mandarin... felt kinda dumb queuing for so long only thing which made up for it was the pork wraps  that's pretty good
631	ramen play just go for the shoyu ramen or tonkotsu ramen.. i tink the soup is not bad... the aji tamago yolk is liquidy... .. the cha shu is standard too.  only the noodles not really fantanstic.. kinda plasticky, but amateurs wun know a difference
4437	Not sure about the lunch hour but dinner is correct. If i'm not wrong they close on Sundays. One of the best ramen, and when you add butter it just taste so much better.
65	I am a ramen hater but ever since my 1st bowl of Spicy Tonkotsu Ramen at , I'm a convert.  Been revisiting it several times and I always order extra soy eggs and cha-shu. DAMN GOOD. Even the Japanese come here so that says something
63	why would a ramen hater even have his 1st bowl of ramen ?
1539	Aiyoh, at least he has turned away from the Dark side. Ramen is meant for everyone to enjoy...unless you have problems with the ingredients inside.
1512	I wonder how do one start hate ramen in the first place   btw, u have 3 eggs with your ramen ! Tats a lot bro
11	Looks like you guys are not afraid of the Japanese food scare. I personally think its very safe to eat and guess what...I had Japanese food for dinner just now. Haha.  TechieSporty
196	if its time for us to go, we will go. I like ramen with generous portion of cha shu, no veggie. that time i and my colleague go Baikohken to eat ramen for dinner.  not bad. just that too much bean sprouts and bamboo shoot. The miso soup base is not salty enough.
63	If it's not a high end shop, chances are they don't use Japanese ingredients to begin with. If it's a high end shop, they should be able to source for ingredients from western Japan or outside Japan. So don't worry and just eat
14	but high end shop if import ingredients from outside japan... end up quality may suffer?? so for me if i'd avoid japanese food... i'll more of avoiding because we may not get the usual high quality stuff now then because of radioactivity...   regards,  wacky
17	agreed! on every aspect!
712	Other than stuff specific to Japan (like certain species of fish), I'm sure top restaurants will be able to source for ingredients elsewhere, such as tuna from Spain  The only thing is that you've gotta pay more for that quality now.
59762	i tink marutama is gud, juz tt it's kinda exp for ramen, n a slice of pork.
1	Tsuru Tsuru Tei at Central -Group of Tampopo  free flow of blackpig shabu shabu (shoulder and belly), cabbage, golden mushroom, ****ake, egg, ramen for 90mins.. lunch price $35 after ++..
110	Ramen Santouka! Simply awesome ramen with an amazing soup base, bamboo shoots, the pork cheeks are so tender and all the side dishes like ebi prawns are so fresh and huge  the gyoza is very authentic Japanese too
7	i'm glad this thread still alive...   anymore reviews of sanomaru @ tripleone somerset?? how is it compared to santouka or ippudo?? had wanted to eat there couple of times but end up didn't...   regards,  wacky
8	when i go restaurant i dun like to eat alone one...  regards, wacky
2094	lol... another day la... well it's wkday and in town... not easy to find ppl last min go down eat..... den i need to travel down oso... zzz...  besides i asking for more reviews... if ish no good den no need to jiak liao...   regards,  wacky
1162	dunno if this has been mentioned, but yoshimaru at holland v quite good too!
70735	hi i've been to santouka,marutama and sanomaru.  my overall appraisal is that sanomaru is a slight notch below the other two, but it is much much better than the run of the mill ramen shops. The tamago is very nice. It is definitely worth a try if you have not tried it before.
1296	this is in sunday times today... regards, wacky
6	any1 tried the 6 stalls at illuma?
259	Will try the one from Tetsu this coming week. Can't wait to try the Tsukemen as recommended by my sensei.
796	ippudo at Mandarin gallery not bad
3	Those 6 stalls are in Illuma Bugis right?
16	can advise what are those 2?  the first one is hokkaido ramen?  the 2nd one?
30	Nice ones if wanna base on my friends review:  - ikkousha, thinner noodles, feel its not as huge a bowl, so wouldnt feel so overwhelmed. porky soup base nice.  - Gantetsu, Sapporo butter n corn , not the rated number one special miso ramen. with butter n corn, its more of novety taste, not porky soup base style. pork is tasty &amp; fragant.  - Paitan Tsukemen from Tetsu -highly recommended, yet to try.
502	So exciting! After recently trying the delicious Uobushi ramen at Kusabi, can't wait to try these new ramen!
4952	Can organise a ramen outing?  Moi like ramen...
206	I tried the following ramen shop and I highly recommend it to all
747	i tried the tsukemen today.. it doesn't look appetizing but it tasted really good! Slurp up the noodles with the thick sauce, wipe it down with cold sapporo beer!  be warned that the sauce is not for drinking though, its thick and salty, but goes very well with the noodles!
1402	some stalls selling tsukemen in japan will pour hot soup in after you are done eating to let u drink the soup
1971	I went down to and tried from Ikkousha and Bario. The queue became very long after I went in.  Nick of time.
193	read this thread just in time for my friend's birthday tmr. thanks for sharing!
9	Went to Santouku last Friday and standard seem to have dropped, anyone else tried there recently? The pork in my Ramen was hard and dry!
30	why dont u feed back to the manager?
5361	anyone tried b4 the one at tampines century square basement 1. forget the name already. their char siew is those bbq type one veri nice ! the shop name is Shin-Sapporo Ramen
503	I tried the Ikkousha this morning. It is not bad but nothing special. I want to try the other 5 as they seemed more interesting.
4006	Tried Bario Ramen just now  Queue was terrible  Its damn oily  When they prepared the broth, they poured what looked like fats into the bowl  Look nice, but then u realise ur ramen is soaked in oil  My wife had Gantetsu, i liked it better  The dumplings from Tetsu was sweet n juicy
21	Ajisan ramen scandal!
26	Bario isn't worth the queue. Nothing too special, imo. Prefer the jiro ramen at Menya Shinchan.
26	ajisen....  good for ramen beginners no diff from soup noodles..imo
80	I don't consider those noodles from Ajisen ramen at all.
15	Had Tetsu's tsukemen: damn good man! Also recommendations from the remaining 5 stalls?
10	its baikohken good ? planning to try it tmr
73	nothing spectacular..but very filling..not sure if they still serve the "coffee water"
2222	have u read the previous pg of this thread? anyway, do share ur recommendations =)
26	Moi now at raffles place... Any gd ramen to recommend? O.o
10	nope.........
40	Beppu Ramen (Bie Fu). @ china square. try at ur own risk.
72	it's quite nice, last time always go when stationed at CBD area
0	oh... I go jiak at Marutama Ra-Men  chicken soup base... Nice and rich...  Add additional items like egg and char siew...  Char siew is soft and tender... But a bit   like eating canned pork trotter... It's tat kind of   taste...  The egg ish nice too with the liquid yolk oozing out...  However its cold...they Fridge the egg or ice water it...  Like the fine chopped spring onion and seaweed...  Can see the chef skill and attention there...
3	Comparing Baikohken's char siu to others, baikohken gave the most char siu pork ever. Super filling...
2	wat do u think of santouka?
1	walk towards Central @ Clarke Quay... go for Santouka... afterall very near only ma...   regards,  wacky
14	really?? i tot my impression when i was there... they give ALOOOT of tau gay only... so i find them over-rated...   on the other hand... santouka pork cheeks... they give ALOT of them... plus it's the and not quantity that matters most to me...   regards,  wacky
11	i wouldnt recommend him to walk to clarke quay under the hot sun!
8	erm i did walk to central where i had the ramen... O.o"
460	i thought the one with lots of tau gay is Menya Shinchan at Robertson Quay.  Baikohken is not bad.  I tried before.
10	thought baikohken no tau gay ?
855	i think i ordered to add tao gey.... didn't know they will add SOOOOOOOOO much tao gey.... anyway daikokuya opened a branch in serangoon garden... has anyone tried their ramen b4?? i am thinking of trying it some day... and den can go the FC to eat beancurd too...  i've visit the same chain in tokyo b4... but that one serves tempura one ley... not ramen.... regards, wacky
2234	You shld order the normal one.  1st time at baikonken, I order the tau gey and corn. End up, really all tau gey and corn, no much char siu.  If fact, 1st time, my fren order the normal XL size, got so much char siu, he gave me some.  Subsequently, i order the normal char siu ramen will do or for big eater like my fren - order XL.  Took him to marutuma and santuaka, appearingly both taste ok to him but not enough to fill him!! We did ask for more noodle serving but 2nd serving not that nice as soup already lessen and cold.   Well, Baikohken suits me fine at cheaper price thou!
544	Tried it at Paragon last year...  The taste IMO is quite forgettable(after tasting the likes of Ippudo and Santouka)  Other than being situated at Paragon it don't warrant the slightly expensive price   i don't wanna pay $$$ to visit unless being forced
63	went Ramen King with friends yesterday, ordered the tsukemen from Tetsu with tamago and memma sides.  everything went well until i "pry" open the tamago, it was fully cooked so i took it back and ask the guy who took the orders why it's not like the one in their pictures (with runny yolk)... guess what he said "oh, this is singapore-style egg" if i want singapore-style egg, i can take that $2 and buy a carton of eggs from NTUC then cook em' myself
7	ya.. their eggs fail. already feedback to manager. said eggs in sg not fresh. so cannot make half boil.
153	rubbish... den how the other places can do that...??   regards,  wacky
385	if the eggs here are not fresh... then those kopitiam selling half-boiled eggs would've closed down a long time ago by MoH
13	i warned about the egg at Tetsu several posts back..u must have missed it..
97	I was not really worried about the egg when I ate Tetsu, just aiming for the broth and noodle nia. Speaking of eggs, Gantetsu's seems to be relatively more runny though.
25	Out of Gantetsu,Bario,Iroha, Ikkousha n Tetsu, i think Iroha one is most runny followed by Gantetsu and Ikkousha, Bario. Tetsu one is hard boil egg  These are base on what i saw from my friend's order as well. Personally only tried Bario n Iroha. Bario taste is too overwhelming for me, Iroha one is good.
3799	Forget about the egg at Tetsu. It's all about the dipping broth and the q noodles
112	ramen not a favourite amongst my list of Japanese foods but i quite like santouka and marutama. santouka's tokusen pork cheek ramen is the best i've had.
1316	I know chicken broth is not very Japanese like, but I still love the spicy chicken ramen at Marutamen (at Central only).  Who's with me!
74	ish notch bad... But egg ish cold...  Quite ex than most if u add the items...  The chicken soup ish flavorful and good...
10	Tmr i will be going Central to have dinner. They say theres a good one there. Whats the name and whats good?
35	Ramen Santouka?Try the Shio ramen with their Tokusen Toroniku.
130	this... the tokusen toroniku (or beef cheeks) is a MUST TRY.... anyway personally i prefer the shoyu over shio... i concluded that when i ate the shoyu again yest.... anyway most ppl seems to prefer the shio...   regards,  wacky
165	personally, i like Ippudo. But i'm quite interested to try the Hakata ramen at Iluma
6	its pork cheek i believe
633	when did pork cheek becomes beef cheek?
397	hahahaha dunno why my mind was thinking pork cheeks but end up my fingers typed beef cheeks....    regards,  wacky
28	shio ish simi ar? the other one ish soya sauce right?
21	shio - salt  shoyu - soy sauce
1214	kamsia kuno zehzehs.
255	Tried Taishoken @ Ramen Champion yesterday: the broth for the Tsukemen taste rather like those dipping sauce for Cha Sobas. Egg yolks are runnier than those I got from Gantetsu and the char siew is quite tender. Note that it's best not to order the large servings...... unless u are really capable of eating a lot At the moment for me, it is Tetsu &gt; Gantetsu &gt; Taishoken
62	i went to simi basketball ramen.. :x
41	and do u like?
43	Nope........
44	marutama ah... i ate once long ago and didn't left any impression on me that time... so i think it's so-so only....   regards,  wacky
57	Marutama is helluva boring. Don't understand its popularity.
98	coz 2nd floor one super crowded then bo pians must go up?
690	which was why i dont understand y u go there..
8	coz my friend say its good! i nv try before mahs.
20	I think if people go to Marutama, it's for the 7 nut soup. The chicken broth tastes suspiciously like CQYD chicken noodle soup. -_- If you are at Central and Santouka is full, can consider Kusabi. The Uoboshi Tonkotsu is quite tasty.
27	alamak.. i chose the cheeken soup.. i duno wat to eat also.. so i just choose wat everyone chose.
1365	I feel sad for Kusabi. They're awfully underrated and deserve a better crowd than what they're getting.
703	Well, there hasn't been much advertising for them and they are hidden away in a corner. The only issue I have is the powdery aftertaste of the uoboshi powder they use in the soup. Now I think the main focus is on the Ramen Championship at Iluma.
1516	i just had daikokuya @ serangoon garden for lunch today... had the stamina shoyu ramen... i tot the highlight is the soup...! the stamina ramen soup comes with a generous dose of minced garlic... which adds much flavour to the soup... and another plus is that the soup has got pig fats floating on top... i give high marks for the soup... noodles wise... average..... charshu wise... fail... although they give 4 huge pieces for just $14 bowl ramen... the non fatty areas are pretty tough.... and not flavorful... only the fatty areas can pass... runny egg ($2) is small and one of the ugliest i've seen... but at least yolk is runny... egg can pass...  overall... still not bad... at least better than my experience at the ramen champion... p.s photos taken by my phone camera since i dun carry normal camera around during lunch...  regards, wacky
18	Had Tetsu today at the Ramen Champions. Bought the Pork + Chicken Tsukemen with an egg.  Somehow mine came pretty cold (i.e. no smoke). Is it supposed to be like this? Kinda small serving with 1 small piece of pork (ok for the price) and the egg isnt the runny type. Also, the soup doesnt seem that salty either. I thought the Shio ramen at Santouka tasted even saltier than the Tsukemen i had. Overall, still prefer santouka. Just to add on, i visited daikokuya a few weeks ago. Given the standard, probably will never visit it ever again. Oops
2207	which daikokuya branch did u visit... and which ramen u ate??   regards,  wacky
144	imo. santouka ( The Central ), tampopo ( Liang Court ) , baikohken (Raffles Place) , sapporo miharu( Gallery hotel) are the best ramens in Singapore right now .
40	i have been to baikohken several times.. I always go for full bowl, more meat.
28	wah that one charsiew really is allot.. but their prices like keep going up...
259	price raise again...? last time i went it cost me 22-23 dollars.
134	Think there is a price diferencw between taka outlet and north bridge road outlet?
18	i only went to the raffles branch.. taka is selling more exp.. i assume.
2	not again la but it has been going up allot... now its 20+ already???? my gf and i usually eat at the raffles place branch cos her office is opposite. last time we ate i think the char siew ramen cost abt $15?
862	my bowl of ramen is full plate with max char siew by default + additional char siew by paying 3 dollars more and + 1 egg. $1.50. different from u
23	yeah i also ate at taka outlet chasu ramen + extra chashu + bamboo shoots and $25 dollars
1208	bagus. but i always ask for no veggie.. my stamp card is full can redeem either gyoza, charsiew don or small bottle of beer.. i guess charsiew don or small bottle of beer is more worth it.
820	lol..you shouldn't compare the standards of 1 ramen store from the other. Tetsu is rather famous ins Tokyo. You should taste the ramen in Japan before comparing those in Singapore.  Tsukemen shouldn't have watery eggs..it's dipping noodles. I reckon it's not the Japanese at tetsu who cooked the ramen from you
4	Tried  today
1252	And so how is it ??
888	what a big piece of sea weed and is that char siew.. paper thin.
30	taka also got baikohken? i always eat at raffles place , full bowl $20 easily . but shiok alot charsiew !
78	u choose miso soup base, soya sauce or salt ?  i can never have enough of charsiew.
48	where gt nice Ramen other than Central,Liang Court? Name me a few.. and wats nice to order..  Thanks.
12	It's thin, but definitely not paper thin.
16	ippudo tao @ UE square...  regards,  wacky
5	wat is nice to order there?  thks
3	damage ?
31	IIRC, it's $14.80. That's the "special"  Basic bowl is $11.80  + fungus is 1 dollar more  + egg is 2 dollar more  Special basically is + egg and fungus.
17	ramen lor... wat else...   go for the tao kuro (black) or tao aka (red)... both of them are nice i think.......  regards,  wacky
26	the char siew they gave is 2 very thin pieces ?
138	Not sure if the given charshu is fixed amt of slices for everyone or not. I got 3 pieces, not all same size. It's thinner than the usual sliced charshu, kinda like a more thickly sliced ham.
329	i always eat miso only . my fav soup base
34	thanks i shall stick to baihouken, the charshu given are fixed amount and a thickness i like.
18	If you like Baikohken, try . I quite like it
9	the charsiew don really nice... but cannot eat all the spring onions if not smelly
8475	i can redeem for free.. lol
27	this ramen is featured in sunday times today... regards, wacky
0	i have the article.. i watsapp to moi fwens.. should be trying ~
796	i posted liao...   regards,  wacky
28	fwah so near to my work place! less than 5mins walk nia..
3294	good... can go try liao and come back feedback how was it??   regards,  wacky
112	going there tonight.. will let u all know... last wednesday went to the raman place at mbs. last friday went to baikohen at raffles place  today this one
3642	the noodles used in the various ramen shops seem to drop in the quality..i wonder if the earthquake crisis have affected the imported ingredients
4736	Yes I like Ichibantei too, check out the review of Ichibantei at this food blog ...
14135	Yes my vote is only for either IchibanTei or Nantsutei...
184	So near my house but din not go try yet haha  .. no wonder nw i see queues forming outside.
45	Keisuke's ajitama is damn nice..
525	I tried the . I think I prefer the original.
16	Still like the one at gallery hotel the best.
860	ippudo??  regards,  wacky
337	It's Miharu.
23	Miharu last time i tried i found it too salty
157	oh... haven't got to try... it's one place i always wanted to try oso..   regards,  wacky
2602	Depends which one you order.   I always drink green tea when i eat ramen as I find it helps clear my palette after every mouthful. Good for the more over powering soups.
45	Kusabi is gone from Central!  Tried the new Shin Aji Tsukemen from Santouka. A peppery soupbase. Worth trying if you are sick of the usual shio.
68	So fast Kusabi is gone? Was just thinking of going back there for the soup. =/ I think hard to get business with Santouka there.
104	wah.... got new soup base ah... must go and try some day....   regards,  wacky
90	and dinner at ramen king...   free hard boil eggs... i took one and mashed it up and dip into the soup to eat...  sesame seeds... u gotta grind it urself...   red spicy tonkotsu ramen.... $15.80 for all toppings...   black spicy tonkotsu ramen... $15.80 for all toppings... the s  the soup and noodles are good... flavored egg is very good.... unfortunately the charshu is tender but not flavorful... the black version is with black pepper... the red is chilli... i liked the black version soup better... but red one is good to drink on a rainy day....  regards,  wacky
12848	unlimited eggs at there.. ok 1 day might go down there.
4359	totally agree! super niceeeee
834	Santouka isn't that bad. Presentation and all are of satisfactory standard
2580	Just went Tonkotsu King for lunch. Its really good, soup is as good as Santouka which has been the benchmark for me all along. Tried the black pepper version, spicy n tastes perfect. Big eater can add soup n ramen cause serving is not exactly very big. Restaurant probably seats around 20pax so be prepare to wait if u go during peak meal times.
4	I remember there's another branch at Marina Sq....
26933	Their charshu don is the Best!
2380	hi hi~  i see like not much people here like ken's noodle house... is it? But that time I went there is because that is the only place can find hiyashii chuka in singapore(?), and I think it's very shiok lols. My friend ate ramen and I think it's nothing that special myself too...  By the way, don't know if it's me, but Ikkousha in Iluma IMO is the most jialat one... the noodles taste just like those you can buy instant, and the soup was salty as hell! My favourite in Ramen King one is Tetsu and Iroha...  Also, just had Tetsu + Upsized + another bowl of noodles... it's like $12.50 + $2 + $3... shiok! (Standard upsized portion is still not enough for me, I had to have another bowl)
401	How about the Shin Sapporo Ramen at ?  I love the broth and the Macha cheesecake... shiokz. Just went and lucky i kept the receipt.( I usually throw after the meal, dun bother to keep) Going to try for their facebook contest called BuyThis TellUs WePay.
15	There's one at 313 I think, can't remember the name but definitely over rated and over priced !
38	Hmm 313 got nice ramen?? Or you mean Triple One??? Both are just nearby each other..
829	ramenplay at 313..not to my taste though
50	i ate shin sapporo at CS... I think it's crap...
5593	ramenplay at RWS is crap. service bad, food bad. everything bad.
19	tripleone is ... never tried b4... wan to try oso... seems to have good reviews ley...   regards,  wacky
643	Tonkotsu KIng is good  Serving size is just right and i liked the preserved bean sprouts. Generous servings of unlimited hard boiled eggs too.
550	wheres tonkotsu king?
189	A  in it from Baikohken.
18769	if i am in orchard, shd i go for Tampopo, Baikoken, Ippudo or Santouka?
0	Ramrnplay not nice de.
1	Triple one nice
5688	Best Ramen in Singapore Contender #7: Nantsuttei: Black is the word!
43	wah... buy ah............!!!!!! Terms &amp; Conditions     * Voucher valid till 19 Feb 2012. Redemption starts from 18 Nov 2011.     * Voucher valid for:           o one Tokusen Toroniku (Pork Cheek) ramen           o inclusive of GST &amp; service charge           o choice of Shiro/Shoyu/Miso/Kara-Miso soup base     * Unlimited voucher purchase per customer. May purchase multiple vouchers as gifts.     * Printed voucher to be presented upon redemption.     * Voucher and its unconsumed value is non-refundable and non-exchangable.     * Voucher is not valid with other discounts and promotions.     * Voucher can be redeemed at:       21 Cuppage Terrence       Cuppage Rd s229452       Mon to Fri: 12pm - 3pm &amp; 530pm - 1130pm       Not valid on eve of PH &amp; PH. regards, wacky
25	Great deal! Only catch can't use on weekends
3	wow just realized... 500 deals only...?? sold out le...   but then again... i think likely they'll add more later....   regards,  wacky
1	bot...........
7	i wanted to buy but deal sold out already .  It's near my office.
25	fastest fingers first... i bought 4 le...   anyway i suspect they'll add on more later bah... such deals site typically liddat one... purposely one... show u XX remaining to make ppl ganchiong and chiong to buy.. den after that they add more...  regards,  wacky
3	wah u guys so fast leh.  i too slow.
25	when i saw that it has only 100+ left out of 500 already after the deal came out only for few hours... i quickly go and buy liao...   regards,  wacky
30	ha ha, wait u see got, can sms me or im me.  i don't check often leh.  if not u sell me 2 voucher ha ha
3	I bot 10
45	No wonder so fast sold out.  Great buy.
173	anyway inSing posted a review of santouka here:we encountered that b4... and asked them to change the egg... the reviewer should have done that too... haven tried b4... maybe next time can try...  regards, wacky
145	Haha no Lah
32	bought 4 when it was 100+ left and it was almost sold out when i finished buying
70	One bad thing is that they do not accept table reservations. Expect long queues.
29	great recommendation!
610	me too... bor liao le~~~~~
5	yah only 500 coupons le.
3474	well one thing is... 500 deals only... over 3 months.. that's maybe 60 days or about less than 10 redemption per day... so won't make that much a diff to the existing queues....  regards,  wacky
147	ramen champion in iluma i don't really take to the overly strong taste of tsukemen, pardon me if any of u guys r lovers of tsukemen
2345	i developed ramen phobia after i finished bario's char siew ramen
26	Oh! I know where it is! but forgot the name also... Its located at the corner of the hotel.. They do have very nice ramen.. very springy..
18	natsu something?
7	The ramen place @ Gallery hotel is called Miharu
2409	miharu?  The noodles is very nice, they make it themselves right?  But the soup to me is too salty.  One of the most saltish soup i had tasted.
721	rofl bro benny
5	hmm have been monitoring this everyday... it seems like it's really sold out.... and unlike some other deals site... when it says it's sold out means it's really sold out and wouldn't extend... i should have bought more coupons.. :/  regards,  wacky
12	Went to Santouka over the weekend. Idk why but their noodles taste like those instant ramen noodles to me, soup is pretty salty. Disappointed.
5	perhaps personal preferences... i like the noodles and soup... but THE highlight is really the pork cheeks... did u order that or the normal ramen...??   regards,  wacky
58	the ramen noodles quality seem to have changed after the nuclear accident in japan..i find it not nice..nantsuttei also have drop in quality..maybe its just me
14	No I did not order the pork cheek. But it wouldn't make a difference with regards to the soup and noodles would it? So which is the best ramen now? Miharu?
149	well the pork cheek made ALL the difference to me... cos it simply take my attention away from the soup and noodles..... 10 out of 10 times i go there... i can't help but order the same thing again and again -- tokusen toroniku (pork cheek) ramen...  i haven eaten miharu b4... some ppl tell me it's over-rated... but my 2nd fav ramen is ippudo tao @ UE square.... regards, wacky
57	Santouka and Ippudo are one of the best ramen choices in Sg This is the difference wacky is talking about  I love ramen too, but I do not like tsukemen. So sometimes, it does indeed boil down to personal preference?
958	errr i tot the one at mandarin gallery is simply called Ippudo or Ippudo Singapore...? Ippudo Tao is the one at UE square... the Tao's menu is a bit different... Tao has the black (Kuro) and red (Aka) soup which are not available in mandarin gallery...  regards,  wacky
6	New ramen champion stalls opening at airport:
35	Surprised to hear that. I tried a few ramen joints and santouka stood out as the best for me. I must say the central outlet seems to have better quality consistency than the cuppage one. What other ramen stalls have you tried and how did you find the others? If santouka is salty for you, maybe you prefer bland type of soup.
4	wah... thanks for the info... i always love going airport... now got another reason to go there...   regards,  wacky
4	I just walked past it on Sun. Still boarded up   I oso like going to airpork veli much. Sometimes will go there for loonch
21	looks like i gotta make a part 4 to my ramen champion posts
265	so are the stalls in changi airport opened already or opening soon only...? perhaps one day can have an outing go there try the ramen...?   regards,  wacky
2	Any bro tried the ramen at top floor of Illuma?
12	pork cheek for the win!  muz finished every drop of the soup
3	50% off $40 Cash Voucher at Saboten Japanese Restaurant, Changi Airport Terminal 1; only $20 instead of $40
13695	Tampopo Black Pig Year End Sale!*  Enjoy up to 50% discount such as Tonkatsu, Katsu don, Mini Shabu Shabu set &amp; Ramen. Yummm!  Valid now till 15 December 2011.
1794	This deal worth to get?
1975	1 look at the egg can see is not nice liao
72	Tonkatsu King at Tanjong Pagar!!!! But there's always a long queue there. Best to go at odd hours. Like 2pm-4pm.
15	thanks for sharing.  Would definitely give it a try!
83	Totally agree...this kind of egg is to go with mee rebus or mee siam...definitely not with ramen
98	I feel that Santouka has inconsistent quality for both the noodles and the eggs. Sometimes the noodles feel like instant noodles, and sometimes there is a very strong alkaline taste. The eggs, sometimes runny and nice, sometimes fully cooked. But when everything is perfect, it's really nice.  The soup is quite consistently good though.
2107	kinda agrred wht u bro  i try it bout outlet too  the soup still ok  but mee is not consistant qc
1916	the new nansuttei branch opens today at cuppage, just beside OG/OCBC bank there
1178	Enjoy 33% off authentic Japanese Ramen at Marutama Ramen (Suntec Outlet)! Pay just $15.30, instead of $23, for a Marutama (Non spicy) or Karashi (Spicy) Ramen + Ajitsuke Tamago (Egg) + Free Flow Green Tea Ice Cream.
224	Menya shinchan gone ?  Went down there after month of not eating ramen and their store is deserted. Ask around and people said the owner went back japan and not coming back. anyone know whats the story with them ? I really missed their ramen
89	tried nansuttei one yesterday.. quite heavenly the soup but after finish abit want to vomit...   normal ramen  Dragon Ramen
528	ippudo ramen at mandarin gallery is pretty damn godly imo
180	If Menya is gone, I think I'll miss their Jiro.
6414	book seat first
2462	Menya Shinchan similar to Bario..or should i say Bario similar to Menya instead..
185	today was at Robertson Quay area for lunch (Went to Ginza Kurosan again).  I walked by Menya Sinchan and there was a notice posted by Far East Organisation indicating that they have taken possession of the shop and for owner to contact them if they want to take back their possessions.
837	How did the dragon one taste? Had the normal char siew ramen, it was better than santouka IMO but the gyoza we ordered was nothin extraordinary.
20496	actually must try their most basic one to judge nice or not... their dragon one is more spicy lor... with minced meat
1701	Ramen Champion starts in T3, B2!  A total of 5 stalls, of which 2 are new stalls.
25	Cuppage road, there this resturant that sells pork cheeks ramen   the best ramen ive ever had
3836	problem is the queue ... the other day i went on a weekday for dinner also queue 40 minutes =_=;; weekday leh not even weekend yet.Santouka? the pork cheeks for me is super nice &amp; tender but a bit on the salty side &amp; if combine with a salty broth then is sodium overload liao
79	any nice tsukemen in singapore?
100	millenia walk, new jap wing. not sure the shop name.
43	that should be  bah...  regards,  wacky
1255	i had my saltiest ramen ever at keisuke last month..
1152	try tetsu of the ramen champion at illuma
80	Tetsu's tsukemen is really good!
2994	Tried Tampopo yesterday, taka branch. It's good but eh, I don't see how it is Singapore's so-called #1 ramen lor.
3303	where did u read that it's #1...?? personally my #1 is santouka pork cheek ramen... anyway finally went to ramen champion @ T3... had 3 out of the 4 stalls there... starting with the 2 stalls not found @ illuma... nitamago riki ramen... overall probably like this the best... soup is very good... goes well with garlic... vegetables are good... noodles not bad but a tad thick for me... so i prefer the gensuke one... char siew okay -- kinda too thick... ajitama ramen @ gen-suke... the soup is very good... although gets kinda too salty towards the end... noodles is not too thick and good also... chicken is good also... only problem is it gets a tad boring after a while... gantetsu special miso ramen.... soup has a strong taste which i dun like... noodles also not as nice... char shu is okay... but overall is kinda disappointing... fried chicken from gantetsu... taste more like taiwanese snack than japanese dish... so if u are there for ramen... can forget this... as for the eggs... they are all very good and well up to standards... and all 3 stalls eggs seems to be identical... which is why  i review the eggs at the end... i won't be surprised if all the eggs are cooked and obtained from the same supplier... final thoughts... i have better impression of the food here compared to the ramen champion @ illuma... especially the eggs... the eggs i get from illuma then were hard boil and really FAIL.... regards, wacky
5765	NICE NICE!!!
55	WOW looks damn nice
873	Yeah i like this one.. But they will be gone after july right?  Hmm is there any where in singapore tat is similar to that?
126	Tampopo, on hungrygowhere's top 10 ramen, they got the top number of votes (sorry, i can't link url's yet). Which like I said, I don't really agree but oh well
31	oh wow... this ah...   anyway i long time haven eat tampopo liao... probably will go eat some time next month using voucher...   regards,  wacky
16	hmmm anyone know where can i find GOOD NANKOTSU RAMEN? this is my favourite type. =)
73	miharu offers tsukemen as well, and menya shinchan (but someone said they already closed down)
147	the best i had was yoshimaru at holland village. should go have a try. the soup base is friggin gd..
1593	Holland V MRT station open already right?
792	Yoz, update to the 2 new outlets of Ramen Champion in T3  cheers!  Riki Ramen - Nitamago Riki Ramen  Gensuke - Ajitama Ramen
1692	nice photos u have...!  which of the ramen u like better...?? and yeah i think the eggs there are really good... taste as good as they looked in the photos...  regards, wacky
1904	Riki is like Bario (90-100%) similar... so you know the taste
2412	Eh how about Santouka Ramen? heard their standards dropped already..
383	hey wacky, seriously in ramen champion i prefer gantetsu's ramen. so i think it's really up to personal pref? Riki ramen is indeed similar to Bario, for they serve Jiro-style ramen
2419	yeah i guess it's personal preferences...   regards,  wacky
1	dont think Tampopo's any good.. try the ramen outside Carrefour at Suntec.. need to exit towards taxi stand that area.. pretty good
10	they got one outlet at east coast but not that good somehow
17599	is that shin-sapporo ramen...?  regards,  wacky
71	The hakata ramen is good.
1475	Best I've had is Santouka's Tokusen Toroniku Ramen. Never knew pork cheeks can taste so good.
609	Thumbs up agree that this is GOOD!  Ate in KL branch (Pavilion) - flavour is there and better yet, only RM40 for a large serving!  Yumz to the max.  I thought I was eating abalone when I bit into the pork cheek but of course more tender.
270	I tried  at millenia walk the other day, cos he is so called Tokyo Ramen King. thought the shoyu and tonkotsu broths was salt overload. Crab stock ramen was pretty interesting, is more like Lam Mee than ramen.   Supposedly he used to have specialty prawn stock but stop liao cos locals don't appreciate it or something like that.
355	I ate Marutama (Central) on Sunday for dinner. Didnt suit my taste buds at all, one of the worst ramen i ate.
181	Keisuke is pretty good, pity locals don't really appreciate. Hope it doesn't die the way Kusabi did.
22	Same sentiments. I think I even prefer Ajisen to it.   My friends say i'm siao but I think it's cos their noodles have a very yellow/egg-noodle kind of taste that I don't like.
33	To be quite honest, i think Ajisen is not ramen, its just instant japanese noodles (no offence). But i do agree Marutama is a notch below Santouka, but i guess they have their own fans judging by the queue at times... afterall taste is subjective
658	no offence taken. i haven't eaten ajisen in years, maybe i rmb the taste wrongly too lol.  Marutama still has queues? I walked past the Central outlet on a Sunday a couple of months back and there was no queue at all...
67	Well, I went there on a weekday lunch and it was almost full house. Just too bad that I didn't know about keisuke until  he stopped serving his prawn stock ramen, so I can't try for myself For me I thought Marutama soup is too close in flavor profile to Maggi Chicken Flavor (I went to Suntec branch).
2513	Yesh, Marutama is phail, according to my taste buds. I only ate 1/2 bowl of it that evening.  But when I was there, there were still alot of people (most tables occupied)
5	dont really like santouka. soup base too salty and the meat/egg not as nice as the other premium ramen restaurents i went. just my humble opinion.
1738	i went there twice. guess i was unlucky both times.
10666	only been to Marutama and Baihoken for ramen. Marautama char siew is very good though.
2989	Now in TrippleOne, supposedly to go Sanomaru...but reached there to find it's replaced by Ikkousha...  Tried but still can't meet expectation previously set with Sanomaru!!  Anyone can recommend one that can at least rival Sanomaru's shoyu ramen?
14467	Santouka had changed their noodles..no longer the same..the noodles now sourced from USA..reeks of akaline
7	Bario Ramen @ Ramen Champion.
16	the meat looks more like lor bak than chashu..how does it taste like? the soup base is what?
14	Dun like the soup at first cos it's kinda oily. It tasted much better after a few scoops. A bit on the salty side also.   The noodle machiam like lor mee noodle, thick thick kind but got v nice texture. yum yum.
589	wah.... seldom see u post non-hawker food... anyway between the 2 ramen champions... i had better experience with the ones at T3....... ate 3 out of 6 stalls at illuma once with a fren last time... didn't think any of them are great...  regards, wacky
17	T3's Gantetsu had the King Cha Shu Men that wasn't available at Illuma's the last time I looked~
16199	think i almost tried every stall Bario has the biggest bowl and most generous serving, but probably fall in the bottom 2 in my general opinion.
342	awww... that's not for the pork cheek ramen... :/  regards,  wacky
26	their business must had been badly hit since the noodles changed..
13	i went on sat evening surprisingly no que
2	i got the worse ramen at T3 last week...  the noodle was not fully cook and got part of the ramen is in one lump and when i chew it, its uncooked flour...  soupbase also soso...first and the last for me..disappointed..
399	consumers pay good $ to eat the ramen..the quality of the noodles is extremely important imo..many ramen players in sg might suffer losses in the months to come
3172	i tried ippudo ~ i like their thin ramen, and i feel the quality is not bad for the prices
268	ippudo is gd. theres another one called yoshimaru oso. at holland village. they serve hakata ramen. n its like 15+ bucks a set. comes with side and a drink.
210	wah... does it apply for both outlets...?? and does it apply to any ramen including the pork cheek ramen...?? and wat's with the bad english and spelling...?? "opend" ... "we appreciate you to get a promotion..." "you can use it ticket from march" ...??   regards,  wacky
5	wah....muz call to check tml le....
906	ehhh.....i ain't going back for my case...lol
14	I went yesterday. Apparently, they will be issuing a free 1 for 1 coupon when u ordered a ramen. This coupon is valid til end of Apr and you can use it on your next visit. So when you dine from 9-11 mar, you will be entitled for the coupon.
154	bro this one is at TRIPLE 1 SOMERSET   is opp 313  can dont anyhow give wrong directions ?
201	Thanks for correction!
942	Went for a bowl of Santouka Ramen @ Central. Not bad.   7.5/10
19193	this is so misleading... it's more like buy 2 get 1 free..... cos u have to buy 1 to get coupon... den another time buy 1 get 1 free...  regards,  wacky
2514	So which ramen store in T3 ramen champion u guys like best?
235	For me Tetsu.
21	- Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.
116	Reserved for additional info
36	eh the laksa buffet looks not bad eh... poisoned...
33	since mod deleted my post above... i will keep my list here:    ]  these are jus unofficial pending list for my own easy reference...
10	why? what happened?
38	the korean crystal bbq voucher by groupon issue ba and the indian times
10	i am usually skeptical of such vouchers.. :/  regards,  wacky
21	Wacky, how is yr indian buffet ?
5	Let me post a FR ~ just finish my dinner at Buffet Town at Raffles City, B2.   Buffet Town  Overall : 6.5/10  Food/Beverage : 6/10  Ambience/Setting : 8/10  Value : 6/10  Service : 8/10   Price : $42 (Adult/Weekend/Dinner/Opening Promo Ends 31st Aug)  Food Photos :   A wide range of Japan slice fish ()  Oyster are good, but they are quite 'warm' so I went to the drinks section to get ice to cool them for a while before consuming.   DIY Ice Kacang.... quite ugly right ?  Spaghetti White Cream Sauce without Spaghetti (haha)  Bonus Picture   Coffee &amp; Tea section........ with Messi ? lol  The food really nothing to shout about.... average food.  Wagyu Beef was over cooked.  Chilli Crab was not in the confront heat zone..... too spicy.   Black Pepper Crab was salty  Service was good, there is a staff walking all around the whole place asking for last order.  Not many Buffet place does that unless a la carte.  And all the chefs are friendly, when you ask for 4 servings, they give you big servings. And ask you come back for more if not enough.   Cleanliness was good.   Plates are all clean. I think it's better they have someone mend the drinks section.  As I dunno who keeps pressing the ice from the Coke machine and the whole place is a mess.  So not the restaurant fault. But could be improve.
10	thanks for reminder... posted here liao:  regards,  wacky
2	haha DaYellowDuckie, the way you reviewed in blue color paragraphs so cute.   but on the other hand, the chef is quite bad yea, don't understand his rationale.
14	going for the $10 kr bbq  this sunday with my friends.
28	DaYellowDuckie, the chef is damn chee hong.. this kind of people need to get whacked. this buffet goes into my book of blacklist buffets..
11	Went to 10 Claymore for the TOTG plates of pleasure last night. Ordered about 10-11 plates in all for 2 pax. The angus beef and lamb were good, pork ribs was cafe cartel replica, wagyu patty was just patty, didn't try the prawn thing.  No foe grais  They had the lobsters and the usual sashimi/oysters stuff. Cooked food were way below average and the desserts were of poor variety (banana cake was pretty good though), the only dish from the cooked section i went back for again was the chicken curry, probably because i craved for some curry last night.   Oh yah, i wasn't told from the start that drinks are not included in the buffet price. Imagine paying 8 bucks for a glass of lime juice woohooo
12	i thought they got fruit juice for the buffet ? last 2 time we went there got infinite fruit juice...now cut cost ar ? how was the chicken curry ? spicy to the max ?
467	Nice taste for the curry but not as spicy as it should be. Drinks included in the buffet price apparently was only tea and coffee, this i was told while i was asking them before paying. Can say partially my fault also lah since i assume
20	any reviews on FISHERMAN MARKET? cannot find any
5	()  Sunday Brunch  Date:  (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price:  or  after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) Raven  5) eInS78 (TBC)  6) samba ( TBC )  7) Donkey (TBC)  If we can find someone else with an ANZ card, we can open another 4 slots (paging for Toons...hahah)
7	The lunch is definitely more worth it as the sashimi was self-serve and they replenish quite fast...  No oysters and crabs though but I don't think buffets can cook up decent crab dishes like those from zhi char stalls anyway...  Duckie never try the curries ah?   I like the satays - they run out pretty fast but good thing my table was quite near...hahah  Grilled salmon fish heads also not bad - free flow - hint hint to Kahlan
19	basket! how come the oyster they put ice on top of it..
5	nope, it looks very very dry wor.... i only saw Curry Chicken with Potatoes. Then the rest is Sew Pork, Mutton, Beef.  Satay idk is it my requirement is high, but all burned. I don't want to get sore throat, so didn't get them.  Block 85 satay also nicer and looks more juicy than theirs.  Ya, the crabs is bad. The chef cooked in advance and put under the heat, so I think the crab become more salty after a period of time.  Black Pepper was way too salty. No..no... the oyster I put the ice myself because it was cold at all.  I like it cold so I put the ice myself.
1	why wasn't 29th Aug 2D1N in the list ? cancel le mah?
11	1 wk plus went to bedok 85. satay over cooked.. hard hard de. not tender... my makan kaki asked me not to waste calories on them   btw: , thanks for writing the review for us.    what is the opening promo price?
14	Only Sunday Brunch has juices as part of the buffet.
73	Not cancel, I have updated it in the list now.
52	i am interested. but need to see which date. i have anz though,
25	Great - you suggest a date lor else from previous experience, the outing will never happen
2	WO PENG RESTAURANT  476 Macpherson Road  Singapore 368191  Tel: 6747 9892 (reservations strongly recommended)  Open daily 11am - 3pm; 6pm - 10pm   another recommendation my kakis which they said its very gd.   But prob is i cannot seems to find  dishes that we seems to like such as PK. also the Pekking duck cost 120. crab been hoon might cost up to $55. Pengcai is 36 per pax. not an item pple usually wanna eat. they do hav braised trotter... though.
2	i spied.... crayfish? or crab? goood?   scallop looks... overcooked?
71	Sorry carey. I can't set date as me is usually last-minute.  Erm. Please. Add t b c behind my nick.  Thanks.
31	()  Sunday Brunch  Date:  (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price:  or  after cc discount  Max 10 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) Raven  5) eInS78 (TBC)  6) samba ( TBC )  7) Shalome (ANZ) (TBC)  8) Donkey (TBC)  9)  10)
25	u dilute the liqour le.
10	50% off orchard hotel high tea...anyone going?
2	actually most of the items are overcooked... Satay, Pizza, Beef, Wagyu Beef (wasted) and Scallops. Even the Chicken rice chicken meat was tough and cold.... didn't try the rice but looks quite oily to me. hmmm, but i prefer it cold, maybe One Man's Meat, One Man's Poison.
1	Almost all are cabo dishes.
3	Too many carb items including dessert...hahah
14	Okay, this only shows that BT is inconsistent   The satays I had were okay - moist and tender  We were trying to find the scallops but didn't manage - epic fail on our part   Never tried the chicken - but the laksa was okay
85	Garuda Padang buffet. 1 for 1 @ far east sq.
19	tis huan nid to buy voucher?
103	The scallops are all together with the Satays and Fishhead.  i didn't try to laksa as my mum told me Laksa needs Sugar.
3	This one looks better...hahah  But lunch is probably a better bet as dinner will be filled with people breaking fast   Far East Square is also near my office...hmmm
67	Then must have run out - no wonder never seen A very small amount is okay - I allow for around 5% of serving size cos I am not a food nazi
1	no nid..
38	nice.. help us recee if you happen to pass by that area
59	Good advise. I avoid all halal restaurant during dinner time of fasting month.   Had a bad experience at Sakura before.
50	Removed Donkey from list as per requested. () Sunday Brunch Date:  (Sunday) Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel Time: 11.30am to 3pm Price:  or  after cc discount Max 6 persons 1) carey 2) twtan 3) Evilduxy 4) Raven 5) eInS78 (TBC) 6) samba ( TBC ) 7) Shalome (ANZ) (TBC) 8)  9) 10)
16	Yeah. I will be traveling in sept so easier if u guys plan without me. If there are slots then I will join if I am in town.
10	so tempted to go...
17	You should. It's nice. For the food and the company.
4	go lor... haven seen u and ur chewtoy join any outings for some time le...   regards,  wacky
2	Erm, does that mean that you are also going?  If not, you still won't see her even if she and chewtoy join
1	Or do you mean if I go in and try? hahahGood thing I am not a lawyer - sure go broke if I give out free advice all the time
67	no la... just look from the window
18	not free to go?  nvm next time future then go sure will hav other outings
3	chewtoy not free leh.  and i got something on at abt 2
16	the dates are not even set...   cheer up. next time we go eat other yummy stuff.
4	ohh i thought it was suppose to be tmr? kena postpone ah?
3	haha... ya. postponed. hehe
447	going for wat??  regards, wacky
71	Hi bros, thinking of going for a buffet lunch later (or rather brunch), any good recommendation? Would like to have seafood included. So far it seems M hotel brunch at $50++ is ok. But any better deals? Thanks
522	how is the quality at M hotel?.. for sunday brunch.
79	2D1N buffet rules at the door. :-)  Yeah, I am at the door now. Long que already.
5	ok went M hotel in the end. $56++, 3+1 free with UOB credit card. Spread is limited but quality is not bad. Very quiet on sunday so service was fast and good. Overall quite enjoyable.
78	is it part of this?
23	For your info:
4	28 aug must go ?????
37	No, they are still open but they shifted to 2nd floor temporary.
30	Don't think so...he went for brunch...  Plus the price of S$88++ is definitely way more than what he paid...  If I am not wrong, M Hotel usually has curry for its Sunday brunch...  Haven't been to its buffets for a long time - they actually have 2 dining outlets serving buffets...damn confusing at times
13	Yup i went for just brunch, not the S$88++ deal
18	jus wondering if the 56+ is part of the 88+ buffet as it includes a few outlet's buffet.. or so i am told.
525	Hahaha . . You so gan cheong, can't wait till our makan outing ah.   Btw, i heard you mention some think like they improved their ventilation. Is it better now?
1	Would like to share a simple review as i couldnt find any for the below buffet. Went to FISHERMAN's MARKET last saturday evening: Located at CENTRAL (Clarke Quay MRT) Pricing is $44.90 for weekend dinner Buffet is on level 2 and very spacious. Got view of Singapore River if you take the window seats The drinks available; drinks are taken from a "bar counter" where a "barista" will make your drinks.. the bad thing is that it results in a long queue for drinks... The reason why i came to this buffet; for the OYSTERS!
0	Another reason for going: Sashimi The mussels are normal.. the prawns not sweet and got the prawny stink.. not fresh?
16	Chilli crabs (black pepper also have) Actually not very keen to eat.. but see many people hoot... so i also hoot some to try.. it is quite fresh and the sauce quite nice.. but the crab quite small.. (compared to JUMBO ) Red color patch is some cold sweet and spicy squid. white sotong patch is cold and sour (bo ho jiak). The shellfish (scallops?) normal taste... pumpkin and beans Teriyaki beef and mushrooms Chawamushi and udon (udon super not nice) DIY ice cream desserts also got fruits and creme brulee.. the brulee quite nice compared to other buffets i been to (e.g. Todai)
31	The oysters there are a mixture of small and medium sizes. The "chef" washes it under a tap and separates the flesh from the shell before placing it on the ice bed. The oysters are not cold , but quite crunchy and sweet  in the picture u see lots of oysters (6pm).. but by 7pm+, you will see the ice bed empty and the chef struggling to meet demands (cannot shuck quick enough)
16	MKJ BBQ Buffet Steamboat with $10 Groupon voucher .(NPGP) We went into the restaurant 1 hr late cos the place is hard to find. When we entered the restaurant, it reminds me the first time i went to 2d1n, the charred smell filled the air but this was worse than 2d1n. Looking through the window, surprisingly, it's only half filled with people. Probably because is Sunday. A Chinese receptionist attended to us. We told him our bookings and he scolded us for not being punctual. My friends and I were surprised. First time ever someone will scold customer for being late?!?! Even before we have our seats, we are already a little pissed off. The waiter took over and lead us to our seats. As we got deeper into the restaurant, the charred smell became intense. Don't really feel like eating korean bbq, but rather, tiong bbq. The settings is like those restaurants in China. Standing aircon, tiong ceiling fan, Exit sign with tiong words, tiong designed chairs and tables, tiong toilet sign, tiong posters, electronic clock with room temperature monitoring, tiong words on the steamboat induction cooker. And Alot of TIONGS inside! After getting comfy with our seats, we started to see what food they have. For meat, they have pork belly, boneless chicken tigh, beef stripes, pork liver, prawns, dory fish, chopped black fish and small pieces of lambchop. For vege, they have golden needle mushroom, broccoli, green bean sprout, those brown mushrooms and black fungus. Others: maggiemee, with egg, meatball, fish ball, sotong ball, prawnball, chicken franks, crab stick, luncheon meat. Think i've mentioned almost all of it. For the soup, they have chicken and tomyam. couldn't remember the other 2. The steamboat pot was small which i think just nice for 1 person to cook his stuff. The drinks you have to buy. They don't even serve plain water. Unlike 2d1n, the oil from the fats will be drained to a small container but this crystal plate does not have a draining hole. Thus, we got sick of eating the meat when we are not even 50% full. The fun thing about this BBQ is that if you keep the temperature high, the oil will start to splatter. We are like jumping and fidgeting when we get hit by the splatter. The person who cooks usually tiok the most. We decided left the restaurant, leaving our half empty stomach for durian mousse somewhere else. Just as we about to leave, the waiter ask us to pay for the wet tissue. $1 for 1(another money earning tactic). I wont ever go back to this BBQ buffet..
24	Another horror story to further reinforce my aversion towards coupon "deals"...  Seems like a lot of unscrupulous merchants are hoping that they will also make extra money through "fatigue" i.e. diners are so put off that they rather forgo their money than put themselves through such a terrible experience...  Dining out is supposed to be a pleasant experience - these "offers" are anything but
8	i just notice the new upgrade of the ventilation is not fully installed yet... only pipe laid and the system not install, so same BBQ smell after you finish a 4 hours non-stop BBQ.  But they did install big fans to cool down the area.  And have new dish, enoki mushroom  but these mushrooms when you cook, it will stick to the aluminum foil, so better put bacon and laid the mushroom, on top for the heat and oil to cook it.
13	IMHO, I think wrapping the mushroom with bacon is better
3	yeah, tat's wad i did the whole night.. then other table see, they also do.  I must say the enoki mushroom are very clean. Usually in those Tiong Steamboat places, the mushroom only trim the area where all the mushrooms are stick together. But 2D1N, they trim the Enoki to 5-6CM leftover. Means you are eating the top part only... idk is it waste of food, but their enoki is really really really sweeter and cleaner.
5	where gt nice and good Japanese sushi and sashimi buffet? Not so ex. Can sit 10-12 people ar? Thanks!
46	Shin Yuu lor, same place as Greenwood Fish Market we went the other time.
8	how much is consider exp ???
12	budget ish below 50nett nohs..
12	Shin Yuu lunch is $36.90++. They got private rooms some more.
6	Only issue is accessibility   If need to cab in, then the price would be more expensive
54	The other day we walked in, not too far actually. Beta walked too. Today someone posted nonsense stuffs again after she tio exposed by others and also PMed others to expose another member's picture.
42	Wah, never buy 4D siah   It's not that far but if the weather is hot Expose who? hahah
83	The weather quite hot but at least still got trees for shade. Sharshar lor.
0	I would strongly encourage TS to refrain from OTing in a food thread so as to set a good example to all.  I welcome you to suppport my threads but do bear in mind that this is afterall not edmw; being accused again for being double standard is definitely the last thing which missumuch would like to see
7	Jin elite siah...S$120 per person  Paging for Beta and Swatchie - think only they are interested
8	went ikoi the other day, last minute dinner with friend who's back in town for a couple of days.... alot of items not in the menu anymore, sashimi standard still there.
0	any discount? i m so near it everyday...  wat items u wanan eat , its not there anymore?
1	A change of heart or that guilty feeling?  Who started this first, you tell me? Stay within the limit and I won't bite back.
1	no discount
10	can we go back to food topic?  .  .  .   wat items u wanan eat , its not there anymore?
5	I hope the purpose of this post is not TS's plot to lure me into infraction.  1. I did not make any malicious remarks about you in edmw.   2. If I dare to say or do anything, I am not afraid of how others will view me. However, before you are clear of what's going on in edmw, please refrain from maligning me for things that I did not do.   I do not mind butties using my photos to create threads or make fun of me but I certainly mind VERY MUCH if I am being maligned for things that I did not do.
6	regards,  wacky
18	hmm... off-hand can only remember the beef steak cubes  but the not-in-menu salmon heads still have~
30	Since when did I malign you, you did PM the other members Sharshar's photo. I still got the PM that someone cc me. Also what is the meaning of this:Since you don't like me in your thread, please keep away from mine.  The next post from you I will infract.
14	Missumuch and Twtan14: Kindly settle your differences in private and not ruin the nature of this informative thread. Else I'd be forced to close this very useful and informative thread. Eat more, quarrel less.
37	until senior mod also come out liao
6	Prive ar? Got buffet? i see only directions nia lehs.
22	i think is for this...
16	Can anyone recommend international/Japanese buffet? Budget is around $30~$40. No Kuishinbo as we wanna try something new.
168	Ikoi  Shin Yuu
1	46% OFF Buffet Dinner at Brindas 24Hrs Restaurant ! Only $12.90 per pax Usual Price $24
3	i wonder will it end up like indian times ?
4	might not. seems that their reputation good. why risk??
2	nowdays many buffet restaurants don't care about their reputations..only care about money, money, money.  Personally have you tried their buffet ?
11	nope. i live so far...also quite ulu to me
11	more poision: 50% off! ONLY $17.60 nett for Flavours of Penang Lunch/Dinner Buffet @ Vanda Terrace! (UP $35.30
16	Hmm near toon's house. Maybe he is interested to go. What does Masala means ?
38	Spicy stuffs......
421	now i know why got quite a number of bad quality indian food, cos the masalas they used are not fresh, chao seng.
466	Plus some of them use poor quality spices to cut cost...
20	Where is this place?
10	indulge @ grand park city hall.
21	Oh I see, yesterday's buffet. How are the foods? PS: How come the pictures all so tiny?
6	coz pic not nice.. so no pt enlarging?
7	Std drop but still edible. The roast beef at the later part turn powdery. The assam mee Siam taste good, the sour version which I like. They got new dessert, durian pengat egg tart which was warm, plus point. They also had warm durian pengat, the cold version still holds the winning flag.  All the meat dun have much fatty cuts so not shiok enough. Have about 3 diff kind of curry fish.  Overall, $35nett is ok for such a quality and variety.  Picture small cos imageshack is having problem, I use imagevenue.
65	A lot of time the tart's shell are soft due to it absorbing moisture from the filling as they were made much earlier. I preferred those freshly made or have a coating of chocolate inside the shell to act as a barrier against the filling.
401	I think because starting part, we all sup the fatty parts of the beef liao   It was okay for me - the lamb chops were also okay but nowhere near as tender as those at Straits Cafe (when they had them)...  Never tried the fish dishes - don't look appetitizing cos like a bit dry...  The ginger flower crab was powdery - not fresh  Only thing I took a lot was the cheese - very nice   Overall, I think the spread at Straits Cafe still better
2	Any recommendations for buffets under $50 nett? Thanks! Prefer non-japs because going to jap buffet the next day.
70	When you going? So we can recommend. 10 at Claymore for their:Promo Period : 1 July 2011 to 31 August 2011      * Dinner  ($48++) from Sunday to Thursday UOB cc got promotion.
3	i think if not nice might as well don't put up  tiny can't see!  need magnifying glass
1	Going this Friday, for a colleague's farewell. Darn, can't enjoy the promo. Any other ongoing Cc discounts for any buffets?
547	something's cc discount doesnt mean its  nice..... shalome: i zip. :x
12	Valid 31 Aug to 1 Dec 2011. By telephone reservations only (Tel: 62732779). Please quote 1kg Sri Lankan Crab promotion on JigoCity. Both Sri Lankan crabs must be redeemed together. Not to be used with other promotions. Dine-in only. Offer not redeemable on Public Holidays and eve of Public Holidays.
4	Or you want to try this Chinese ala carte buffet:
15	wah... tempting ley........ anyone interested??   regards,  wacky
24	Tempted too.   But dont know if should take the risk a not.    Have anyone tried the crab there? I stop believing written review from strangers after Indian Times.   In JB, i can get big sri lanka crab at RM65 a kg. For 2kg, it will cost about $53. Slightly more expensive but i got quality assurance. Of cos Labrador would be a nicer dining experience but for me, it is really the taste of the crab that matters.
0	the 2 reviews in HGW is pretty good.. one of them got a blog about it:  2 reviews on InSing also good: 2 reviews on openrice are good also... for me... i still look at reviews... having reviews is better than no reviews... at least u can read and judge then make your own decision... besides my fren who went to Indian Times b4 in the past... she said that it was good then... standards must have dropped alot since then... edit... weird... they have TWO entries in HGW...  reviews here are all good also... regards, wacky
7	wah.. everytime go JB buy meat and seafood.
7	Poor me, times are bad
3	I now poorer lo...can only admire buffet deals post by you guys
4	no...............
7	wacky , got people start then i join
15	The food may taste ok before the voucher promotion, but after the promo comes on, the food's freshness/quality goes down to cut cost since the diners are paying a lower price point.
9	That's what i am afriad of.   I mean if the review is in the sky, at least you would expect to fall on the tree. But in some cases, it fall right down to the ground, face down some more.
145	erm....1KG Sri Lankan crabs....very tiny eh...sri lankan crabs usually quite big...between 1 to 2kg...i am afraid it might be a ripoff, they might give you really tiny and meatless crabs =S
6	ok wat... i tot usually i eat sri lankan crabs around 1kg is mid-size de... sri lankan crabs the shell is thinner so got more room for meat...  regards,  wacky
17	well like this?? Labrador Seafood (Sri Lankan crabs outing) WebSite: Promo: Date: 3 Sept 2011 Time: TBC (Dinner) reviews: 1) wackykid 2) raven1019 3) kahlan (TBC) 4) if we can hit 6-8 pax b4 offer the deal expires den buy the voucher and confirm...?? regards, wacky
114	no problem wacky
14	Wacky - Can you add me in for the Labrador Seafood (Sri Lankan crabs outing)? Sorry somehow i cannot quote your post  maybe too new
21	Ok, added.
270	WebSite:  Promo:  Date: 3 Sept 2011  Time: TBC (Dinner)  reviews:  1) wackykid  2) raven1019  3) kahlan  4) tiaptiap  5)  6)  7)  8)  9)  10)  NOTE: outing will only be confirmed once we can get at least about 8 participants (with at least 6 confirmed)...  regards,  wacky
10	think think think. Really feel like going this one le. That day I on leave some more LOL. Can TBC first?
70	soju bang not 5.30pm start meh??
62	how many can reach there by 5.30pm because need to go in group to sit down if not wrong
0	hey hey any good $20-35 buffet recommend?
513	the soju bang is 20+ without any voucher or discount?
43	Yep but no reservation allowed so got to go there early.
455	()  Korean Grill BBQ Dinner Buffet  Date:  (Monday)  Venue: 44/46 Tanjong Pagar Road  Time: 6.30pm - 10.30pm (if you can reach earlier, then get table for everyone cos cannot reserve table)  Prices:   1) Toons  2) Donkey  3) Carey  4) PPP  5) DaYellowDuckie  6) Dennyz  7) sallywss77 (TBC)  8)
1	what is nice at Hanabi?
2	I tried once before they changed owners and I don't like it. That was many years ago, not sure how they fare now.
8	changed owners before ah? i think quite a lot of ppl go de lehs..
27	Yes, I went to the Odeon Towers branch when they open not too long (former owner). Unless the menu changed I won't want to go back. You see there rating:
5	Sorry, I need to ask something, anyone tried tiffin room buffet at raffles hotel?
21	It's quite sad cos they started off so well...  I went to their branch at Crown Centre, Bukit Timah (now replaced by another Jap restaurant - which I think you guys went recently)...
7	no recommendation for buffet for 20-35 bucks net?
1	Sakura at Jurong safra, dun go other branch.
6	My Admiralty Park branch ok wor.
19	only sakura? no others?
197	ok, safra jurong and admiralty park branch.
732	You can check out the below thread.
16	Only $21 eat-all-you-can ala carte buffet @ Senki Japanese Restaurant! More than 130 ala carte dishes!
9	Saw the fine print:So using voucher still need to pay the above?
27	not quite sure. just saw it too...
13	Went before - not bad  So if we need to pay GST plus service charge, it's another S$3.60, bringing the total bill to S$24.60  I think their usual lunch price is S$30++?  So the savings is S$10.50, or 30%
4	Can go on weekend too, don't know want to buy or not.
9	i'm interested too..
6	honjin near cpf building citibank card one for one.. all in abt $27
26	If weekday i dont mind.   I scare weekend crowded.
135	Me still considering.But I need to take one day leave just to go eat buffet if on weekdays.
29	$33.60 for Wave House Oktoberfest Buffet for 1 pax at Wave House Sentosa (Worth $48) Menu:
1	Wah, looks interesting - pork knuckles plus grilled pork  But only thing is that it's only available on 10 Sep...going to be damn crowded
38	Looks like you kena poisoned liao...hahah  So who else is interested?   I don't mind going...hahah
12	U guys hav to consider entrance fee into island if gg wave house
18	Extra S$1 per pax   One way to bypass the entrance fee is to park at RWS carpark (but the fees will also kill ya)...hahah
42	Wow, sounds like a place for us to go.   But too bad, not in town on that day.   I think Toons should be keen cos that day we were taking about PK buffet.
5	Valid for Oktoberfest Event on 10 September 2011 only. Limit 1 Groupon per person, may buy multiple as gifts. Valid for 1 soft drink only.
43	only valid on one day?? i wonder wat is the max no of vouchers they going to sell...?  better not oversell..   regards,  wacky
9	must read fine print before buying
85	the fine print looks ok to me. i dont really drink.
1	bigmonkey, jin ho jiak ?
2	local food only ? hmm
5	wa bo ho jiak.   The food wise, the unagi really failed. Some of them tried the fried rice and say is nice. I only like the fried chicken. Miso soup is the light version which I like also, not too thick. The variety is not worth $40++ (full price w/o promo)  Dreamer bought the voucher, so we paid $27nett. For $27nett is still on the high side, but the company is better. Shared alot of insightful thoughts.
4	If dreamer shu shu going, can I be the 2nd pax? San q.
1	tot of organising...hehe....  i ask the others too
940	totally agree with u.....i ate the buffet a few yrs back...  guess the standard and variety really dropped to the bottom
1	Is there any nice buffets ard dohby god area?
1	rendevous.... is kinda near there  the cathay resturant is near there too... but is it only buffet @ night?
4	rendevous nice meh??  well dhoby ghaut area mentioned b4 many times: cathay restaurant buffet is nice.......  regards,  wacky
31	Yes, buffet at night.
220	Hi, is there any chinese cuisine wkday lunch buffet around town area to recommend? Budget about $30 - $40 per pax. Thanks a lot!
5	Was a rainy Friday afternoon and not much crowd at Sakura.  Very spacious dining area with a great view of the lily pond outside. You can choose to sit in the aircon or the alfresco dining area.
3	The HK style Cheong Ching fish is not bad but I like the Thai Chilli Fish best. The Sambal Squid with Petai is very good.
4	The Teppanyaki section. The meats are quite tender but I love the scallops best. Had many sticks of them.
1	Was craving for sushi so I had many of these though the rice was no good, don't have that vinegar taste.   I did not finished the Laksa as the gravy was just too diluted and don't have that full fragrant taste.
4	Tried both of these but the Soursop Delight hardly got any soursop taste.  Of all the desserts, I only like the Durian Pancake.
4	No sashimi?  Think should have more items right? hahah
153	Have but from the look from the colour, I did not take them. Yes, got alot more dishes but I did not take pictures like the tempura section, steam chicken, pizza, those hot plates etc...  Also the next table got 4 Malays also eating lunch, I thought they are fasting!?
55	Ok, I just do a quick report of the dinner i had at Cathay Restaurant yesterday night.  As it was only 6 girls, we can't really eat much and i think i over ordered.   So enthusiatic that I started ordering all the recommended dishes :- 1. fried soon hock (very very nice) we tore it apart very quickly as it took up a lot of space of our table.  But it was also nice to eat fresh and hot and whilst it was cripsy. 2. Cathay Roasted chicken. Nice - but to us it was a tad salty. 3. pork chop. Very good.  Was surprised myself.  very tender and nicely marinated.  All my friends like it. 4. XO sauce pork ribs.  To us a little too sweet. 5. 3 eggs spinach.  I quite like it.  Nice 6. Herbal prawns.  The herbal soup was not hot enough, but quite flavourful.  The prawns were very fresh. 7. Prawns in diced chilli.  Prawns is crunchy. but friend say this is frozen prawns. 8. Scallops and whelk in XO sauce.  Scallops were nice.  Don't really like the whelk. 9. Cereal Oats Prawns.  -  but as Wacky mentioned earlier in his review, nothing special. 10. brocolli - also very nicely done. 11. all the appetizers, prawn salad, jellyfish, octopus,  chicken feet etc and our favourite was the eggplant with pork floss. 12. soup - tried the shark fins and the shark cartilage.  Shark cartilage different but a bit too milky the taste for my liking.  Tried another shark fins soup with abalone and sea cucumber but i was disappointed with the soups as i felt (a) not so flavourful and (b) not hot (ie warm) enough.  I like piping hot soup.   13.  Deserts, - i don't like this version of the pancake as they use lotus paste.  I like my red bean version. Conclusion.  In my own opinion, I prefer SCDH dishes to this..
4	Ah tan, we did not have scallop at the safra jurong branch.  But we had the lamb masala which was nice.  The branch you went look so nice and spacious.
134	Only got beef stew but I find it not tender enough. The scallops are very juicy and nice. I got full quite fast cause I ate too much sushi.  Ya, the place is got a very nice feeling to it and not to mention a great view.
19	Thought so...hahah  Anyway, I also came back from Sakura at YCK stadium...  Nothing spectacular - ate less than the previous time Some of them don't fast due to special reasons...  Or they are not Muslims
3	twtan that sakura is which outlet? looks nice
1	Admiralty Park branch next Republic Poly.
8	So you bought more than one? My colleague told me YCK one not bad but I have not had a chance to visit it yet.
1	yeah yeah yeah...the pork chop sure are nice....  hmmmmm second cathay outing anyone? lol
1	Put you as organiser. Now gives us a date and time to go.
8	after u photo shot. let u set any date.
14	lol....okok let me think of a date first!wah still must wait so long i dun think i can wait tt long lol
10	when is ur photoshoot?? i got patience i can wait one....   regards,  wacky
8	UOB promotion still on right?
2	until end oct...  regards,  wacky
5	long way to go....we postpone it till feb cause moi grandma just pass away not too long ago so is have to postpone itoh if like tt find 1 day in september we is can go eat again
61	how about roland in sept... cathay in oct..??   regards,  wacky
1	can i join the cathay outing too? or only for regulars?
10	You are welcome to join though we have not fixed a date yet.
182	steady!
375	is the cathay buffet avail on P.H?  is there anything on for this coming tuesday?  the admiralty green sakura looks much nicer than jurong safra
109	No lah, I never buy any coupons
518	Their website did not indicate validity for PH or eve of PH. Only stated Mon - Fri.  Yep, because this branch is located inside the Admiralty park itself.
743	So tomorrow Soju is 6:30pm not 5:30pm?  I can make it 5:30pm also actually.  Have given my mobile num to Toons.
18	anyone can meet me @ the mrt for 2d1n soju? my first time, dunno way
28	I can meet u thr.  Is the meeting time confirmed at 6.30 or..?
31	Earlier the better since i heard that place quite pack, plus eve of hoiliday.   But i can only be there after work so will reach about 6pm.
8	i think i can only reach mrt around 6.15-6.30pm  u got my number right ?  let me know later after 1pm  gonna take a nap
39	I want to go try this one: . Seem to be related to 2D1N.
20	From reading the review, don't seems they are related.
31	But someone said he saw 2D1N logo on their billboard.
2	For me, the pork chop is really good at cathay, n their roasted chix also better compared to SCDH, although SCDH's is good too.  Soups for me okay nia, though still better than those at SCDH.  Desserts generally better and more variety though i still like the pancake over at SCDH cos the cathay one too oily.  All in all, i still like SCDH more too, by abt 0.34% ...   for its free flow of fishes and nicer appertisers, esp the sliced pork.
1	Actually just go when you can make it lor.  They start at 5.30pm, just tat most of us can only make it there 6pm and after.  Go early can get table first, but you need to sweettalk the lady boss (can ask Mariah for tips ).
1	Count me in for this.  If its 2D1N std meat wise, without the hellish environment, i am sold ...
9	The two reviews appear to be done by the same person...hahah  Plus these days, I am quite wary of the reviews on HGW...
3	Yea, same person.  He/she has a food review blog, so just cut n paste the text over to HGW too.  Looks like a regular reviewer with 100+ reviews wor, so i will give more creditability to it.    Anyways, taste is subjective, so just read reviews to get a rough idea of wat to expect lor.
1	what is 2d1n dinner?? lol overnight makan?
0	Where is your Starz's homework?
1	Korean BBQ buffet.
1	i see..hmm if there outing will post over at this thread/?
0	Hahaha ... should not have told you we went
6	See Page 1 of this thread.
7	Tonight one also need to chase wor.
2	Ah tan, you call and ask them then you jio hao ma?    I will support esp if the meat is just as good as 2D1N and the place is better ventilated.  Toons say he will be bringing gloves for tonight's BBQ.   I am still comtemplating if i should go Daiso to buy the driving gloves
15	I will call tonight if I can remember.
19	Don't worry, I will sms you to chase you
2	today i've no work can arrive early but cant go 2D1N   anyway tan if u goin to the other korean bbq also let me know i wanna join
129	Help me chase for my homework hor. OK, I need to check out the shop's detail first.
1	You all went for Properous Kitchen already?  What are the must-orders and what are the dishes to avoid?  Will be going tonight with my family as well as parents on both sides.
3	Haven't go yet, you let us know what are nice ok?
2	I thought you went before, since it is so close to your place.  You all haven't try Kim's Kitchen right?  I should be going for that this Friday.
14	The last time I tried was one year ago??? All their dishes are very small in quantity one.
113	jian jia zhang?!?!  liddat u muz ensure tat u dun order the lousy dishes liao lor   toons got do hw b4 leh, if u r hardworking to go &amp; search.  I only rmb the jindu paigu is
18	I hand up  first Yea lor.  When you buying your camera?  Then we can split the work. I do cold + desserts while you do the hot stuff
2	Tonight my guest with me going to 2D1N....... anybody  to meet him ?
1	What camera? Who is buying camera? I just know how to jiak nia   Plus my camera is for a different kind of meat altogether
4	Tot its meet liao will die?
5	mai worry, i come at 8PM, so most likely everyone 'die' with a full stomach. Hahaha
3	You will be surprised. The last trip, we ate till about 10pm. I might KO by 8pm but i know some of them can still go on and on.  Must bring extra tissue later
0	they provide FOC tissue mah..... I only scare those who try the chilli will clear rack of iced water...
186	its gotta be PPP n toons then
192	where u hoot is it nice ???
3	Pwnnnnnnnn by prawns @ Ssikkek Korean Grill BBQ buffet...  The aftermath....
18	You can ask those who tried it today.  I think most of them agree it's hotttttt
8	The sauce is nice, it has a sweet before taste. After awhile the spiciness start to tingle at the place where it originally landed.  Thank you duckie for sharing this fabulous sauce. Appreciate it.
40	prawns~~ eh, 2d1n become ssikkek?!
10	Ya lor, good thing that Twtan got post the new Korean BBQ place...  Reached 2D1N at 5.40pm already full house and got to wait until 7.30pm for the next sitting and I was just number 30 in the queue...  Heng I called Ssikkek and they still got place - booked and jetted down...hahah
0	Thanks for bringing the sauce down for us to try.   I think I will stick to my tobasco.   Nice meeting Sally for the first time   It was a smokey experience for me today.   Before buffet, I smell smoke. During buffet, I also smell smoke
14	2d1n at tanjong pagar is same as ssikkek
3	I think the BBQ spread is similar to 2D1N...although I think the marinate here is a bit weaker and probably a tad sweeter...  And some of the cooked food that was mentioned in the review weren't there...we did have a cooked beef dish (sweetish), a noodle (never try) and a strange looking salad (also never try - was still full at closing time)...  The good thing was that they allow reservation (although they initially only allowed us to  come as walk-in due to our last-minute call)...
6	tts alot of freaking prawn!!!! all gg by ppp? haha
1	yea i know, but is still different location. queue number 30 at 5.40pm?? lucky you are quick witted enough.
0	of coz not..  theres over a hundred prawns there..lost count of how many we had..
4	Good thing that you reserve, else we have to Q outside.  For the extra $2 more compared to the tanjong pagar branch, I still prefer the novena branch.   Though parking was expensive. Thank goodness i didn't stay a minute longer cos I got only 9 cents left on my cash card after the deduction
5	And lucky too - if Ah Tan never post the link earlier, we would still be waiting...hahah
352	so u prefer where this or 2d1n?wah sounds good shld go back again soon!! so the food quality almost the same&gt;?
315	Ssikkek == 2D1N 2D1N == Ssikkek  Ssikkek more expensive = $24.20 (2D1N $22.00) They are exactly the same thing. 2D1N = long que. Ssikkek = can phone booking, we are discussing that next time cannot use carey's number.... as our table ate from 7PM till 11PM (closing), maybe tio "blacklisted". The gas was replaced twice, total 3 cans of gas used up by us.  The air was less 'smoky' compare to 2D1N, as Donkey say the ceiling was higher. There are tables outside but it's non-aircon if you really cannot take the smoke inside, maybe can stay outside BBQ?  We swept empty the prawns like almost twice that night. I estimate around 6 to 7 plates of fresh sexy prawns. From  to to to to .... we just pwnnnnnnnn all the prawns last night....  Oh, we have 1 mystery guest in the middle of the Buffet Outing at around 9PM...extremely mystery... if wasn't for carey's sharp scanning around the whole area, the table size will be 6. I will go 2D1N &gt; Ssikkek For $2 more, the place seems better and less smokey, almost 3 times bigger and seating capacity.  But if tables are avaible at 2D1N, I am still fine with 2D1N after all, it's  savings.  Final scoring from DYD with HGW template for scoring... Nice food, refill was good, meat was good. I saw coffee machine but didn't try them. Air is 100% better but you still smell like BBQ after the whole 4 hours sitting inside the shop. As explained above, $2.20 more compare to 2D1N. Strangely, the staff gives a neutral service.  Addition 0.5 for quick response when request changing foil and gas ran out.  Addition 1 for unlimited food as promised. But sadly, our table arrangement had 3 of our diners having to shift their seats multiple times. Carey chair was knock by their push trolley every time they move around our table. If once or twice, it's much okie, but after 4-5 times, they still trying to squeeze the trolley behind carey and only ask carey to adjust after only they knocks on carey's chair. Maybe it's our table position, but the servers could open their mouth rather than knock on the diner's chair... It's all still Korean BBQ.
3	Thanks for the pictures, at least someone did homework.
10	You all never ask them why lesser cooked foods?
9	mystery guest got more photo. Wait for him to post :-)
0	OK, will wait.  These people went? 1) Toons 2) Donkey 3) Carey 4) PPP 5) DaYellowDuckie 6) Dennyz 7) sallywss77 (TBC)
3	All DBS/POSB Cards  25% discount off total food &amp; drinks bill, excluding beer.   1-for-1 beer.  Valid from 20 May to 31 August 2011.  Offer valid for Medzs dine-in only.  Not valid for set lunch menu.  Not valid in conjunction with any other promotion or discount offers.  Not exchangeable or refundable in cash or kind.
11	Actually moi going at 5pm with a colleague or two. I didn't make reservation so can join you instead?
1	Can I join also? wan to have one rosti by myself.
3	no prob, but that is if you don't mind being an hour later for dinner. which is 6pm. their reservation is latest at 6pm, after that only walk-in. thus i put 6pm but i may be slightly late or not as i am rushing down from somewhere. so you can actually get my name and go in first.  if there are more than 6, i try to increase seats early.  twtan, i pm you soon. by the way why is your status red color when you are online?? p/s. my face has little rashes. don't mind if you coming.
8	shalome, can BigMonkey join too? My online status is hidden by default.
5	any one is welcome.  been almost a year since i see all of you.   but sorry, it's inevitable that i am usually last minute so may not have much attendance.   i have edited the previous post, my face has some rashes, if you coming please don't mind the face even though lunar 7 month just over.
0	Medzs @ orchard central Date: 30th august 2011 (today) Time: 6pm 1) shalome 2) twtan 3) twtan guest 4) twtan guest (tbc) 5) bigmonkey 6)
2	Toons didn't. Donkey say he last min got thumbthing caught up.
1	So the other photographer must be sallywss77 liao.
9	wow......nice!  tmj going
79	Updated to the first page of this thread.  () Ala Carte Mediterranean fare Dinner Date:  (Tuesday) Venue: 181 Orchard Road, #B2-01/03 Orchard Central, Time: 6pm - 11pm Prices:  1) shalome 2) twtan 3) BigMonkey 4)  5)  6) Max 6 persons
29	UOB Cards Exclusive Deal: Enjoy 30% off Steamboat Buffet at Jade Room Restaurant. Pay just $18.50 nett, instead of $26.40 for this Chinese Steamboat Buffet. Buffet includes a total of 80 different ingredients, chilli crab and complimentary tasting of Peking duck.
3	mystery guest how come will be inside the list....
12	OK, I ask BigMonkey to post the pictures.
9	corny.......
155	OK, I changed the time to 5pm, please take note.  () Ala Carte Mediterranean fare Dinner Date:  (Tuesday) Venue: 181 Orchard Road, #B2-01/03 Orchard Central, Time: 5pm - 11pm Prices:  1) shalome 2) twtan 3) BigMonkey 4) Donkey 5)  6) Max 6 persons
3	Just now I walked past the prosperous kitchen at ssc. Inside no ppl one. Biz seems to be bad for them.
15	Nope - and it's not me...  Always say mystery guest liao
58	carey, i really hats off your patient yesterday evening.
122	=( i saw this too late
8	I already know who liao. I personally asked him for homework just now.
64	I ate there yesterday. Not many people on a Monday night. But hard to get their staff's attention. Plates not cleared or changed despite piling fill with bones and shells. Dishes gets lost in the midst of ordering. Food comes cold. That is the most unacceptable part. No doubt it is cheap at $22 per pax. But only the cereal prawns and red tilapia with Thai sauce is good. But even the tilapia gets worse with subsequent orders. I won't be going back again.
39	Guys dont mind helping me out with a couple of questions.  1. Between Fisherman's market at Clarke Quay and Buffet Town at Raffles City shopping center, which is the better choice for lunch buffet? 2. For Basilico, is the difference in variety huge between the weekday lunch buffet and weekday dinner buffet?  Thanks for all who answer!
6	Nice meeting up with you shalome.  Sorry i started dinner early before you all arrive.  Today was one of those rare occasion I had something to buy in orchard. So I was already there earlier. Actually I quite like the food there.  Will sure go back again if they have the promotion.
5	Here is my mini review of Medzs. This place is hidden in Basement 2 of Orchard Central. When we reached at 5pm, there weren't much diners yet. The place gives me a warm cozy feeling when I stepped into it. There are around 8 stations if you included both the drink stations. Most of the stations has a country or two associated with it to indicated the originality of the cuisine.
2	The very first station is selling Desserts, though for tonight we did not try any of those.  Was very tempted to try the below pastry but was quite full at the end of the dinner so did not get to eat it.
3	Rosti counter.
5	For the juices, I find them to be on the expensive side at $5 per cup for one type of fruit and $5.80 for a combination of up to 3 fruits.  Bar counter selling all the alcoholic drinks.
2	While waiting for the rest to appears, I went around taking photo of others' foods. - Couldn't decide which to order, this or the lamb leg. In the end I went for the lamb leg.
5	This Kebab station has many diners queuing for foods.
3	Nice meeting U too donkey.  Missed the chance to meet U last time to jb.   c u again. Twtan wanted run away. So fast. Lol. See u guys again
8	Greece and Italy counter  The card on the left was given to you when you walk into the restaurant. It stores the info on what you have ordered. The round disk on the right was given to you when you ordered from the food stations. When the disk vibrate and the red LEDs comes on, it's time to go collect your food. You need to bring along the receipt to claim the dish.   Time to go collect my yummy food.
3	Run where?  I thought I was the one running away hahaha  Did you like the food there?   I don't know is it becos I was in high spirit and that's why everything tasted nice or was the food really good.   It even make me sin.  I confess, I ate the potato.
9	- At first glance, it look like a single piece of lamb but actually was rolled up like swissroll. The meat was tender and the herbs taste strong but yet does not overpower the lamb taste. Quite fatty too.  Donkey's  - After eating all those oven roasted chicken, this was a refreshing change for me. You can taste the char grilled flavour from roasting over open fire and best of all the chciken is not dry. The sauce complemented the chicken well.
11	- When I was at the counter, the piece of fresh meat look quite thinly sliced but when I collected it back, wow, the piece was actually quite thick and the portion substantial. The meat was melt in your mouth texture, even better than the lamb I had earlier and this cost only $11 before discount. - Ok, this plate was BigMonkey and shalome's. We ordered the plain version below. Nice crispy exterior and soft inside, pepper taste is strong but it's good nonetheless.
3	- Took a bit to try, the meat was quite dry and not flavourful like the one we had in Katong. - shalome said the chicken taste too strong. I on the other hand think is due to the tomato sauce and the cheese which add a strong flavour to the dish. You either love it or hate it.  Pita bread?  The bill - At least for me and Donkey's.  The range of foods may not be a lot but I find them to my liking, ok, I only had 3 dishes but they are yummy to me. Prices are quite reasonable and with the DBS 25% discount, it's very worth.
31	What ran away? Me wanted to go Cold Storage at CentrePoint to buy something. And to come home do edit and post the pictures.
34	wow nice pic..the place is like marche??
1	the pork belly is so nice!  every time i go there i will have their pork belly!   the roast chicken also good..very moist..
10	will have chance again  hope they have good promo againfeel like going back tomorrow but like no time.. i missed out the desserts. i aimed for some when i went order. after eating i totally forgotten and went for bill.  from the counters, waiting for collection or you take from other people's table??
320	just teasing twtan. he ran off to get his stuffs from cold storage. i quite like the mango smoothie, and duck confit, though sauce is tad salty but i find it complement to the meat.the pork belly really tempts me... the rosti..too pepperish.. i prefer ambush's.i think only i like the duck confit. perhaps due to first time try this dish.  at first my first taste, the chicken taste too strong. but i do agree with you that it might be the tomato sauce and cheese. yea i know  because you stayed for some time too, was seeing you rushing off for cold storage
105	Yes, like Marche though lesser range of foods.From the counter before they collected their foods.
11	The night before, i had over dose of pork belly and beef at 2D1N so i ordered the chicken. I was pleasantly surprised that the roast chicken came out better than i expected, yup, moist and got the char-grill taste.   Then after that, ah tan ordered the pork belly and i regreted liao. It really look thick and tender. Next trip must order pork belly and the rosti again
19	Hahaha ... so fast Medz part 2?   Let me know, i should be able to make it after my swim. And i promise this time i will not be rushing off. Initially, i find the place very small and wasn't expecting much. But the food turn out to be better than Marche.
105	They are having 1 for 1 beer promo right?  wonder how much is the beer?
38	Dreamer shu shu, yang chewren dunch drink beer, yang chewren drink fruit juice sho I dunno how much the bear cost.
7	this is not a new promo right? meaning previously there are 2 promo going on?
1	Ah tan, picture below
9	Thanks for the pictures, the place also nearer to me. Got some more?
1	Should have more. I took some pictures using BigMonkey phone while he was eating. But maybe all the pictures too blur, that is why he never post
1	$14 to $22   promotion valid only for bottles.
106	Still have quite a few, but have to be patience cos I keep on encountering upload error on my iPhone app.
88	sweet rice drink
60	the spread of meat looks good!  2D1N vs ssikkek, which 1 win or both same same
48	$12  wow!!  lunch buffet what time to what time?
33	Thought we gave a quick review liao? hahah  The meats are the same - but I find that the seasoning at 2D1N is better...  You pay extra S$2 for some cooked food but nothing to shout about...  Plus points include better ventilation and they accept reservations at Ssikkek
41	Not sure if anyone shared before.
26	ok i probably missed it behind =X thanks for repeating
10	I did and even went there liao - quite a big con - at least for The Tent...  I also gave a review not too long ago...really really very meager spread and not worth spending even S$10, much less S$15
6	wow, now then i see until weekday lunch $12+!  will go there one day to see see look look!
6	It might not be of the same variety as the dinner. Better to call and ask first.   And remember to jio me
4	Got pork belly and bacon i happy enuff alrdy
29	Hahaha, I prefer the pork belly and beef slice.  Today I saw a lot of pork belly . . . at the swimming pool   Btw the pool near your place is closed on every wed.
5	wow ok, that i didnt know. thanks for reminder  the beef slice monday i eat i didnt like it..theres some odd beef taste..  if eat with onion still ok..but onion is cheating
4	wow seeing all the pic really tempted me join the next outing haha.. so far nv join b4 hwz outing b4
9	just join   we're all very friendly!
4	u all nv try the soup at medz ?????
37	No, my first time try, don't know which are the good stuffs.
70	Credits go to DaYellowDuckie for the arrangment.
10	had the pork belly at medz today. was good! 25% disc too. bread and butter pudding wasnt nice though.
1	Went to Medzs just now for dinner.  Ordered roasted chicken and pork belly, really nice!   Best is have the 25% discount   Thanks for the review guys   BM, i also did not ordered the beer...lol
13	I saw so many beer in the cellar there but never put price so I diddn't bother to ask...  the bread and butter pudding sucks!
6	donkey you saw me at the pool?? but i don't recall i spotted you.. beef slice ? are you referring to the bbq or medzs? you went medzs ? never jio  actually i saw reviews that pork collar is nice... but i don't know the difference or taste between this and belly..  creme bulee i saw was good too.. never go medzs today  no chance try.... must see next time got what promotion..i think got the drink/beer list/menu somewhere.. i posted the range for beer price
94	got the menu? diddn't know.  last minute decision also... i went from somerset mrt walk to taka, dono what to eat then friend suggested medz suddenly so walk all the way back to OC.  don't think their chocolate fondant will be nice also... all put there blow aircon dono how long liao. bday month got 15% off if $98 and above! find their normal drinks quite exp though...
267	Very authentic korean bbq which is around $7 in Korea~ but without prawns.
25	For the beef slice, i was referring to the bbq.   As for pork belly, you have to show me yours first else i wouldn't have recognised
51	I already missing their Pork Belly, it's so tender and fatty.  Lets hope some cc will have discount again.
12	OMG.. pls jio me if u all going for the bbq lunch!
1	Ok, when PPP jio me, i jio you
10	Lunch leh, need to take leave unless on weekend.
8	Donkey:  bu ke yi la.. later you see me juicy want eat me..  The bbq..They want go weekday lunch because of the low price? If working, go there lunch, aftersmell on oneself quite strong?
97	Weekend lunch is normal price. Young children must learn how to save money, it is a virtue.   Can change or use perfume.  See liao then we can compare mah
104	Anyone bought this?
11	I got buy
26	Worth? $9 savings for the restriction of only lunch.
51	and have to add GST and service charges to the $21.00
5	Not sure whether nice or not?
27	reviews are quite bad.  that joker which rate it a 10 mus be.... stupid ass.
175	Or a staff   I have been there once last year for lunch with my colleague...  It was not as bad as what some had written in the reviews (maybe standard really did drop a lot)...  But there was also nothing special...  Forgettable is probably a good word to use to describe them
231	Thought you said the place not bad?
0	You have seen , now see my $15 dinner yesterday.  The first thing when I got off the escalator on the 5th floor, was that the place is very quiet. The crowds seem to stop short on the basement level where the NTUC supermart is. Inside the restaurant was no better, only a few tables are occupied but it does not matter, I am here to eat not people watching.
0	The  caught my sight first but they are not on my must eat dinner list. - Left our clips with our table number here for the Pork and Beef. - Here you have got Lotus Chips, Salmon Skin, Onion Ring etc...
3	- I helped myself to the seared Salmon sushi.
1	- The large scallops here are quite good, sweet prawns are so so only and salmon sashimi are ok. - Just decent stuffs, passable.
0	More Desserts
0	Even more desserts - I only like the cream puffs. BigMonkey might be attracted to these brightly coloured ice creams.  But they tasted like frozen sugar water, very diluted flavours.
1	These  are dry and tough, none of us like it. The scallops in the center are fresh and springy but the white fish below it has a fishy taste to it. Grilled Salmon was good but the portion was so tiny.
0	The first portion of this beef was overcooked and tough but subsequent order Toons requested for it to be undercooked and it more manageable though chewy. - Me just loved this skewered jewels of the sea. Small they may be but it was juicy and goes well with the salty sauce.  but overcooked and tough.
0	- Salty char grilled bacon wrapped around scallions and cherry tomato were just oh so good. - Another hit with us, the slightly charred meat and the fats just exploded into mixture of flavours in your mouth.
5	- Between this and the one I had in Sakura, I prefer the later one grilled with mentaiko. is just a slightly mushy plate of chicken. Thumb down for this. These  are so hard on the outside, just inedible. - Not my kind of soup. The End
40	Not bad is not = good woah...  Ordinary is probably a fair comment...hahah
7	Any promotions for credit cards like uob or dbs for Friday night (buffet/non-buffet) dinings? Going tomorrow night  2pax
602	hope it helps
5	Any buffet sessions tonight?
19	Nope, our Prince of Buffet is not around.
113	Where he go? Sigh. Thought can join you all tonight.
40	but hor... looking at the frequency of your recent hoots... u seems to be on track to inherit the title from toons ley...   regards,  wacky
97	Tan bo jio..
6	carey, donkey: since u guys cannot eat sweet stuff, wat kind of dessert can u guys eat? any suggestion for dessert? someone wanna join us for dessert.
5	I want to eat the Lychee Martini Cake at  after the breakfast at AMK.
20	i meant tonight. not tomo.
7	I am ze minority - you guys decide bah and I am not too keen on desserts anyway
57	I am quite happy to watch you all eat dessert even though i am not eating it.
7	very angry ah..... no mood to eat
8	I know.   Convert your anger to hunger than we go jiak buffet again.   Make your IC liao?
143	haven't go make IC.... no mood, really hard to eat or do anything except find the thief and kick their balls till bleed.  okok...dont OT the thread, later Dragon Auntie come in get red card.
17	Saw your thread. If you have any chances of catching those scums, it will be through the CSI team here. Our SPF is a bunch of useless good-for-nothing clowns that are only effective against the political opponents of the pappies. Some scum climbed into my condo 2 years ago, smashed the windscreen of my week old car to steal the cashcard. Yea, got people come dust the crime scene like yours, got the fingerprints of that idiot clearly as my car was just washed and waxed that fateful night. Till now no calls or updates from the IO. Cost me hundreds to replace windscreen and change solar film. Hope that scum gets run down by a speeding lorry. And the lorry driver reversed on him again to see what happened.
37	if Dragon is Auntie... that makes me a dinosaur liao loh!!!!!  bunny will be submitting HW tomorrow night. people, look forward to it bah...
61	Just went to Zhou Kitchen at JP outlet for Hi-tea buffet, last time i've been there was 3 or 4 years ago where you helped yourselves to the dishes typical buffet style. Now it has changed to the staff serving you ala carte style. Quite a limited variety but for that price i can't complain much really. My partner said you are only allowed to order maximum 3 times. Charsao su and XO carrot cake were good, cold drunken chicken and prawn paste chicken decent, the rest was just average and poor here and there. Drinks like hot tea and juices are not inclusive of the buffet price. Probably won't go back again
28	think you are allowed to order more than 3 times bah. went there recently and ordered same dishes quite a few times.
167	You all got notice the city square mall, there is this korean BBQ. The lunch buffet only $12.90. Really cheap!
97	tml morning then post , now go out jalan jalan
1252	Please help me delete mushroom pot since as of now no interested parties and coincidentally I am Very sick so cancelling. Thanks.
115	oie ! can u guys take 2 min to vote so that i can have my crab fest?   details here:==&gt;   link to vote:   remember to vote !!!
0	Kuru Kuru @ Valley Point using iphone4 + not pro... pics lousy dun complain hor!! a bit of the interior 1st round of sashimi (salmon, hamachi, suzuki, tai &amp; tako) 2nd round, only got the stuff we like more (salmon, hamachi and tako) a small selection of nigri sushi they have: swordfish, hamachi, suzuki &amp; unagi baby octopus (dunno how young) with sesame sauce (not mine dunno how it taste) spider handroll with wasabi mayo sauce cold tofu scallops in mentaiko &amp; cheese sauce (we ordered many of this)
11	more........... chicken wings in mentaiko &amp; cheese sauce unagi in special sauce a small selection of tempura shishamo satay (we order many of this too) kiku niku (stir fried beef) chicken satay saba didn't manage to take pics of the chawanmushi, miso soup, chicken balls satay, nasi pattaya, zaru soba, potato gratin and etc.
11	damage??????
554	we used vouchers, $25 + $5 (dinner and free-flow drink charge)
222	voted liao , can share some with us bo
2	any one knows if there is still plates of pleasure at Claymore? I went to their website via mobile but did not see that. Wonder is it changed or I missed that out..  if have, what are the plates of pleasure?
44	You can call them to check. I checked earlier today, no more indicated.
45	Belly Happy!  31 August, 2011  I have eaten at 10 @ Claymore twice so far and will definitely go back again. it is not over-priced and the quality buffet spread coupled with the amazing service makes it well worth the price you pay if not MORE. I tucked in with gusto at the oyster bar... super fresh.. and the . The beef was cooked to perfection - medium rare exactly as i had ordered. What is great about the "Plates of Pleasure" is that it is always served fresh after you have ordered it from the menu... and you can keep on ordering as much as you like! i was also pleased with their cheese platter and the salads available. i always find that normal restaurants do not know how to make a good salad. but at the Pan Pacific Orchard, 10 at Claymore.. i was in heaven! The chef at the station made a caesar salad exactly to my liking!! The second time i ate there was for my birthday weekend. i brought my mum along to enjoy the feast and the two of us not only had our cravings and appetites satisfied, we were able to have some mother and daughter bonding time without the crazy hectic business of other buffets. The ambience there is perfect for conversation and the service staff are attentive but not intrusive!! Absolutely wonderful!! i can't wait to go again soon... i will have to work it off in the gym the next day.. but TOTALLY worth it!!!
22	hi raven, review on 31st august probably is august promotion..  if not wrong every month should be different. but now looking at september's..  i have emailed them to enquire on this. can't talk.. throat pain ...
156	The promotion ended in August.
50	That's cheap as the food looks very decent  Hmmm...can't remember if we bought any vouchers or not haha  Got to check with toons lol
297	sho fast part 4 le..yum yum
15	any nice weekday buffet dinner to intro for 4pax?  like those pay for 3 &amp; 1 dines free
499	Go surf thru the sticky on previous outing. U might find what u r looking for.
95	Usually the 4 go pay 3 are cc promotion, you can check from the respective cc website as we do not know what cc you have.
7	Marriott Cafe  (Open)  Sunday Brunch  Date: 25 September (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price: $80++ or $64 nett (based on 6 diners) after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan (TBC)  3) Evilduxy (TBC)  4) Raven (TBC)  5) eInS78 (TBC)  6) samba ( TBC )  Reserve list  7) Shalome (ANZ) (TBC)  8)   9)  10)  Note that ANZ cc promo ends 31 Sep  Please reconfirm interest
3	confirm me
21	() Sunday Brunch Date:  (Sunday) Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel Time: 11.30am to 3pm Price:  or  after cc discount Max 6 persons 1) carey 2) twtan 3) Evilduxy 4) Raven 5) eInS78 (TBC) 6) samba ( TBC ) 7) Shalome (ANZ) (TBC) 8)  9) 10)
5	unker, you got referral code? so can let you earn a bit of cash back.
8	me ish not unker  many pple dun like referal link wor... if u all dun mind, here's the referal link  Only $24.80nett instead of $33 for Eat-All-You-Can Mongolian BBQ International Seafood Buffet (Halal Certified): 150 Dishes + Sashimi &amp; Sushi + Teppanyaki + Seafood + Dessert at Kublai Khan Restaurant @ Dhoby Ghaut! THE DEAL $24.80 nett for Eat-All-You-Can Mongolian BBQ International Seafood Buffet Dinner at Kublai Khan Restaurant: Nett price. GST included! Conveniently located at Park Mall (2-mins from Dhoby Ghaut MRT). Over 150 dishes Buffet including Mongolian BBQ, Sashimi &amp; Sushi, Seafood and Teppanyaki! Range of Chinese, Japanese, Mongolian and Western Cuisine. Soup &amp; Salad Corner, Traditional Chinese Clay Pot, Hot Entree Selection and Dessert Station! Offer quality food &amp; a comfortable ambience. TERMS &amp; CONDITIONS Valid from 12 Sep to 12 Dec 2011. Redeemable from Mon to Thurs only. For dine-in buffet dinner (6pm to 10pm). Minimum 2 purchases; Multiple redemption allowed, buy as many coupons as you like! Reservation is required @ 63344888. Coupon print-out must be presented during redemption. Not applicable with any other discounts &amp; promotions. Non-refundable &amp; non-exchangeable but transferable.
3	No offence but the Mongolian BBQ buffet is so-so niah - standard has been dropping until   Then again, for S$24.80, you don't have much to lose - just don't go with very high expectations
5	Now I gian Japanese food...hahah  Can compare with Shin Yuu?
32	Thanks for the comments. I never tried b4 yet
96	IMHO, Shin Yuu is better coz the menu got more stuff that i like to eat~
7	seems like it is still currently ongoing.. ever since july as when twtan and toons went to eat... oh my.. i wonder should i wait for october.. hopefully there are some changes.. Reply from claymore:
62	a few yr ago went not bad did not try recently
1	Reply from claymore:Wah, they extended the promotion...  Now gian to go - anyone else keen?
94	there will be new Plates of pleasure in Oct.. eg. kangaroo meat.. i edited my post.. in case they later blame me for disclosing
96	Put time put place
33	Date (Oct) and place (10@Claymore) I gave you liao.
5	I am not so keen on kangaroo meat - it's pretty awful cos it's too lean...hahah  Give me a juicy lamb chop anytime (everytime also can)
111	I am not going for the kangaroo meat, some other dishes caught my eyes.
100	Friday night in October?
31	Toons Friday night not free. Also I think the Plates of Pleasure are from Sunday to Thursday only.
2	Hahaha  . . . Oct is month, not date.   Don't bluff young children
37	Oh ya, I had kangaroo tail at Alice Spring and I didn't like it.   Meh meh still the best.
381	Oh crap. Then do you all want Sunday? Can't make it on other weekdays. Mondays will be very late. Can only reach at 8pm. Late bird catches no worms.
2	Sunday is Brunch if I am not wrong.
45	the line or 10 claymore better?
24	the 10 at claymore has buffet on friday?
2	They have buffet everyday just that the Plates of Pleasure is only on certain days.
5	Brunch is better no? Same price as dinner
52	No problem here, it's whether if piggy can make it for Brunch. Actually I preferred Brunch as got juices plus the bright environment better suited for me to take photo.
11	Brunch more exp.  If you want the plates of pleasure, you must go for dinner from mon to thu or sun brunch.  Other days dun have.  The beef n lamb are good, though not as good as marriott's one.  This one i dun mind going again.
23	$4 difference in pricing.  Weekdays Dinner  $48++  Sunday Brunch  $52++ (with free flow of fresh juices)
0	wah ... u oso jiak buffet de ar   10@ claymore better sia, imho   the spread is not as extensive as The Line but 10@claymore weekdae dinner &amp; sundae brunch hv freeflow lobsters   reasonable freshness but wif the price, it is definitely more worth den The Line less 40% or 50%.
7	free flow of fresh jucie for $4+ still ok lah
0	If you guys going for weekday dinner, i suggest date, 20 or 27 October (Thursday), by then i'm back and can join.
6	But i dont drink juice, only sky juice.
10	I prefer weekday dinner also, if possible.
36	My colleagues, I think 5-6 of them went to the Prosperous Kitchen buffet last Friday, they told me they like the foods there.
2	claymore better rah.   the Line jiak liao will laosai one
4	okie ... gonna go claymore ... wanna comes?  but looks like friday dont have buffet?
3	Friday have buffet just no Plates of Pleasure = lousy buffet. Basically we are there for the Plates of Pleasure.
7	Their website never say got buffet leh ... got ala carte menu
32	i iish on diet   you call and ask lor... but basically go for the plates of pleasure more wu hua
8	wooo dieting
8	If it's towards late Oct, then I am out...hahah  Don't mind brunch though - UOB currently has a 4-for-3 promotion for dinner and brunch
1	no worries, you guys go ahead, i'm also not sure if i can make it during those periods now.
34	Citibank same promo  Carey..  I thought you aiming for Sept plates of pleasure one..
6	Yes donkey. I thought you realize that earlier  when you replied along Carey post on kangaroo meat..? Previous posts got put until Sept and new p.o.p in Oct..hmm..
78	kangaroomeat really taste damn badmeh? lol I planning to spam them when i'm at australia.
7	kns. i thought you dont like go for buffet one?
3	Ok, then we go for both Sept and Oct lor   I am getting greedy liao.   I know Carey and Toons are keen, for Sept, anyone else?
1	It's lean and i feel got an after taste.   Not my preferred type of meat.   In SG, they sell kangaroo meat dog food
3	Lets settle sep first for those who wanna try the sep menu.  Oct can organise another one for those who wanna try kangaroo n unagi.  Dinner, 10@Claymore  Mon 26, Tue 27 or Wed 28 Sep.  Which days do you guys prefer?
12	Mon 26 for me.
18	I am ok with all the dates, let you guys and gals pick the date.
4	I am aiming for Sep - the meat dishes look better IMHO
0	It's not "bad" taste-wise   Just that it's very lean and can be tough if not done properly  Plus there isn't the melt in your mouth feeling as compared to a fatty cut of meat
2	We actually have Marriott on 25 Sep so I prefer 28 Sep
3	Oh ya, I forgotten about this. So I go for 28th Sep too.
4	Just came back from Ssekkei lunch buffet with my colleagues...  For S$12+, they cut down on a lot of the meats...  As you can see from the pix above, they only got this selection - no bacon, no pork chop, no prawn, no beef ribs and no beef slices   The cold section is the same as the dinner...  Overall, it was not bad but without the bacon, the foil got black very quickly as it wasn't oily enough...  For a weekday, it was packed but maybe it's school holiday as well...
8	The first picture, the meat in the center is what meat? The one that look like bacon.
2	Pork belly
5	I forgot about Marriott too.   We change to 28 Sept then.   Ah tan can start name list liao.
6	() Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: 1) Toons 2) carey 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) 7) 8)
124	Looks like I have to go on my own. Do they have other discounts? I only have 2 pax on my side.
6	Lol, tat week your tummies gonna have a good workout wor.  Dun forget Saltwater Cafe BBQ on Fri 23 Sep.  Lucky i not going to Marriott
6	I really forgot Hahaha  Unlikely i am going marriott since 6 pax liao.    More buffet will means more laps at the pool lor
57	These are likely to be last few buffets before I enter into my busy period again...hahah  Not a problem - just fast from buffet to buffet
39	Eh y claymore so little ppl de...I wana go n Try leh lol
19	so claymore on friday what difference from other days?
6	Can add you in if you want?
19	okok add me in!!!
26	BBQ charred pork belly yummy yummy
3	claymore no more cc promo ah?
5	Got UOB cc 4 go pay 3 promotion.
59	can put me and chewtoy?
70	thought u say dieting
6	() Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: 1) Toons 2) carey 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) etteNNaej 7) chewtoy 8)
1	but chewtoy not dieting ma
37	There is a salad counter if you just need to diet.
8	() Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price:  1) Toons 2) carey 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) etteNNaej 7) chewtoy 8) PPP
25	Just nice, 8 paxs for the 4 pay 3 promo.  Can close liao.  Too big grp also no fun.
22	gdgd heng i fast this time if not miss out again ~ ~  anyway what abt joaquim n 1 more the korea food?
153	Pay $48 for salad is
343	You can consult either carey or writetodonkey on how to go on your diet.
16	Is $48 + 10% + 7% = ($56.50 x 3)/4 = $42.40 nett
10	We love to eat with people on a diet.   We will help you eat all the fatty parts and you can have all the lean meat
20	No lar, he just need the oysters ... not fresh even better cos can lose weight even faster
4	Donkey is the expert...  I am on a "see food" diet - I see food, I eat
5	LS? *cough* *cough*  I am noob hor, still learning. Must "qin jiao" my master cos he is the best and i learn from the best
192	jenet... just eat the buffet normally lor.... exercise more la... den eat more.... no need to diet...  regards, wacky
52	wah chewtoy need to diet, i can go liposuction liao....
551	Chewtoy not dieting, you read wrongly liao.
5	hey guys.. need a quick recommendation for dinner this FRIDAY!.. Am having family dinner for grandma's bday, around 20pax. is 10 at Claymore recommended? They were initially planning to go Vienna @ united square but without the credit card promotion, it is abit more expensive than claymore.  What's your tasteful opinion? Thank you edit: Do they have freeflow of lobsters on Friday dinner??
1	When are you going? Try not to go on Fri/Sat as the menu does not include the Plates of Pleasure. For more details see below: My colleague went on a Sat, no lobsters so I assume Fri should be the same.
2	aside from the plates of pleasure, claymore spread is little. and those on buffet spread table, is jus average.  dont wanna consider the cathay?
4	tot cathay II sure will have...?? got so many ppl interested... i suggest oct for cathay II...   regards,  wacky
7	which page of the story are u at????  pple is granny birthday celebration, u wanna join in ar?
2	thanks I just realised going there on a Friday night is not worth it without the plate of pleasures.. now headache.. I want to find something better than Vienna ($40.80++ no discounts!!)
1	lol u post never quote ppl... so i oso dunno which page are u on mah...   regards,  wacky
6	Then go this one like what the rest said:
2	can consider SCDH if hav discount too....
76	Seems like they are highly recommended by you all. I though of trying something different than zi char. But I will put this in mind!What is this?
121	There's a 1 dines free with every 3 paying adult at MELT @ Mandarin Oriental. Love the big spread here. Haven't been there for a long time though.  And 1 dines free with every 2 paying adult for Straits Cafe @ Rendzvous. Think quite a number of people on the buffetlicious been there. Check out the sticky thread for pictures.   1 for 1 at Sheraton Towers. Missumuch said the oysters here were good?  All for UOB.
65	I am thinking of where to eat too, as the uob has so many 3dine1free promo. Donno which 1 to choose
272	I like Mandarin Oriental personally.  Wide spread, decent food.
12	MELT is $78++  Straits Cafe only 20% discount $49++ calling SCDH and cathay later
0	Any good buffet restuarants at USS ?
1	Paiseh, don't think got any fatty parts left for chewtoy once we are through...hahah
12	Cheapest is probably Melting Pot bah - they got 1-for-1 with UOB cards  Toons went there before - you can search for his review and pictures
2	I will be there early to reserve the fatty parts first!
30	Dining Room the oysters cmi, asked the others who went before. Raven ate one piece and gave up liao.
37	Yea, hehe.  Normally at buffets, its the fatty bits tat gets left over.  Everyone will go for the lean bits, but you go with us ... its the reverse
23	Ya lor...sad hor   Think I must stop saying that fat is healthy and good for ya...hahah
98	oei! when did I say the oysters here is gd?   I said wif 1 for 1, sheraton is a value for $ place to jiak oysters. (Frankly I dunno the quality cos I din even try one )  but I like the desserts here; ambience oso gd ~tat day I went straits cafe, not satisfying lah. frankly if u r looking at more decents desserts, the more worth de will be 10@claymore &amp; the dining room lor.  The Line, Oscars de desserts all disappoint me
11	moi miss jiak oysters.... sobz sobz  wah sian my never-ending projects..............
13	Busy at work is also a good thing, that means your rice bowl is secured. Year end get big bonus can treat yourself to all the good foods your missed earlier.  You able to join us for this Sat outing?
16	You still managed to join them for some buffets. I only managed to go for 1 this year.   A little bird told me that next year I will have Wednesdays and Saturdays off, so i can join if there are buffets on Wednesdays and Saturdays nights. But my bunny boy coming in October. Going to be super busy again. Last time my tiger princess came, I lost 9kg.    This time round dunno lose how many.
12	dunno leh... some things hard to say  wanna think positive about money but always tio disappointed  this weekend i am working i dun mind losing 1-2kg but 9kg is too much for me leh.....
1	I working every weekend but I don't mind actually. Just sianz when I see the Marriott brunch pictures showing what I had missed.   I was slightly off in my bmi range so the 8-9kg loss puts me in the ok range. Think another 8-9kg loss will put me in the under-weight range.
5	Oo sat the amk outing??Help me reserve n where is claymore?
11	10 at Claymore, your name is already in. Check first page of this thread. We are not going AMK this Sat, check below:  () Ala Carte Lunch Date:  (Saturday) Location: Taste Paradise @ ION Orchard Time: 11.00am to 4.30pm (last order at 3.30pm) Price:  Taste Paradise (max 8 pax) cum Isetan Kyushu Fair 1) wacky 2) twtan 3) kahlan (TBC) 4) Beta_Tester 5) 6) 7) 8)
9	oh u got menu for taste paradise???  anyway i meant to ask carey help me reserve fatty parts as i def wont be able to make it in time lol
3	You asking a wolf to help you look after the sheep?
21	Hey hey hey - I am not a colour wolf like you hor  Besides, you never see me post that fats is unhealthy meh...hahah So unless you guys want to be super bui bui like me, please don't fight with me to eat the fats
3	haha have to try n ask ma lolIs okay I'm alrdy bui le lol..help me reserve some part also mA...
6	Reached liao.
4	A lot of sauce.  Both are chicken soup, haven't add the mala sauce.  IF not spicy enough, can go to the sauce bar and get more sauce.  Add $1.30 for free flow syrup drinks and chinese tea.  Got cockles le, yum yum.  Zhu tu is pretty nice.  Moi first plate.  Still got take somemore, but forgot to take photo.
19	This dumpling ran out fast, have to get the kitchen to special delivery to moi table.  After mixing the mala paste becum like that.  A lot of steam.  See the dumpling boiling  Total damage: $28.70  The staff start to leave at 10pm. bad point, cos make me so kan cheong, i haven/t even jiak bah. by 9:45pm, they already lock the drink station and close the ice cream freezer, very sianz.
15	nice number 39999
72	Congrats on your bunny boy.  Not bad can lose 9kg.  But i think for second one you won't lose so much right.  You should become expert and experience after dealing with your princess.
52	Suddenly I think of lamp post   This is so weird, every one fighting over fats hahaha
3	I jus went Equinox for lunch. U all will be pleased with the massive lamb shank. I post pix when im home. Hehe
22	Bo jio, I take AL and rush down.
4	Okay, I will try...  But if someone decides to stake his claim by licking it, don't blame me hor
9	You trust the wolf around the lambs meh? Later all the fats got lost somewhere. Anyway, the Claymore one is ala carte ordering, don't order first else cold already not nice. Don't think it will run out also. The lobsters on the other hand have to be fast hand, fast leg else left only the claws.
5	No choice I have to believe in him hahaha..oh if it's ala carte then pls dun order all the fats away then  wah got lobster eh then tt also help me to reserve haha
1	What time are you reaching? Think Toons, Donkey, PPP and carey will be the earliest. The lobsters limited ones, I went that time they like top up only once or twice and each time, many will chiong so subjected to how much one can get.
11	Meh meh killer PPP going you know hahahaWhat time will you reach?  Your office is very near there mah.
3	Ya I know but wed is my wkly vc n sc on wed most likely end work at 7+
1	Not that bad. Will choop the lobster for you.  As for the fats, no guarantee hor
1	ahhh.... favourite pic of the day~~~~
2	No lobsters can also order the giant river prawns though the freshness left much to be desired.
25	Wah maybe lunch time I just go over n ask the   To reserve all the fatty parts for me n only serve when i order lol
38	thank you for liking the pic.
9	BO JIO!   Foie gras
77	Patience young one.   Toons say will have one next month.
2	thanks for the suggestions! ya la. especially PPP!   i remember that time got pigs trotters or something, he go kope all the fats then left all lean meat there.. so unsightly!
7	tts so PPP
22	is really a selfish and evil kid!
113	he is so kind and thoughtful leh to prevent the rest from getting high blood pressure and cholesterol , he is sacrificing himself loh if i don't go to hell who will go
8	Gd deal?
11	Usual weekday dinner buffet price is $60++ = $70.20  so......  70.20-50 = 20.20 need to top up...  so $25.00+20.20 = 40.20 if u are eating..
2	WAH! i that time still got leave some leh   nv kio all
48	unless find 5 pple, cost $351.40, use 7 vouchers. damage est $35??
4	math so good sia
16	# of pax  -
7	Opps, my bad! feel like trying the $12 korean lunch bbq buffet opps mistaken  I want to try four season and st regis one day but like no discount at all  now getting older liao also can't eat much so quality&gt;quantity liao
12	do they limit 1 pax per voucher ?
15	only states 'Multiple vouchers redemptions are allowed.'
2	redemption might means the purchase of voucher call before buying
56	the claymore pay by uob ish 25% off ... as long as got 4 ppl or more.
4	4 for 3. multiples of 4. not 25% fixed.
52	not sure what is the difference between dinner and sunday brunch for marriott.
371	wa,, if $35 for m hotel buffet i going
65	if 35sgd per pax, me gg
846	Dinner is just normal buffet spread - don't think they have any ala carte items...   Brunch got free flow of ala carte items that you can order...  Please refer to the recent visits that we made over the last few months...hahah
19	Hey guys.. in the end my granny's bday celebration was held at 10@Claymore. 22pax.. UOB 25% Not much people there today. Very friendly, helpful and pleasant bunch of staff and cooks helping us take photos, sing bday song tgt and meeting all my family's demands. Desserts were quite disappointing according to overall consensus. Some claim carousel buffet desserts were way better. Grilled lobster limited to one per pax had too little meat, too much cheese making it look like alot of meat. Oysters and sashimi were very fresh. Other cooked food were ok. I'll give 6.5/10 given its promotional price. that's all my 2cents review  I believe if paying the same price with their plate of pleasure promotion it will be much more worth it.
19	sibei elite... swatchie, you rmb the address I posted in the tst thread? you planning on going there? it's a shop called take5.   and what's the hk rest opening in terminal 2 that you mentioned last time?
13	Your avartar looks like a pyschopath rabbit, not cute bunny.
48	i 5 ppl got 25% off
20	Had the dimsum at Taste Paradise Ion this afternoon. Every item i ordered bar the pan-fried ramen and foie gras xlb was completely satisfying. Char sao su, custard bao, xo carrot cake, prawn mango rolls, chee cheong fan and the mini egg tarts. Just had to make a second order for some of the items above. Abit costly when it adds up altogether, but definitely worth it. $104/3 pax for the bill for me. Go earlier if possible, cos we reached almost 2pm and some of the items my partner wanna order were sold out already
516	wah....!!! thanks for the review...!! looking forward to the dim sum lunch later today!!!   regards,  wacky
18	We will be there at 11am.
285	Yup, went there before - the bill was almost the same except there were only 2 of us   So not so worth it for me
445	Visa exclusive deal.  Korean BBQ buffet
80	The place is called tai hing. I tink i dun haf time to go take 5 already. All my food slots taken up lol  today had lunch @ lung king heen. Awesome dim sum/lunch. Dun tink its worth the 3 michelin stars though, at least not the service part.
91	So true. No fats for 3 days only and I more bui liao
85	sold out le....
1037	the so called cheapest michelin star restaurant? yeah heard it was so-so only only few dishes stands out... take lots of pictures of your brunch.  tai hing.. ahh.
0	September 2011 Marriott Cafe (Open) Sunday Brunch Date: 25th September 2011 (Sunday) Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel Time: 11.30am to 3pm Price: $80++ or $64 nett after cc discount Max 6 persons 1) carey 2) twtan 3) Evilduxy 4) Raven 5) eInS78 (TBC) 6) samba ( TBC ) Reserve list 7) Shalome (ANZ) (TBC) 8) 9) 10)
2	Lol the makan outing always full ha..
28	can form 2nd group for  Marriott Cafe (Open) Sunday Brunch it u can confirm even better
70	Yes, can form 2nd group but subjected to whether Shalome is going or not as she has the ANZ card.
16	I think u are referring to tim ho wan or something? The 1 cheapest 1 michelin star? Lung king heen's dim sum not excellent but their cooked dishes are excellent. The reason i am not sure if they are worth the 3 stars are because of the service. Very stiff and professional. But my gf and i will gladly take a plane back to HK to eat there again lol.
22	Theres this 1 Star Michelin guy who already sold that restaurant come open a new one in SG. ard a month old if i nv read wrongly.. Its call La barca. google the name plus sg.. wonder nice bo..
564	u go try le let us know ~ ~ u can go bring go zehzeh ghost also
28	top 5 best teochew porridge buffet  Credits go to insing.com
106	Hello people, I'm looking for a buffet that can cater to vegetarian(no need whole restaurant to be of vegetarian food cos only 1 vegetarian).   I have heard of cola/kola buffet, and review from there?
5	Baked Cod Fish in Honey Mango Sauce and signature Crispy Roasted Chicken with Special Spicy Sauce, sound nice.  Going to try this.  Anyone wanna join me?  Disclaimer :- No idea if the food is nice hor, so join at your own risk
3	i think they showed this restaurant on Channel 8 recently.  i don't mind, but when u going?
13	Valid for 6 months, so we can just go on a weekday nite for dinner.  TnC:-  Valid 6 months. Unlimited Groupons per person, may buy multiple as gifts. Reservation required. Limit 2 Groupons per table. Valid for ala carte menu only. Valid for dine-in only. Not valid for alcoholic beverages. Not valid with other promotions and discounts. Not valid from 14 Jan to 6 Feb 2012 and on weekends.
16	ok, sure you buy the coupon for me and i Internet transfer the amount to you? or shall i just buy the coupon myself.
28	toons the Khmer delight de coupon u paid right ?
5	Done.  Bought 2x vouchers for you n me.  We settle when we go for dinner bah.  After your trip then we arrange.Yea.  Will check with carey n streyer on the proposed date of sat 24 sep lunch.
23	i saw this earlier... and the 2 coupons per table kinda put me off liao... if go large group den u don't really save alot liao unless u split tables and den shout across the tables to chit chat...   regards,  wacky
83	thanks Toons.
197	not in sg for a while..  Hmm but no price listed on the menu.. jin scary .. lol
4	To Carey, Raven, Streyer;  Khmer Vouchers  Valid til end 30 Sep.  Can go for lunch or dinner on any day, except sat dinner.  Days i cannot make it - 14 to 20, 23, 28 n 30 Sep  Days Streyer cannot - 24 Sep (pls add more as needed)  Days Carey cannot - 23 n 25 Sep (pls add more as needed)  Available dates :-  Wed 21, Thu 22, Mon 26, Tue 27, Thu 29  Pick any of the above bah.  If really cannot, then you guys go ahead.  Most of the blackout dates are mine, paiseh, i can always go myself.
4	as requested updated
10	I am okay with 21, 22 and 29 Sep dinner
21	me every mon ,wed , friday got class thu 22 n tue 27 and thu 29 no problem for me
16	Equinox Lunch Went for lunch at Equinox today.  Got a shock when told tat they are no longer serving foie gras as part of the buffet.  Seems like they have a new chef who is revamping the spread. Anyways, we still managed to get them to give us 2 servings of foie gras each. For the mains, got changes too.  The beef tenderloin now comes in the form of a medallion.  Smaller than the previous steak but abt twice as thick.  Looks tough due to the color n thickness, but surprising very tender n nice.  Yummy!  Definitely better than my previous visit. The lamb however was a disappointment.  Its braised lamb shank now.  It tasted of some weird herb, neither indian nor chinese nor western.  Not much of the lambey taste left, n a tad salty.  The flesh though tender also overly soft. It jsut breaks apart. I prefer tender, but still with the meaty chewy texture.  Donkey also dun like the taste. Rest of the spread largely unchanged.  Seafood generally fresh, esp, the crabs which were fresh n sweet.  Best crab at buffet so far.  Sashimi depends on the cuts you take.  Oysters also good.  They also have this foie gras canard (i think), which is like foie gras mashed into a paste.  Tad salty, but meant to be spread over biscuit or eaten with the slightly sweet jelly on top.  Definitely not as nice as a pan fried foie gras (this paste is served cold too), but if you like the pig liver kinda of taste, this is like a more refined n smoother version. All in all, for $35 nett each, really cannot complain.  Not as good as before cos no more foie gras, but the std of the mains, esp the beef tenderloin, fresh oysters, crabs, justifies the price, not to mention dining at such a location.  Pity the haze affected the view.
65	Like that PPP still want to go or not since no foie gras?
234	Waiting for you to try and give FR.
128	It is a pity that they drop the foie gras.   But thanks to Toons' charm, we got 2 big serving.   So I am happy   Overall, with the discount, it is still worth going for the steak and seafood.   I took a peek at the next table, the salmon main course also looks good.
385	FYI, Diners has 1-FOR-1 Buffet  15% off total food bill too. I do not know whether both offers can be used simultaneously though. Click  for more information.
104	No need vouchers if you got UOB or HSBC cards where they have 1-for-1 and can be used every day...
42	I also got buy but I see most of u only go on weekdays then nevermind. I can also 1 person go on weekends.
1	It depends how strict a vegetarian your friend is. Some vegetarians don't take garlic which is used at some vegetarian places. I would think mushroom pot is vegetarian but I think they use garlic. It's a good place to eat considering that they can make some of the mushrooms taste like meat.
7	FAR card or vouchers or specific credit cards for the discount? So it's one main course plus sides for the buffet?
41	Lets hope when we go the view will clear up.
12	Sigh, my hubstation uplorry.  No internet connection at home now, sibei sian.  Is there any broadband plans without contract one?  Maybe on a monthly subscription to tide me over for a month while i explore more permanent plans?  Got those instant internet activation kits one or not?  Thanks.
8	use wifi tethering and make use of ur mobile data for the time being?? unless u no data plan like me...  anyway this one not food discussion hor... why not post in networking section...??  regards, wacky
1	Can subscribe Fibre also.
527	Oh cool thanks for the info !
937	so is the date confirm?
1	Quite a large portion of the salmon ended up in my belly.   Fatty pork belly wrapped around asparagus.
0	Nice too.  I likie!  The salmon karage is juicy.  Salmon belly kimchi soup.  Not bad too.
12	Pork belly skewers.  Good.  Scallop skewers  Sweet n fragrant jack fruit.  For $15, I think its great value, just on account of the above items.
1	will the quality or quantity go down because of this offer?
2	nice, is the coupon valid for lunch / dinner or both only ? okie i saw the t/c  its dinner only
3	ya, I agree $15 cannot hiam, seriously, is very gd value liao!   eh, but do u find the new city sq branch lousier den the pomo branch ar?  tat time I went city square new branch I feel is much inferior
3	but no more pomo so must stay with city square already
3	it depends on wat mentality u go during a promo. I am a person who associate the value/satisfaction of food with the price tag tat I'm paying. honestly I won go with high expectation tat the food quality/qty spread remains as gd as during non promo period lor.
4	We went once, the foods we found it quite ok for $15 nett. The sashimi were fresh, the grilled bacon rolls, pork belly and scallops were yummy.
1	The pics above were from a visit using the $15 vouchers too.  Just note that the salmon belly sashimi is only 1 tray nia.  After finished liao, its just normal salmon sashimi.  Too full to try the normal salmon.  Tat one have to ask twtan, heehee.
0	ok.. bought liao.. haha. i'm ok with any dates before 21st sept and after oct 4th. lunch or dinner doesnt matter
2	Variety seems less, but i find myself enjoying the food at city sq more than my visit to pomo.  I dun recall them having salmon belly at pomo.
1	Never left the fatty parts for me, sapu all.  But I more interested in the scallops sashimi. Where is the Starz homework?
1	Is dinner only.
4	i don't mind a slight drop of standard and quality but not deteriorate until not even worth $15. oh,that's what i am procrastinating about. i recalled nice pictures posted earlier but didn't realize you guys went on $15 offer previously too. i was thinking if now $15 offer, the salmon belly would not even appear, only normal salmon, then varieties lesser.. nice.!. tempting to buy now.    but they always say whatever buffet toons go before, standard drop after that..
1	Oei!  Tats sheer boloney!
11	Just forget about ordering the Pork chop from the Teppanyaki section, the meat is very tough. Beef is still ok if you ask the chef not to overcook it as are the salmon.
10	Also bought liao...hahah  Before 21 Sep is best for me
9	Restaurant week open for booking for AMEX cards. Alot of the good restaurants have already been booked but there are a couple left. Quickly grab them!
5	but she is not wrong lor!  naosadae I oso dun like to jiak after u cos the sense of satisfaction is realli jialat   @ Shalome:   at $15, nothing can go wrong la  go ahead &amp; buy
5	That's what we thought at Indian Times...  We were SO WRONG
4	Indian Times u all complain so many times liao still not sick ar?   but tis yr the buffets I jiak so far, tink oni dining room &amp; 10@claymore I more like nia, the rest I feel not worth lor.  tats y I always feel dining companion is impt.
1	NO. Cos the nightmare is still very vivid.   It sets the all time lowest benchmark for all the buffet i had.   When i think of it, my digestive system shivers.
5	No choice - that place deeply scarred us for life!Yup, thank goodness for the wonderful after dinner chat after Indian Times, which somewhat salvaged the situation...  But if small children got go hor, be careful of what they say...our xiao didi wanted to ask for beef kebabs there
4	So far the worst for me is the Windows on the Park lunch, can't imagine a hotel buffet to turn out to be like that.
3	That is why i no dare bring our xiao didi to eat muslim food in jb for fear that he ask for halal pork   But me and Toons got a good recommendation for jap buffet in jb for xiao didi. Cos the buffet comes with a xiao meimei that talk like xiao mehmeh. When she serve us, both of us jointly concur that we so have to introduce her to our xiao didi.   Wait for Toons homework on the buffet.
1	I been to windows on the park before.  Trust me ah tan, indian times is far worst than that.   It is even worst than my grandma's curry function.
4	His homework I waited until neck long long liao. This one we go next month ok? Cause this month got Prosperous Kitchen, Marriott Cafe and 10@Claymore.
2	Don't let your grandma see this post.  Maybe we should just go eat ala carte Indian food.
3	too late... someone told me 9 am  this morning..those good ones are taken up... =(
1	tat means is yr dining partner de fault liao lah   idk. sometimes when certain buffet realli sucks, if yr dining partner is gd, can still laugh at the lousy taste tgt mah which ginna asked for beef kebabs? paiseh long time nvr join official outing liao, dun catch up wif u all the storee
1	Ok. No worries, we no burn computer for her
5	Until today, I still have curry chicken phobia...hahah  Haven't touched that stuff since Indian Times...imagine the whole night just eating curry chicken because there weren't anything else to eat...
10	sian, momiji one on gmarket sold out.
5	It will only go down after Toons has visited.
43	Indian food no need go buffet. Big Bites is quite good. I sign up member 10% off. Eat at Kopitiam Square at Sengkang another 10% off. Their chilli cheese mushroom dosai is fantastic. There are also branches at Raffles Place and Serangoon Road.
6	Guess, I no chance to go liao.He already went with me.
16	i agree!!!! indian times... not even worth $10!!!!   regards,  wacky
2	When I booked, Takumi still had space so maybe you can still try that? I personally booked Basilico and Boathouse
1	Shall I rub salt in your wounds?   NPNT!!!
3	actually how do u know if got space or no space?? if got receive mail means got space?  regards,  wacky
7	gong simi?? why need P one??   regards,  wacky
2	Its a real time booking system..
2	book through diningcity ah?
22	ok SALAH LAH... walao... it says:  Edition
11	You can book directly through this URL if you want. Don't need AMEX card.
4	Me too  It is ok, i am not a big fan of indian food now cos mostly carb.
4	u mean u walk there?
5	What does making reservation have to do with walking there?
5	amex starts from 14 Sep diningcity member starts from 19 Sep public starts from 21 Sep edit: eh how come can access diningcity booking page now? lol
4	I wonder if Toons manage to get it before it's sold out?
6	He bought it, but one person can only buy 2 vouchers per day.
1	oh lol thanks...   regards,  wacky
3	dunno wat she means also...   regards,  wacky
2	Oh i see. Ah tan hand and leg not fast enuff. That means me and Toons also have the voucher.   But Carey and manyu, don't think can do before 21 Sept cos Toons will not be around. And he has another buffet planned on 20 Sept. Not unless you all go ahead first but i think more fun if we eat together. My eyes need to eat too   Any other dates?
1	i wont be in town from 21st sept to 4th oct. after 4th oct? maybe?
4	Dinner he sure long sleeve one so eyes nothing to "eat". Will have to wait to see if they release more vouchers or not. That place is like a ghost town so if they don't do more promotion, no business. 21st he oversea?
35	Ok, we wait for prince of buffet to look at his buffet spreadsheet before he throw us some dates.   I am ok with most weekday dinner.
2	u lamb is that big big one with the bone in green curry? That day i went.. i ordered quite early.. later the item 1st to went off. no more stock. i went exactly last wednesday still gt free flow Foei Gras.. jiak-ed 3-4 pieces each.. some ppl really chiong that item.   I still will go back. For that amount i think at 33-50% really worth it.
9	beta when bringing me?
72	Yes, that's the lamb shank we ordered, serve with green curry and coconut milk. Bo ho jiak.   They only stop the foie gras on the day we went (this monday) cos new chef take over and wants to revamp the menu. But at least we still get to eat 2 pieces each.
22	She wants young meat - me is unker
1	wah i also wan go this this momiji or dunno what name
14	Bo vouchers liao, sold out. If you see, help me buy since one person can buy 2 vouchers per day only.
12	so fast boh liao
38	for those who are interested in free "buffet style" wanton..
4	Bought liao.  When it come to buffet deals, i chop chop one I will be meeting Manyu as i am collecting something from him, so it wil have to be after 4 Oct for me.  Since Carey also going, you wanna go with him since his timing is bad after 21 sep?  Of cos i prefer if everyone can eat together   If 21 sep everyone can make it, then i can go on 21 sep too even though i doing prosperous kitchen on 20 sep.  I dun like back to back buffets, but doable lar Ah tan ... wrong target liao ........ she is actually referring to me .... like real, haahaa You like the lamb shank with green curry?  Yea, i dun mind going back, not prolly not oct ... unless they serving foie gras again.  The buffet not meaty enough for me to go back every month.
25	Iirc, Raven joined this last yr?  Oei Raven, over to you!
1	my friends and I plus quite a handful of ppl who saw ours came also ordered lehs. Just abt everyone cleared the whole bowl. For me its quite nice. Not fatty enough.   I noe the Caucasian lady serving there and this Manager there.. Maybe I go ask them about the Foie Gras.
6	Manyu can't make it on 21 Sept cos he's not in town.   I suggest we go after 4 Oct together.   Then i got young one, old one and everyone
5	u sho rich need me to bring meh plus u so many zehzehs. my curry was really thick. Thats my complain..  plus nt fatty enough.
212	We had the green curry separately served. I suspect might be the change of cook or chef? Cos the waitress came and explain to us. The green curry is ok, but it is the lamb shank that had an unpleasant taste (too rude to post here, next time see you then i describe to you). I dare not use my taste bud as the marker but even Toons didn't like it. But the crab was exceptionally good.   Next time go again, must jio hor. Maybe we will have better luck going with you since you know the people there.
95	submitted my application a few days back le
10	Video of last yr finals.
27	mine was mixed together. served together.lol
4	walao that angmo ish really crazy....  regards, wacky
475	That's nuts. I at most can eat 40 only. Better don't go there throw face.
32	I see a lot of hamsters in the video.  Wonder back stage got merlion to see a not.
3	The wanton got prawn?
38	Saw they put extra photo for free flow crab. Mid size sri lanka crab.
50	I am actually okay before 15 Oct...hahah  After that, my busy period is back again but since it's also the year-end, I will be saddled with work until 15 Dec
15	Going auntie kim's. Any recommendations on what to order?
28	Still waiting to go...hahah  Let us know how's the food and what we should order   But knowing us, we will order everything that is meaty and fatty
7	CP goodie bags for participants who consume a minimum of 30 CP Shrimp/Prawn Wontons within 5 minutes. u can makan 30 and stop
31	wat's in the goodie bag?? so u just get to eat free wontons and the goodie bag...? doesn't seems appealing enough to join...  regards, wacky
61	need to buy 30 wanton for time trial first.
3	top 30 finalist de goodie bag
4	need meh... 5min sounds pretty long time for 30 wantons... that's 6 wanton per min or 1 wanton every 10s... can pop in mouth and slowly chew and swallow...  regards,  wacky
112	agree with u, it is feasible
5	I think you will be disappointed. The only thing I find was good is the beef short ribs but only one order. The rest are items normally you order as meal. The glass noodles sucks. The ginseng chicken soup is normal. Had better ones elsewhere. The grilled mackerel is above average. Had 2 of them. The chicken slices are normal. Basically there are about 12 or 14 items you can order unlimited, and 3 items which I can only order once. For $20, I can't complain much since I ate about $90 while my wife ate about $45, based on the menu prices.   Nearest MRT is Marymount. You can walk there or take some buses along Upper Thomson Road. For those who drive, go early. Parking lots are limited. I had to turn in a small road just before Thomson Plaza and park at the private estate which is just behind the restaurant. But the stretch is also almost full at 12pm. Any later then you GG.
32	Is the Fisherman market worth the price? The menu certainly looks enticing with the cooked food(grilled salmon, ribs, beef stew and sukiyaki). Then i went hgw and most of the reviews are bloody bad
5	Hey can I know how much u pay per Pax? any promotion currently?
1	when is the CP wantan competition? :O
95	Just to add on. Korean cruise quite healthy. Alot of veg. Many carb and veg and soup items. Very few items for hardcore carnivores. I won't go back again. I have had very good Korean food and barbecued meats which I don't mind paying abit more for.
69	look nice worz.... very hungry now~
2	Wah evil bunny really knows how to tempt us...hahah  Looks delicious - but I think I will settle for Brauhas' pork knuckles
1	Thanks for the review   Looks like another "too good to be true" deal again...  But for S$20, can't complain too much - can't be worst than Indian Times
15	Quite true - just pay S$24 and go Ssekkei is probably better...hahah  BBQ meat is more my liking
27	no lah~ ownself see liao hungry... very sad must share and let everyone hungry oso mah   never try brauhaus before oso... everyday eat yong tau hoo i am so healthy and starving to death liao~
5	Jin sad - good thing I am already at home - can go make dinner Waiting for toons to organise leh...hahah  Erm, YTH is not healthy leh, unless you just only eat the veggies...then again, don't think you are a cow right?
21	From what I have heard, Indian Times is a joke. I don't think it's a too good to be true deal. There are a few Koreans who came in and paid the price to eat a few of the items I ate. I don't fancy Korean food. And the ginseng chicken soup and BBQ meats i have tried at a few other places are better better than here. Maybe I did not order the right things. But choices really limited. I am also a meat person. How? Interested in Fu Shi Roasted Meat at Shunfu FC? $5 should be a satisfying meal.
88	Confirmed and chopped by all of us who went there So it's really authentic Korean food - not an AT place Hmm...if the choices are limited, then don't think there will be much to order anyway...hahahSounds tempting but I stay quite far woah...  My transport there is definitely more than S$5 liao...hahah  Anyway, I work at Raffles Place - there is a pretty good roast meat place at Philips Street...  I usually get my fatty fix from there
78	If you are a meat person then next time must join us for BBQ.  Me and Toons has been trying to visit the uncle on weekday lunch but he is always closed. The last time Toons called, he say he not well.
10	HEATS                                                                                                                              15 &amp; 16 Oct 2011                                                                                        FINALS 22 Oct 2011
9	The one opposite the Chinese temple?
4	Yup, that's the one
93	You guys can organise an outing for the super brunch organised by ritz carlton. =)  theres one coming up soon.
99	wa.. very damaging..
268	Speed wise is theoretically feasible, but whether one can practically stomach 30 without feeling full, then I do not know.
259	sure will full for most
4	i dun drink alcohol.... so can i pay kiddy price??  otherwise i really wanna go.... look interesting...
30	here's 1 with a jaw-drop price tag
14	kunoichi mei mei bring me..
8	okay~ but dear kahlan mei mei must pay her own share  not sure what's the date as well, just google'd without much success~ i am totally in love with this sexy leg of wagyu: and of course the oysters and seafood too....  or u meant the akari one, that oso good.... LOL!!! premium sushi and sashimi, are authentic dishes such as soki tatsuta age (deep-fried pork rib), unagi tofu, gindara saikyou yaki (black cod with miso) and saikoro steak. yum yum.... hungry hungry~
6	Anyone interested in Pizzeria Mozza tonight @ 7pm? Someone just pulled out so have 1 slot left. Thanks!
6	yah lah i will pay myself of coursei not so thick skin ha ha, yah u know me i more interested in the japanese (cannot eat cow).  .  But not sure date as well.  i thought u also going away?
34	haha~ but ritz super buffet oso got alot of other things to eat even if u dun have any cow...   yah the akari one looks pretty nice, true i not around next month (u too, right?) and now still tied up with alot of work to finish first~  we go try when i'm back?
13	can, don't mind the ritz one as well.  But that one when?  I will also be back next month.
201	when u coming back??   regards,  wacky
11	Sawadika Everyone!!!  Greetings from twtan n toons in Thailand!!!  Just ate a super buffet lunch at Lord Jim's Mandarin Oriental, Bangkok.  How are you guys?
40	sawadika.  Wah nice.  Looking forward to your pictures.  Eat more and shop more.
69	Hope you guys brought wet weather gear (aka scuba stuff) cos newspapers say BKK may be flooded soon
66	Ritz Carlton Millennia Greenhouse 50% off next week for Lunch and Dinner from 19-24 Sep.
106	19-23 Sep. With 23 Sep dinner fully booked.
77	Lunch is 19 -24 and Dinner is 19 - 23.  But when I called, they're fully booked already.
856	all fully book ar?
106	durian chee cheong fun anybody?
43	where is this??  regards,  wacky
36	In her tummy liao.
1	at killiney there i think it came out this morning... warmed.
38	Finally you got to try the famous buffet.  Was it good?   Ah tan got hang umbrella outside?
1055	anything to eat tonight ?
974	hopefully i'd be able to join one soon~
625	weekday lunch still available.
219	so is the date confirm already toony
34	Think Toons is still in Thailand
75	when he coming back
70	Maybe he found a wife there n not coming back?   or maybe he making the movie, hangover part 3.
40	Back liao. Just touch down at that time.
5	22 n 29 seems to be the dates which all 4 of us can make it.  If no objections, we make it Thu 29 Sep dinner?
6	can giv me recommendations for gd bbq korean bbq? buffet style
9	Never drink wor, but for the 1st idea, if the woman can do good thai massage, i seriously tempted, heehee
6	Guys going for Prosperous Kitchen tomorrow, Dennyz, Bigmonkey, Twtan, Cashcow + guest, tomorrow meet at Sembawang MRT at 6.15pm.  There is a shuttle service to the mall.  If you prefer, can also meet us directly at the restaurant.
13	I will be going straight to the restaurant.
81	u and toons got alot of homework to do liao...  regards, wacky
1	Meet u pple at the restoran.
31	I will be going there straight. If I am late, just start without me.
56	Marriott Cafe (Open)  Sunday Brunch  Date: 25th September 2011 (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price: $80++ or $64 nett after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) Raven  5) etteNNaej  6) samba  Final call - please confirm attendance as I will be making the booking tomorrow...  Ah Tan, can I also use your name to book as they need 2 names and numbers so that I can use 2 credit cards?
7	i am ok with 29 sep
15	might need to confirm with u tml, might have special operation for my company if tio on sunday
245	samba might not be able to make it if sat needs to ot ~ ~ any1 wanna take his place ma haha
267	just gg ahead with the booking for my slot....  btw beta will be paying for my share for this buffet...  Tks beta..
113	samba become jie jie ??????? y beta treat???
3	Wah! Why beta treat you ah? Not fair!
29	beta also owe me treat at equinox
7	like that he dont come i take over him.. so his treat forfeited? lol.. i earned a meal if he dont come.. Fair and good deal i suppose.
23	Marriott Cafe (Open)  Sunday Brunch  Date: 25th September 2011 (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price: $80++ or $64 nett after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) Raven (TBC)  5) etteNNaej  6) samba /beta_tester  So I take it that everyone else is confirmed?  Once Raven lets me know, I will go ahead and book  As before, I need to use Ah Tan's name/number to book another table so that we can use 2 credit cards (dumb but it's their system)...
2	What card got promo?
48	where got free treat sia can i go...??
5	Hi Any nice buffet in Vivo city area???
8	CIMB World Card got 50% off for first 2 diners  ANZ Credit Card got 4-for-3 promo
9	Both cards I don't have.   Cimb world is Atas card
3	Got brokeback?
1	Go East. Indian buffet. Got one Jap sabu buffet but it's high tea. Not much of buffets in vivo.
58	beta, hao come u downgrade samba jie jie de mezza treat to marriott sundae brunch   btw guys, r u keen for a revisit to tis one? the promo is back till 15 Oct 2011
125	OK, with me.
18	thu 29   dinner fine with me~~
1	marriot de i cannot come , kana job
27	Warm greetings from The Ritz-Carlton, Millenia Singapore.  Greenhouse for their SuperBrunch-SuperInspired  on Sunday, 16 October 2011.
2	The spread look yummy but the price of $188++ is
10	()  Sunday Brunch  Date:  (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price:  or  after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) etteNNaej  5) samba / beta_tester  6)
6	wah jeanette going alone wor... if go can go buaya her wor~~
11	i remove then u quote back  btw got 2 location for seating
5	wah jin gui..  200 bucks.. if i huat maybe i go..
30	what is that compare to bluefin tuna only a few piece $100+ liao
6	that one ish kinda always wanna eat but restaurant sell sibei gui.. so only can buy from Isetan.. anyway i havent gt chance to buy n eat.
33	did i see chicken foie gras?? u mean besides ducks/geese... they also stuff feed chickens liver now as well??  regards, wacky
3	I went Isetan yesterday at around 5pm plus, the scallops sold out liao but bento selling at 20% off.
7	bento 20% off seem like good buy
3	Ok then we need to find one more to go else can't get good discount
96	either jenet ask chewtoy to join... or samba and beta both join...??   regards,  wacky
100	I can surely go. But Sambal.. I duno. he say Sat then can confirm.
29	Chewtoy say scared ippt
31	ask him keng mc la.. wat can a meal do? lol
70	How much ice cream can one eat?
0	their normal 3 scoops like $5+  so pay $15, eat at least 9-10 scoops?  gelato... so get sian quite fast.
7	wah lao....any1 interested boh....i wanna go i see the spread like damn good oo
9	but its so expensive.
6	also not everyday eat 188...i dun see any ++ so net price shld be 188 right  oh just saw it below but 188++ ok la once a year...but bad thing is only 12-3 if only its 11-3 then its good
320	Their ice cream so  cheap? I thought such kind of ice cream shops sell at about S$5 per scoop?
18	Nope, it's S$188++ cos you never read the fine print   Too elite for me bah - if I go eat, my dogs will disown me
108	188++ is $228
54	Marriott Cafe (Open)  Sunday Brunch  Date: 25th September 2011 (Sunday)  Location: Marriott Cafe @ Marriott Hotel  Time: 11.30am to 3pm  Price: $80++ or $64 nett after cc discount  Max 6 persons  1) carey  2) twtan  3) Evilduxy  4) etteNNaej  5) samba / beta_tester  6)   If we can't find one more, then the bill will go up to S$75 per pax...  Alternatively, we drop to 4 pax, then the price goes down to S$70 each  Hence 6 is probably the most ideal combo...  So are you guys still keen?
10	The price includes free flow of champagne n wine right?  So if you drink, i think its worth it.
14	Let me post elsewhere to see if I can find the 6th person.
1	Thanks TWTAN  I will proceed with booking then - worse come to worst, we cancel the outing
24	if cant find. i dont mind dropping off the list. Lets wait till Sat night..  No problems with that.
13	See how bah - if we can't get one more, then maybe we cancel   We have been there many many times...hahah
9	Hey guys, bad news...  The brunch is off due to renovation   So they are only having their regular lunch buffet, which IMHO is not worth the trouble  Sorry again...
25	It's ok la. Postpone lor.   Just to check, claymore on 28sep still on?
10	not 'branded', in 'ulu' place like Pomo..
74	i not in singapore at that time....
85	oh noes...tt means no more brunch le
262	The renovation till end Sep if I remembered correctly.
21	Oh okok wah tt means this wk is boring wk no buffet oo
55	its not boring wk.. its F1 wk... maybe u can go find buffet over-looking the race.
189	Nope, end Oct - they will move back in Nov...  But they can't confirm if they will have the same sort of brunch though...so sad
18	not into f1 ~ ~ was looking forward to brunch but  no more alreadyoh well.....tts sad no more brunch for me
9	not interested into F1 car move too fast , zoooooom then car gone le prefer to see in TV for full coverage from start to end moreover seeing race with buffet will request for higher pricing too
10	like this one??   edit: ok... this is not buffet... but something... different...  regards, wacky
6	Join me @ Mortons for lunch. No need buffet also sure full and no need to pay $590++ for the pan pacific gourmet thing
3	$17.50 instead of $26.95 for Ala-Carte Lunch Buffet at Suan Thai. 28 Dishes to choose from + Free Flow Pineapple Rice + Calamansi Drinks. Minimum 2 Purchases.
84	u use ur voucher to blanjas moi peasant?   i kinda directed a guy frm edmw who seems interested in Morton to ur thread..
13	how much is ur damage at mortons? been to west end?
690	going for the set lunch ah? can join you(but you pay also la?).
28	Jap sabu buffet - high tea? is it nice?
1	The King of Kong Bak Pau Makan Session (Menu Revised) Registration is Closed!  Thanks for your support! Notice is hereby given that the next Makan Session will be held at Westlake Restaurant! Here are the details: Venue: Westlake, Blk 4 Queen's Road, #02-139 Time: 7pm (registration) Date: 7 October 2011 (Fri) Price: $25 per pax Menu (Revised) 1.  Kong Bak Pau 2.  Guo Tie 3.  Sichuan Hot and Sour Soup 4.  Kung Bao Chicken 5.  Butter Prawns 6.  Sambal Long Beans 7.  Yam Ring 8.  Hot plate Tofu 9.  Black Pepper Crab 10. Hong Kong Fried Noodles 11. Red Bean Pancake To register, please write to .  In the Title write:  I want Kong Bak Pau!  In the body write:  Name, Hp, No. of Pax (limit 4 pax).  Please be short and succinct.  No need for pleasantries as we want all the details on the first line!  Please note that once you have confirmed your seat, we consider it sold and you will still need to pay for it if you don't turn up! You can read about Westlake here:
83	It's a good thing to know that in fast paced Singapore where everything  changes at breakneck speed that there are still some pockets of  nostalgia waiting to be discovered.  The Kong Bak Pau at Westlake is one  such pocket. I am quite serious when I say that this Kong Bak Pau is still very much  the same deal as it was when it was first introduced by Westlake in  1976.  Three families are involved in making this one dish and they have  been doing it together for the last 30 years or so.  The first family  are of course the Lims who are the owners of the restaurant.  Its  founder, Mr Lim Tong Law started Westlake in the early 70's because of  his love for cooking.  He was a PE teacher at Chinese High School at the  time and was in his fifties when he dreamt of running a restaurant so  that he can give the public a chance to try his dishes.  When he started  Westlake, he was still teaching at Chinese High and had to shuttle  between two jobs!  Business began to really pick up when the Kong Bak  Pau was introduced which eventually became the iconic dish for Westlake. It was during those early days when Mr Lim was sourcing for ingredients  for his Kong Bak Pau that he met with our second family, the Loos.  The  Loos play a very important role in the Kong Bak Pau because they produce  the most important ingredient that gives the braised pork its  characteristic flavour -- premium Dark Soy Sauce. Over the years, the  Loos have been constantly supplying the Lims with Dark Soy Sauce,  preserving the same recipe as before.   Now we come to the third family, the Ohs.  The Ohs are a 3rd generation  master baker of Pau Skin.  When you eat Kong Bak Pau at Westlake, you  know that there is something very special about the Pau Skin that you  can't find anywhere else.  That is because the Ohs have been supplying  Westlake with the same Pau Skin that is made with the traditional method  of adding lye water (kee zhui) and using yeast instead of baking powder  as the raising agent.  Lye water makes the dough alkaline and when  flour is subjected to alkaline conditions, it becomes more springy.   Incidentally,  lye water is the ingredient that differentiates Chinese  noodles from Italian pasta.  Whereas Chinese noodles are springy because  of the addition of lye water, Italian pasta tends to be more toothy.   Nowadays, not many bakers use lye water in their recipes, but they  continue to make the Pau Skin the same way just for Westlake. Now when it comes to braised pork, there are many methods of cooking  it.  The easiest way is simply to simmer the pork belly in braising  sauce.   However,  if you want to make an exceptional braised pork that  has that soft fat layer and a skin which is tender, then it needs to go  through several steps.  At Westlake, the pork is first boiled, then  dipped in braising sauce before being deep fried, after which it is cut  into bun sized slices before being marinated in braising sauce.  Then  when you order the braised pork, one serving portion is freshly steamed  and served with the buns.  The whole process of making the braised pork  takes 6 to 8 hours!  It was Rockett Girl who first told me about her amazing lunch at  Westlake restaurant.  All the while, I have only known of the Westlake  Kong Bak Pau which is sold at the Kiosks in Shopping Centres, but it  never occurred to me that there was a restaurant!  Westlake is by the  way, no where near Westlake.  It is in Queen's Road, just stone's throw  away from St Margaret's Secondary School. The HDB flats that the  restaurant has been for the last 37 years is unique to say the least.   It has a open carpark which is located at the basement of the block of  flats and if you have never been there before, it is worth the trip just  to park your car there and have a look around and soak in the  nostalgia.  Aside from Kong Bak Pau, Westlake has several other signature dishes  which you must try.  One of this is the Sze Chuan Hot and Sour Soup.   Now, you might wonder why Sze Chuan dishes feature at Westlake.  Well,  it so happens that both Mr Lim and his wife did their tertiary education  at Chengdu before the war and that was where they grew to like Sze  Chuan cuisine.  The menu of Westlake really just reflects the kind of  food Mr Lim loves.   When you visit Westlake, be sure to order the Hot and Sour Soup.  It's  the best that I have tasted in recent memory.  The balance of Hot and  Sour is just right.  The "Hot" is just enough to give you a kick, not  enough to make you sweat.  The "Sour" is just enough to give you a buzz,  but not enough to make you wince and the generous dash of sesame oil  gives it a wonderful fragrance!   The other must try dish is the Kong Bao Ji Ding.  This is one of the  best I have come across.  Again the flavours are excellently balanced  and the smokey chilli flavour comes from dried chillies that were  specially selected for this particular dish.  One of the key ingredients  in Kong Bao Ji Ding is the fragrant vinegar and which gives it aroma as  well as a nice tang.   Long before Shanghainese restaurants and Japanese gyoza hit Singapore,  Westlake was already serving up Guo Tie, which is yet another dish which  Mr Lim picked up in his travels.  The skin is amazingly crisp and I was  told that even the Japanese came to the restaurant to buy the raw ones  to bring home to Japan! I felt however that the meat filling could be  just that little bit more flavourful and juicy.  If you have always had trouble trying to get a seat at ,  then the good news is that the Black Pepper Crabs at Westlake are done  in a very similar fashion.  The black pepper is ground very fine and  then fried in butter to give it a smooth, creamy texure. The crabs are  solid and the dish is excellent but somehow Eng Seng's still has that  edge.  However, over here you get to enjoy your crabs without having to  line up for a seat at 5pm!   I am not sure if Yam Rings are as popular as they were years ago, but a  good Yam Ring should have that wonderful floury yam inside of a crisp  exterior.  I felt the Yam Ring would have been better if there were more  gravy as it tasted a little dry that day.  The yam ring itself was,  however, done very well.   This is the kind of place where you can experience a blast from the past  and sink your teeth into a warm fluffy bun with moist succulent braised  pork. Westlake is an oldie but a goodie just waiting to be  rediscovered.
120	Anyone interested in taking over my slot?   Dinner Buffet  Date:  (Wednesday)  Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard  Time: 6.30pm to 10pm  Price:   1) Toons  2) carey  3) Twtan  4) Donkey  5) evilduxy  6) etteNNaej  7) chewtoy  8) PPP
15	i interested leh, but i not in town   so sad.  You going?
2	Soli my vchr ish limited   You directed who? No one buy from me sia. Sho muddy
1	Average dinner at Mortons ish about $150/pax inclusive of taxes with free flow ice water.  Yesh i ish tried west end before. Its the one at Pasir Panjang Village right? Notch too bad.
1	Yesh the $125++ set lunch seems value for $. Soli I ish no marnie to pay for other peepur besides my gf
6	Hou my dog! Westlake ish goodie?  Rast time I ate there I almost wanted to flip tables cause of the quality of food  But to each his/her own
27	I got 1 birthday cake from them sia. but if go there must dine there.  damnnn got the legendary hot choc cake also for dessert also! anyway, how does morton's fare compared to other steakhouse? angus is as good and cheaper I heard?
12	You can check with beta. He say next week he very free
6	I think Morton's steaks are not the best anymore but I go there more for their seafood, bread, desserts and the great service. It helps that I always get my favourite table there
6	Same here - we used to patronise Westlake cos it was within walking distance from our old place...  But over the last 10 years, the standard has noticably plummeted and now we would rather go to a good zhichar place than Westlake...hahah
104	cannot go
36	thanks for sharing .... i see that the variety is kinda.... limited.
2	They are ordering a set bah...  Those are supposed to be their best dishes
44	well, the initial menu on list is even shorter. and not impressive at all. anyway its an odd mixture from the way i see it. haizxzxxxx. wish they replace it with crab fest instead agrh!!!
6	You want to eat crab? Then we have to arrange
5	yes yes yes. oct mus leave slot for crabby ok?
2	ask beta about his yang cheng hu crabby
6	Sure. I want to eat too but never butter crab again.
6	hmm... where to...? roland...?   regards,  wacky
29	Though I love the crab at Roland, I was thinking JB
37	where is roland ???????
9	At the top level of the car park beside parkway parade.
25	$15 instead of $33, 55% off All-You-Can-Eat Sushi Buffet + Ramen of the day + Iced Green Tea at Shin Tokyo. Halal Certified.   Worth it bo?
90	Buffet valid for white plate sushi on the conveyor belt only
68	Toons: Foie Gras slice become Foie Gra parfait. Then on Monday their maincourse will change.  as in new main course.  Equinox person told moi..
54	Parfait is basically the paste thingy right?  Spread over bread or biscuit?  Although i find the taste quite okay, but it really cannot replace the pan fried foie gras ... its akin to replacing cod fish with ikan bilis ...
2	Wats tat ar?
4088	Yea those paste lo. Tink free flow very xiong for them. Hope the main course make up for the change.
61	Yes they do. Both Yan Ting and Les Saveurs serve Sunday brunch.
272	what's the nett price after discount?   also discount available to everyone or need certain cards?  thanks
343	how was morton's, swatchie?
32	Both their sunday's brunch are awesome. Yanting's in the lead though.
0	oh....sunday brunch....thanks.  hmmm...am actually looking for weekdays high tea.  so far, have been going to THE ROSE VERANDA at Shangri-la since it's the only one I know that let you sit thru the afternoon.....trying to find some other options...
2	Very bright and good  Noticeably less people and food quality was even better than usual. Fillet mignon perfectly medium rare with nice lightly charred bits on the outside.
1	Whatever you do, don't try Les Saveur's high tea
11	greenhouse weekdae lunch ish sucky de ~
7	wooo...that bad huh?   noted...thanks.
229	It's not exactly bad (average imho) but I don't think its worth the money. You get a 3 tier stand with scones &amp; sandwiches and a choice of a main (dim sum, pie and something else) + choice of 2 desserts. I have some pics  if you are interested.
1	Sounds good. Anyone interested?
3	lunch... have lobster mah?
40	Interest Check:  Special Makan session at Shunfu Mart Fu Shi Roasted Meat.   This Wednesday 28th September 2011 around 2pm. Uncle Bob will try to arrange for the crispy skin char siew, Chinese Green Mustard Vegetable and the special BBQ baby back ribs. Please indicate your interest. Those dishes are not available on normal days.   Carey, Twtan, Toons, Lovejade, Donkey, and everyone else, interested?
0	Actually its just because that it isnt a buffet la. hahax..
9	Wah - so nice but confirm this Wed cannot deh...  I got lunch meetings this whole week cos my boss not in - sian 3/4
22	Haha no la. I actually dislike buffets. I just don't feel the quality of food is up to the mark for the price. Even if you give me more of the same mediocre food, I won't eat
19	Because you jin elite mah   Only beta and erwin can match you
51	Erm I subscribe to the less is more theory. I don't eat to live. I live to eat
7	That's the difference between elite and peasant   We also live to eat but quantity matters too...hahah
68	Would love to go but Wednesday 2pm need to take AL and also go 10@claymore in the evening.
84	Too much of anything, regardless of how good it is, is bound to make you sick of it. So why not savour the scarceness and understand the effort and techniques that went into it? Quality or quantity? You can't have your cake and eat it
1	Time is 1.15pm. My mistake. Meet there straight. If anyone is coming, please let me know so that I can inform the organizer.
9	Your 10@claymore is better. Would love to go but I can't.
0	Nice pics!  ya...not quite a spread...after high tea at shangri-la for that discounted price and amount of food....the spread seems limited at Les Saveur's ....confirmed cannot last us beyond an hour...
116	ya...seems more like a set high-tea...  it's hard getting a long session high tea spread...sigh....guess going back to shangri-la....
27	i just went Equinox. Not much of a change. The Foie Gras paste thingy.. is like cold dish.
16	even though near my office... but where got so eng.... 2pm some more... not even lunch time...   regards,  wacky
13	I can make it if its like 1215pm
5	U guys no need work one or take leave?
3	precisely they need to work hence no one is free to attend.
4	Ever gone to a pricey restaurant and ordered something that totally sucks? Or picked something which is a wrong choice? You paid a premium for it, so you have to finish it. Ordering another item will cost you more, so you just have to suck thumb. Not for a buffet. Took a wrong item? Just go pick something else. I will have many items to choose from. Can't be everything also sucks right? I like paying a price which I can afford and then I get to try anything I want. I can't eat alot, but I like to try many many things.
16	I work part-time with weird timings.
7	Yes I have. Quite a few times actually. If it sucks, I won't bother finishing it, regardless if I paid a premium for it or not.  Buffets imho tend to focus more on quantity, not quality. If I wanted quantity, I would just go to a hawker centre and go on an ordering spree  But that's just me la. I've honestly never fancied any of the food I've had at buffets before and I have been to quite alot in my younger days  But 1 buffet which I will definitely go again is the one at One Ninety, but a pity they canned it.
4	Well i think some value for money high tea is peach blossom at thompson.   Equinox high tea is pretty value for money too if you have the amex card and going in a party of 2.
1	lunch bo lobster
36	You mean peach garden? peach blossom is at marina mandarin
7	or was it because some1 u went buffet shock u too much tt u till now still got bad memories? haha
1	I don't like to waste food actually. If I have paid for it, I will finish it. Even if it is cheap.  Lol. I went for the One-Ninety buffet after reading your blog. Ya, it's good. If Marriot's Sunday Brunch is as described by the folks here, I think it will be close to One-Ninety.
1	Maybe  I think it all started with Red Lobster's unlimited shrimp and lobster for like $16.99. I stuffed myself silly with crappy shrimp and lobster and that paved the way for my buffet binge
5	But the price will not be similar  The mini bites buffet was only $52++/pax for dinner.
0	The price they paid is only slightly higher. But love the way One-Ninety people presented each dish, even though it's just a buffet.
4	oo what 1-ninety? wah they canned it too bad hows it like?  anyway any1 interested to go to the ritz carlton buffet brunch? haha
4	It was great. Ala carte buffet. Best dish imho was the prawn.
1	wat kind of prawn was that?
2	Cause they had CC discount + voucher. Or else its $80++/pax.
0	drooling liao le
11	Don't remember but it was huge. Maybe King Prawn? The name on the menu was Black Soy Prawns with Pumpkin Confit
1	but no more le right one-ninety? tts too bad...which hotel was it anyway?
14	Black Soy Prawns...... yum!~
321	Love to but this wed I can't cos I got a division lunch to attend.  Though i cant eat the buffet my colleagues ordered, I will still be joining them for the company.
57	190 is at 4 Seasons if I am not wrong...  I love their wagyu burger there
53	Sorry guys. The above event has been cancelled by the organizer as a quite a number of people pulled out. Since so many of you can't come on a weekday anyway, do you guys want to go this Saturday? Say 11.30am? No have special dishes like the crispy char siew or the babyback ribs though, coz my face not big enough. But will have the usual roast duck, roast pork and the fatty char siew.
93	Yesh it is. Wagyu burger good but expensive
10	Hmm...wasn't you who said that we should go for quality and not quantity? hahah  Anyway, it's a treat once in a while previously - the truffles on the wagyu beef patties are exquisite   I believe their burger isn't the most expensive - I have tried the defunct uber burger before - nearly S$100 and don't even taste as nice
103	You want to put it as an official outing?
6	Cafe Mosaic?
2	the 1 tt raven posted....hmm the 188++
5	That one is Greenhouse at Ritz Carlton.
1	oh okok u wan go also not? haha
14	burger king got so sexpensive the burger??   regards,  wacky
18	u treating?
6	Gotch. Special burger and for charity.
30	I can eat many buffets with that kind of price.  I will pass. You jio elite Beta go eat.
11	Got interest then make it official. Now like no one keen. Wait and see lo.
1	hogak hogak i treat but u must pei wo 1 night
5	sorry, i cant make it this sat.
12	okay but if got go is no ppl do homework how? cause i can nv stand to take photo n mai jiak!
11	treat beta may as well treat me. I noe greenhouse de manager
2	Wah, you know the manager ar? Then can SIC the weekday lunch menu? Interested in their 50% off offer
4	got staff price bo the manyzer give or special stuff? hehe
1	You sponsor me 50%, I go eat and take photo.
1	Got - not that nice   The one at 190 is much much better
1	u ate b4 ar? there was some hype of that place right?
1	Chay - for charity...  Normal piece of bun also can sell for S$100 lor
2	dunno if they hv onot but I help u to ask den send u lor ~
7	I'm not staff leh, hao to hv stuff price   they can give special stuff ---&gt; restaurant de floor plan so tat u can memorise which direction to chiong
3	i sponsor u the +++ lol ai mai!
0	Yup, big hype but mainly on the price, not taste...hahah  More the HL factor than anything else
6	u know manager also boh use u gotch no discount...like tt i might as well say i go goodwood park can eat for free cause i know the owner ~ ~
1	like that no goot de..  i tot can get waiver or corkage or stuff like that. lol or at least free carpark.  i think at least some form of discount will be good.
9	basket.. i see until they say until gt dragon gt tiger.. lol
11	liddat can I tag along u to go goodwood park jiak, since is free? jiak buffet bo corkage charge one mah  can afford car mai calculative over carpark charges la
26	Chiu know the owner of goodwood park? chiu got many shares in scb too?
6	rater they think u n i ish xxx hw! chiu also?
1	mai, you go ahead.
2	Like that, then bring me instead lor
11	Then add me so 3s a crowd and they won't think otherwise.
2	provided u all come to the sunday brunch with me then i bring u all go !
14	haha, bring u jiak chilli crabs u keen? wun la, ppl oso noe my std for food ish jin high one, not chin cai simi edible nia will put inside my mouth de
2	Which Sunday?
4	Wah...where? Sounds interesting
5	16th october 2011!
32	down with food poisoning sibei jia lat... see all of you talking about food.  off topic but still about food, is it ok to microwave those paper boxes? like uhm...those japanese tori-q paper box?
42	Think I will still pass, too much $$$ at stake and I can't eat much nowadays.
76	Merlion from wrong end?   Can - as long as not metal, you can microwave...  But don't try with plastic bags though - may melt
7	microwave metal bowls how ar? Why cant? Sorlee other than will get super hot im nt sure why..
13	can save i sure save de.  everything can waive or free i might just kio. Maybe he related to Khoo familee?
17	ya lor the old mr khoo my godpa......i wish lol
57	never merlion... just diahorrea so many times until i lost count. fever, stomach upset.   fwah feel like having a good steak from morton's... beta can bring me?
34	Merlion from wrong end = diahorrea
23	So sorry, this sat I got a function at RW to attend.
2	You try and let us know  Metal will cause spark in the microwave - will explode - don't play play
623	Raven knew what I was referring to...hahah
32	Darn, yesterday went Teck Sing to eat, before the last dish - the Pork Trotter came, the whole area blackout so have to eat in candlelight and hot like hell.   Pasar Malam got one new store selling fried rice and grilled chicken.
7	Must be you never wear red underwear ah?   Erm, how come this posting is here and not in JB food thread?
16	Fisherman's Market - Sunday Seafood Buffet Lunch  at $39.90++* ... zhun bo??? free flow of champagne for $39.90?? diluted one??  dunno wat's the catch... can't find the full T&amp;Cs... regards, wacky
18	Ya hor, my mind not working properly today.
16	I think the catch is the food really sucks. lolx. especially for you guys who frequent all the hotel buffet already you can skip this.
34	Ya lor, may have a catch...hahah  But Central is quite dead these days so I am not surprised they need such promos to draw in the crowd...  Anyway, some people who went to FM weren't really very impressed
43	Tonight makan. () Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price:  or $42.40 nett after discount1) evilduxy's guest 2) carey 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) etteNNaej 7) chewtoy 8) PPP
1	Hey I know last min any1 wana take 1 slot for tonight? 1 person she nw sick dun think can make it for tonight any1 interested
2	So looking forward to the Black Angus and Lamb
14	Wah seow liao...hahah  Or you can invite your erm, not so straight friend
50	Hahaha boh bian she SMS me 3am say not Fweeling well lol I know asking ppl also lol...see who free leh haha Ya hor maybe he might interested in tan or u
3	I go check other source, see got people want to join or not.  Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price:  or $42.40 nett after discount1)  2) carey 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) etteNNaej 7) chewtoy 8) PPP
2	Then should be Ah Tan bah...  I am super bui bui - he won't be interested
13	Can joi Beta cause he said we never jio him. Evil check with Beta.
35	I also buibui maybe he likes fats..I ask samba n beta le both can't...beta trolling u only &gt;.&lt;
3	I goes ask beta. That time he told me he wanna go leh
2	Anybody know how to walk there from orchard mrt ah?
4	he tell me he say cant go leh dun tell me he troll me!!!! it opp hilton!
1	Walk along the front of Thai Embassy then just after it, turn right into a small lane along the fence and you will reach Pan Pacific Orchard.
8	He also tell me cannot go   Who else to ask   Anybody asked jade?
4	som1 ask denny also? haha
1	Jade cannot.   Denny I no have his number
4	Too rast min.. got things on.
3	You all wanna post in edmw see if got ppl interested?
1	He going buffet with Toons at Feast@East tonight.
5	You try posting.
2	Can I go but don't pay?
12	cannot la~~~
5	he say today he going to dunno wat buffet.... with toons...?? today got 2 diff buffet outings??   regards,  wacky
7	u go I every wk intro ur type of gal give u
10	I think claymore can talk one, I remembered reading here, they gave 25% off for odd numbers too.
28	When will this promo ends?
2	ask sharshar mei mei?????
7	This one is UOB cc promotion. You can check their website for details.
2	Why not you join them today?
1	Can - just sign with your card
11	We did that the last time - hopefully it works...  Let me call them and ask bah...  Just called them...  The 25% off was due to the Great Singapore Sale - bo liao  So we need to find one more kaki bah...else we will be only enjoying 1 person off   In that case, the bill would go up to S$48.20 nett
3	Can bring your other half go or not?
2	I no UOB card and I just finished a tub of blueberry crumble from da paolo. Damn full now
1	Citibank card also can...hahah  We just need warm bodies - you can watch us eat
1	Current food promo is 31 Sep  Current CC promo (UOB and Citibank) is end Oct  But just heard from them is that from 01 Oct, buffet price will be raised to S$52+++
0	Can I go for it and pay $1.80? That's the difference if 7 people were to go vs 8   ps: just trying my luck
2	lol unless u can teleport if not there's no chance she can make it in time lol
7	No choice then I go ask in EDMW liao.
56	I asking Le.. But no replies
3	() Dinner Buffet Date:  (Wednesday) Venue: 10@Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: 1) carey 2) hotbigdog11 3) Twtan 4) Donkey 5) evilduxy 6) etteNNaej 7) chewtoy 8) PPP
23	Good job guys/gals...hahah  See you later then
1	Donkey will be there early.
1	so sad no ask me.......
7	Anyone interested in this? Can use for weekend lunch. Shalome, you tried before?  Hows the food?
0	I walked past the place a few times when I was at Liang Court for lunch - usually very empty one...  And I don't think the actual lunch price is S$40.25 - I could be wrong
2	We no have your contact mah...  But if you want to go, I can always give up my seat
2	Tomorrow wat time can you make it?No.  The buffet was planned for tue, but i postponed it to today as something last min cropped up.
6	Thanks.  This one looks far better tat those recent steamboat deals.  I remembered Shalome asked a few time if anyone keen on their supper steamboat buffet.  If its nice, i will go try.
2	help me save my food...i'm ending at 7!
1	wat is the item for craving station tonight???
2	Its ala carte, so you can always order when you reach ... unless they finished all the beef n lamb like they did for the foie gras at marriott, heeeheee.  Only thing are the fatty parts for the braised pork at the buffet line, with PPP there, tat one you no hope liao ...   Sigh, was looking forward to meeting the smaller you, nvm, next time we meet, you'll be even slimmer!!!, hehee.
2	Think I might reach early. Left office already.
2	That is very early. Moi still working.
5	Going shopping first ma
2	i also wanna join u.... but.....
4	Next time lo
4	Just now we got "advertised" in EDMW hor.
1	No idea - I forgot to ask when I called them just now...hahah  Hopefully it's not BBQ ribs - the last time, they were quite tough
3	Like that, looks like I have to hold the fort as the only super bui bui liao...hahah
17	Reviews of oysters plsss..
45	Ya got ppp tts y it's frightening...some1 help save some for me  actually not much smaller lol
60	I am afraid it might already be too late. If I am not mistaken, he had already begun cleaning up the buffet line.
2	Donkey: oysters goood!
28	So what is at craving station ??
62	Roast duck and roast chicken.
8	oysters from where ar? simi breed/variant? kam sias ~
8	The tag says its US oyster. Only one type
84	okays..  kam sias ~
547	chao beta dao mai come!
29	The oysters were very fresh and sweet...hahah  Will post the picture later
0	Lol.u.all.hoot.alot?
18	Bo jiejies mahs.
18	*cough cough*  Bo jie jie, aunty can?   The oyster was so sweet and fresh.
4	The auntie on my left me ate quite a few of the oysters.  The prawns was lousy though. Tried two, the first one decent but the second one cmi, the flesh stuck to the shell and flesh soft. The lamb and beef were good though. Managed to loan a camera the last minute, but homework will have to wait as I am busy with work at the moment.
102	Ah tan, it is so rude to call our new comer aunty   I like the beef better than the lamb. The pork rib and lobster fair better than previous as well. And the cranberry cheese is very nice too.
7	Twtan so evil. So fast start to bully new friend
2	To tempt Beta  Here's a nice picture of the oysters  Uploaded with
1	I edited my post liao, point to the correct auntie.
15	I need the one with the lobsters.
4	This one?  Uploaded with   or this one? hahah  Uploaded with
46	I no eat cremo ice cream but dont know why i feel jin emo
0	Thought image shack will get deleted fast ?
10	where is this buffet?
1	Ya, the 2nd one.
69	10 at Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard or you can refer to the first page of this thread for more details.
54	That's tinypic... Imageshack keeps virtually forever one...  regarda,  wacky
103	And tinypic will recycle the URL one...hahah  So your previous picture could turn out to be very different
10	Eat-all-you-can Chinese buffet at  For lunch, River Palace Chinese Restaurant charges $28.80++ from Monday to Saturday and $35.80++ on Sunday. Dinner is $38.80++. I might have been to this place for dinner.
207	For that price, I think SCDH or Cathay more worth it...hahah
79	*potential ot*   sorry guys, any takers for Mahjong this saturday at evil's place? last slot left... i suppose there will be free flow drinks, snacks(can always snack on evilduxy if you'd like), and win-all-you-can mj    anybody interested?
57	wish i could but i OT till 730pm yest.  hope the promo will extent till end oct
45	hello. sorry never try before. my friend went for the supper deal before (quite long ago) and claimed nice. that is why i kept asking if any one interested last time
0	1 for 1 dinner buffet at Masala art. $32.20.
7	Agreed.  After reading the review, i will rather go to SCDH or Cathay.
2	Ah.  Quite wary of those cheap steamboat voucher deals, so tot to get some reviews, preferably from ppl here b4 trying.  Hmmm, the online reviews are so so ... think i will stick to the more trusted fat fish, ting yuan, zhong hua etc.  At least i know those are decent.Frankly, although its not as bad as indian times, but in comparison to prosperous kitchen which is also at the same price range, it is a lot inferior.  Indian buffets tend to have very small spread n lots of curries items, be prepared lor.  I find myself eating those 2-3 items only, and when they are all curry items, get sick of them very fast.  Other than those pricier ala carte indian buffets, which hopefully have a lot more variety, i dun think i wanna try indian buffets anymore.
28	wat time??  regards,  wacky
16	just now the buffet jiak until quite full burrp still got the ribs smell
15	What buffet?  Show us some pics.
47	Lol, the ribs damn nice.  Think we ate abt 15 pieces between the 4 of us.  Thanks for recommending us this buffet.
4	tml then post make u gian
8	u all went eat cambodian food? the khmer got buffet eh?
413	i tried the tanyoto one before. i dun think is very good leh. or maybe should i say the food doesn't really suit me. i think they have a different menu for the supper one. maybe the normal one will be better. oh the plum drink taste weird.
63	I went alrdy.  They dun actually serve buffet. But for the voucher, you can order anything on the menu except appetiser n dessert.
213	is call ala carat buffet
24	I heard that someone dun dare to eat wor
1	Wednesday night saw the 8 of us gathered at Pan Pacific Orchard's 10 at Claymore for dinner. Our main focus for the night was the  - unlimited servings of signature dishes served in sample portions. We are also taking advantage of the UOB's pay 3 for 4 diners promotion so essentially S$48++ became . Do note that they will be revamping the dishes in October for the Plates of Pleasure. Plates of Pleasure menu is only available for dinner on Monday - Thursday and for Sunday Brunch. Left only the lobster's claws as the lobster bodies are all taken.
0	Please do not ask me how are the hot dishes below as I did not try them at all.
0	Forgotten to check the name of this mussel dish. - Ate a chicken drumstick which was moist and tender plus some duck meat.
1	- Very nice of them to label them.
0	- This beef was so tender and juicy, the mushroom and sauce goes well with it. Without the side dish and sauce.
0	- The flesh of this river prawn is not of the usual crunchy texture we are so used to sea prawns, it's kind of soft and less firm. But last Wednesday's prawns was not that fresh with flesh stuck to the shell and the flesh falling apart.
1	- I just love the lamb, with the layer of fats char boiled to a smoky flavour. Preferred my lambs without the sauce though. Just look at the charred surface of the fats!
0	- It seem more meaty then the last time we were there. I had only ate one rib since I had satisfied myself with Tony Roma's version during the F1 weekend. Meats and Prawns sizzling over the open fire in the kitchen.
0	Their chilled  are very fresh but the bodies disappeared as soon as they are replenished leaving behind their claws.  For hotel standard, their roast chicken and duck are actually quite good. One auntie ate a lot of these oysters commenting they are very fresh.  One young man's plate of meats.
1	Now for the desserts. The  was delicious.  As are these .
0	Ate a slice of this pie but I do not know what it is. This Chocolate cake tasted like it had banana inside so I abort eating it.  - Monkey will like it, not bad.
0	No Fruit Flies this time round. Quite a tall  they have.
1047	i know this hwz guy won an iPad thru there.
37	27 Oct I'll be in Germany. But even if I weren't, I wouldn't blow $930 on a dinner for 1 pax especially when I'm not a big fan of dom perignon.
29	9 Course. 1 dish 100bucks. :x Anyway you know of shops that sell reasonably priced Dom? I owe someone a bottle..
762	No idea sorry.
20	swatchie have you tried laduree macarons? trying to ask a friend to buy back...
603	Yes I have but I would recommend you have your friend buy PH back for you instead. I personally feel Laduree's shells are more crisp but PH's macarons have much better filling. Go for PH's White Truffle Hazelnut.
48	already oct liao... no plans in the pipeline liao...??  regards, wacky
123	I still got one voucher not used yet. You want to organise the Cathay Restaurant one?
11	Still have nihon mura voucher, expiring on 31st oct
8	We going 8th Oct 2011. You leh?
4	how about SCDH ? ahaha  but i think still got 2 voucher with toons haven use up yet
5	Dunno le, still planning.
17	Wait for Toons to organise or you can if you want to.
26	hmmm u mean SCDH?  sho ish any1 free for this mth to have SCDH? Lol
12	I should be good before 15 Oct...hahah
111	wahaha lets make it this wed-fri lol
6	wat voucher .. scdh ... n cathay is that?
7	i wont mind going SCDH.. i should be good also before 18 Oct..
24	Joaquim de outing when r ??????????? remember got this voucher with toons but duno expire already or not
34	this wed/ thur sounds gd for me.
15	whats SCDH?
3	Si Chua Dou Hua ~
22	This one:
2	whahahaha!!!! i want to eat!
8	bros! any fix date?
30	actually since i've been to cathay b4 liao... i'm more inclined on going something else instead... unless nothing else interests me... that's why i asking wat's in the pipeline in oct...?   regards,  wacky
144	will take SCDH anytime  btw u check the new menu for 10 claymore already ?
0	10 claymore..? no... never think of checking... wat's there?   regards,  wacky
26	Sichuan Dou Hua (Thursday 6 Oct) UOB Plaza 1  60 storey Interested  1. Evilduxy 2. Carey 3. Jadey 4. Jadey Guest (TBC) 5. Jadey Guest (TBC) 6. 7. 8. Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3 (assuming it's still valid)...hahah
1	The UOB promotion valid till end of this month.
2	Sichuan Dou Hua (Thursday 6 Oct) UOB Plaza 1 60 storey Interested 1. Evilduxy 2. Carey 3. Jadey (?) 4. Beta 5. CofeeshopB (tink he interested, thats wat he told me) 6. 7. 8. Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3 (assuming it's still valid)...hahah
3	Sichuan Dou Hua (Thursday 6 Oct)  UOB Plaza 1  60 storey  Interested  1. Evilduxy  2. Carey  3. Jadey   4. Beta  5. CofeeshopB (tink he interested, thats wat he told me)  6. Jadey Guest (TBC)  7. Jadey Guest (TBC)  8.  Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3 (assuming it's still valid)...hahah
1	() Date:  (Thursday) Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT) Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc 1. Evilduxy 2. Carey 3. Lovejade 4. Beta 5. CofeeshopB 6. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 7. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 8. raven1019 Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3
10	Thanks Carey n Twtan for the initiatives
36	add me in the list
22	okay CSB told me he confirm ok to join us. Thanks!
56	() Date:  (Thursday) Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT) Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc 1. Evilduxy 2. Carey 3. Lovejade 4. Beta_Tester 5. CoffeeShopBuddy 6. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 7. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 8. raven1019 Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3
2	im thinking of the fish already!
10	u can have most of the fish
7	how many are u targeting
15	Beta, take some pictures ok?
328	Lol nt sure but can i hv 0ne to myself?
60	Of course - but one is enough meh?
43	Hihi~  TS i confirm going!!
17	Because he WANs to reserve space for loads of tea~~
11	either peanuts / pickles or we must get tea right tea will be more wu hua if not wrong
5	Where can i get Dom Perignon Champagne at reasonable price? Anyone knows?
15	Wrong thread   Duty-free lor...hahah  Try and see who's travelling and can bring it in for you...  Too bad I don't have any business trips coming up else I can buy for you...hahah
62	Ya, tea is refillable and supposed to be good stuff.
11	ok tea but what type
1	They got 2 types - Longjing and 8-treasure tea
26	same or different price ? which is nicer to lim ?????
1	I think should be same price - S$8 per person  Different taste...  Longjing is traditional tea while ba pao is a "sweet" tea cos it has a lot of ingredients inside...
2	Aiyoh, SCDH so fast no slot liao.  Sigh, i'll do something else then.
3	Then have another session but not this week, I may be able to join then.
4	You only have 1 more voucher with me, Auntie Kim.  Also bought for Carey n Donkey.  Expiring end Oct.  It will be a weekend lunch.  Sat 15, 22 n 29.  Which one you prefer?
8	I emailed you the voucher liao mah.  You paid for it too.  The voucher expires on 23 Nov.  Which days you not free again?  I intend to go on a weekday.
0	I can join u all
1	mon wed n friday cannot go , got course
24	just get 3 more people to join u  the most we have a more cozy table of 12
4	Their table not meant to sit so many people as the chair are quite big. That time also split into two tables.
203	I also got Joaquin with u..hmm both 15 n 22 is okay
3	Scdh lunch buffet
9	hey carey. can you add me?  btw your friend moved to prop trading.
10	()  Date:  (Thursday)  Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT)  Time: 6.30pm to 10pm  Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc  1. Evilduxy  2. Carey  3. Lovejade  4. Beta_Tester  5. CoffeeShopBuddy  6. Lovejade's Guest (TBC)  7. Lovejade's Guest (TBC)  8. raven1019  9. Somatic3  10. Bathing_Ape  11. hotbigdog11  12.  Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3
3	Sure, Mr Mod added you liao...  Oh, he's over at prop trading liao ah? hahah
2	Wah, so restrictive siah...  Boh hua liao
1	somemore not inclusive of drinks, wanna ppl to spicy until uplorry!   UOB promo better deal ~
1	restrictive meh?? i tot sounds ok wat... and it's wkend...! i'm more keen if is on wkend.... min 4 vouchers cos u need min 4 pax to go bah...  but is their lunch not as good as dinner..??  regards, wacky
1	Is this cheap? Can easily find 4pax tho.
6	Not inclusive of drinks meh ?
1	SCDH does not include drinks whether you use OUB or not, drinks are separate.
0	The restrictions for the SCDH lunch promo are the same as if you going for their dinner mah.  For their dinner, you also need min 4 paxs wor.  Drinks also not included in the $38++. Wacky, its the same menu. Dreamer, compared to their weekday dinner price of $38++, with the UOB 4 pay 3 promo, its only around $1 cheaper IF you have 4, 8, 12 ... paxs. However, if you compare to their weekend price of $42++, then its about $4 cheaper IF you have multiples of 4.  More if you dun have multiples of 4, eg, if 6 is going.  So its actually less restrictive as you are not limited to multiples of 4. Imo, i think the voucher deal is okay.  Hmmm, can consider as i would prefer a sat lunch over a weekday dinner.
5	well UOB pay-3 for 4... means 25% discount for multiples of 4 pax (or lesser if not multiples of 4)... the insing one 30% discount... and doesn't depend on how many ppl u have... but u gotta pay first...  regards,  wacky
1	() Date:  (Thursday) Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT) Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc 1. Evilduxy 2. Carey 3. Lovejade 4. Beta_Tester 5. CoffeeShopBuddy 6. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 7. Lovejade's Guest (TBC) 8. raven1019 9. Somatic3 10. Bathing_Ape 11. hotbigdog11 12. Evilduxy's guest Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3
1	The scdh really so good? See you all always going there.
1	oooo... why not schedule one for nov using the insing voucher then...?? lemme do some math... inSing is $$34.60 nett... excluding drinks etc...  UOB one... $38++ wkday... also exclude drinks... so is $38 x 3 x 1.17 / 4 = $33.35... cheaper than inSing by $1.25... only if u got multiples of 4 pax...  wkend prices... $42+++ ... so is $42 x 3 x 1.17 / 4 = $36.86... or $2.26 more $$$ then inSing... and only if u got multiple of 4 pax...agree!!!! den this month can schedule something else la...   regards,  wacky
0	The voucher deal did not say must order tea or must pay for peanut or wet tissue right?
1	reasonably price n not bad.
1	Carey/Ah Tan: if jadey guests not going.. Evilduxy say he will take one more of the slot.
1	You have not include charges for tea or peanut or tissue for UOB one.I have added his guest in liao.
2	i exclude because both inSing deal and UOB CC also not include the tea/peanuts right?? so it's a fair comparison... regards, wacky
1	But you need to order either tea or peanut for UOB. The voucher deal doesn't mention so if they make you order, can complain liao.
0	Thks bro. can order ice water? Free!
3	the most 16 pax 2 table
3	Thks to toons  n wacky for the detailed breakdown. i prefer weekend too.
1	oh haha ok... in that case insing voucher cheaper den even wkday dinners lor...  regards,  wacky
10	Evil say if possible then he take one more slot. if nt its ok.. Unless jenets n her chew toy come?  Btw can pay with just carey's card right? or need extra?
3	This Thursday company treat jiak Mortons
2	Your company so good one.
5	Wah like that I also want...hahah  Mortons
7	Not too bad la. That time got treat Melts, white rabbit before also.   The sales ppl hit target then is very happy one, anyhow treat
1	mean gnet de bonus gao gao liao
2	Wah, that's really good leh...  My company don't treat us eat fried cuttle fish already very good   Budget cut - now welcome lunches and farewell lunches also boh liao
17	Heehee, same tots, which is why my calculations included the misc charges for the UOB promo, but not for the voucher deal
34	No wor.  is performance bonus and boss no like me We don't use to have welcome or farewell meal one leh. Unless out from own pocket  when sales ppl bust the target then they will get extra money for team bonding session... So happy   Actually I still deciding whether to go mortons not...
26	free de just go
208	Can I join your company? Got opening?
78	For the superdeals voucher,MUST order the peanuts.
34	This is like false advertising.
16	I called up and asked juz now.
1	Like that not very worth liao.
4	Why you think I don't quite trust coupon deals anymore? hahah
9	Price wise about the same compared to weekday dinner, but if you consider the voucher is for weekend, then you do save a couple of $.  Besides, the biggest adv is no need to have multiples of 4, which can be troublesome.
666	Actually for me, the only bad voucher deal was indian times.  The rest were either okay or good.  Indulge n prosperous kitchen were okay.  Khmer, saltwater, himawari were all good.  So i will still buy, but i will likely skip those small unknown super cheap steamboat deals ...
7	Wah very chim...hahah  Will make it a point to try it at our next tea session   Paging for Beta and wacky
569	is it nice ??????
8	ya lor i see like only seafood n something like chicken satay in the blog!!! wah i feel like goin but boh meat
1	on that day.. u all liming what Tea?  or Dom Perignon?  hee
3	u bringing?
1	Dom Perignon beta bring ?????
7	seems like he is proposing to bring n treat everyone.
41	2 bad u not coming if not can lim
4	Steamboat I like  Can I request to be on a weekday night?
1	Got any buffet outing on weekend? Weekday I too busy at the gym.
42	wow friday from toons??? no need badminton liao mah??  regards,  wacky
19	Can put me tbc first? I confirm with wife see how. Thanks.
57	Next day still got the buffet at Revenue House with you, guess I will have to skip this.
13	Done.For this one, i suggest we do it ASAP.  How abt next mon or tue?
5	both days doable just let me know asap!
64	Hi, i got 2 voucher for sale of the Buffet and Ala Carte Items at Award-Winning Go India:  Valid until 25th Oct 2011  Please contact mi if you are interested  Thanks
3	urm... sorry but now when i see "indian food" and "cheap buffet" ... i can't helped but remind of the nightmare at indian times...   regards,  wacky
49	$4++........
0	hello people.. , wanna ask about 10 at Claymore, Pan Pacific Orchard Hotel , how is their buffet dinner..?  planning to go there later on today..
312	Ah!!! u guys are killing me!!! cannot go!!!!  haiz.. next time hopefully can join.
112	We went because of the Plates of Pleasure. Their normal cooked foods so so nia. But for Oct they have changed the menu for the Plates of Pleasure so none of us had tried yet so can't comment.
59	If we are doing the steamboat on next mon and tues then cant do the JB jap buffet liao. Thinking go JB jiak the buffet this friday but u got Hilton. Alamak, so many buffet, so little time   I am ok with the dates, I will go with majority vote for next mon or tues
11	Dun make it fri lar , cos the Hilton one in planning for some time liao plus its only available on fri.  Make it next mon or tue then cos the steamboat one no rush.  Just tot it might be a better idea to go early before the voucher crowd comes in n std might drop.  I prefer to go for the jap buffet.
36	Same here...hahah  Reviews here are quite similar - they don't advise going for the buffet
85	Ok, i will make the JB jap buffet on next mon.  Btw, i bought a chilli dip for the steamboat buffet, no sugar
20	Friday I can go with you to jiak, must ask cow first.
2	so tmr SCDH how ar? we got 10 ppl..
20	Just go lor and pay a bit more.
13	Oo I also wan try the jb buffet
26	Just a bit more only...  Else you can look for two more warm bodies lor
9	We go althogther on next mon better.   Friday we can go somewhere else but not buffet please. You drive your car then more people can go.
73	okay im ok.. so is 1 table right?
4	I don't think can sit 10 to a table as the wooden armchair big wor.
74	alternatively... if 2 pax would pull out and get the inSing voucher togo in Nov instead lor... the inSing voucher more wu hua anyway... and is on wkends...   regards,  wacky
34	short of 2 pax for the scdh is it? If so, can put me and chewtoy in?
30	()  Date:  (Thursday)  Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT)  Time: 6.30pm to 10pm  Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc  1. Evilduxy  2. Evilduxy's guest  3. Carey  4. Beta_Tester  5. CoffeeShopBuddy  6. Somatic3  7. Bathing_Ape  8. raven1019  9. hotbigdog11  10. mystery guest part 1  11. etteNNaej  12. chewtoy  Try to limit to multiples of 4 cos UOB promo is 4-for-3
35	guys, i'm back, any plans for the momiji buffet?
3	Waiting for you to come back lor.  Hmmm, i have 2 vouchers for donkey n myself.  I remember carey also in right?  You bought for him or he bought himself?
1	I bought it myself...hahah  This one is weekend lunch right?
16	Let's hope that Evil's guest don't put aeroplane again
6	U can strike toto 3 times in a row be4 I get the chance to drive in jb lol  Fri go jiak buffet is good too lol
6	oo if put sexpose them!
11	Hehe i tot u go mortons.. ho liao mai jiaks a? Hehe..
1	Nope, its a voucher from gmarket.  Usable for dinner mon to thu only. So you must be b4 15 oct?  Hmmm, tat week we got orchard cafe lunch on wed.  If lunch you can do after 15 oct, then we can do momiji tat week n orchard cafe another week.  Otherwise it will have to be momiji n orchard cafe b2b liao
37	Lol, if i am not mistaken, evil's gas might not be who you guys are expecting ...
5	mai goes mortons la... at work see colleagues, off work also see them... abit sian.
2	who isit tt they are expecting? gotch 2 guest!
12	the kua tio gui one?
22	KTG ish who?
2	So smart 1/2 correct!
7	1 pretty lady n 1 yandao guy.  I 2/2 correct right?
2	then the other one is... mum?
2	Do your homework guys and gals.
9	oh no... without you around.. who's the one hardworking enough to take pictures?
2	beta loh.  there is 11 of u guys to remind him. hahahahaha
2	Raven will take, Beta is the lazy one.
6	never seen beta taking pictures leh! haha.. yea raven sounds more like it.
123	I only can jiaks.
1	Hmm...then is mystery guest also evil's one?  If that one never turn up, we will claim the bill from Ah Tan
2	NOT ME AGAIN!   I announce I'm onree attending 1 official buffet next week, k!
28	If dinner, best to do Momiji first before 15 Oct...  Lunch I am more flexible - should be able to sneak out...hahah
22	Claim from evil lah. It's his guest.
4	mlmlya claim frm ah tan...he always curse ppl de
1	Later I give you $3 Ang Bao.
2	si ginna! jiak wif me jin xia suay meh?
2	next week you go which buffet?
82	himawari ~
44	i scare ur hubby cashcow take chopper n chop me with his staki fit fit body   anyway just had a a steamboat dinner at mookata at katong   hmm the bbq meat is nice just tt not much variety of food   forget to take pic of food so only pic is this but for the price of close to $30 per person ish can go eat other food but must try this once for the novelty of it...  the chili ish damn nice esp the fiery hot version although i dont find it tt hot
403	wah liao, mai dee dee mention tis name to me can onot? if u jin jin wanna discuss we plan buffets or makan outing la.   everydae hv to keep on seeing tis name dunno hao many times without fail ish jin irritating one leh!
85	Pls dun associate pork chop with me. It is very disgusting to eat pork chop for the rest of yr life.
6	home work pre-submitted le no need to hand up liao
3	All.same food la. Refer back! Unless gt new stuff.
15	oei! hao can liddat one!   den I go himawari I oso mai do hw liao
25	I am so looking forward to the beef and fish later
25	hello, any feedback with regards to the buffet?
0	u got do homework before ??????
4	Wan Hao now has 30% discount from Mon - Thurs.  Anyone interested in going?
0	swatchie kor kor treating ????
5	wan hao is marriott rite? I tot last time they all went to jiak the dim sum came back complain the svs jin jialat got! I even do a 10 episodes hw from HK u forgotten liao meh?  tat time u still got participate in my Q&amp;A but dun wan to jiak wif me! follow swatchie gor gor is jiak for free de
0	i mean himawari de u got submit before ???????
1	Swatchie, can blanja us?
1	If you pay using your citibank card then I ish eat fwee
1	Yesh Wan Hao ish marriot. I always go there for dinner, never go for dim sum before. Serbice always veli goot when I go on Sat or Sun night cuz very few peepur
0	Can but you haf to blanjah me eat The Cliff aft that
4	himawari I nvr go b4 hao to do hw? but I intend to do when I go tis round cos suay suay jiak wif lazy pig who refused to do hw naosadae   but dun do oso can de la, cos a few mths back aldy got ppl do an extensive one liao.
16	their svs to u gd becos they noe who u r mah.  btw, yr face can bring in hao many free guest ar?  nao we got 3 wanna jiak wif u, willing to help u carry tripod &amp; do hw leh
7	We went for the previous rendition so menu is different - give feedback also not valid   But in general, their cooked food CMI   Cold platter is okay niah - lobsters are fresh but not replenished fast enough; oysters are fresh; sashimi is forgettable  Desserts - I never try so no comments  Highlights are their plates of pleasure - the last time we went, it was not bad but caveat here is that the menu was different...
17	How would they know who I am?  I am not that regular a customer @ Wan Hao
4	Don't think anyone here went recently in October after they revamped their Plates of Pleasure menu so how to comment on the buffet?
6	CIMB World Card discount also works at Wan Hao if I am not wrong...hahah
10	50% off for 2 diners. Time to go apply! Thanks for the heads up!
3	nv go before then how to pre submit homework go liao then submit homework
28	dun worrie, I will set up gd example &amp; do hw one ...  but as usual, spread over 10 episodes
35	we shld make the timing to 7! so i can make it in time if not i go there all almost 1/2 full
12	It's okay, we can warm up the table for you...hahah
7	warm for me until 6.45pm thx
24	i should reach ard 630ish
19	Special reminder for Beta: Brought your camera?
4	I feel like leaving office at 5pm again today.   Should be can reach on time.
1	do you wanna meet mi to go together ?? marsiling or woodlands mrt ?
8	If I leave office at 6.20pm, I will be there by 6.25pm bah...  Maybe 6.28pm, depends on how long I take to cross the road - traffic can be quite heavy at that time
5	You are that  or that ?  I don't know why got part 1 one, unless you comes in mutliple parts?
8	I bringing moi camera...  not sexpose people,  Coz moi also want take photo of GOOD FOOD
1	Thanks, do post here.
14	Yup   no worries
7	beta n firedoll together ????
15	haven jiak dinner wanna stir dabian liao
9	Dun anyhow say rehs..  later the bf hoot me. ;(
14	edmwer is good in stir da bian
5	Date: Fri 7 Oct 2011 Venue: Checkers Brasserie @ Hilton Hotel Time: 7pm onwards Price: $59++ (or $62.50 nett after 10% promo) Highlights :- Participants: 1. Toons 2. Nameless gas 3. Mr (^@^)" (TBC) 4. Mrs (^@^)" (TBC) 5. 6.
3	Enjoy yourself, while we go  eat the curry fish head. Take photo ok?
1	Toons, please GPGT cos i very keen to know if the seafood is good.
23	Ya, so we can plan for round 2.
6	meet at level 1 or wat ar?
5	You guys gonna 3 take on the 6 pax set again?  Lol, enjoy your meal too.  Ooohhh, pics sure will take one, just dunno got time to post or not
9	You want to meet me there or you know how to go straight up?
5	i know how to go up. Under ur name carey?
8	Depends if cow can make it a not.   Ah tan say he will eat 2 bowls of lice.   He ask me eat 1 bowl but 1 grain i also not interested   Even if you no post picture, please give review ok.
7	Yup, under my name   See you up there then
40	I don't know if cow's wife going or not, he always last minute one. I told Donkey, I only help eat 2 bowls of rice.
59	Rice can don't want mah even if it comes with the set...hahah
35	Orchard hotel dinner buffet at 38.50nett
187	Set comes with drinks and rice.
41	Beta got chance to try backdoor.
6	Anyone else bought voucher for Auntie Kim n wanna join us?  We are going on sat 29 Oct for lunch.  All welcomed!
5	That's what I meant - don't have to eat the rice if you don't want to...hahah
3	nice meeting u all!
5	But I like rice.
6	Hand in your homework.
6	Jim ho jiak~ nice meeting you all too
28	Waste food sia.
0	Then ask them to serve only what you can eat - no need to serve everything woah...hahah  But can't believe some people are so thick that they think it's wastage
1	Nice meeting you guys.   Will upload the photos after some chopping
1	Nice meeting you too   You certainly brought a lot of laughter to our table
0	Nice meeting you too...  Thanks for volunteering to be our photographer
1	I got 2 belly goot butties helping with the cameras.  credits to them.  Raven n Somatic3 ~
9	i wanna box BBB stomach. Coz no bun!
2	nice to meet u too! =))  she ish meam and scary huans =((lolx~
1	Heheheh! The police station incident?
1	Wise words from someone who can prove that energy can be destroyed.
3	I know you're gng, so no bun~  no wonder so mean today
1	Same to you.  Your really not like what you described   Looks quite buff for your age Just practicing as much as I can
1	i think peasant like us ish too difficult to understand a satki vios owner!
0	Dont be lame laaa!!
1	I also find it difficult to understand why a guy will spend so many hrs buayaing a gal online.
2	u see your reply  so mean &amp; Scary huans
1	can't understand some people cant understand the fact that buaya online also can end up going out wib her huans!   problem?!?!?! jelly?!?!?!  may be someone to satki to understand~ think too busy also.... one hand must hold steering wheel one hand must hold iphone one hand cig one hand ipad! lolololol
0	csb shushu~   This is a makan yummy thread, dont stir here ba
4	lolx~ okkies... noted =))
0	bye everyone! really appreciate the sharing of good food! Hope to see u next time ~  Game time now!Bye~
1	Moderator Lao Tan coming in to scold us OT niaos.. here cannot OT will tio 3bugs angbao one..
1	there are so many OT here now.  donkey/twtan, can keep me in loop if you guys got scdh outing? though prefer dinner over lunch. thank you
32	Go out then go out lor. Like that oso want to haolian? I believe you not the only buaya she go out with.   Pls la. You describing the king of st james while I dun even go clubbing. If u want to continue, pls do so in edmw.
35	Pls respect the rules here want to quarrel bring it over to edmw n not here! Here is a place for makan only....1 normal buffet outing also can cre8 so much epic saga ~.~
4	Coincidentally, i'm going SCDH tomorrow lolz  What are the must order nice dishes there? Will spam the fish of course, but i only have 3 pax including me so can't order much i think. Do they go by servings, like i tell them i want 1 person portion only for each dish so we can order more variety?
19	I think you need at least 4 pax to have a table. Even 3 pax, you need to pay for 4 for the buffet. Correct me if i am wrong.
294	Really? I made the reservation online from their webby and there is nothing there that tells me this even after it's confirmed  Basket i will call them tomorrow first thing
31	mod shu shu angry liao
13	We did not buy the SCDH voucher.   But will let you know if got next outing there
6	Anyone ish interested in going yan ting for dinner next month? My Astor card ish going to expire in Dec so thinking of going soon.
3	What benefits does the Astor card gives?
3	Dining on Mon - Wed ish 35% discount up to 10pax. Thurs - Sun ish 25% discount up to 10 pax. Can get free parking too
3	You want to put the details here like the date and time etc...?
4	WAH.. i 2 weeks not here this thread so happening!!
26	later i going vienna at united sq.. that one good anot??
1	Food ok but environment like little China.
8	I was thinking 14 or 21 Nov. Time maybe 630pm?
27	With 3 pax, they would not let you have the buffet even if you offer to pay for 4 pax. At least that was what happened to me when I tried.
4	I got an email from them saying it's indeed minimum 4 persons. Then they have this UOB card promotion for 1 free diner with 3 paying ones. So if i am willing to pay for 4 pax when i have only 3 by using UOB card, isn't it the same thing? I still only pay for 3 in the end except of cos i lugi that 1 person which gets to dine free
11	Here's how you can "cheat"...  Make a booking for 4 - and when only 3 show up, say the 4th person is going to be late...  They can't stop you from starting first...  When it's time to pay the bill, say the 4th guy can't make it...you have already eaten your meal - what can they do?   Or alternatively, you can always invite me as the "free" 4th person - I volunteer my time and stomach to help you
19	Confirm they allow entry first mah? Wait they say wait for the 4th person to arrive then let us in. I have encountered cases like this at other places before, wasted my time going there. This time i'm bringing my mum there for a good meal and she can't walk very much
1	Toons, my wife and I will be coming tonight, if my bunny boy don't decide to come out today.    Can I have a baby chair for piglet? Thanks.   Anyway, why start at 7pm? Thought usually very kiasu one.
3	They allow.  Tat time i reach there first also start ordering liao   With the promo, even if its only 3 pax, it does not make a difference to them cos ultimately they still only collect payment for 3 pax.
1	Auntie working there told me that if I pay for 4 pax, I 1 pax eat also can. That was the branch at Beach Road.
2	Okay. Will call to make arrangement for the baby chair and also enquire abt parking coupon.  Lol, if your bunny come out tonite, maybe can get FOC buffet for the rest of your life.  I sorta remember 1 airline offering foc lifetime flights for a lady who gave birth on the plane   If can start earlier i also want lar, but they only start at 7pm
4	Invasion of the EDMW ginna pis.
3	Like that not bad wor, 6 for the price of 4, who say no discount   Enjoy your seafood today.
3	Thought so too   Anyway i just called them, yeah turns out fine in the end. (^@^)" post of willing to pay for 4 pax even if you are going there to eat alone also applies according to them
1	Yes they do...  I was there way before most of them (not my fault as I only work across the road) yesterday...  I went ahead and order the cold dishes and when they were served, there were only 2 of us at the table...hahah  Of course, there was a lot of merry go round last evening - long story for another day...
8	With piglet fussing, parents can't eat in peace one. Won't eat much. Mummy appetite also no good. So quite loogie.
14	Baby chair arranged.  No parking coupon.  Hmmm, yea, i remembered tat time himawari, you guys also did not eat much.  How come go for buffet then?  Tot ala carte might be better?  Nvm, tonite one seafood.  Eat a couple of lobsters, oysters, a few slabs of cod fish can cover back liao
36	I am buffet-deprived. See you all go so many buffets but can't join, sibeh dui. Today chewren day, that's why i am free to join tonight.
36	merry go round for me  while the rest of you had your dinner merrily.
1	tonight wat buffet wor? got slot???
6	hmmm Yan Ting.
1	Ask Toons. He organizer.
16	tooons shu shu are u going for ribs??
4	oh, today chewren day?  My childhood a long long long time ago, heehee   No wonder when i asked for window table, all fully taken.  Hmmm, hope its not crowded tonite.
0	so chiu ish interested?
3	Tonite going for this one.  No ribs, only got bones, n fish bones at tat   Let me know if you wanna join.  All welcome.  Ribs will be the churrascaria at 6th ave.  Its in the works.  2D1N got small small ribs i tink. Tat one counted?  Tat one got proposed date liao.  You keen i point you to the post.   Date: Fri 7 Oct 2011  Venue: Checkers Brasserie @ Hilton Hotel  Time: 7pm onwards  Price: $59++ (or $62.50 nett after 10% promo)  Highlights :-  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Nameless gas  3. Mr (^@^)" (TBC)  4. Mrs (^@^)" (TBC)  5.  6.
6	Yan Ting is elite dim sum   After discount will hit around $50?
2	elite seafood buffet~~ ok i make my way down tonight~~ non meat non carbo related, so wun get full easily... ~
3	Having dinner sho no dim sum. Probably about $40-$50/head after discount
22	i go makan seesions thread haven update yet... only update to SCDF yesterday's one... yesterday one so many power guest sia.....~
1	These days go and eat at "normal" zhichar stall can also incur this amount per head if we order crabs and fish
9	Ya lor - so paiseh   Next time will not ask you to move - ask Beta to move
16	OT:carey what is the app u show me at khmer delight ?
7	K, added.  Heard tat tonite will be close to full house
5	I will update night, so I expect homework to be handed up.  Darn, the sky very dark again.
2	Yesh. So ish chiu interested?
1	dear sir,  can i kindly enquire yours is which buffet ? and wat are the dishes available. thank you
19	i guess sky turn dark dark, u falling asleep lazy to update liao...
5	I busy at work wor, my colleague on leave so I have to do everything. PS: Updated liao.
7	Harlo. Sorry ish not buffet. Ish ala carte
7	LOL, the summon auntie app!~!~!~!  sorry for OT, pls dun send me letter!~
2	I kenna summon then 15 mins later received warning.   Anyway, today all the summon agents out in full force. Saw 3 at Chinatown and Downtown East. All working hard for year end bonus.
1	Swatchie not buffet junkie like us. He elite foodie.
3	All the lobsters and fish ish belongs to me.     Hope the wait for the fish will not be too long.
15	have some Fine De Claire. Very nice ~
1	Eat so much oysters ... no wonder you so buaya
13	i nv buaya hor..
2	sorry, i will be out of town.
2	go where overseas?
3	Summon Auntie
6	I need to revert - my timing will be very erratic from 15 Oct onwards
1	Sure no problem. I'll check back on this probably beginning of Nov
3	If you can give a date and time, I will help post the details up.
6	Smashing! How about Nov 14 2011 @ 1830hrs? Thanks!
1	You got link to the website? Need more details to post up.
1	the other one
5	Please stick to food topics.
4	Can i check with ah tan or toons, for Tml nihon mura buffet, who is gracing the buffet? Thank you.
2	Ooops, i postponed tomorrow's nihon mura to Sat 22 Oct cos i got this Checkers one tonite.  Tot you not joining us, so never update you.  For nihon, likely only ah tan n me cos i only bought vouchers for both of us.  It will be a dinner though as dinner got some special stuff according to the staff.  So wanna join us?
9	Yesh its   Thanks!
1	JuzToday's Deal  55% OFF, $15 instead of $33 for Eat-All-You-Can Sushi Buffet + Ramen of the day + Iced Green Tea at Shin Tokyo (Next to Clementi MRT)! Halal Certified  Buffet menu  - Spicy salmon gunkan -  - Spicy mushroom gunkan -  - Thai chilli tuna mayo spicy gunkan -  - Spicy salmon skin gunkan -  - Spicy idako (baby octopus) gunkan -  - Spicy tuna gunkan -  *- Spicy ika (squid) gunkan -  *- Tom yum tuna spicy gunkan -  - Tom yum prawn spicy gunkan -  - Spicy tofu gunkan -  - Spicy prawn gunkan -  - Spicy ebkiko gunkan -  - Chuka idako (seasoned baby octopus) gunkan -  - ****ake mushroom gunkan -  - Egg mayo salad gunkan -  - Kani (crabstick) salad gunkan -  -Chuka wakame (seasoned seaweed) gunkan -  - Corn mayo gunkan -  - Ebikko black (shrimp roe) gunkan -  - Chuka hotate (seasoned scallop) gunkan -  - Tuna mayo gunkan -  - Salmon &amp; egg mayo gunkan -  - Salmon avocado gunkan -  - Ebikko (prawn roe) gunkan -  - Salmon skin gunkan -  - Ebikko (prawn roe) green gunkan -  - Tuna mayo inari -  - Kani salad inari -  - Inari -  - Ebikko inari -  - Egg mayo inari -  - Sushi ebi (prawn) nigiri*-  - Ika (squid) nigiri -  - Salmon nigiri -  - Kani (crab stick) nigiri -  - Spicy squid tempura nigini -  - Maguro (tuna) nigiri -  - Unagi slice (eel) nigiri -  - Avocado nigiri -  - Ebi (prawn) fry nigiri -  - Spicy cutlet cheese nigiri -  - Vegetable roll maki -  - Salmon maki -  - Kani tama maki -  - Kani maki 6pcs -  - Kappa maki (cucumber) 6pcs -  - Tekka (tuna) maki -
2	nt extending ur card ar?
0	Oh, like that I think I am out then...  I think I will have to pull all-nighters around that period until after 15 Nov
29	See how much its gonna cost this year. If &gt;1k, no thanks
12	Mister Swatchie or Anyone can help? You know sometimes u order some food. Lets say Cheese selections. Then they will explain what kinda cheese is what, where its made.. then beside they will put things like this (Supplement:$35). What are these? or what they mean? keh wat extra liaos?  Thanks ~
273	I speculate, top up $35 to get the stated item(s)
24	Yesh top up $35++ to get the cheese platter.
55	Got new buffet outing!?
9	Here every week got 1 or 2 buffet outings. It's whether your stomach and your wallet can take it.   Anyone here visited Pasta Inc? Bought some vouchers in Aug, going this Sunday before it expires.
14	swatchie, any dim sum to recommend?  yan ting is not bad, but definitely not worth the price.  wah lok so-so, only the bo lo bun nice.  lei garden @ chijmes quite good too.  any others?
101	My review on the place:  Food: Limited spread. Some of the prawns are not very fresh. Highlights should be the lobsters and Alaskan crab legs, pan-fried king prawns, cod and snapper. I wasn't too impressed when the king prawns ran out quite early. Desserts were limited, ice cream sucks, fruits nit available, but our mystery guest managed to charm the waiter to give us 2 plates. Score given here is 12/20.    Service: This is the section that they had done well in. Minus the waitress who is taking orders at the seafood section, I am quite happy with the staff generally. Score given here is 8.5/10  Ambience: Typical hotel buffet setting. Not that impressed with the not-very-clean PVC chair. Tables are also quite close to each other. Score here is 5.5/10.   Value: $62.50 nett after discount is slightly on the high side for me. I would feel $50 would be a fairer price, considering other comparable buffets I had tried. Score here is 4/10.  Overall score: 30/50. Will I return again? Highly unlikely, unless there is a 1-for-1 offer.   Pictures wise, please wait for Toons' homework.
29	Wanted to go SCDH today but change of plans so went to Straits Cafe instead. They having the Peranakan and Nonya buffet this month. Not too bad lah overall, but the lamb rendang ran out very bloody fast and it was replaced by some crap vegetables which i spitted out immediately  Will post some peeks of my plates if i can find the time
4	Some peeks
384	Two funky hongkie (i think) meimeis sitting opposite us  Even caught them feeding one another a few times
193	Wah...the lamb rendang is very nice   What was the roast? Beef ah?  The last time we went, they changed menu - very emo cos no lamb chops  The laksa and durian pengat is consistently good...  So overall the food still quite okay
21	Is that beef beside the crayfish?
8	Last night marks my last buffet for a long time.   Anyone willing to buy over my pasta inc voucher for 2 pax? Supposed to go this Sunday.
2	Peach Garden - still okay   Mouth Restaurant - not bad if you are not too elite
8	Heng I never go...hahah  For that price, Marriott Brunch any time siah
12	I kind of expected piggy review will be like that due to his high expectation.  The mystery guest doing that is not the first time liao.
8	Singapore is the only country where random strangers will meet online to go for a buffet   Not that there's anything wrong but this is so quaintly Singaporean. No wonder all my Sing friends in the States are foodies.   How often do you guys organize an eat?
12	You can check out the sticky thread above to gauge yourself and then there are non official outings too that are not posted here.
9	Lol. Hope I don't appear to be difficult to please.   I am not well-off, so I expect standards to match, especially if I have paid a high price for it, though my 'high' may not be the same as some of you.   I tend to be less critical if the buffet isn't pricey. After all, you get what you paid for.   This is swatchie's best buffet, and I agree. I went aft reading his blog and it was wow. $62 nett for the buffet and it was outstanding, food and value wise. I told Toons yesterday that I am willing to pay $80 for it. $80 is the most I had paid so far, for Greenhouse and Kushi, which did not meet my expectations, so that is my highest compliments to it.
11	That's what makes Singaporeans unique. Different countries have different cultures. Well, for us, food makes people tick.
0	Sigh... all the photos look so good. And here I am on week 4 of my diet...  I'm positively drooling at spykid's pics.
358	but it's not available anymore le right ? 1-90
21	Actually it's not true...  They have something similar in HK - except they don't go for buffets but a group of strangers will gather at some home-kitchen to eat...  Such house dinner parties are also quite popular in the US - no menu - and it's not cheap
2	papers say the simi secret kitchen or eating thingy. also strangers meet up to eat. Now like very hot everywhere including SG.. just pay, sit back n eat home cooked food at the owners garden or backyard.
2	So should we also go and try one of these? hahah  I am game
1	yah mouth rest. nt bad. my Mom like the place ~
28	i dont mind. lol.. i really thought of it. But my friends all say im mad.lol.. let me settle in my new job b4 i go.lol
9	Life's too short to be serious all the time...hahah  Sure, now who has any lobang...  Swatchie - do you know of any of such "dinner house parties"?
2	Your place?  We are quite happy to be served with sio bak, roast chicken/duck and your 6 month old stew
861	your place? lolol!  hmm.. i forgot to take the address n names down from the papers..
27	whose house got backyard/garden?
20	Me peasant   But the last time I went to a friend's house for a dinner party, they had a whole lamb roasting on the rack in his garden...
23	you should intro us to that friend
71	That one was my ang mo colleague - went home liao
7	Baby bunny boy popped in the wee hours this morning after mummy went through almost 18 hours of labour.   Boss, sorry for the OT.
13	Congratulation to you and your wife.
12	gong xi gong xi
3	Congrats! Talking abt that i havent seen you for a while liao man!
8	CONGRATS!~!~! to PIGGY~~
1	wah sounds good must ask elite beta cook lots of good food   anyway piggy gxgx on ur small little piggy!
7	Ya, then bring over the foods to opposite his home, the Yishun Park to eat.
4	only carey n beta ish elite
48	You say beta can liao - me is peasant niah haha
22	Gongxi Congratz Piggy ^_^
20	you forgot swatchie   feel like trying andre chiang's food one day. but peasant no $
3	Actually all the places you listed serve about the same quality of dim sum with a few individual items standing out. So it really depends on what you like to eat. Personally I believe that there is no such thing as a place where you can find excellent renditions of every dim sum item. Not in SG, not even in HK.   Having said that, you can try Royal China and gauge for yourself.
2	I've read in the papers about a couple of such events and have been invited to join but never actually had the chance to. But I've had private dinners at my friends' place with a private chef before and it's really enjoyable
21	I'm just a cheap watch brand that costs &lt; $100   My friend just went to Restaurant Andre. Cost her $400+/pax. 1 glass of wine is $40++ and they don't state the price on the menu.
40	Hi guys, are there any buffets with good ambience to recommend? Birthday treat for 2  Have these in mind: Todai / Carousel / Dining Room / 10 at Claymore
8	Oh we forgot Erwin lol  You are a real elite
8	elite still got chris
4	Green house embience nicer.. Even hav violinist to play the birthday tune live at ur table
24	salt water cafe @ changi village hotel got couple seats with cosy lomantik lightings
10	so elites are swatchie beta n erwin plus chris so many elites in here anyway when the nxt buffet
2	Congrats!!!  You're on your way to a litter of piglets
4	Mon we going steamboat mah.  Tot you just ate the korean bbq ytd?  A lot of ppl?  The meat they replenish fast right?
2	me is chao peasant not in their league
15	piggy wun be joining us for buffets from nao onwards,  till the year of snake   cos next yr he nids to jiak more prawns heads to pia for a xiao long nu muahahaha
7	ya but if after monday then nxt buffet gonna be 26th ~ ~ lol  the meat they replenish very fast no worries...fri i went there super lots of ppl the meat nv once went out of stock for long  the service there is top notch!!
5	Great to hear abt the service!  Too bad coming thu momiji is via voucher.  Well, you can always join us if you dun mind paying full price, anyways momiji dinner i think slightly above $20 nia.  Hmmm, mon 17 or tue 18 still can slot something in.  I see if there is interest for tat JB jap buffet on those days or not.  Tat one really wait til neck long long, heehee.  If going, take 1/2 leave or leave work a bit earlier n join us lar.
7	where is momiji ??  wah nw i hard to siam cause peak period for closing sales ~ ~  jb is def out unless can wkend
3	City Square, but i dun recommend you go lar.  This is sorta like Sakura, but will smaller spread.  You gonna be disappointed comparing this to Ssikkek.  I'm only going for the salmon belly sashimi, the company n cos its $15.
5	15 dollars!!! who mai go sell me the tix lol
2	I got 1 himawari jap buffet coupon sell to u aimai?  nett is $48 but on account of our dip sistery reln  I give u special price $38.80
2	then i ghost alone for what
9	got toons they all mah   so u wanna take over my voucher rite?
5	Have been to greenhouse  Trying out other placesIs the spread big? If it is I can consider this place too
22	nope, the spread is small.  the buffet cannot be considered as good, not bad nia ... I juz find the ambience nice ~
8	Can try Melt at Oriental Hotel, nice ambiance.
2	Last month I went there with Toons and Carey, the spread very limited.   It was lucky we had the BBQ meat.  The environment is like more family orientated.   Maybe it's the seat we are at, 3 is a crowd
8	Donkey got more "meat" (*hint hint*) than she bargained for.
6	But I prefer bui bak   Too lean and muscular, my teeth not strong enough.  I think the bui bak at west coast is more palatable   Don't get me started hor.
48	Ask Toons to pass post some pictures of last Friday's buffet so I can put up in the sticky thread.
154	Oh, if 3 of u, most likely u r seated at the inner side which is brighter &amp; more "Lao liet"   Din u all noticed the dimmer side of the restaurant?  Ambience is definitely more lomantik ~  but 3 ppl jiak better Mai so
5	TS, i need a small favour from you...  i need to host a gathering in nov, there will be halal and non-halal eaters, the last time i did was at manhatten fish market which was the only halal eating house... since it is hard to make everyone happy, i tink buffet is the way out...   is there any halal buffet place u may like to intro? i got recommendation of bambu, but my boss &amp; another friend claim the food is not impressive at all
111	Sakura, Straits Kitchen, Carousel, AquaMarine etc...
15	I call them see if I can extend, because it will expire end of October. If cannot extend, you want to take 2 vouchers from me?
5	I like going back to 126 at geylang. cheap compared to all the hotel restaurants and 24hours. food quite decent too. andre looks damn cocky/arrogant hahaha. 400/pax too exp liao.  anyway, anyone knows if holland v the crystal jade xlb buffet can make reservations?
564	Busy with babysitting and work. Going to be busier with 2 piglets now.   Thank you all for the congrats.
2	I think 126 sucks. For the price I rather top up a little and go Victor's Kitchen.
11	For those going for the outing tonite, meet @ Bugis MRT @ 6.15pm.  Dun see you means you going there yourself.    Location map below.  It is at 23 Middle road.  Same building as hotel 81 bugis.  Participants  1. Toons  2. Evilduxy  3. Donkey  4. Dennyz  5. nameless gas
695	hi all, anybody tried Zhou's Kitchen hi-tea buffet b4? hows the food there?
23	Just came back from scholar.  The crabs n bbq lambs are sedap!  Surprising, the bonus dishes like oysters (paiseh, they're actually not big, but just as rdy to sexplode!), peking duck n deer meat also nice.  Overall, nice food.  We're going again next week, prolly 17 or 18 Oct (likely mon 17 oct).  Anyone else wanna join in?  Let me know within 2 hrs cos tats when the voucher deal expires.
8	18 is.... jb day.
2	Someone tried b4 n post the pics too.  Can't remember her name though.  Do a search for zhou's kitchen if you interested.  Their hi tea buffet looks quite decent.
2	got received my sms ???????
3	usually he response to forum faster then hp de.... unless its sms from his darling.
2	who is his darling ???
1	cannot OT hor. delete ur post
10	received his sms for the voucher liao , wonder his darling will be there or not
5	Phew, lucky i normally only reply to your smses 1-2 days later
9	that is precisely what i meant!
2	what time go there jiak
2	u ask this question too early hor. can u ask next wk? u wanan arrive what time then u arrive what time loh.
2	is someone asking carey &amp; ppp if they can make and is interested?
2	Imperial Exam Details  Date: Mon 17 Oct  Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant  Examinees  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Lovejade  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PPP (gd luck to the boss!)  Buying the vouchers in 1 hr.  Let me know if there is any changes hor.
3	Yea lor, like someone, we reach already, call her, but she still wants to sleep for 30 mins more.  Come liao, then ask 'how come got no scallops or crabs left' ... pengz
6	u left out the annoying evil who telll story tell one sided one ar?
3	this is incomplete story again! delete!
6	chewtoy bo come?
1	Ah Tan prolly slept liao, so can OT a bit more   So which part is incomplete?  Is it sleep 1 hr more or you complain dun have scallops, crabs n prawns?
1	Nope, I just came back from office.
3	You got the link to this?
1	Kaoz, really cannot talk abt ppl behind their back, heehee
1	Buy for me. So we split into two tables? The Scholar Returns ... Imperial Exam Details Date: Mon 17 Oct Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant Examinees 1. Toons 2. Dennyz 3. Lovejade 4. Donkey 5. Orlengjuz 6. Jeanette 7. Raven 8. Raven's Machi 9. PPP (gd luck to the boss!) 10. twtan
0	say cao cao ,cao cao reach
2	Have to do OT, just ate my dinner.
1	twtan its realllllllly nice. they enjoy the bbq meat , which is grill to perfection , crisp on the outside, tender on the inside.
1	I will dump it into my mouth.  Washing the oil away?
2	The vouchers left 48 only. Toons, quick go buy.
2	Prolly split into 2 tables.  I think 6 to a table (with 2 pots) is max although the guy said can squeeze 8.  We'll do 5 n 6.  Imperial Exam Details  Date: Mon 17 Oct  Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant  Examinees  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Lovejade  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PPP (gd luck to the boss!)  10. Twtan  11. Natureview02  Okay.  11x vouchers bought.  Seeya guys on next mon!
9	Returns ...  Imperial Exam Details  Date: Mon 17 Oct  Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant  thanks to the person who took it, thanks to the person who cook it.  thanks to the person who took it.  i have dump the nicer ones into the pot le ! shiok.
1	One man's meat is another man's poison
2	wah so fast buy le i just wanna say help me book only lol  jade pic
15	what u mean??????
3	u eat already dump the stick to him loh... i keep seeing u eat non stop. dumping .
3	cause doggy is new plus at least doggy wont pangseh me like other mystery guest
26	so now ur saviour is the mystery guest. i am 3 hours past my bed time. ciao!
15	126 been ok for me leh so far. Any idea how does victor's fare against swee choon?so if got 2 ppl, can get 4 dishes. the 4 dishes is free flow or one serving only?
3	Pls don hate me but it's stated very clearly
378	I don't think it is? unless by 'main dishes' you mean its only one serving. or i'm blind and not reading beyond the lines...
28	That's true.  Maybe u guys will have a better review.
8	I hope he's not thinking of doggy hotpot can liao   Anyway, I confirm got to work late on 17 Oct
0	Can still walk in without the voucher, just $2 more only but no special dishes. I think becos it is still very new, the crowd is still ok and the food nice. Join us after you work late. The meat skewer is really good, worth the trip.   Especially the 3 layer pork and the lamb, very fatty. I like the duck too, though i only pick the skin.
8	Wanna join us
4	Yea, but the special dishes are surprising good.  The oysters, scallops, deer meat, peking duck all not bad.  I also like the pork skewers.  Surprising tender n pork when cooked in the hotpot.  Btw, the vouchers still selling.  Seems like still got 35 left, so will only close after selling off them off.
16	Yeah, that place was a pleasant surprise.   Since it is still new, we better go before it gets too crowded and standard drops.   It kinda top 2D1N in my list as it has both the BBQ and steamboat.   Like Dennyz I do find that the first few batch of the BBQ was better (they grill it longer) than the latter part when it was more crowded.
5	is the skewer unlimited ????
7	Yes, part of the buffet.   BigMonkey ate 26 sticks.   I am sure someone else ate more, but he quietly slips the sticks away
1	No evidence, no count  ... Ooops, i meant we cannot say tat poor fellow without any hard evidence.  I do see a huge stack of sticks with evil though!
3	then i want 50 stix can ?
10	Go ahead lor.  Our crab gal also wiped out a lot of their crabs
81	all the creature in the sea fear her escpically lobster , crab n scallops
21	Our own little dragon (long xia) girl
104	Weekday outing difficult for me.
59	WAH bo jio~!~!~! =x
2	It's posted in forum
30	21 left. Hurry! 
2	Hmmm, 13 pax in total.  We can do 2 tables of 6 n 7, but i think it will be a squeeze.  i suggest doing 3 tables of 4 4 5.  I'll ask for 3 tables, then tat day you guys see if you wanna coddle or not   Imperial Exam Details  Date: Mon 17 Oct  Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant  Examinees  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Lovejade  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PPP (gd luck to the boss!)  10. Twtan  11. Natureview02  12. Streyer  13. Evilduxy
7	wats the scholar thingy?
1	jiak liao become scholar loh u want to join ???
8	unless u have 5 ,5,4 or best 5 ,5,5
4	We do 5 5 3 lor.  After they serve the additional 2 dishes to the 2 tables, then we can spread out to 4 4 5 so tat its more comfortable.  We can always share the additional seafood toufu n scallops.
14	where's the link ar?
3	yday went to the rise at mbs, wah not bad leh the food. 68++ for dinner. and their red wine is good!
0	starting work the next day. i give it a miss.
12	Here hor, NPNT leh.  But some of them here got burned at Rise. Nearly got someone jump from the Sky Park.
27	so don't say we nv jio u
2	any extra coupon?
6	I thought you already going?
19	means she getting more people to go
2	coupons increased. to 107
5	same marketing tactics again!
14	i think.. there are abt 1500 or 2000 coupons that will be released.
52	from 10 vouchers left become 107 now sorry, realized lovejade posted above
2	The Scholar Returns ...  Imperial Exam Details  Date: Mon 17 Oct  Time: 615 Bugis MRT, or 630 at the restaurant  Examinees  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Lovejade  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PPP (gd luck to the boss!)  10. Twtan  11. Natureview02  12. Streyer  13. Evilduxy   14. Mystery gas (TBC)-voucher will purchase on their own.  15. Mystery gas (TBC)-voucher will purchase on their own.
2	Just nice, 3 tables. () Date:  (Monday) Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01 Time: 6.30pm to 3am Price:  using voucher bought online 1. Toons 2. Dennyz 3. Lovejade 4. Donkey 5. Orlengjuz 6. Jeanette 7. Raven 8. Raven's Machi 9. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!) 10. Twtan 11. Natureview02 12. Streyer 13. Evilduxy 14. Mystery gas (TBC) 15. Mystery gas (TBC)
84	so it will be arranged in 5 per table to maximize the additional plate 2+2+2 = 6 plates
2	i starting to pity the boss...
13	we tried to help him by paying the full amount but he dun wan. too bad.
11	Y pity the boss?
4	() Date:  (Monday) Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01 Time: 6.30pm to 3am Price:  using voucher bought online 1. Toons 2. Dennyz 3. Evilduxy 4. Donkey 5. Orlengjuz 6. Jeanette 7. Raven 8. Raven's Machi 9. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!) 10. Twtan 11. Natureview02 12. Streyer 13. Mystery gas (TBC) 14. Mystery gas (TBC) 16. Lovejade 17. Lovejade guest (tbc) 18. Lovejade guest (tbc) 19. Lovejade guest (tbc) i dont mind seating separate since my guest will by shy. but i want my scallop hor.
1	anyone of you bought the extra ticket??
2	LOL. I'm quite interested ...
2	then join loh xin dong bu ru xing dong
11	haha, but need to buy 2 tix at one go.. i just need one..
5	I got the tix for you.  So count you in liao  ()  Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price:  using voucher bought online  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!)  10. Twtan  11. Natureview02  12. Streyer  13. Mystery gas (TBC)  14. Mystery gas (TBC)  15. Manyu   16. Lovejade  17. Lovejade guest (tbc)  18. Lovejade guest (tbc)  19. Lovejade guest (tbc)
82	I'm so Greatful to you!! Now gonna schedule for another buffet ..
74	Wah y so many mystery guest!!!! then like tt we only 19 ppl woh...no scallop for lovejade table
8	Ya hor, her table only 4 persons.
2	so many ppl going man!
50	drooling over the meh meh and oink oink already
1	it didnt say per set of 5. only mini 5. isnt it? and we are going as grp.
45	()  Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price:  using voucher bought online  more details here&gt;&gt;   1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Donkey  5. Orlengjuz  6. Jeanette  7. Raven  8. Raven's Machi  9. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!)  10. Twtan  11. Natureview02  12. Streyer  13. Mystery gas (TBC)  14. Mystery gas (TBC)  15. Manyu   16. Lovejade  17. Lovejade guest   18. Lovejade guest (tbc)  19. Lovejade guest (tbc)
513	ya lor ya lor....i dont want share moi share of scallop
26	Looking forward for it already.   I will bring my own chilli sauce
11	AUNTIE ALERT!!!
1	Oei .. at least i got share with you the low carb chilli right?   And I didn't ask to tar bao the left over oyster hor.
2	You tabao leftover oysters from buffets????    *salute*
2	Oo must bring n share so can see see
121	It didn't happen. Of course. Will bring to share.
16	home maded chilli?
3	if wanna see, take pic n post can le.
105	If it is home made by me, you guys willn't wanna eat liao
11	They never demand you to pay for the leftovers due to food wastage?
2	We didn't waste food.   It's the free items they gave and only few pieces left.   By the time I saw the left over, I was already full.   But we were kidding around if we can doggy bag it home to make oyster omelette
3	wah....i jus saw the timing:   Date: 17th October 2011 (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time:
29	Hahaha ... hotel 81 is just next door
157	I just copy the business hours from their website mah. You can eat till 3am if you want but I am going home as next day need to work.
73	Donkey so open-minded.
64	Mind can be opened.   But something better not, like mermaids
8	Don't understand.   Sigh. Tempted to go, but.....
9	u got 2 piggys to take care now~~ no makan outing for u the time being,,,
73	Question~ - my mother was asking me wats the buffet showing on Chn8 advertisment?? got a lot of variety one..  for this upcoming buffet show on chn 8
101	Look like Sheraton Hotel's Dining Room to me.
4	Hey, just a question. Saw 1 of ur threads tt 10@Claymore dinner buffet tt u guys went on 28sept2011 was only $48++. However, i saw on hungrygowher tt the dinner buffet is $52++. So which is the correct one?
927	Price increased to $52++ recently.
15	Sorry for the late post...
3	Some more...
17	Last part  The placed where we dined?
3	I am missing this already
62	Thanks Somatic3, I missed both the steam and deep fried fishes there.
65	I do miss their fishes as well
24	Yea i find it really good!!
6	Too bad we only ordered this as our last dish   Time to go again?
3	Kk scdh anyone? But only in nov
9	Best towards late Nov...hahah  But not sure if the UOB promo is still on boh   And let's keep it small this time - 8 is probably the best
10	End of the year please!
4	()  Date:   Location: Sichuan Douhua, UOB Plaza (beside Raffles Place MRT)  Time: 6.30pm to 10pm  Price: , with UOB's 4 pay 3 promo, $35.20 nett estimated due to misc charges like pickles, peanuts etc  1. Evilduxy  2. Carey  4. Jeanette  5.   6.  7.   8  Gonna End at 8
9	UOB promotion only till end Oct, Nov don't have liao.
22	tts sad  oct is too full alrdy im ok but i doubt others will want lol
2	` ME ME ME - Streyer, CHris, gas~ 3 pax~
8	me also want.... tbc
4	I still havnt go to SCDH b4, haha   since promo is ending in oct, hao come u guys scheduling in nov ar?
87	i told chris no promo also go~ the food seems nice...~ anyway he just left my office lol~
39	As long can eat ok alrdy what lol...doesn't matter
64	can open another table ????
3	since no promo, open another one lo~, who is the organiser anyway?
60	The first one in the list is the organiser.
26	bo prace niao SCDH.
22	The UOB promotion seems to be quite perpetual one...  They are likely to repeat it again
7	Yea, they actually have it on and off.  Since the promo is not available for nov, why not go to cathay instead?  Then maybe in dec if the promo is back on then return?
1	im okay with cathay also.....but cathay no lots of fish   but cathay got any promo?
3	no fish ????
1	Think they have 4 pay 3 too, but not sure if its still on.  Anyways, you guys decide bah, i just giving suggestion.  How is ssikekk?  As good as ever?  They haven't ban you yet?
0	That could work as well...hahah  As long as got good food, good company, I am game
1	ya... toons gave quite a good suggestion.
4	Got but their "whole" fish is only one serving niah  The rest of the fish dishes are in fillet form if I remember correctly...  The highlights were the pork chop and chicken
2	yeah the ever tender pork chop!! but sad the fish only got 1 n nose more le...here lose out to scdh..so isit to be cathay or scdh??? if cathay i will remake a new 1haven leh...maybe on the 26th they will ban me  im gonna go back to makan nxt wed again!
1	indeed... that sounds..... sad
1	next wed ?????
2	Wah - he is going back like every week siah...hahah  Wonder if he's trying to tackle the owner's daughter or something
3	not daughter...i think is co-worker  opps
4	Lol, you reporting there at least once a week wor.  Too bad thu 20 i got something already, else i join you if you dun mind the company ... then again, maybe not, cos i sorta prefer scholar over ssikkek.  More variety, n i really liked their bbq lamb skewer.
11	No wonder you made it to the buaya long hu pang
1	hmmm for me ssikkek is better...good for the mouth n also easy going on the eyes with lots of eye candies o.o ahah
13	tt was not real lor.... anyway all confirm cathay? if so i gonna change it to cathay any objections?
2	wah buffet thread moving sho fast..i need some good food..!
4	can i join cathay too? but i can only decide when date is confirm.... thanks!
1	when is cathay HMM!
3	long long long time ago, after first session at scdh alr told u its gd. but u not keen mah.
1	()  Date:   Location: The Cathay 2 handy road #02-01 the cathay / or UOB  Time: 6.30pm to 10pm  Price:   1. evilduxy  2. Carey  4. Jeanette  5. reserved  6. Streyer  7. Kazana_Chris  8. Chris's gas  9. tbc  10.  Gonna End at 10 so can 1 table no need separate like SCDH   those tt were in SCDH also wanna go cathay let me know...
2	i thinking lerh..i prefer scdh &gt;cathay hmm
6	evilduxy... how abt keeping the scdh list... and if no promo, then when date nearer then change to cathay?
382	oh i just bring over the whole list lor if gotch promo then go scdh if not i'll change it to cathay n those not interested can need not go then
5	added myself le
82	Don't end with 10 lah, with UOB promo, we need multiples of 4 for maximum discount...hahah  Think we can have 2 tables of 8 lor if there is enough interest
59	() Date:  Location: The Cathay 2 handy road #02-01 the cathay / or UOB Time: 6.30pm to 10pm Price:  1. evilduxy 2. Carey 4. Jeanette 5. reserved 6. Streyer 7. Kazana_Chris 8. Chris's gas 9. tbc 10. raven1019 11. twtan (Cathay only)
45	()  Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price:  using voucher bought online  more details here&gt;&gt;   1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Orlengjuz  5. Jeanette  6. Raven  7. Raven's Machi  8. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!)  9. Twtan  10. Natureview02  11. Streyer  12. Mystery gas (TBC)  13. Mystery gas (TBC)  14. Manyu   15. Lovejade  16. Lovejade guest   17. Lovejade guest (tbc)  18. Lovejade guest (tbc)  Withdraw my name.   Will pass the chilli sauce to Toons.    Enjoy the buffet
16	16 is overkill too much le...  unless can squeeze in i table 12...  anyway see how first cause some ppl might not want cathay also
7	Can open to EDMW also mah...hahah  Just ask Beta and he can bring the whole village
5	oo then hor i ish make sure i mai sit only 4 ppl like last time i cant order much cause not much ppl eat
86	haha, if Beta brings his whole village of edmw zehzehs, he mah lai ai jiak wif u all sia!
43	If Cathay then can I bring chewtoy?
36	SCDH also can bring chewy
25	nooooooooo
29	beta bring his mei mei here
8	But you are not coming for Cathay right? hahah
150	She is the type that make an appearance at the last minutes one.
8	Good luck to all the lobsters, crabs and prawns when she turns up.
6	If all the EDMW powerhouse come, then twtan will grow more white hair and BeeJay needs to put 4 mods to monitor this thread.
0	Beta can flood the outing with all his girls leh... can ask a favour from all you buffet peeps, help me like my picture here please...  yes sexposed myself :O
24	But I going Cathay, no such stuffs for her to wack.
66	u better dun lick the pork choP!! haha
10	The mental image isn't very pretty. Is it the same pork chop we are thinking of?
112	You can order your own plate mah.
107	Don't go there bro
7	hannah, hannah ... dun forget to branja me buffet ~
23	i hope not...i think i know what u r thinking he's alrdy there!
43	I win then talk... losing by 40 likes now. sian.
221	Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price:  using voucher bought online  more details here&gt;&gt;   1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Orlengjuz  5. Jeanette  6. Raven  7. Raven's Machi  8. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!)  9. Twtan  10. Natureview02  11. Streyer  12. Mystery gas  13. Mystery gas  14. Manyu   15. Lovejade  16. Lovejade guest   17. Lovejade guest (tbc)  18. Lovejade guest (tbc)
234	they shy to come lahs.. that day that one is one off i ask them come. Those fellas my groupies.. Normally got more zehzehs and korkors. But that day only few of us free nia.
37	anybody has any idea what is the original price? feel like bringing chewtoy go
7	S$ 39
13	that is not the usual price.
84	The usual price is about $22 if you walk in.
5	Saw this on the Facebook site from the Scholar's Hotpot Facebook site It looks like $19.80 but I cannot read the chinese word.
3	Yea, its around $22 nett.  The $19.80 is without the bbq option which you have to add $2 or something.  So using the voucher, you essentially save around $2 plus you get those additional dishes.
506	Too lazy to explain why. But walk in price is 22.
2	What is that ??
2	ranking list of today wanton eating contest
2	O. Wanton buffet.
0	CP waton eating compy~~ cashcow and raven top eaters~
47	ya loh , but today de lunch nicer to eat
78	Is evil going ritz carlton super brunch tomo ?
36	hmmm dunno.....secret...
2	Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price:  using voucher bought online  more details here&gt;&gt;   1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Orlengjuz  5. Jeanette  6. Raven  7. Raven's Machi  8. PinG_PonG_PianG (gd luck to the boss!)  9. Twtan  10. Natureview02  11. Streyer  12. Mystery gas  13. Mystery gas  14. Manyu   15. Lovejade  16. Lovejade guest   17. Lovejade guest    18. Lovejade guest
51	i also voted..... hope he dont forget too......
802	i won't forget... you can quote me first. dennis can come find me if i back out... i'm losing by 30 likes anyway  every time I catch up with the other guy, he'll get more likes. damn sian zzz.
127	I might not be able to make it. Anyone wanna take over?
6	u all read this Sunday papers gt another kopitiam french food store open at Queen Street? Anyone wanna go try.
16	seems not bad and quite reasonable leh... dono that one or saveur better
0	yea.. one day can go try if u all keen.
35	The one near to Kwan Im temple?
92	is it this one? la cuisson?  the name sound very classy.  the address is below.  Block 269, Queen Street #01-236, Singapore 182269, near Illuma
13	For those who wants to meet me at Bugis MRT, pls do so at 6.15pm.  Else, meet you directly at the restaurant.  If you can't make it at last min, let me know asap.  Thanks.  Date:  (Monday)  Location: 23 Middle Road #01-01  Time: 6.30pm to 3am  Price: $19.50 nett  1. Toons  2. Dennyz  3. Evilduxy  4. Orlengjuz  5. Jeanette (TBC)  6. Raven  7. Raven's Machi  8. PinG_PonG_PianG  9. Natureview02  10. Streyer  11. Mystery gas  12. Mystery gas  13. Manyu   14. Lovejade  15. Lovejade guest   16. Lovejade guest  17. Lovejade guestHi, jeanette, its okay.  I will take over your voucher.  Let me know by today if you will be going okay?
12	Bigmonkey n DaYellowDuckie, i tink you guys like indian food.  You might be interested in this :-  Btw, monkey, the KTV with the voucher which you said not very good is topone at Bugis right?
2	toons sooooo ........ lets get denny to bring $20 of 50 cents coins....
2	You still owe me 10 cents.  So tomorrow you pay me $19.60
20	tomo i remember to bring $20, u remember to bring 40 cents... TIA
3	ya. the song selection v sensitive. the server is very attentive, its the song selection system that sucks. u spend half the time running thru song selection screen cos once ur hand accidentally rest on the wrong area, it go back to the main screen, which is v irritating.
17	topone not that bad la. i actually prefer it to kbox.
1	where is your name?
5	heh. i can go already.  please bring along 50cent coin for me ok.
4	As mentioned earlier, change is on a first come first serve basis.  Bring exact amt ... else if i run out of 50 cent coins, then too bad lor.
1	btw, just to check, there the aircon good or not... scared hot
1	hokay, tge queen of ktv have spoken.
4	good, won't get sweaty.
9	can u find my name if not may not be inside
3	oooh. thats good swz?
1	i seldom sing..   you all going topone ah? i got the member
5	so clever sia
30	wah after buffet go sing k?
4	sounds like a gd plan to see how evil's opera skill is...
32	i sound like a god......if u r deaf
4	me wu yin bu quan , gnet can prove
15	neh hear before.
23	i sing song , people will become deaf or ear drum will have issue due to NID
4	their ordering menu  special items (limit 1 order per pax)  drinks (extra charges)
35	special item (wagyu beef)
126	The wagyu beef looks good.  Taste great too? The one below is their normal beef?
21	wagyu beef - the fats was lost in the soup. so it taste like normal beef.   can't remember the bottom item.
94	go fatfish bo jio!
368	later going scholar mah, dun wan later u over eat.
1	today not touching wanton
22	Is this nice   http://www.juztoday.com/deal.php?id=145&amp;c=dealsletter&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;utm_source=dealsletter&amp;utm_campaign=deal145
142	Their Thai food is not bad - just that some of the better dishes are just limited to one-time order...
62	anyone wanna go back Amara Element? hehe.. long time no go ~
15	wooo 15.. just nice.
23	Yea, 15 is a nice number.  3 tables of 5 each, not too cramp.  The added dishes as long as =&gt; 5 in total can liao, dun have to be =&gt; 5 per table.
1	I reach alreadi ..... zzz can u guys come earlier ?  Lol
15	wah so fast? i still at home. leaving now
32	we meeting at 6.30pm
2	wah lar i missed it!! damn!!! is today somemore!
12	u can jus come..  sky is still bright.
2	jus go lo. the more the merrier.
230	oh well next time  not very ready to move right now...
26	$17.50 instead of $26.95 for Authentic Thai Ala-Carte LUNCH BUFFET: 28 Dishes to choose from + Free Flow Pineapple Rice + Calamansi Drinks at SuanThai @ Somerset!
30	Denny, toons, evil, monkey, has steamboat standard dropped ?
3	Yes, lamb skewers not as nice.  Only the ones with the bones got tat lambey taste, the rest all bland.  Crabs like slightly smaller n not as fresh.  The rest abt the same to me.
3	the lamb wasnt as good as the first time tt was what i felt! i still prefer my ssikkek
9	So it's true after all, after Toons went, the quality goes down.
9	i thought we all know hw it goes le....anyway who u went hog's cafe with!!!
6	Went with mystery guest.
2	omg donkey?? she also missing~~~~~!!!!! dun tell me iS MUM!
0	i go n pom pom first come back chat
3	feel like something missing. the lamb skewer macham rubber band. the pork not as juicy. the scallop is the same as before - good.   ot: the prawn shells' graveyard  have something sticking out at the bottom right corner. i wonder what is that, anyone took picture of it?
2	Monkey got do homework or not?
0	ginna, mai bdbj quote my nick if I did not attend any official outing, else I hv no choice but to ask $ *ow to put u up on the tree again.
2	i think evil has it.
2	some hairy thingy?
0	dont anyway bring other pple into picture n mislead ignorant pple ok?
1	i think evil removed the hair before taking the picture
1	i was horrified by PPP. haha.
1	who's mCchicken was it...i got the pic..taken...hmm later upload!
1	do you regret sitting opposite him?
1	You also got do homework?
1	first time ar?
5	ps, only one picture in the post above yours, i not sure if anyone else taken any.
1	now i know why denny say pity the store le.... i dont dare sit with him in future
0	if he can carry me up first then say k i nv ~ ~
0	i think anyone who look at him eat will lose appetite. see him eat also will become full
0	only of the prawn graveyard cause tts just amazing
3	BO regret leh... just stare at him eating lo. BTW, who are you there just now?first time see...donnoe he's really that hungry or not
1	ohh. i'm not there  ppp is never full.
1	this is hilarious... the cutest one of all.
1	he does. when he eat meat. at least he will say " i am full le. cannot eat anymore" then i will like think " huh... ok. his stomach has limited space"
0	LOL u dunno who was she just nw? lol
1	nope....he'll say ok im sick of prawns then carry on to meat after tt back to prawns again!
4	quick upload but den, it's very interesting to watch P_P_P  coz simple food taste jin yummy from the way he eat it
0	thats provided when graveyard not there..... PPP: do u wana go back there to eat?
4	i never heard him say he full before... whenever i ask if he's had enough, he say ok la.. then he will start looking for food again  i think so too!
7	graveyard of prawn plus something xtra
3	eeh ... siang wack prawns until drop hair?
3	ok i know who liao.
2	Its my second time there today   its not bad but i wont go back there any time soon..
1	2nd time??????? how come leh?
2	how you know??
3	i alr say.. cutest of all le mah.
1	first time nothing eat then go try try first luh
9	when???              ?
1	last week? but dont know why they didnt have that lamb with a small bone inside that time
437	evil gave the clue "her" there only got 2 HWZ ladies . one lovejade and one idontknowwhothenameis.  the one sitting beside lovejade should be her friend(guest) so it's not you Going to sleep liao k bb
26	Thanks Toon for organising the get-together steamboat &amp; BBQ at the Scholar..  Ha ha.. now can put the face to some of the names in the forum.   The food selection is reasonable for the price we paid.  Was surprised that their BBQ selection was quite widespread.. Guess.. the steamboat owner would say just break even with all these heavy eaters..  P.s.  I think PPP stands for Prawn Prawn and Prawns..
4	You sneakily went alone?
24	He went with Toons, Donkey and a few others.
3	Looks like you got to know PPP very well last night...hahah  It could also stand for the other sort of "prawn"   That XDD is not simple
3	Why you never go?   Not only ppp not simple... Evil also not simple.. He went around disturbing ppl with an image of the famous McChicken
1	Why you think we call him bottomless pit?   But only for meat and prawns - he should be bo jiak carbs too
28	ppp = pork and prawn pit  ????
1	Nope. He didn't go with us.
3	I think more like pork, prawn, porn
3	He will say he is full but he will still continue eating.   I kena con many times by him before   But i simple love to eat with him cos he take the guilt out of the amount of food i eat
2	u all not simple sia
27	What abt beef n lamb ? He also eats right ?
20	i is solo i ytd no eat lamb..beef little bit
75	Wah...that's a first...  You are also the meh meh killer woah
1	.
0	i forgot that i ate the lamb too! the bbq one
0	1 time off item
0	1 time off item
1	raven di di de dan dan
55	become like that finally
14	food looks good.........
2	wah raven, whats the damage?
4	Using voucher so $19.50 nett.
14	Think must still plus S$2 to get the BBQ right?
4	nope. for the voucher u dont have to pay $2 extra
23	Then quite worth it...hahah  Still think I prefer Ssekkei though
56	just went recently. the food was mediocre and some was bad. Won't go back again.   the pineapple rice tasted like plain white rice coated with yellow colouring.
3	U all see papers. Triple Three got Hokkaido specials. No price lehs. Lolol
47	Which newspaper?
10	ok gam xia...
33	Dunno if the 1:1 promo applicable for this or not.
7	Wow $138+++, yes the DBS card/POSB card promo applies for this from Mon-Sun also.  You going or organising?
4	Welcome back.   Next makan outing, please bring photo to show us
17	Neither
11	They featured toons' review...hahah  Not that he gave much of a review - must be desperate
29	Looks gd but no meat again??
60	will try as i did not take photos (all taken by my friends). Not much on food though.guess as much cause no meat ha ha
34	Thanks for the warning.
89	you never say i never notice. i only know toons went to eat before and review not bad so i posted the deal.
4	Wah liew, i also never notice   My original post got pics wor.  Anyways, my comments were for their lunch.  I went for their steamboat b4. Its really very very little stuff one, think only about 12 items.  Seafood fresh, but the meats quality not so good.  The good thing abt it was it comes with 2 lunch vouchers worth $11 each, so the steamboat is machiam foc one.  This new steamboat + bbq promo, no idea how it is ...
5	Bring on mon   Their wagyu beef roast is actually very good ... tat n their seabass/cod fish.  I dun mind going for their normal dinner to feast on those 2 items, but i dun wanna go for this promo n pay $89 for crabs n stuff, even if its king crabs.
1077	That's why I say they must be desperate to use your non- review lol
22	anyone i interested?
12	can help me buy 1? when u go, jio me
39	Doesnt look that enticing...
6	Take note of the fine print. Not valid for seafood n drink. Only mon to thur.
26	buy liao, thank you for your interest.   See you soon.
1072	thank you for highlighting. ^_^  i can't take seafood. for $10.50, usually buffet serve diluted syrup drinks, which doesn't really matter if they serve drinks in this deal.
106	If you keen, we can go in nov after this promo.  I think twtan might be interested too.
39	whats good over there?
50	Yes, I am interested, never been to Triple 3 before.
2	Wagyu roasted beef, seabass (cod taste-alike) n the sashimi.  Was about a yr since i last went though.
0	Been there for their Sunday Brunch, in my opinion, for the price, the Sunday Brunch is more value for money. However unlike most brunches, for champange you have to top up $25.  The one unique item is the Jamon Iberico Bellota that they have. Freshly shaved straight from the leg.
90	eh ... hao come we r meeting at tanah merah mrt ar? shdnt it be expo mrt?
10	so anybody up for scdh in nov?
14	Heehee, yea, you're right.  It should be expo mrt instead of tanah merah mrt.  My bad
10	i din quite enjoy my last triple 3 dinner buffet. although i am on the 1 for 1, i still dun think its worth it.
36	k, see u guys at expo mrt den.  I got bring camera tonite, so
152	anyone want to go NTU to catch  to grill?
5	50% off Buffet Dinner at Window on the Park Restaurant, Holiday Inn Singapore Orchard City Centre (Includes Festive Delicacies); only $37.67 nett instead of $75.33
80	$21 per pax for Ala Carte Lunch Buffet at Senki Japanese Restaurant in Kiliney (Worth $30)
35	wonder if kushi bar got groupon voucher for buffet bo
17	We bought about a month or two ago. Still haven't go to eat yet.
12	they are so cute running away from u.
9	Forgot if toons got buy for me as well or not haha
4	they spotted PP_P lah
12	Can check with him, I heard he got Excel spreadsheet to keep track of all the vouchers bought.
32	so professional sia
10	Expires on 24 nov 2011.  Usable for lunch only (any day except for PH n eves).  We settle Nihon first, then we schedule this for a sat in nov?  I dun have available sats in oct liao.  Senki|3|21|24-Nov-11|lunch only exclude PH n eves|donkey n twtan|nNope, only bought 3 @ $21 for twtan, donkey n myself.  You wanna join us?  It will be lunch on a sat in nov.  If yes, i buy a voucher for you.Me coupon junkie! Joaquim expires on 23 nov, i keeping track, heehee.
13	Can we do on 19 nov?  5 nov ah tan not in SG and 12 nov not a good day for me as I got another office buffet to attend.   What irony, you keep track but not mrt track lor
5	12 Nov weekend if nothing goes wrong i will be in Cebu too *cross fingers ... n toes*  19 or 26 Nov okay for me too, we can do the 6th ave brazilian churrasco on 1 sat n senki on another.  Let me know the date for Senki asap as i worry abt its availability.  Hmmm, Nov we need to clear senki, shiu yakiniku, scholar n Joaquim ... busy busy busy ...  Kaoz, your joke veri the cold wor ...   Paiseh, eat full full, all the blood flow to my tummy ... i go west, you go east, i board the train this side, so you must be boarding the train at the other side lor, logical right?
5	Haha... He wanna go airport board airplane home
4	If he goes airport, I don't mind. The problem is, he fly me aeroplane there.  Bluff yang chewren lor.  Ask me take the train and I ended at changi airport.
12	If it expire on 24 nov then 19 nov is the only sat available liao.   Book for 19 nov first.   At tan, you ok for 19 nov?
11	sorry for being lazy but can anyone recommend me some buffet priced at about 60$ after CC discount? so im actually looking at buffet with cc promo  thanks!!!
363	Nice meeting donkey for the 1st time. never expect fit &amp; saki hk superstar to behave like tis  u shd hv taken the bus back wif me
37	If it's not too much of a bother - I don't mind That one is a weekday dinner right?  Heard not very crowded but suspect it may get more crowded towards the expiry...  I have got a spare coupon for that too
115	19th Nov I got wedding dinner to attend in JB. Or can we go on a Sunday?
0	Is that before or after including me?   I forgot liao.
2	The pleasure was mine
1	That means left with 20 nov only.   I am ok.
2	You all went for Auntie Kim already? I haven't heard any curses.    Any of you bought momoji vouchers?
10	We going Kim on 29 Oct.   We bought and use up the momiji voucher last week liao.   You have? Me and Toons dont mind take over
6	u can pay abit more for weekend too
2	OK, let settle for 20th Nov then. Toons you ok with the date?
1	Before - so if include you, then just nice
8	Both of you should be taking MRT together then change at Tanah Merah MRT.
10	Hokie dokie, thanks.
4	And so i learned, the hard way   Btw we ended dinner at 9plus ytd and was too late to go to the JL expo sale. I will be going later today for the chocolate.
22	Okay, then i go ahead n book Sun 20 Nov liao.Errr, actually her voucher is with me. Your senki voucher bought.
10	Sorry Carey, my mistake, Toons is holding on to my voucher so you still got 1 extra. Jio PPP?
11	Next come the fried stuffs  Tink tis is sotong, quite chewy to bit  Tis one shd be oysters  pumpkin, nice &amp; smooth  Ebi (I like) &amp; soft shell crabs (I feel is not nice)  chicken  mushroom
32	beef &amp; lamb before they   zoomed into the lamb for those wif poor eyesights, magnify the beef to make u all gian. dunno which is which, juz eat   Shabu shabu  dunno simi broth, quite weak taste with light sweetness.  Ice-cream  their ice cream taste more like sherbet.  we 3  liao, only ordered 1 scoop to share   but I swear we nvr
14	Thanks Toons  So I am back to one extra Joaquim voucher...hahah
2878	Correction.  It's beef and pork, no meh meh.   And it's not  cos we had soup.   Also, i no share the ice cream hor cos i never eat.   Only left you and toons to ....
53	WB too... i also hope to resume my hunt for good food... awww....   regards,  wacky
10	next month i going si chuan dou hua , u ai mai join
2	wat date...?  regards, wacky
0	No cc discount next month wor.
9	bo discount liao r ?
2	or wait for another deal lor..... sure got other things to eat...   regards,  wacky
354	Yep, till this month only.
9	I received a call from Peony Jade.  They having 1-for-1 weekday lunch promotion.  Anyone interested?  Its my number 2 for Chinese ala cart buffet after Pearl River Palace.
122	feel like going here to makan on next month 1 of the sat (shima goodwood park)
121	My sis-in-law was just telling me about it But only weekday - very hard to jiak
455	btw what is the plan for wed ????
122	6pm at Novena Ville for Ssekkei?
40	Wah, got free flow steamed sea bass, fried soon hock, pork ribs n stewed lamb wor, plus with the 1 for 1, its abt $20 nett for weekday lunch?     When does the promo end?  If Nov, take leave also must go
20	Take MC to go also can.   I just realised my MC records for this year is only 1
27	when is the next outing!!
13	tis is for the PJ at clarke quay rite? anybody tried the buffet dinner at keppel? saw there is 1 for 1 oso
42	WAH!!!! SOUNDS GOOD.
1	toons shu shu are you toking about the pork ribs i am thinking about???
8	Please organize one lunch outing to Peony Jade in late Nov can? hahah  Don't mind taking 1/2-day leave to jiak
1	Got any details on wat you need to enjoy the 1:1 promo?  Which cc?
2	1/2 dae leave hao can jiak lunch buffet?
13	The Clark Quay branch. No specific credit cards. It's not $20 nett la. She told me $40+ so I think $25 per pax should be safer. But damn worth it. The last promotion I had was 4 free 1. Per pax about $30-35.
13	Hmmm, was told need NTUC card.  Price is $42.80++ plus add another $2.50 for tea n towel.  The menu indicated lunch is $28.80 though.  Dunno how old the menu is or whether they changed it though.
4	Oh yes. NTUC card. I old man, so forgot about that. No worries. I have the card. I don't have citibank, hsbc or cimb cards but the rest of you have, so we are basically covered in the area of cards.
3	Old man, ask you hor, i am holding on to the black plus card, not the silver plus card, can use a not?
6	Not sure. I have both so I did not clarify. Should be the same. Both got link points etc. Think the plus card more benefits.
11	I got NTUC Plus card not cc though.
4	I call them and they explain that silver plus got more benefit and must pay membership fee e.g. union member.    Black plus is for link points. It's to replace the old MAX card.   So far, i never pay membership fee before. Got it when i bought NTUC shares long time ago. Don't know can use at the resturant a not.
3	Wah, zeh zeh play shares one. Uncle buy groceries. One month can hit $1k. That's why have the card. Think got some rebates or dunno what.
8	That is why got burn, now no money   Wah, you every month spent so much   Milk powder and diapers is it?   Every year, they will sent you a cheque for the rebate amount. Yours must be a lot then.   So when you wanna go peony?
5	Why cannot?  I can leave at 12pm
9	Either that or they jacked up the price for the 1-for-1 promotion so that actual discount is around 10% niah   Sounds like Triple Three...hahah
22	i also got the Plus card.  U think if i sneak off for 2 hours lunch can make it?  Clark quay near my office, so i eat from 12 to 2pm, go back office a bit late.
1	Think princess trying this Friday right?
11	$28.80++ was the price for lunch previously.  They increased it to $42.80++ along with making the soon hock a 1 order dish.  No more cod too   Remember to add $2.50 for tea n towels.  So will be around $28.20 nett.
16	Peony Jade de 7 dishes only 1 order/table nia   liddat go alone jiak better, can hv 1 abalone, 1 crab, 1 fish &amp; 1 duck all by ownself
3	so fast deleted post lol.
2	Ya lor - make it until like then lousy siah...hahah  It's okay, I will give it a miss
51	Still got free flow of barrumudi or something.  See wat the guinea pigs say lor
58	Looks like you giving it a miss. I am disappointed with the revised menu. Last time looks much better. Sianz.
30	Yea, disappointed by the moving of the fried soon hock to 1 order only, n the removal of the cod fish. I still dun mind trying it, but in Nov lor.  My schedule very packed for Oct liao.  Wait also can see how those going earlier find it
119	Got to also remember their eating patterns and tastes are different
992	NTUC card usually refers to the union card, the one where can put photo
37	Advance party going this Friday.  I remembered the wasabi prawns are good.  Only Defu Lane's Seafood Paradise is better. But thats a restaurant, not buffet.  Oh, I remembered the dragon beard prawns were very good too, but the new menu don't have anymore.  So sad.
18	The menu is still decent for its price lar.  Let us know how it goes?  If its good, we'll do one in Nov and/or Dec too   Bon Appetit!
28	going anywhere to jiaks?
2	Do a Sunday brunch in Nov leh. I see your Marriott outings, very gian but cannot go.
1	Now they got different promotions for different seafood item on every weekday at 30% off.
18	Marriott is probably still under renovation - not sure, need to check...hahah  Easy to get kakis for Marriott Brunch
11	I'm a must in for Marriott lol
40	i wanna go lehs, i missed this out few times le..
3	any1 wanna go Element Amara?
113	See, so fast got 2 responses liao...hahah  We will fix up a date in Nov bah
0	Boss, put up a list for Marriott Sunday Brunch in November. I am in.
3	Anyone keen?  Thinking of getting the dinner voucher for $12.50 instead of $11 (lunch) so tat can use on weekday nites instead of just weekend lunch.
5	Just a suggestion - might want to call to ensure that the renovation is done plus get the new menu (if there are any changes)
8	I am in. Lunch and dinner I also ok. Just include me and piglet.
5	Settle what score? Don't sabo me leh. You now the hottest chick in EDMW. So many sagas and threads involving you. Wait all the white knights go after me how?
0	Need to confirm with hotel first if the Sunday Brunch will be back and if there is any change in menu.
31	I tot I aldy deleted my post   u noe wat u hv done   Toons, please buy 1 coupon for me as well, thanks.
3	Can't join you all for Friday.  But do give review. I been to the one at keppel for the dim sum before and I quite like it or rather, my staff likes it very much.
21	Waiting for you to jio and review the new menu for equinox lunch leh.
4	i tried new menu at Equinox twice liaos.. hehe.. i got soft copy.. hehe..  next week u all wanna go try the Element?
2	Really, pm me?  Is the yucky lamb shank still on the menu?   Lunch or dinner are u thinking of?
9	Wah lau, bo jio me go one.
4	count me in!
1	Kahlan also keen to go Elements. I'll go if there are BOTH steamed chilean seabass n the jackfruit cake.
1	Me too, I have not tried the Jackfruit cake yet.
2	will the jackfruit smell super power.. much stronger than durian.
1	u all wanna go bo? the Element? when u all can? lol.. yeah im going therefor the seabass! chumpadak cake nt jackfruit. hehe..
0	chumpadak cake ??? what is that ?
1	actually same like last time.. i only thing changes are the main menu n foie gras nia,, i whatsapp u the menu la. hehe  dating mahs. hehe
6	another variant of jack fruit.. the smaller more pungent one,
4	My bad, should be chepadak cake.  Must call to ask wor.  Even the steamed chilean seabass is not always available.  There is once i went, i called to ask if there is chilean seabass or not, they told me got.  End up its the fried version ... not nice one.  So must really specify 'steamed chilean seabass'
8	But only on that day can verify right?
17	Yea.  Can fix a date first, then on the day itself call to confirm.  Then whoever interested can then decide if still wanna go or not lor.
1	which day good for u all? weekend im okay also. This coming Sunday? or Saturday?
4	Me ok with coming Saturday or Sunday.
2	I only free on wed 2 Nov.  You guys go ahead then
4	I am keen too help me buy also thanks
1	i'm fine with 2 November Wed as I'm busy this weekend.
5	u serious?   liddat I hao to enjoy my dinner?
3	when is the proposed date for the marina square korean deal? this year or next year?
3	then weekdays lo.. im ok also.
1	Weekends and weekdays got price difference?
3	im nt sure.. lol.. always go weekday de.
2	Yup, me too - as long as got lots of meat
17	anyone keen this weekend chinese tea??
7	This weekend we got Auntie Kim also
2	Prepares twtan and forum for avalanche of curses after Auntie Kim's outing.
2	Hopefully in November.  November I am jobless.
2	Toons, you want to fast hand fast leg buy first?  Wait don't have liao all cry.
1	wei, marina bay bbq price leh, not sure if shd buy more &amp; stock
1	Donkey's DA BOSS.    I would think standards around there.  I had been to the Clark Quay one and I like it.  Pity several items taken off liao.  Actually, princess wants to do it in November instead?  That means next Friday rather than this Friday.  See the November menu?
3	Got expiry what.  I buy so many vouchers till blur.  End up have to let go some and waste some.
4	tis one till feb 2012 leh.  u nvr ask toons to send u his database template so tat u can moniter at ease   can even plot chart to do a 12 mth buffet vouchers analysis too!
30	My maid is my staff mah  Nov would be much better cos this week really got too many buffet liao. I will definately join you if in Nov. Is there a diff in the oct and nov menu? I like keppel club cos quiet and so service is good.
6	I was told there is price diff.   Fw to Twtan n toons to upload later.   Then maybe u guys can email to check on november menu but I definitely wouldnt be able to join
7	Should be this yr bah.  Prolly mid/late nov to early dec.  If you keen, propose a date bah.Yea, if go in nov, i'm onz.  I dun mind the current menu.  Not as good as the previous one, but for $28, its okay lar.  Anyways the ntuc promo until end of yr.
11	Heehee, bought liao.  Bui bui uncker fast when it comes to grabbing good food n cheap food deals   Bought for :-  Carey  Manyu  MUM *noted PM  Evil  Piggy  Toons  K, can't confirm, but i was told we BBQ ourselves (not literally  ) via a grill plate on the table n not pass to the staff as stated in the writeup.  Also, for carey, evil, manyu n toons - pork belly is part of the ala carte dishes we can order!   Lastly, i bought the lunch voucher.  Was told tat we can just top up the difference if we wanna do dinner instead.  Hope she not smoking moi
2	her "difference" meaning..?? the original price one? or original price of lunch minus original dinner
77	unable to make it this year already. many vouchers to clear. enjoy yourselves !
1	Thanks Toons   Now got another Korean BBQ to look forward to...hahah
119	You have a point...hahah  If it's run by Tiongs, we got to fear for the worst
8	Thanks for the warning.  I called to check after reading your posts.  Firstly, i think its operated by koreans.  However, you guys are indeed correct.  The difference they are referring is the difference between the original price n not the difference between the voucher price.  So using the lunch voucher for a weekday dinner, we'll end up paying $1.50 more than compared to if we bought the dinner voucher straight.  Oh well, for those who wants to go for dinner n dun want the lunch voucher, just let me know.  Dun worry abt the vouchers i bought.  Will try to get groupon to give me a refund or i'll just use it myself.  You'll have to buy the dinner voucher yourself though.  Sorry abt it.  Let me know.  Carey  Manyu  MUM *noted PM  Evil  Piggy
6	cannot get groupon to re-issue u the correct voucher?
4	Will call them on thu.  Thanks.
4	I am ok with either lunch or dinner   You can also sell me the lunch vouchers - I can get my colleagues to go   We can then get the dinner vouchers
2	I am ok with lunch. If someone pulls out, Mrs (^@^)" wants to go. Since Carey also ok with lunch, we should be alright to go ahead.
5	That bad? I no buy the voucher.
0	erm.... very confusing. so what is the conclusion?
2	I can always be the back up esp for lunch.
12	I have the voucher but I think nothing can be worst than Indian times *shiver*
8	The food is ok. Just that very limited choices and quite abit are carbo and veg which Carey don't fancy. But if you like Korean food, it's authentic.
12	I will pass on the carbs too. As long as it's authentic, it's worth a shot. Btw, few weeks ago, I just had the worst Kim chi soup from a Korean restaurant at bt timah. Don't think Kim will bottom that bah.
24	I don't like kimchi so I wouldn't have ordered that. I had 2 portions of ginseng chicken soup. It's ok, not the best I have had. Grilled mackerel is ok, also had 2 portions but it's a tad salty. I don't have much other choices to choose from. The BBQ beef short ribs is nice but only can have one portion.
0	so the lunch isit wkend or wkday? if wkday count me out i cant only dinner for wkday wkend both lunch or dinner im alright
3	Contrary to popular belief, I also like to eat veggies   Kimchi is also my favourite - fermented veggies very good for gut bacteria
17	no worries Toons, we can always go for lunch. I still wan mine.  btw, not advisable to get refund as normally take very long to get back yr marnee 1.
11	Si la. Like that mrs (^@^)" cannot go liao.
26	wah liao, yuan lai u r eyeing on my voucher?   to tink I still hv intention to help u humour yr piglet so tat u can eat in peace, mei xiang dao u   nao pui! pui! pui! liao
10	piggy, just go groupon and buy the voucher now lor?
477	shalome so clever.. anyway, he is jus joking abt eyeing missumuch de coupon la... lol.. missumuch, dont take it to heart
95	It's ok la.. i'm free anyway!!
35	Thanks guys.  So it will tentatively be a weekend lunch.  I will try to change it to dinner voucher on wed with groupon.
6	No problem   Thanks for taking the trouble to get the vouchers for us
3	Eh, like that should I get 1 voucher for Mrs (^@^)" or 2 (including myself)?  Not sure when if it will be lunch or dinner.
59	Anybody interested in the cash dinning vouchers below can pm me your contact number for discount. Use them just like real cash.  Uploaded with
24	wkend lunch even better...
481	if weekend lunch i joining
3	u got buy the voucher meh?every1 is joking de la, haha
906	$23.80 instead of $49.30, 52% off Chong Qing Hotpot Buffet + Free Flow Dim Sum + Free Flow Home-made Green Bean Drink at Chuan Jiang Hao Zi. Available at West Coast Plaza and Smith Street.
16	Global Kitchen outing 2? That was my 1st buffetlicious outing.
1	but muz go in nov lor   suits u nia   tat time u all pay hao much for the sat dinner huh?  1 for 1 oso rite?
4	is the food global kitchen good...??  but den with such deals going on... i wonder if the quality will suffer or not...   regards,  wacky
14	u haven burst yr buffet budget for tis yr meh?
7	just to get some feedback from u guys.. have anyone try before Plaza Brasserie Buffet at park royal hotel? how is it? thinking of trying it..
36	I tried a couple of time before, food wise not bad. Love the braised sea cucumber. Last went about 2-3yrs ago.
13	Wednesday dinner and weekends dinner still ok.   Anyone interested? That one I missed the crab legs, lobster chunks and rum &amp; raisin ice cream.
3	Our Prince of Buffet today very busy, I waiting for his reply.
1	guys. anyone got link to goodwood park buffet review?  if goodwood park, melt the world cafe, todai, triple 3 and straits cafe can choose one which to choose?  thanks for advice.  (mainly interested in big crabs/crayfish/lobster. got durian desserts is major plus too)
2	Tat time we went is seafood buffet, this one never indicate.  Might want to ask for menu first.
14	budget i don't have one...   as for KPI... i need to review again... kinda lost track liao...   regards,  wacky
22	it's stated only 50 vouchers to redeem per night so i guess quality shld be quite controlled. just need to make reservation early since slots are so limited per day.
16	Power. No budget. I wish I can say that.
14	Yesterday I went for Yan Ting's dim sum brunch. The food overall notch too bad but dim sum dishes better than ala carte, though I liked the deep fried soon hock  After discount ish $86.55 for 2 pax. Worth it
10	Huh?  How come their dim sun brunch got fried soon hock one?  1 order or unlimited?  Errr, you meant the buffet dim sum better or ala carte dim sum better?  Rare to find buffet dim sum better than ala carte, heehee.  Lastly, you got the menu?  Can post if have?  Thanks.
45	lol well i dun set a budget... doesn't mean it's unlimited...   i must compare the price vs quality and decide if it's worth paying that amount of $$ den i would consider going lor....   regards,  wacky
71	im finally going Jaan to jiaks.. lets see after Andre what it is like..
13	is the below worth?? when getting gmarket food deals? but i don't really understand the vouchers valid til date and the redemption date. i have yet to get any vouchers from g-market This BigDeal includes: $40 worth of vouchers in denominations: $1 x 4 vouchers $2 x 3 vouchers $5 x 4 vouchers $10 x 1 voucher Vouchers are valid till 27 January 2012. Perfect for buying Christmas presents for friends and love ones, or purchase the voucher as a Christmas gift! Grab them now before they run out! The Fine Print
8	Unlimited soon hock but 1 order of Lobster + 1 order of shark's fin soup. The rest is unlimited. The dim sum brunch menu is actually a combination of their ala carte menu + dim sum menu minus a few of the more expensive dishes.
5	Trust me it will suck big time
4	why ar?????????
1	Different management now le....  I dunno much myself lar but the new chef also never heard of him before one....  Try then give FR bah :/
6	I suggest you dun get it.  For Gmarket, quite a no of deals, the sellers will price it low, but then charge more 'via options'.  So you might find yourself paying over $50 for a deal, but the base price is only $10, n you will not be able to use your $10 voucher.
1	Thanks.  Hmmm, $43.  Abt $8 to $10 more than SCDH.  But its Yan Ting wor. Anyone keen?  I go find out more.  Just need 2 paxs can liao right?  Or solo also can?   Btw, i dun quite get your earlier post.  You actually meant their dim sum served during the brunch is better than their usual ala carte?
4	i wanna go the 3 Star Michelin guy one.. im a day late..
0	Sorry if I was unclear. Its about the same standard, just less variety. The discount I got requires exactly 2 pax. Usual price is $98++/pax.
1	You is elite - you never jio swatchie? hahah
4	Like that I also don't mind   I think he meant standard bah although I think they should be the same as ala carte...hahah
1	yan ting sounds good to me... think i prefer chinese buffets than international buffets...   regards,  wacky
1	its half a lobster right?
2	The astor card discount. I had 1 for 1 plus an extra 25% off. So instead of $230.70, I only paid $86.55
3	Wah, very good deal leh...  How to apply ah? Peasant like me can or not?
2	wah... how to get the card?? didn't see any 1-for-1... except  regards, wacky
1	oh i think i know liao... the 1-for-1 ish 1 time only... in other words... only 25%... so it's $86.55 per pax...  regards, wacky
0	Anyone can apply. Just have to pay $888+/year or renew card @ $788+. But worth it cause can get 2 nights stay free.
2	Yesh you ish correct.
4	sigh... this coming from swatchie... i should have known better... in other words... ....  regards, wacky
5	Heehee, no wonder.  Was thinking yan ting brunch where got so cheap one.
16	Chiu priorities are different from mine thats all
8	But not peasant like me   Thanks but no thanks - S$888 can eat a lot of buffets for a whole year
11	sell the stay away maybe can recoup more than 50% of it..
9	a bit confusing for me, maybe i don't have the experience of buying from g-market, that's why. i saw those nihon mura, momoji deals you all bought from there, so tempting. but all in all, your summarized in the first sentence. therefore i won't be getting then.
162	u faster finish ur current coupons ba...
37	Erm then also mean I need to pay S$400+ to get 25% discount - how many times I need to eat to recoup ah?
50	Oh, if you intend to use it purely for food deals, then should be okay ... i tink.  However, given the expiry deal plus normally yr end restuarants good biz so less likely to offer discounts, you might not be able to finish using the vouchers.  Wah, you still got simi voucher?  You went for tantoyo or something already?
3	swatchie you bidding for the les amis vouchers ah  so how was jaan, beta?
7	Wah swatchie, how many times have you sign up for the astor card. hahax.
1	Yesh but I think the person notch willing to sell below his stated price. He said someone offered him more than what I offered than said if the deal didn't go through, he would get back to me. But 1 week riao and he still selling
4	I've been a member since Nov 2008 so 3 times.
14	Probably, he 1 day bump all his threads so many times. Have you tried that graze kha?
17	Yea I have. I got invited there for dinner once. Didn't think too much of the food actually. Can see my pictures .  I don't think they are doing too well cause I saw a groupon deal being offered for a meal there
33	lovejade:  yes i should. i did not buy tanyoto voucher. i got 3 buffet (including scholar hotpot) and 2 ala carte (including tien court) to redeem in november.  don't know enough time or not
5	havent jiaks yet..  next week. she wanna go there then go there.. im nt so fussy abt food. just dont gimme canned mushrooms.. i eat watever **** ur throw to me.  i still like my Thanying very much.
32	What about this?  not the thai one. hmm. beta sho elite... when you jio me go?  I give you staff disc next time I start work hahah
7	really bo give staff price! u work there coz u wanna humsup the xmm right?!  u jio them go eat all the good food ard ur work place then tell us where nice la.
3	canned mushrooms not nice?
435	I only eat canned mushrooms as I do not know how to cook the fresh mushrooms with microwave oven.
111	Next time i see u all i tell u y.. im really scare of canned ones.
25	Heehee, got ppl wanna buy the scholar voucher liao?  I also clearing several vouchers.  Too bad the scholar ones until end Nov only, else i sure buy from you.
20	So when are we going for scholar?
189	Graze I only tried their brunch. Notch worth the marnie imho.
8	Carey, evil n donkey, tomorrow after Kim, depending on how it goes, wanna go Shunfu market and eat tat bui bui char siew tat piggy recommended?  Its in the same area, heehee.
2	Erm, got to see my tank got how much space left woah...  Me not bottomless pit like PPP hor
14	I dont mind esp if Kim got not enuff meat for us
2	By the time you all finished lunch, he might have sold out and close stall. He will close stall around 1.45-2pm.
4	We are starting at 11am...but sidetrack - do they open at 11 or not? hahah  Again, depends on how much I eat at Kim's bah
1	Outing to Joaquim *finally!!!*  Please indicate which of the 2 days you can make it.  If cannot get a day which everyone can make it, then we will just make it into 2 outings on both days.  Can't remember who else holding voucher except for the below.  Feel free to add in   I think carey got extra voucher also, if anyone wants to join.  Proposed Dates : Tue 8 or 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : $25.80 nett, voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80.  Participants  1. Toons (both dates okay)  2. Raven (both dates okay)  3. Donkey (both dates okay)  4. PPP  5. Evil  6. Carey
2	jus need to call shunfu uncle up for him to keep the better ones for u guys if confirm going then no need to scare sold out
5	Noted.  Thanks.Edit - Just called, they said 1130am.  So we meet 1130am at Kim. We play by ear bah.  If still got room after Kim's, then can head over to la kopi n eat char siew.  Just order a bit to try try lor.  I dun intend to have char siew buffet
2	Can add me?  Thanks.
3	added first......
1	Outing to Joaquim *finally!!!*  Please indicate which of the 2 days you can make it.  If cannot get a day which everyone can make it, then we will just make it into 2 outings on both days.  Can't remember who else holding voucher except for the below.  Feel free to add in   I think carey got extra voucher also, if anyone wants to join.  Proposed Dates : Tue 8 or 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : $25.80 nett, voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80.  Participants  1. Toons (both dates okay)  2. Raven (both dates okay)  3. Donkey (both dates okay)  4. PPP  5. Evil  6. Carey (only on 15 Nov)
3	Outing to Joaquim *finally!!!*  Please indicate which of the 2 days you can make it.  If cannot get a day which everyone can make it, then we will just make it into 2 outings on both days.  Can't remember who else holding voucher except for the below.  Feel free to add in   I think carey got extra voucher also, if anyone wants to join.  Proposed Dates : Tue 8 or 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : $25.80 nett, voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80.  Participants  1. Toons (both dates okay)  2. Raven (both dates okay)  3. Donkey (both dates okay)  4. PPP (both dates okay)  5. Evil  6. Carey (only on 15 Nov)
2	You can remove my TBC. My missus TBC remains. I don't think she is keen.
0	added first....
1	Outing to Joaquim *finally!!!*  Please indicate which of the 2 days you can make it.  If cannot get a day which everyone can make it, then we will just make it into 2 outings on both days.  Can't remember who else holding voucher except for the below.  Feel free to add in  I think carey got extra voucher also, if anyone wants to join. Proposed Dates : Tue 8 or 15 Nov Time : 630pm onwards Location : Joaquim @ Suntec Price : $25.80 nett, voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80. Participants 1. Toons (both dates okay) 2. Raven (both dates okay) 3. Donkey (both dates okay) 4. PPP (both dates okay) 5. Evil (both dates okay) 6. Carey (only on 15 Nov) 7. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (TBC)
1	Carey, PPP told me he bought 2 vouchers too.  So basically, each of you holding 1 extra voucher. Just to confirm, i am only holding on to Donkey's voucher.  Evil n Raven's one i emailed to you guys liao.
1	Those who drive better go early. Parking lots in front of the whole row of eateries and shops limited. If don't have, just drive down and turn before Thomson Plaza, drive all the way to the behind of the row of shophouses and park at the private estate. Spaces also limited. So all the best.
2	Wah. Got extra vouchers ar?
1	Since you free in Nov, join us lah.
1	dun have any...not very sure how to get them too~
1	Thnks, but most of us meeting at marymount mrt first.  Walk from marymount to kim's abt 15 mins hor?Yea, looks like got 2 extra.  Wanna join us since you on vacation in nov
0	Joaquim Steamboat Dinner their chicken flavor rice nt bad.. if still serving.. yrs back i ate la,
4	No prob, got extras, just let us know when you can confirm.  Thanks.
2	You know they won't eat it one.
1	I will let you know tonight. Ask missus later. Working now.   15 mins should be ok for a fit person like you. Tomorrow I end at 11am. You all tempted me go packet fatty char siew.
4	I meet you at the mrt 11:15am then cos i dont know the way there.  But after reading what Piggy post, want to meet earlier cos i not fit.
13	That area got many restaurants and makan places.
2	I am limiting the number of participants to 8 persons as the tables there are designed to sit 4 persons to one table.
4	take A bit lahs.lol
2	I am not worry about the many resturants and makan places but the person i am meeting at the mrt station cos he make me go changi airport before o.O
1	Bring a compass or a GPS with you.
1	Blur joker
1	You or her?
12	Just curious how come for the , why voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80? So that means voucher holders loogie loh.
6	She of cos, go home also can take wrong train  Nah, its all my fault.  My bad.The voucher is only $25 value.  Weekday nite dinner is $25.80 nett, so must top up the difference of $0.80.  We paid $12.50 for voucher, so in total pay $13.30 instead of $25.80.  Got loogie meh?
14	OIC.......
11	so Toons and Beta,  Elements tentatively fixed for 2 November?
0	Yea, but i will go only if got the baked seabass n cempadak.  Beta got a lot of gals to buaya, dunno if he is confirmed one or not, heehee.
1	Me too if both items are available.
23	ok, i also will go for the seabass so so if not seabass and no compadak we postpone another time lah. No worries and no hurry.
8	can check then let me know bo?
8	Keke, made the reservation liao.  Will call again tat day to confirm.
1	Reserve  1. manyu (TBC)
1	recoupon got ppl letting go the voucher.
2	The voucher was from a Groupon deal some time back...  Since we have spare vouchers, you only need to pay S$12.50 (voucher price) plus S$0.80 instead of S$25.80
8	edit: woops just realised it.
16	nope, i edited so that won't seems like i am targeting you to buy, in case you misunderstand also. i will try my best to go but if some one interested i will consider also. you guys still going for another round??  how many going?
10	thanks btw u included Dennyz?  He mentioned the last time he was interested too.
3	if got im coming!
4	got oysters or not...??
8	Got, the last time we went got oysters. Think you went too right?
8	But fresh or not?  Her standard very the high one hor
0	Just saw this in BT today...  Feast@East is having a special S$35nett deal for lunch and dinner to celebrate BT's 35th anniversay...  Details will be out in BT weekend tomorrow
3	u spat out a tiny pearl if u remember?
1	We don't read Business Times leh. sic the info here.
1	Oh ya hor, found a pearl in the oyster that time. Think Raven got the picture.
1	the buffet gt wat offer or discount? price?
3	lao tan.. i saw the pig trotters at old woodlands check point. many ppl queue.. they sell the 10 quan duck also many ppl buy..
15	hi, have link/exact location?
7	but that was for weekends... u all planning for weekday mah~ alamak, think i can't go oso... have to chiong OT *weep*
27	kunoichi !!!!! u are back !!!! pics pics?
40	huh... what pics...??
57	Which store is that?
41	u didn't go japan mah..?? she is referring to your makan pics from japan.... regards, wacky
4	If got 2 more, can put me and my missus in?  Both of us confirmed and both dates also can.  Thanks.
4	Wah, this one I also interested.  LOL.  Need to buy BT and cut out coupon is it?
1	Never SIC earlier.  Was there on Wednesday to send away the confinement lady.  Could have made it a more useful trip.    Anyway, Ubi has this roast duck stall also always long queue.  $15 per duck.  I like the roast pork better though.  $5 can get quite a packet of roast pork.  Purchased $10 CS pork trotter.  Eat till song song.
18	Okay. Reservations made for 5.
7	For $29 nett the foods still ok, mainly Asian cuisine. The Laksa was good though and the Durian Pengat definitely hit the right spot for me. I won't pay full price for it though as the varieties was limited.
1	Is this a special promo? I dun think roast pig is part of their normal buffet spread. Their sun brunch without alcohol is 69++. Got foie gras too.  Btw pat mok introed the mezza9 brunch too. Think she also foodie wor.   So got interest for this?
2	Lets see the TnC for this one.  The last deal I can't join due to the limitations, ie only weekday dinner.    The 1st Feast@East buffet I went for was in 2006/2007.  It was 1-for-1 at $45 for 2 pax.  The last trip I went was the high tea during last year's National Day eve and National Day breakfast.  Durian pengat is the star.
1	Tempting.  I don't mind no alcohol.  Don't really drink anyway.  Is the roast beef really that good?  I haven't found one that I like though.  Still prefer grilled steaks.
3	i also duno.. but sign board gt pix of their dish. nt those very pro pix.. is self taken type.. happened to be there ystd mahs.lolol.. just remembered.
2	Got Chocolate Martini also.  I don't drink too, if we can opt for non alcohol, shall we go try? I think elite Beta and Evilduxy would be interested too.
0	Is at the hawker center?
3	Any promo? Mrs (^@^)" going to skin me alive for that price. Especially if the food no good.
2	So far I haven't come across any promotion for it. Even without alcohol, I think the price would still be close to $100.
1	yes hawker ......
11	think without champagne will be cheaper?
5	Is this roasted pig, choc martini part of their christmas menu or something?  K, not sure abt the one shown on tv, but from i know, their sun brunch is 69++ without alcohol.  Sat lunch is 45++ (i need to check) n from wat the lady told me, the sun brunch just got foie gras n more cheeses.  So sun brunch will be 81.20 nett whereas sat lunch is 53 nett.    No promo one, for the last 6 months, no cc promo at all ...  Reviews postive, i think kunoichi also liked it when she went for their weekday lunch.  Should be a quality buffet i tink.
4	There was no mention of any seasonal theme and I think the show was record much earlier so cannot be they having Christmas theme buffet so early.
4	did i hear rice ??????????? yummy yummy 3-4 bowl of rice for me
1	I think you lost weight wor, if eating lots of carbs does it for you, then go for it man!
1	so u notice it ??? at first i say bo people believe
5	yeah i saw the basilico on buffetlicous just now... the food does looked good...   and yeah... i cringed on pat mok's reply when asked if the buffet was worthed it at $139++ ...   regards,  wacky
80	Normally high carbs consumption n weight loss dun go hand in hand mah.  Furthermore the previous few times i saw you, you're in your work overalls, so look bigger.  Only the last 2 times, esp the sseikek outing, you came in normal clothes then its more noticable.  Well, everyone's body is different, so if it works for you, then good lor   Happi for you too.Wat did she say?
9	Plus a whole lot of exercise.   Even have to wear a step counter.  My brother was sent for such a programme before.
11	Mezza9 was 108++ right?  Hmmm, tomorrow i call them to see if they are resuming their normal sun brunch with the same menu or not.I did not see her in person before, but i remember seeing her on tv during 1 of those star award events n she actually looks good wor.  Really validate the saying 'there is no ugly woman, only lazy ones' ... n i tink she is funnie.  Funnie woman way better than pretty ones.Heehee, i tried getting into such a programme 2 months back but was rejected after 1 round of tests.  Oh well, so much for getting paid to exercise
2	thought their menu same
6	Really? Why would you want to sign up for such a program?   My bro is huge and was referred there by doctor.   You probably dont qualify cos you so slim liao.  Maybe I should try instead
6	Err, simi menu?Paid to exercise wor!  Its like getting paid to do something which i do anyways   On paper, i qualify wor.  Told you i classify as borderline obese liao, sniffs.
1	u below certain BMI they wont admit u into the program. lol.. last time i tried to during reservist.. the doc say "come on, you are not obese.. meaty nia'.. lolol.. tot can take free might as well try.lol
7	Basilico u all going?
537	Lol, Nov sun i only left 27 Nov nia.  Think the others also as bad   Dec Christmas special?
1	ystd they showed the focaccia mascarpone on tv.. looks damn good.
117	reward ourselves with one big n exp buffet b4 yr end..for the year work we deserved something good   hope many ppl can come n enjoy. bury the hatchet n all..
17	yeah... set one for dec lor....   regards,  wacky
12	Only have 1 pic of it
14	meeza9 de menu not much changes
0	yeah tat time i emailed u n tan i think,
0	Wah so chin - got hatchet one meh   Anyway if we are going for an elite brunch, then I better start saving now  But now save $1 a day also not enuff how?
2	im starting to clock OT so i can go.
18	I think I need to go PT at Mac during weekends too
2	can we set a date? better do advance booking before too late.. must start interest check.
21	Beta, you find the details, I will post it. You the organiser hor?
2	Here where got hatchet? Here not edmw leh.
5	Mai sabo leh. December I cannot. Unless Christmas or New Year Day.
19	You want to be paid to exercise? I know how. I was paid to exercise. Think going to be 'selected' again. Sianz.
2	The Sakura makan can place me under tbc.. Driving too thanks
24	anyone frequent bedok 85? there's this store that sells western food/grilled fish stuffed with sambal inside and they also sell german pork knuckles. $14.90 for the pork knuckles with some sides. see quite a lot people order and looks damn good too.
2	You know the name of the stall? I only know of a Western food stall called Pete's Grill. $14.90 is for a full knuckle or half? Big difference.
43	IIRC from what the picture shows, its a full knuckle. Nope not Pete's grill. The other row beside pete's, you know there's the famous ah balling? just beside it.  Is Pete's Grill any good?
71	Any on going buffet promos now?
33	This is too general a question. What type of buffet are you looking for? International, Chinese, Japanese, Indian etc... What is your budget?
5	3. Lovejade (TBC) 4. Dennyz (TBC)
5	lol wanted to post this also..
0	i dont understand this part&gt;&gt;&gt;  For $14, you get Korean BBQ lunch buffet for 1 pax (worth $21.90)   For $26, you get Korean BBQ lunch buffet for 2 pax (worth $43.80)   For $19, you get Korean BBQ dinner buffet for 1 pax (worth $29.60)   For $36, you get Korean BBQ dinner buffet for 2 pax (worth $59.20)
3	How's the Auntie Kim's outing today?
0	Lunch and dinner different pricing. 2 pax more worth it than 1 pax. Cheem meh?
3	means..buy voucher for  pax, @14 voucher for  pax, @26 voucher for  pax, @19 voucher for  pax, @36
1	oic. thanks.
9	Valid 31 October 2011 to 30 &gt;&gt; i like.....
0	just to note, they did not mention free flow of prawns
33	need to call them to check if the lunch n dinner price apply for weekend Operating Hours: Daily: 12pm - 3pm (lunch), 5.30pm - 10pm (dinner)  pay abit more jiak can jiak longer lunch is 3 hrs dinner is 4.5 hrs
2	I also don't know how to appreciate food... But I like porky porky ~
4	me is tone down alot loh
3	Surprisingly good - the food is not bad although we did have a small issue with their complimentary beef ribs   We whacked 6 Saba fish lol  The ginseng soup was forgettable though - their soups in general are quite weak
6	Like I said earlier, I am game for dinner :d
9	Lol, yea lor, we kept trying to explain to the waitress tat it does not make sense if a table of 1 person gets 1 plate of ribs, and a table of 4 gets the same amt of ribs.  It should be portioned to the no. of pax.  Anyways, we gave up.  Lucky the ribs only so so.  You should join us for Sseikekk.  The ribs there are better, esp if Evil cooked them   Like Carey said, the soups we found too bland, though they're not stringy with the ingredients.  I liked the beef bulgogi too.  Their saba fish is yummy.  Crispy skin, oily near the tummy area, n fresh.  Yum yum!  Definitely eaten better for $20, but this is decent.
3	What ribs ??
4	I whacked 2 fish alone. I feel it's salty but one of the better dishes. My ribs ok leh.   Anyway, I feel the meats at Sakura not very nice. I told lovejade that I feel sseiki's meats should be better but I went Sakura for their salmon fats. So those going to Sakura needs to adjust expectations.
6	The deal closed already, b4 i can buy.  When i called them, the person answering said the groupon opened the deal before even the details were confirmed.  However, they will honor vouchers already sold.  Guess tats why it was closed so fast.
5	Oh, auntie kim serves a complimentary plate of pork short ribs.  1 plate per table only.Heehee, i do hope your ribs are okay   Yea, the pork short ribs were okay, just tat the ones at sseikekk were better.  Hmmm, the salmon fats are salmon sashimi or pieces for salmon for grilling?
3	K, Basilico confirmed is sunday brunch for me liao.  Just called them.  The roasted pig, choc martini, etc are all part of the sunday brunch.  They even have wagyu beef too.  Plus the foie gras, and i think its worth paying $69++ ($81.20 nett) for sunday brunch vs $42++ ($49.40 nett) for normal day lunch.  As usual, no cc promo ...  Prob now is finding a sun to slot it in ....   Edit - K, for marriott, they will only be shifting to the newly renovated premises in Dec.  So they  bring back their sunday brunch then.  Call back in Dec
2	No. I mean what ribs u want evil to cook for u ??
24	Make it a Christmas session ?
3	Yea Xmas one..
20	I had beef short ribs. Quite nice.   It's the salmon for grilling. I won't bother with salmon sashimi here. It will be either poor parts or left in the open too long, thus not fresh.
32	It's for grilling only. There is a note saying the fish is not for sashimi eating. I did not see any sashimi there.
1	time to start the grilling
1	jie jie display until so nice
2	shu shu sprinkle some kong tao give people eat liao will follow him home  we had some watermelon
0	If only show the cooked prawns will be nicer.
12	U need to put super clue ok ....
54	when cook the prawn will curl up
7	Make cuts on the length of the prawn body. That will stop it from curling up.
8	What super clue? I haven't got a clue to what you are trying to say.
644	when cook the prawn will curl up , they making pattern of the prawn layout
286	Darn we were too slow...hahah Should have just whacked it first while we were at Auntie Kim  Edit: I managed to buy 6 vouchers for dinner - hope the deal goes through bah Already 720+ sold ah
36	i bought 2 coupons for dinner... hope it goes through as well.
32	are both of u talking about the same thing ???
16	honjin ala carte buffet @ $20  weekday dinner / sat lunch
4	Looks Great!
3	ahh... on the second thought. FORGET IT..
12	That is trivial... but the $20 is... "Groupon excludes GST and Service Charge."  So end up will be $23+
2	Should be bah - the Korean BBQ at Tiong Bahru  I actually bought 8 coupons - can organize an outing soon
6	Actually it's okay mah 1 per pax n 2 paxs means 2 vouchers lol  Honjin food is not bad - at least in the past haha
1	kahlan say valid on Monday to Thur only for dinner
60	i thought 2 pax only 1 voucher can be used
4	Thanks for the heads up.  Bought 2 vouchers.  It has been many years since my last visit.  This will be more memory's sake.
1	Went a there a few times before, not quite to my liking but then for $20, it's cheap. But need two to go.
2	This one who bought ar? Wanna check if you all bought lunch or dinner.
5	Me and Mrs (^@^)" lor.  Piglet going but should be free.  Used to go when Mrs (^@^)" still Miss.
2	I meant, if I want to buy, who going with me.
8	Thought got hordes of people going buffets every week what.  This one should be no problem.  $20 for a Jap buffet is quite alright.
57	Carey bought 8 coupons, i bought 2 coupons. all of them dinner.
8	Can get at $18.80. Here's how. get this person to buy for you at 80% of deal.com.sg twtan's review:
16	It's still okay ah - Dec I very free liao...hahah  Plus it's up to Apr next year
12	so who is the 8 person you buying for
49	got include my share boh
19	Myself, toons, donkey and evil   The rest are spares - who wants can come along  Bigger group more fun mah - can also open to low carbers haha
7	add me inside the coupon
4	Carey, combine mine with yours.. so we now got 10.. add me tot the list also..
2	I will get 2 vouchers later. Let me know when you all going. I am indifferent to carbs though. Just that I don't really eat carbs during buffets.   My piglet is a carb queen. She had a chawamushi and half my soba. Now eyeing the bento.
14	piglet must eat more then can fast tall grow big
37	She quite big for her age. It's a funny sight when she towers over those who are older than her.
5	K, reservations made for Joaquim as follows :-  Date : Tue 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : $25.80 nett, voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80.  Participants  1. Toons (own voucher)  2. Raven (own voucher)  3. Donkey (toons voucher)  4. PPP (own voucher)  5. Evil (own voucher)  6. Carey (own voucher)  7. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (TBC - Carey voucher)  8. Piggy (PPP voucher)  9. Piggy's better half (toons voucher)
9	Wait - Manyu and my vouchers are for Korean BBQ   The honjin one is done by Toons
2	Blue Garden in Tiong Bahru  1.raven1019 (Carey voucher) 2.Carey(Carey voucher) 3.evilduxy(Carey voucher) 4.Toons(Carey voucher) 5.Gnet(Carey voucher) 6.Chew toy(Carey voucher) 7. manyu882( manyu822 voucher) 8. donkey(Carey voucher) 9.  -empty-   (Carey voucher) 10. -empty-    ( manyu822 voucher) 8 + 2 total 10 voucher
5	Carbohydrates make kids grow  while protein make them grow . Must make sure they take the correct type.
1	So fast fill up Liao haha
3	You are so right haha  Got to watch the sugar too
66	help u solve the voucher
33	I will get my own Korean voucher. Honjin one I bought liao.
0	Mixture la.  She has an egg every day since 1 year old.  Fish and meats have to be blended into her staples as she dislike anything that feels fibrous or hard.  Her staples include potatoes,pumpkin, oats, pasta, porridge.
1	so when's the outing?
1	You can add me and mrs (^@^)" in too.  Just bought 2 vouchers.
1	expire in april wor.... have a few months... to plan
6	when is this and what's the damage
4	ok confirm pls........ haha got a deal..why not
7	For $36, you get Korean BBQ dinner buffet for 2 pax 36/2 = $18
546	icic, nvm i skip this
9	got this from my mailbox regards, wacky
4	BTW, anyone here knows if there is UOB offer for Wild honey restaurant?
9	blue garden the outing still got slots?
107	Got one more slot - better hurry
1	Anyone keen on Global Kitchen? $48++ and 1-for-1 offer should come up to $30 per pax max. Pretty ok.
34	pretty fair the price for 30 bucks.
3	A bit dated but here's swatchie's review...hahah  HGW also has a pretty low score for GK - it's perpetually on a 1-for-1 promotion it seems
1	global kitchen jiak powdery lobster?
51	that review is based on high tea buffet...??  regards,  wacky
1	sho cheap?   wait the  no lobsters bits liao
1	Yup but the quality of the food should be "consistent" - good or mediocre...hahah
7	i still remember their review is quite bad. still wana pay n go back? omg
8	tat time u din go meh? no leh, I remember they jiak until jin heypi wor, esp beta de gas
6	We have to go dig out the lobster meat. Also the some of the foods like the bake fish, crab legs etc... they ration it.
2	i went back in june i think.. not too bad.. just missing the few choices of oysters n lobster!
9	U mean the review in post 8527 or 8499?
1	14++... i dont know how come u hit 8+++....  maybe settings different?
4	was there a review?
5	This one by Power
0	review by power789 , twtan and samba for global kitchen
7	hehe   but if global $30 can jiak one, as long as they dun compromise the menu until jin jialat.  I sardenly realised we had so much fun in buffetlicious I his review always jin satki one
12	yeah i know... those were the days........   regards,  wacky
8	last time OT more fun
5	wei, not soley becos can OT rah  but last time, we hv better taste in terms of buffet selections. now we machiam housewives liddat, see got buffet offer quickly buy vouchers liao
2	only buy certain voucher leh
4	so are we going to Global Kitchen?
22	to get back the old feeling ar?   siang is hardworking enuff to go &amp; get menu bo?   or u go &amp; request lor, coz among the old buffetlicians, u r the laziest &amp; contribute the least!
2	yalor i agree....... plus last time more ppl review/comment/discuss about the outings after finish...   regards, wacky
21	What to do, because now a lot of people don't want to do their homework.
16	tired n bz mahs..  hehehehe
16	how to book my last slot!!
33	Blue Garden in Tiong Bahru  1.raven1019 (Carey voucher)  2.Carey(Carey voucher)  3.evilduxy(Carey voucher)  4.Toons(Carey voucher)  5.Gnet(Carey voucher)  6.Chew toy(Carey voucher)  7. manyu882( manyu822 voucher)  8. donkey(Carey voucher)  9. PPP - tbc (Carey voucher)  10. Spotty_Hippo ( manyu822 voucher)  8 + 2 total 10 voucher
1	Mr Mod helped you liao...hahah  Now we need to fix a date
13	Date : Tue 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : Voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80 on top of S$12.50 instead of S$25.80.  Participants  1. Toons (own voucher)  2. Raven (own voucher)  3. Donkey (toons voucher)  4. PPP (own voucher)  5. Evil (own voucher)  6. Carey (own voucher)  7. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (Carey voucher)  8. Piggy (PPP voucher)  9. Piggy's better half (toons voucher)
8	gam xia mod!! haha
18	Whens the blue garden ah?
1	we got until 31 april 2012 to plan until
9	the restaurant is welly empty ... everytime i pass by it.. Lol
9	Think their location is quite bad lor...  But in that case, we better go earlier than later else they close shop
6	Thanks me by taking more photo and post here, ok?
9	It has been there for quite long liao.  Can have it in dec or after?  If majority prefers nov, then pls go ahead
3	I would prefer Dec
15	try to give some gap ba , if not makan the same food over a gap of too close, you will feel sian / sick of the food  it is best to rotate among menu too like the wanton after the competition until now i will not be touching until another 1 more month time
4	hokay hokay
23	im fine with any dates..except for mid dec week
18	dec ba... feb i fly liao
1	I know what you mean...hahah  I haven't touched chicken curry since our Indian Times outing...  Phobia is already a very mild word
2	Let us know which dates you can't and we can plan around that...  Manyu would also prefer Dec as he's flying off in Feb...haha
55	14-17 dec will be a no no date for me... the rest of dec im free!
11	I have 2 vouchers. Add my name and Mrs (^@^)" in. Thanks.
108	1.raven1019 (Carey voucher) 2.Carey(Carey voucher) 3.evilduxy(Carey voucher) 4.Toons(Carey voucher) 5.Gnet(Carey voucher) 6.Chew toy(Carey voucher) 7. manyu882( manyu822 voucher) 8. donkey(Carey voucher) 9. PPP - tbc (Carey voucher) 10. Spotty_Hippo ( manyu822 voucher) 11. (^@^)" ((^@^)" voucher) 12. Mrs (^@^)" ((^@^)" voucher)
6	nowadays the outing machiam on sale like that, like always 100% slots fulled
4	Heehee, nowadays, we focusing more on meaty kinda of buffets liao.  Not so much on seafood intl ones.  Plus a lot using vouchers, so limited slots unless you dun mind paying full price, heehee.  The only one which you might be keen is global kitchen lor, but then the food there, other than the oysters (i think), so so nia imo.  Why dun you organise a kushi outing?  Tat one seafood still got standard.  Tat one got ppl wanna go, but all lazy to organise.  Just throw up several dates n ask those interested to indicate which date lor.  Very simple one mah.  I dun mind going back to En (the nice beef shabu shabu at bukit timah which you like?) or trying out their sister outlet Zen at river valley.
5	Actually En was not bad, I liked that raw beef, which is meant to be eaten raw, but I used as shabu shabu
5	I want to try the Zen at River Valley, it was shown on TV and the foods look yummy though varieties are limited.
46	En, Zen or Chang also can   Was it bunny or Kahlan that went to Zen not too long ago?
12	me 23 dec to 2 Jan going overseas apply 4 days of leave but 10 days no need to work
13	zen is good... the one at UE right?
14	Yea.  We tried En at bukit timah b4 too, n i find it good.  Wats the nicer items at Zen?  For En, its their beef caparcio n shabu shabu (both beef n pork).
25	I am not sure of the place, saw it on the buffet show on TV.
5	Then we go before 14 Dec or after 17 Dec and before 23 Dec lor   Jan 4-6 is bad for me - got to go outstation
3	Wk 1 n 2 dec la. Keep it simple
12	Chui so smart
63	tues n thursday i can go
13	this week got any buffets? like kushinbo, or whatever...
292	oh noes....dec i might be outstation LOL.....  shall @@
113	Whole of Dec meh?
105	not me lah.  Never been b4.
28	Paiseh, then it's bunny...hahah  Thought you went cos near your office mah
55	So you wanna go Chang &amp; Eng or Sex &amp; Zen
3	Either one also can - as long as not before 15 Nov
36	no need to paiseh, just realise that i've never been to lots of places b4 to eat.
1	Aiyah, carey January cannot, evil December cannot. November lor. Good for me.
5	Can we also fix a date for Peony Jade weekday lunch?
8	ot but i just read this article.
9	aiyah maybe bway sai go to the Element niaos.. tio OT..
7	Lol ... deja vu
9	Any idea whats for breakfast at Mandrain Gallery at Orchard?
6	Jan I can woah - just 3 days cannot niah...hahah  We can aim for late Nov then?
2	if tio activated jiu shi till cny i come back LOL....
23	i thought late nov still got carnivore brazilian lol....anyway i also dunno will be outstation not lol
22	It's not Carnivores but Brazilian Churrascaria at 6th Avenue   Your outstation is Paris ah? I also want...hahah  I am going to HK niah - fly in and fly out for work
2	Nope this yr I'm flyin to the big apple song song....haha but dunno will or not lol
1	still pending..
7	so good can go other countries  ~
8	Wah, just as good...hahah  But the 18-hour flight is
14	long journey we ish usually auto upgrade the so is still okay
21	What chiu working as?  Gotch lobang in your company?
1	Male GRO - you also interested ah?
100	Same here - 8 hours and above will be upgraded to BC  But still, damn sian one - maybe I too restless...hahah
1	Guest relations officer
2	All so elite take BC and higher  swatchie you bought the les amis voucher in the end? which restaurant do you recommend in the les amis group?
11	Now private banker is also like GRO
540	beef~~~
66	just a quick update for Blue garden.. I cant make it on the 19th Nov too, in case you guys are planning on that date. I have a make up lecture in sch from 1530-1830...
11	Ok noted - is everybody okay with late Nov then?
18	nov 25th(fri) i cannot. scheduled for something liao
9	I believe the Blue Garden BBQ only available for dinner Monday to Thur, so i'm sure they will not organise on a friday.
2	lao tan hot liao..
11	Tue 22, Wed 23, Mon 28 or Wed 30 Nov?  I still waiting for Shalome to confirm for scholar, but these 4 dates should be good.  Can float them for consideration.
9	He just doing his job mah.  Anyways, for Elements, i just called.  They asked me to call back around 2pm+.  Oh well.  Will sms you guys once confirmed.
11	I don't mind 28 Mon   I try to avoid Wed as it's my gym day
56	Is it? okok, thanksNP.. all dates available
29	okay thanks!!!!!!!!!
64	Nov I am ok.  If anyone wants to go for lunch at Shunfu eat the sinful char siew, let me know also.
10	Next Tuesday or thursday ok? But I don't know if uncle is open a not.  Btw, last sat we are suppose to walk to mrt but someone intentionally or unintentionally lead us to shunfu hawker centre. Uncle was still open for business but er didnt try cos too full liao.
1	I can call Uncle's mobile to find out.   Looks like that someone must have failed his topography. Same person who led you to the airport, I suppose.
2	The Sakura BBQ and Grill when huh? You all still interested in Peony Jade as well?
2	So clever   You let me know which date. I will ask that someone to join us for shunfu too.
1	All bullying moi today Fri 25 Nov.  Yes.  If you want it in Nov, how about Tue 22, Wed 23 or Wed 30 Nov?
5	Sakura is 25 nov.   I am keen for peony but nov really jin pack with makan liao   We see when can slot in ok.
2	haha, can't believe you guys are eating way too much...  in a month
0	Tats why we all bui bui
3	i can 22 nov because tue and thursday no need to study
2	haha not really, some of you look quite fit tho....
5	Oh, it's you!!!     Toons shu shu sho noti.   Any day. Just shoot.
1	The young ones like Toons, timberland and power fit la. the unkers and grandpas here all cmi le.
1	lol, ok...but i dunno who are timber and power...never seen them
3	And yao gui too That is because you have not meet me yet
4	??? oh well, can't comment
2	Anyone wants to join us for dinner tonite at Elements, Amara Hotel?  Date: Tonite, 02/11/11  Location: Elements @ Amara Hotel (near Tanjong Pagar MRT)  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $38++ (with 20% discount, $36.60 nett) *hopefully never change  )  Highlights: Baked Chilean Seabass, Chempadak cake  1) Toons  2) Twtan  3) Betatester  4) Dennyz  5) Kahlan  6)
0	Anyone wants to join us for dinner tonite at Elements, Amara Hotel?  Date: Tonite, 02/11/11  Location: Elements @ Amara Hotel (near Tanjong Pagar MRT)  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $38++ (with 20% discount, $36.60 nett) *hopefully never change  )  Highlights: Baked Chilean Seabass, Chempadak cake  1) Toons  2) Twtan  3) Betatester  4) Dennyz  5) Kahlan  6) Lovejade
2	Wah, you eyeing Carey n Manyu ah?   Next time i wanna come in sunglass too, then can secretly beo the babes!
4	haha dun like that la...next time no sunglass lor...  where got...i beo everyone ok!!
2	Wow. Tonight? No sound then suddenly got buffet. Power.
11	You calling for me ah? hahah  Anyway, I am not too keen on PJ - lao unker got no capacity to jiak so much buffet (wallet also cannot take it)
8	Anyone wants to join us for dinner tonite at Elements, Amara Hotel?  Date: Tonite, 02/11/11  Location: Elements @ Amara Hotel (near Tanjong Pagar MRT)  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $38++ (with 20% discount, $36.60 nett) *hopefully never change  )  Highlights: Baked Chilean Seabass, Chempadak cake  1) Toons  2) Twtan  3) Betatester  4) Dennyz  5) Kahlan  6) Lovejade  7)   8)   Welcome, lovejade.  Hopefully you can find a bigger pearl this time
1	while u all are enjoying buffet... i will be OT-ing... *rolls around*
5	I also unker. Father of 2 piglets le. Ya. $$$ is a big issue.
36	Wait, I wasn't there.
3	I forgotten to bring out camera today cause I don't even remember tonight got buffet.  See if I can go borrow one or not.
2	why does this sound so weird n fake to me.......mmmmm
13	My mom's side   Indonesian food are generally quite nice but a bit sweet though   I also like ethnic food but NOT Indian Times
11	Then you dun come lor.
5	cant go liaos.
2	but sg de indonesian food the taste like not so authentic lor, I feel.cos it's written by a weird &amp; fake unker roh, as simpur as tat
4	It's okay - no fish, prawn also can   I won't fly all the way to Jakarta to jiak Indonesian food woah This is not simple indeed
7	Wow, Toons, that's your 3rd scholar trip? Any spare vouchers?
3	shalome wanted to let go of her voucher........ u mean u confirm + chop can make it?
3	Today is 'abuse toons' day ah?  How come no one send me a memo?  I wanna join in too Yalor, i like the place.  Got, from my personal collection  , but must take 2.  You keen?
3	then u can eat more of the " Baked Chilean Seabass, Chempadak cake" right?   if u finish 1, will they refill another fish??
2	nope.  todae is toons' true colour relevation dae!   we hv a responsibility to update all new diners our CEO eating habits so tat they can be prepared for the worst mah
3	Ack ... when you start reading mind too?  Hmmm, they will refill to a certain extent.  Previously it never run out before, but the last trip i went, it was changed to some rubbish later in the evening.  Lucky by then i already whacked pah pah liao.
5	Ask us to go but you don't go.
2	who is holding u back???? tell... twtan. he will scold him for u. he will go rescue u
3	did u tell them not to change to rubbish?
0	knew it.. i was telling toons and evil on the other day that tough you face the front but your eyes are spying ppl. sounds good
8	they changed to fried seabass, which is very yucky. meat powdery, very yucky.
1	Monkey!  Post some review of the $10 steamboat?  Let me know wat to expect cos i also bought the voucher   PPP said to order 30-40 portions of the meat *pengz*
11	So you were eyeing her as well ah? So you interested? I bought 4 vouchers liao
3	Aiyah, they were eyeing each other.  Nuff said   Hmmm, for Bumbu, the lady (nice matronly feel) said there will be a spread laid out for the buffet.  Its not ala carte buffet.  Then she proceed to rattle off a list of the items in the spread, in malay *i blanked out*.  I'm waiting for her to fax over the buffet menu, but given their ala carte menu already not big, i expect abt 10 items nia.
13	rubbish. i'm at the blindspot eh. open to other atm ba. have too many buffet liao
3	OT mahs.. 200plus workers salary.
3	I will send my bill for tonight to you.
5	cod fish available????
10	Oh, like that ah? Sian 1/2 now...hahah  Hopefully got more than 10 items (excluding rice)
15	Your use of multiple question marks, exclamation marks, really like Samba, lol.  I think its chilean seabass, but it tastes similar to cod.  You ate b4 mah.Items no need a lot, nice can liao.  Still no fax, sigh.
5	then dont go la. so simple. u hav tons of other places to go. toons: i dont think so....................
249	Cannot - bought the vouchers liao
2	Nvm, it can't be worse than indian times
4	For those who went to Elements earlier, thanks for an enjoyable evening.  Hope you enjoyed the fish as much as i did, however bloated i feel now   Sorry abt making you guys spend more.
14	any reviews bo? Whats the special 1 time only dish ar?
3	oh yes i love the fish and the cake was nice.  I very full.. the other dishes, eg the tempura, the vegetables, the cooked prawns was also good.  It's ok i enjoyed the food and company.The special 1 time dish is lobster, which to me was so so, but then i'm not really a lobster fan.
15	0.5 lobster.  Lovejade said over cooked.  I agree, though i still find it quite okay.  Seabass sedap!  Today's slabs really thick n big.  The skin area is very fatty.  Damn shiok, but also damn filling.  You should see how many pieces Dennyz eat   Chempadak cake nice as ever, but by the time we ate it, its not cold already.  Sigh, should have eat a piece right at the start to get that ice cream sensation.  We literally finished the entire cake, heehee.  I like the lamb too, but then again, i stood there n got the chef to cut the fatty n juicy pieces.  Otherwise, i think might be tad dry and/or tough.  Some of the other items also quite decent.  The chicken roll is juicy.  The 2 prawns dishes the prawns not bad.  The veg abalone is tasty.
6	not many ppl go Element right? as in not crowded.
0	where are the picture?????
1	Denny and Toons ate the most of the seabass which was extra thick today. I only took one thick piece and already half full. The vegetarian abalone really tasted like real abalone and very yummy. I like the Chempadak cake which is not overly sweet though I only ate one piece. The seafood chowder has only salmon in it but is not bad. I like the deep fried fatty salmon in bread crumbs which is very nice.I just reached home only. Beside the place don't allows us to take pictures so I only have a little to show which I will upload later.
20	Today quite a lot of diners leh. I will pass you the bill.
6	that time we took quite alot
10	i think next time can join u all on Friday evenings or weekends for buffet.lol..
10	Aaargghhhh, the seafood soup! I wanted to try it, but too full until forgot abt it.  The seafood katsu nice also?  Tot you said it was oily, but din know you meant oily in a good way.
4	serious boh?
1	The oil or I meant fat from the fatty salmon is yummy though you need to eat it while still hot. I think there is only salmon in it and maybe bits of clam.
6	dreamer shu shu, do i still have any makan voucher with u?
1	ehhhh..........let me check....lol
1	how abt this buffet?
2	- Very thick cut, think our table ate the most of this oily fish. - Tonight's special one time dish.
1	Lol u all buy vouchers is from coupon ah lol
5	Wow the food looks nice twtan.. From where ah
1	- The slipper lobster is on the small side and as for the freshness, I will let the one who ate these tell you herself. The  on the top right was very good when eaten hot. This  is not that thick and fragrant due to lesser coconut milk but make up with the spiciness. Someone asked me to take this picture of the  and .
3	Element at Amara Hotel.
2	2 bad i got lesson if not will go
1	the seabass n chempedek cake looks good.  how much is the buffet?
18	Think is $38++.
2	Wah gt outing ah lol.. Din notice ha.. Think next time need keep track more often lol
20	Actually I also forgotten the outing today. Had to go borrow a camera.
8	35% off Lunch Buffet at Suanthai Restaurant (Valid on All Days Including PH + Conveniently Located Near Somerset MRT); only $17.50 per pax instead of $26.95 (Min 2 Pax)
2	Menu:
0	lol, anyways it seems I can't ot anymore... well, see you guys at the next buffet(s)
6	This one was featured in buffet buffet 2 wor.  Looks good.  I wanna try this.  If go, jio me   Almost the same price as the suanthai one, but the dishes looks better.  Also, someone commented that suanthai standards drop, plus the nicer items are those 1 order only.  Will pick this over suanthai if i have to choose.
14	Weekdays bad for you?  Say earlier mah.  Next time plan to go elements again, we make it a weekend.
3	OK, maybe can try the china square central outlet? Who wants to go? Sat lunch or dinner?
5	Haa if element can jio me lol. But u guys normally go on fri sat ah?
4	I dont mind...let's go on a sat noon as I can only wkend noon lol
75	The bumbu one looks good with all the curry beef
10	just saw this article on the bumbu desa groupon. FYI for those who bought the deal.
24	how come only post top half nv post bottom half. bottom half say those that bought coupon dun need to have the minimum 10 pax. below is the bottom half:  WHAT ADL SAYS:  Thus, our final verdict for this deal is that it is a deal that is worth your buy. We are saying this because, under normal circumstances, unless you are going with a group of friends (10 or more people), you will not be able to enjoy buffet at the restaurant at all! Buy the coupon, make a reservation, and eat till you drop!
266	Eh, I din see that line!  sorry, guess I cock-eyed.  I thought u guys must have table of 10 then can go there for buffet wor.
36	is telur trying to link to the above bumbu toons referring to? Cos they seems to be different, be it the name or the location. Might get confused. Otherwise I am kaypoh to link both myself. Just thought why suddenly another bumbu in discussion at same time, maybe purely want inform about the t&amp;c of current groupon deal :0
18	guys, sorry to OT.  can recommend nice chinese restaurant?  preferably with some discounts :p need not be buffet   Thanks!!
6	Menu: 
17	wa, when u try one?
6	Different places.
1	Heehee, since you ask in this thread ...  Cathay  Sichuan Douhua  Peony Jade
13	Yea, carey, was it a recent trip?  So the verdict is worth going?
2	Been there a few times liao - they used to have a branch at Liang Court...  One of my usual lunch spots back then
1	Maybe 6 months back bah...  It's not bad - quite authentic Thai dishes...  Yes if you like spicy food - (I always whack their chili padi)
12	Actually it's the same restaurant
10	Damage?  Think the only thai buffet I tried was the one at bugis junction.  It is decent and the price is ok if I want to try many things.  So far the nicer Thai food I have tried in Singapore is at Yummy Thai (but closed down already) and a Thai stall at Shunli Industrial Estate.  The later is nice and very cheap.  But the chef has his off-days.
5	Elements at Amara? Where is Amara? $38++ damage is no discount issit?
15	how to get the 20% discount ????
19	I usually go for their lunch buffets then - S$13.90++ niah  Plus from Raffles Place got free shuttle bus to Liang Court   If you are near the Bukit Timah area, there is a Thai stall at the FC there - not bad as it's operated by a Thai lady...but her food gets sold out quite early by 8pm
6	Different mah.  The bumbu in the groupon deal and the bumbu featured in buffet buffet 2, tat dreamer posted the menu.
23	toons gt the buffet card or something for Element?
32	Got, 20% off.
4	correct. the menu that i posted is diff from the groupon deal. Name quite close.
13	thanks.  My frenz recommend imperial treasure n seafood parAdise. not sure nice anot .
2	Wanna go?
4	Seafood Paradise go to the Defu Lane one.  Their flagship store.  The cream crabs and wasabi prawns and crab fried rice is good.  Black pepper crabs are decent, I had better elsewhere.  Thats all I had tried as it was only 2 pax.
15	Its Siam Kitchen.  Menu is   At least no restriction on the number of times you can order each dish.
3	Wah saw you posting last time on fitness section. Are you bulking right now? I wish I could go to all these buffets too, but now in cutting cycle...  All these lovely pictures making me drool....
16	u are another me.. just screw that cutting and bulk haha!! actually i;m not bulking la. just maintaining
2	Looks good - how much ah? hahah
3	$18.80++
1	these dnt hav buffet right?
21	Don't mind going there as now they got 30% off for crabs on a certain day.
0	I personally love Imperial Treasure @ Crowne Plaza Hotel, especially their roast goose and scallops with Italian white truffle oil   Seafood Paradise @ Defu is not bad but portions are getting smaller. I like the creamy butter crab and the seafood tofu
1	I think its every Tues or Wed.
2	Lunch or dinner?  So when are we going?
3	Applies for lunch and dinner right?  Think after Mrs (^@^)"'s confinement, she wants a crab massacre.
21	The website says $18.80 under the promotions.  Look .  We have alot of buffets coming up.  Possible to slot it in?
3	on a certain day? when?  regards,  wacky
1	I can't remember, they advertised on TV many times. PS: Promotion over liao.
1	Ok, I just called them - it's available only at City Square Mall and Suntec - applicable for lunch and dinner...  The bad news?   There are only 15 ala carte items available - the guy claims they are the most popular items - including pineapple rice  So it's not better than Suanthai in that case...sigh
1	oh i think i managed to find liao:  eeeyer weekdays again...   regards,  wacky
0	Most if not all promotions are usually targeted at their least peak days/hours.
51	But of course, these promotions are to draw the crowd and fill up the seats, especially during the slower periods   If they are enjoying full-house every day, no need for any promotions right?
24	So go for suanthai? I haven't tried suanthai before.
15	Anyone keen to join me for dinner at melting pot @ holiday inn atrium on wed 9 nov?  The spread is small, but its only $22.30 nett n  i like their oxtail stew as well as ala minute pan fried salmon.
9	i tried suanthai ard 2 yrs back.. if i nt wrong they hv one beside comcentre
1	Menu tat i received from bumbu desa (the groupon deal one).  I asked for a sample buffet menu, n she told me this one is for sat ... too bad its not order from their ala carte menu
2	That's the one and only branch one...hahah
3	I wished I could but I don't think I will be able to leave my office before midnight on that day
5	Quite pathetic now that you shown me the menu...  But definitely better than Indian Times that much I can say   See lor - if nobody else is keen, then I will visit them once a week for the next 1 month to makan my dinner there
4	Carey - for shiu, if on 14 Nov, wat time can you reach?  If really too late, then we switch to 16 Nov.  For scholar, confirm for Wed 23 Nov, i know wed is your gym day, but previously when i floated the date, you said no prob   Scholar Outing  Wed 23 Nov  After 6.30pm  1. Twtan  2. Donkey  3. Toons  4. Shalome  5. Shalome gas  6. Lovejade  7. Carey  8. Piggy  9.  *The end*
14	Some items i dun even know wat they are.  Simi is oseng oseng?  Menu rotates hor. Hmmm, someone posted saying they need 10 paxes for the buffet. So if tat day's buffet reservation dun hit 10 paxes, dunno if there will be no buffet or if they will allow you to order from ala carte menu instead.  Heehee, messy.
2	No lah, Telur only posted 1/2 the review...thought BM clarified the misunderstanding liao   Anyway - previously, they needed 10 person before they can have buffet...  With the Groupon deal, NO NEED 10 people...hahah
54	Actually I still don't know - 14 Nov is still iffy for me...sighI know else you also don't have any more dates...hahah  Worse come to worst, I apply 1/2 day to go gym first
5	WTF, this **** is better than Indian Times? Wow. Looks like Indian Times is the benchmark. Any disappointing buffets, just need to look at Indian Times. Then you don't feel so bad.
76	My Bahasa Indonesian is a bit rusty but I can still give a rough translation...  Bumbu has got chicken, beef, curry veggies, stir-fried veggies with chicken/beef, chicken soup, fried fish with chili and also grilled prawns...  Indian Times got sh!t...  Enough said
3	yes, v paiseh. I din see the line that said no need 10 people with the groupon deal. i thot got the voucher still need 10 pax
1	paiseh, its 2 different restaurants which is y I put bumbu desa n groupon in my post. I only posted cos thot warn about the 10 min for buffet as carey bought some vouchers le. I din read carefully n realise with the groupon voucher, no need 10 min. mea culpa
54	dreamer didi, last time I went pj for the lunch buffet v yummy  was a few months back
22	Np, either 14 or 16 nov lor.  Not me wor.  I'm fine with either Tue 22, Wed 23, Mon 28 or Wed 30 Nov, but Shalome preferred wed 23 Nov. You want we can stick to Tue 22 or Mon 28.
1	me go for tusday 22, only day for me
1	I will let you know by tomorrow - I need to chase down some people first...hahah23 Nov is okay - I just skip a gym session niah - not that it's going to be a huge difference to a bui bui unker like me...hahah
0	Nah, no problem - a lot of people seldom read through the whole thing - me included sometimes...hahah  That's why they teach in effective writing class that we must bring the main points to the top else they will be lost in translation
41	if it's 8...it'd be fine but too bad..
1	I Mon 7 nov going to satay steamboat, need to rest tummy on 8 b4 whacking on 9 again   Else i dun mind shifting it to 8.
4	So far planned outing only the 25th Nov one?  Got any for mid-&gt;late Dec?  Or 1st week Jan?
36	haha you is almost everyday got buffet one lor..but nvm, it's ok...
77	OMG.. shui ge toon want to change date to accommodate pwetty popcorn
41	Simi simi, dun shift the focus hor.  You're the one who wants her no. and she said come n get it liao   Anyways, think you need glasses ... oh wait, you're already wearing glasses   You're the fit fit one, i bui bui uncker.
286	Feeling bored, so i went to try Blue Garden at Link Hotel, Tiong Bahru, using the groupon voucher.  Most of you went to Ssikkek before, so i will just compare it against Ssikkek.  Meat wise, Blue Garden (BG) has beef ribeye, beef belly, marinated beef belly, beef bulgogi, pork bulgogi, chicken bulgogi, beef short ribs, pork chops, pork belly, marinated pork belly, pork belly in wine, pork skin.  Ssikkek meats better quality although Blue Garden (BG) also quite decent.  The marinates at BG less sweet so i like their marinated bulgogi beef.  Juicy!  Their pork chop also very tender.  Pork belly in wine not bad too.  However, the meats at BG tend to be cut too thinly.  This resulted in the meats drying faster when BBQed.  The 'kou gan' also suffered.  Not as shiok as compared to eating at Ssikkek, esp the thick slices of pork belly at Ssikkek.  The non meat spread at BG is better though.  They even have a couple of varieties of maki rolls.  3 soups, several varieties of kimchi (enjoyed them), 3 hot dishes like braised pork belly, battered prawns, korean pancake.  They have tempura too.  They provided cherry tomatoes, ikan bilis with chilli, galic, sh.iitake mushrooms, lettuce n cabbage etc.  Their chilli as well as vinegar sauce are both quite nice, n goes well with the meats.  While they do have prawns, the prawns are really pathetic ... like malnorished prawns.  Small until i can't be bothered to eat them.  Furthermore, they only serve plain water though.  They provide a proper hotplate grill.  Good points are less oily, dun splatter and less smokey *hallelujah!!!*  However, it is not that hot, so its harder to get a good crispy on your meats than compared to Ssikkek.  They do not change the hotplate, so the charred bits will remain n stain your meats.  Hmmm, how come i never ask them to change the hotplate?   This is where BG beats Ssikkek soundly.  The place is so much more comfortable.  Far less crowded, though with enough ppl eating so that you will not feel its deserted or something.  Dun have to queue or push your way around to get food.  Very relaxed vibe.  At the end, you will still smell of BBQed meat, but not as bad as compared to Ssikkek.  All in all, i like the place, esp since it is near my house   Although the meats are inferior to Ssikkek, they're still pretty decent, esp, the pork chop, beef bulgogi n pork belly in wine.  The other items like kimchi, condiments, sh.iitake mushrooms (nice when bbqed!) are also plus points.  A major factor is the ambience, which is so much more comfortable.  At BG, you can actually feel the aircon, heehee.  I find myself enjoying the meal more.  With all the above plus points, n a cheaper price of $18 (with voucher), i will prefer BG just a bit more than Ssikkek, but for those more concerned abt the taste of the meats n prawns, its definitely Ssikkek FTW!  PS:  Anyone wanna sell their BG vouchers, look for me
32	Wah like that ah - can I keep all 8 vouchers for myself?
11	hahaahha thats quick thinking   and nice review by Toons!
9	Toons sneaked off to buffet again.  Looking forward to the Sakura Grill outing.
73	But old unker very kind one...  Plus if I use all the 8 vouchers by myself, confirm will uplorry
56	From 1 October to 30 November 2011, simply charge to your Maybank Card at JUMBO Seafood, JPOT, Singapore Seafood Republic &amp; YOSHIMARU ramen bar and enjoy an exclusive return voucher promotion of up to 50% off!  Key info  Valid from 1 October to 30 November 2011  Valid for Maybank Cardmembers only
2	Siao Liao. Buffets after Toon's visit usually drops in standard. We are gg.   Somehow, I think you will all be disappointed in the quality of meats at Sakura. I was. I only like the bacon and fatty salmon actually.
4	Won't like. One voucher a week. Can eat for 2 months. Quite ok mah. Think of it as a good meal a week.
28	Sorry ar, I old liao. When is the Blue Garden outing and Sakura outing again? Must plan my November well so that I don't waste it. No brunch lined up? Any buffets this week?
3	We split the 8 vouchers?  Thanks.  Small spread, mostly meats, so easy to write n compare against Ssikkek.The correct term is 'previewed' the place Sakura is Fri 25 Nov.  Think Blue Garden is Mon 28 or Wed 30 Nov.  Not confirmed yet.  Well, i'm going to this satay steamboat at east coast for lunch on mon 7 nov.  Dennyz will take a look at the place to see if its worth going or not.  Melting Pot for dinner next wed 9 nov.  You're welcome to join
2	This wk? Hav what.  Or u submit propsal loh. Evil might oblige u
7	Toons: what if u r  comparing with BG non promotion price, without using voucher?
2	Will slightly prefer Ssikkek if i have to pay full price for Blue Garden, unless its 1 of those sudden urges to eat BBQ n lazy to travel to Ssikkek.
4	Yea, evil machiam like weekly visit to Ssikkek, if you wanna go, can check on his schedule, hehee.
1	If don't go suc-kit, he will also oblige la
2	Which is more horrifying ? 3 times buffet in a wk or 4 times in 2 wks ?
5	Which day during Christmas period are u available for buffet btw?  ?
4	Both - me old unker needs more time between meals to digest the food...hahah  Going to be like wacky and limit myself to 1 buffet per month soon
2	Only Christmas Day. Why leh? Auntie want to give presents to my piglets?
2	Just don't niam niam niam to us can liao.
2	Oh, carey interested in suanthai?
97	the courtyard jap buffet @ fullerton. anyone been to it? cannot find a bloody review on it!
3	Korean bbq buffet
5	mine is 1 buffet in 2 months hor... wei.... i dun niam so much now liao hor....  keep a low profile...  regards, wacky
0	Can bring forward Sakura?  I am bored.  Too close to Blue Garden no good.  Too similar.  Satay Steamboat buffet?  Damage? Sorry.  Not too keen on Melting Pot.  Reviews not good.  I don't like oxtail too.
5	Anyone buying?
6	Any reviews ? Does it include free flow drinks?
4	Voucher is valid from   Valid from Mon to Thur only (including PH)   Valid for lunch &amp; dinner buffet   Lunch: 11am to 3pm   Dinner: 5pm to 11pm   Quite restrictive based on the dates...  Please only for Mon-Thu otherwise need to top-up  But for that price, looks very cheap - no reviews found though
1	Last Day! 43% off Daily Lunch Buffet at Zaffron (Oasia Hotel; Novena MRT); only $23.50 instead of $41  Voucher is valid from   Voucher is   Voucher is not valid on the eve of PH and PH   Voucher is valid for Lunch Buffet only (12pm to 2.30pm)   Anybody tried? hahah
1	diam rah~ my last buffet was the 30+ oysters at Marriot loh.....
5	Mon is a ph ...can use
36	30+ oysters??!?!?!?!?    I remember the first buffet which I paid for when I was in Sec 3.  My classmates ate 10+ oysters each.  The next day some of them were absent.  I heard severe diarrhea.
6	dont know leh   but it looks decent..
10	Wah - that's very She's our oyster queen...hahah  30+ is already counted as little liao
31	Bought 2 voucher, one for me and one for PPP.  We went down the week before without reservation, was turn away at door steps as they said the place was fully booked.  (we did attempt to call their hotline but was met with voicemail - stated to call between 3pm to 10pm, called at 3:30pm but still diverted to voicemail. Read some reviews from HGW, seems postive thus the expectation was set higher.   (reviews written before 03 Oct)  Journey: Took 16 from raffles hotel bus stop (opp Raffles city shopping centre)  Duration: 20mins (with no Jam along nicole highway.  Reached the entrance. (quite easy to find the place - near dunman food centre)  Took a seat, the shop uses both electric and gas stove for the steamboat, if you dislike gas running out while you are enjoying, highlight to the cashier that you will like to use electric stove.  Lets take a look at the menu, as this is a voucher deal - $10.50, seafood were excluded. if i do not remember wrongly, usual price is $20nett (drinks are extra charges)  Hmm.....since drinks are extra charges, lets see how much one can of coke cost.  $1.50, very reasonable for a buffet place - a few i been to charges about $2 to $2.50  yang chewren dun drink beer, so PPP ordered one can of coke.  The shop attendant was very nice in his service, explained to us what we cannot order. Sotong, lala and squid are the excluded items.  The raved thing about this place is their soup - full of flavour and better than most of the steamboat place. - Chicken herbal and tom yam - no herbal taste for the chicken soup, tom yam taste like the the maggie instant tom yam powder or paste.  Ordered a few items to start off, was amazed at their serving size.  Knowing PPP can eating a lot, we ordered in quantity of 10s and 20s but the serving came like just for one, we asked the server is this the serving of 10s, she said yes.   I post the pic and the quantity that tagged with that order, after that, more unpleasant experience to share., quantity ordered - 10  Parts used - Chicken thigh  Taste - first time taste half tender and half powdery meat (not sure what it suppose to mean - fresh? not fresh?)., quantity ordered - 20 (serving size, seems like no difference from the chicken serving)  Parts used - dunno  Taste - dried after cooking, i tried to cook at different duration and method - shabu and boiling, still taste the same - dried.
6	going this sunday with moi bro.  i bought for $18.80.
22	Wah, that's cheap  But isn't this Sunday eve of PH?
8	omg..ok just noticed it. will go next week then
29	LOL - heng I alerted you...hahah
5	So much for the raved soup.  I think the powdery effect is because the chicken has been frozen for a while.  Correct me if I am wrong.  Same for the fish.  If it taste dry no matter how you cook, must have lost too much water during the freezing and defrosting process.
0	Mutton, quantity order - 20  Same comments as pork  Beef, quantity order - 30  Same comments as pork.  Ordered another round - 20.  This is another unpleasant encounter - From the time i ordered till it reached the table (30 mins)  After 10minutes, I checked with the server on the beef status, Ans: The beef need defrosting, another 10 to 15minutes.  Went out to make some clouds, came back. Start talking a lot of rubbish to PPP, after 20 minutes than arrived.   Some other stuff we ordered.  Golden mushroom  Beef ball and luncheon meat
4	Wanton - PPP cooked for me.   Fried items - drumlets and nuggets (i think nuggets brand is farmPride)  This is good as it came hot - fried only when order, no bloody smell and taste.  Ice cream - PPP commented it taste like those makeshift ice cream stall along the road side.  Will go again to determine if this place serve quality stuff or their meat supplier is just having a bad day.  Toons, when you going again? i will use the no voucher stunt(if it still works)
145	super disappointing  Thanks for enlightening me, i learned something new.
6	Wah, I thought it would only happen if we freeze-dry the meat? hahah  At least that's my experience with my furkids' food - the meat is freeze-dried to "seal in the goodness"
21	hi everybody! I'm new to hardwarezone, but im also a friend of ping pong piang.. he has been telling me about all the buffet trips that made me salivate.. so here i am! please do notify when there's a good deal coming up! thanks alot!
2	u keep track of this thread as there is no function in hwz to "notify" u.
17	There is. Subscribe the thread with email notifications.
4	can i join when theres an outing to go jiak buffet??
254	Yup - all are welcome but some outings are voucher-based so unless we have spare vouchers, otherwise late-comers will have to pay the full price (which may not be worth it in some cases)...hahah
186	hogayyy~ will pop by the thread everyday to see~
42	Anybody bot the Korean bbq voucher?
112	welcum to join though u r new here
351	just back from night jogging so hungry
97	Which one? There's just too many Korean BBQ vouchers these days
9	later me going to MOF for ala cart buffet.. anyone went there before??? nice??
6	wat is MOF???
25	Ministry of Food?
1	Ministry Of Finance ????
13	I went for their bento and cold soba. The sashimi is very fresh. Food is not bad.
23	sold out!!!!
4	it  mus be used within 1 month right.... besides they are pretty busy this month
41	wow din know MOF now got buffet... last time i remember eating there... i love the desserts...   regards,  wacky
75	$34 for Weekday or $36 for Weekend International Lunch Buffet at Triple Three at Mandarin Orchard (Worth up to $72)
9	how is triple three quality?
3	They have regular 1-for-1 offers.  Food wise, its normal.  I used to like their buffets before the reno.  Now, its passable.  $36 nett seems slightly higher than their usual 1-for-1 offers, but maybe inflation has driven up prices.
53	I think I will be checking this out next week.  Anyone tried before?  So if 2 pax go, one can order the sweet fondue and the other order the savory fondue?
104	No idea, prolly in dec.  Will check with donkey n dennyz.  Let you know once confirmed.
137	hey you are ok mah... anyways, see you peeps at the next buffet (s)
5	next buffet remember to chichat with us ^_^  or else lonely buffet is no fun
64	Which buffet you going for next? Been a while since I last saw you.
90	monday eat satay with toons at katong?
55	u know wat is shy?
21	What's the damage? Is it buffet?
6	Went there with toons few months back.  I like the place, quiet and service is good.  Though food selection is quite limited, for the price, it's worth going.   We bought the voucher
59	Dec please. Nov jin busy already.  Not unless bitten by the last minute yao gui bug to jiak buffet again
496	OMG SAKURA CHARCOAL GRILL. I WANNA EAT T.T
5	Haa can't wait.. Most likely I'm ok w the dinner on 25th
140	The reviews were bad.  Dun go.  I'm only going cos i'm stuck with the voucher.
7	I may be able to make it as well   (Edit - typing on iPad sucks)
19	wah.. from one end to the other end.  mmmmm.... most likely i cannot make it....zzz
33	More for the company mah...  Food is anywhere also can eat woah
5	Haa ya but think need to drive lol too ulu
8	5. Missumuch guest 1 on waiting list *eyeing jadey's seat *  6. Missumuch guest 2 on waiting list  7. Carey on waiting list  - Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.[/QUOTE]
1	do include carey in the list la.... lol...
1	Is there any promo for Shin Yuu now?
2	If include Carey n mine gt 4 cars le so more seats open up ya?
6	carey u confirm bo? u r driver reh
2	include in list is not equal confirm right right right??
4	wei, wei, wei ...  my guests ish cfm can make it de roh   going by toons buffet rule, can cfm butties will over-ride those not cfm ones    *tis is to prevent greedy yet indecisive butties from chopping place *
3	the shuttle bus lots of seats.., for u to choose
0	miss the shuttle bus need wait 1 hour
3	k, noted ...  jadey offered to take the shuttle bus to Sakura so tat my 2  guests can take the cars   any white knights wanna accompany her?
19	5. Missumuch guest 1 on waiting list *eyeing jadey's seat * 6. Missumuch guest 2 on waiting list 7. Carey (TBC) on waiting list  8. Carey guest (TBC) - Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.
4	U not going ??
2	tempting leh, but I next week jiak buffet  farnie hor, my guests gg without me
3	u mean u also got quota one..?   regards,  wacky
1	So for those w cars do we need to wait for the 8ppl who can't make it then we can go for reserved list??
2	I dun hv buffets quota, oni buffets KPI  cannot jiak too much, tummy bursting soon
2	Think no need bah  As long as those got cars one confirm, can liao  Just ask ah tan to book for 16 - less never mind
0	y u so gan cheong abt the reserved lists de participants leh? dun tell me u r eyeing on my guests as well  tink since carey (he has no choice ) is gg, all shd be cfm
3	Haa Carey this buffet alot things must skip cos sushi all rice haa
0	Just jiak the grilled stuff lor...  That's why I am not too keen on this buffet...hahah  Give me Ssekkei any time
2	Nah.. Cos that day I'm changing shift w my colleagues ma.. If need to see the 8 participant before we can go then maybe I dun confirm first ma lol
0	You say all chio bus woah...hahahPlease explain...hahah
9	Haa I'm keen w the grilled food too lol.. The dessert also must skip  ha.. Really temptation lol
3	I told u b4 le, hao much u can trust my posts?  jadey invited u to go mah, u dun turn up, u dun gif her face no, dun worrie abt tat, juz go if u like tis outing come on, unker! isnt yr slogan "it's the company tat matters"? enuff of yr nonsense, cfm u for tis outing
0	erm, i didnt invite carey...
2	"" carey cham liao ,MUM de next target
0	Haa carry hopefully this outing we can see some more changes in us  jiayou lol
1	4 pay 3 for weekday lunch only.  Think eve, PH also cannot.If you're not going, better give ah tan the contact no of at least 1 of your guests.  Wait end up no one knows who your 2 guests are ...
5	Missumuch lol ok.. Then can put me as confirm will be driving   see the pics that's y keen in this outing lol
36	5. Nickblitz  6. Nickblitz guest  7. Carey (TBC) on waiting list  8. Carey guest (TBC) - Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.[/QUOTE]
5	this one the grilled stuff more than ssekkei..  but meat quality not as good oni..  theres steamboat + grill (meat got duck, pork, chicken, beef, lamb)
4	- Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing. I put as 16 participants since got 4 cars.
1	Got prawns.  The salmon fats is SHHIIIOOOOOKKKKKK.  That one alone worth this trip.  Thats why I am returning.     But please hor, don't fight with me for it.  You all can go for the leaner, healthier parts.
2	Reserve list:   - Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.   cannot. carey did not confirm.
1	Leaner, healthier?   Don't bluff young children leh
6	cannot. u so fat le. too much not good for u. besides their diet is eat the fatter the better. why don t u email the management to warn them n advise them to prepare enough fatty food for the buffet day.
0	got salmon belly sashimi??
5	Seriously, i dun think there will be enough to go around   Its a pity you had to miss momiji.  Their salmon belly sashimi is very good.
16	he really wanna go. so if u didnt intend to go last min, he will realli go
3	Ya, if Toons say he cannot make it, then me and lj would have went.    Lj sounds crude.
1	No.  Grilled salmon belly.  Imagine the charred exterior forming a crusty covering and all the fats will melt.  So when you bite into the fats, the oils will sexplode in your mouth.
0	Bi Chi Bi Chi.
2	Thank you piggy for the salmon belly sashimi
1	Their names are pork cutlet and pork cordon bleu?
2	So you are the other beneficiary.  Never tabao for me.
1	The cheese cake, durian puff and rum &amp; rasin ice cream are decent.  I am a sucker for rum &amp; raisin ice cream.
6	So clever. But I don't want risk kena black list by momiji.  Is tmr shun fu confirm?
2	Don't sexpose me leh.  Anyway, that time I went, I was the only one taking the fatty parts.  Everyone else snatch the leanest parts.  I at the side um-chio.
3	You must be getting old.  You said Tuesday.  Tomorrow is Monday coz my teacher teach me the day after Sunday, which is today, is Monday.
8	sexplode in your mouth jie jie
47	Oops. . Really getting old liao.  Another mistake, I can't go Tuesday cos I am car-less.
6	Got grilled lamb ah?   Ssekkei would be perfect if they serve lamb haha  Wonder if we can bring our own or not haha
28	Actually most cars can take 5 people including the driver lol  Unless they are bui buis like me - then cannot
22	Wah I like rum n rasin ice cream too ha.. Lol maybe that  will be my cheat meal lol  Any1 trying the mof buffet later?
31	Not my tin can   Actually we are sticking to group of 4 as ah tan say the seating there is in table of 4s.
21	My side got 2 piglets following if Mrs (^@^)" going. Each piglet got a dragon throne. So my car cannot really fit 4. Even if Mrs (^@^)" not going, I still have one piglet following me. That means one dragon throne.
38	so wad is the plan now???
22	just wait.. when it gets nearer to the date. everything will be more and less confirm
38	Then arrange a meeting point when date get nearer
38	haha, all so kan chiong...plan so early
97	i wonder if they are opened tommo....
56	whats shun fu??
2	Food centre - got unker there that sells very good roast meat or so they say
5	- Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.
6	stall close on monday n sometimes tue. so uncle bob sat best to go wed
3	Thanks for the info sis.  Don't think I can go these few days liao
8	y bo fix date to close? abit weird sometime tuesday
4	Fatty char siew is excellent. Normal char siew is good. Don't order wrongly. Roast pork is good only. Don't bother with the roast duck. When you order, just tell Uncle you want the fattiest char siew he has as your arteries needs some clogging.
3	I don't eat charsiew these days due to the sugar  Roast pork still ok hahah but won't go there just for it lor
3	Sakura has lamb chop, but I don't like. The meat is abit tough. Maybe I suck at cooking lamb chop. The beef steaks also rather tough. Pork chops too. Bacon is nice. They have scallops too, not too bad.
0	no pt going there for Roast pork . not worth it
6	u bring chopper n loosen the tendon
4	That's why I am not keen to go haha
741	Yep, their meat quite tough..but their chicken still ok..coz the cooking temp very high the skin is very crispy   they have shabu shabu and the previous two times i went with my friend, they were serving thin slices of pork belly..which is not bad..but when i went again with my parents, they were serving BACON only for shabu shabu..
22	How's the food like?
57	I would say not bad - quite authentic Thai food - don't go expecting very high-end stuff and you will not be disappointed
162	Most cars can take 5 people but the tables there not designed for 5 diners yet they will try to squeeze you all into one table which will be super cramp.
42	Dun mind trying, but the validity until 30 nov wor.  I'll wait for the next promo.Then we stick to 4 bah.  Cramp not comfortable.  Now the figures very nice mah.  4 cars, 16 paxes, out of which 4 TBC.  Even if piggy's car, he needs to bring the piglets, at most the remaining 3 cars squeeze a bit still can.  Just nice 4 tables of 4 paxes each.
9	Ah Tan - car is car, table is table mah  If we have 5 per car, we can still sit 4 per table with 20 pax haha
3	i'll  give it a miss ma
19	Actually if you go to the website, the normal cost is only $19.80++   The coupon gives you "free" pineapple rice (+$1 option) and calimansi free flow (+$3 option)  Really that worth it meh? Don't think so hahah
4	yea not worth it!
13	Even if you dun count in the pineapple rice n calimansi, you still save $4.80 cos normal price is $23.30 nett vs voucher price of $17.50.  Okay lar.  Dunno if its the same as the previous promos though.
2	You bui bui right? You want to squeeze 5 bui buis into one car?
6	his car can fit 5.
5	5 bui bui in carey de car still got space to roll around
2	we giv him face ba.   sh.......hwe get ur point la
18	Must be elite spacious car, unlike mine. Mine lao pok chia.
1	Because I drive lorry mah
2	I saw on website is $19.80 niah  Plus we don't eat pineapple rice or drink calimansi as well
52	Just came back from my 1st official family outing with the newest addition to the family at MOF @ NEX.   Went for the High-Tea Buffet. Since there are 2 paying pax (piglets eat for free  ), we had the chocolate fondue and cheese fondue. The items that comes with the fondue is one time. Don't worry about the cheese and chocolate sauces running out, as portion is generous. There are not much savory items. Only handrolls and savory items with the pancakes. The rest all dessert stuff. Lots of ice cream with various toppings. Good for those with sweet tooth and a separate stomach for such stuff. Think I shocked the staff there with what I ate, but the last item that arrive did me in. The kiarrage (not sure of spelling) was HUGE, about the size of my face. I was quite full then, so by the time I finished that, Mrs (^@^)" said I looked abit pale. The free-blasting of the aircon didn't help. So warning for those who is ordering that item, order it early.   With service charges and GST in, works out to be $24 per pax (added 2 chawamushi for piglet). Pretty ok since family enjoyed themselves. The staff there are very good, except for one pinay. She came over and confirmed my 3rd order 4 times ( there was only 4 items I ordered) and she can still screw it up. So much for having FT.
9	will go there n try,  which is nicer chocolate or cheese ?
1	no peektures??  regards,  wacky
9	Eh the buffet is the ice cream or food? Lol
1	Go with a partner. Try both. The items that come with the fondue sets are different. So you should try both for a variety. I would say both sauces are nice. Mrs (^@^)" finds the cheese sauce too strong a cheese taste. I like strong tasting cheese, so I find it mild.
2	Got. Only piglets. Family person priorities are different.
40	It's a desserts buffet. The savory items help to balance the sugar overdose. The highlights of the buffet not about the food.
3	no piglet no talk
1	i check see got partner to go with me bo
16	Sure got one. You so many zeh zehs go out with you.
7	me forever alone de wor
3	hannors..
2	me not like u got so many model girl friends
9	no hab model..  all are normal ppl.
2	celestina ????????
93	No more models, please.
30	Haa Brudders buffet lo.. I dun mind trying ha
19	Anyway 25the the dinner my car opc so can only leave my work place at 7pm
5	means your gang will reach there 7.30++ pm at least
5	opc                       ????
2	off peak car car
3	Proves a point.
4	Take bus lor. I have taken the shuttle bus from Sengkang to Changi Airport. So what is the problem with a short ride to Punggol Marina?
9	25th me not going , got school
51	Haa see who that day end work late then I pick ba  lol the mof buffet I see le still blurr ha.. The eat all j can buffet mof is free flow what stuff ha
87	oh well, for the car seats, just sit on top of each other haha
26	Wait, I am driving.
379	are u able to join the gang for scholar?
4	Nice promotion at Yum Cha  Tried the tim sum there before - not too bad
9	Haa the only dim sum buffet I tried is dragon gate at harbor front.. Nv try yum cha or red star before.. Ha carry org la.. But alot carbs lol
6	Promo in straits times ar? Must bring along cutout to get the 4 pay 3 deal.
1	This one is ala carte dinner - should be less carbs bah...hahah  Next weekend I go see the menu first
9	In today's Today - page T3
10	aiya must go find one Today ~
33	Haa Bao siew Mai dumpling those skin alot carbs ma ha
157	That's why I don't eat dim sum any more these days   Even if I do, I will remove the skin
42	i am interested.
25	anyone tried any of the following b4...?  regards,  wacky
2	I've tried Les Saveurs's high tea before. It's a joke honestly.
1	If the date i can make it, i'm keen too.  Its not a dim sum buffet btw, but rather chinese dishes.  Waiting for the menu now.
1	We can arrange one on 28/29 Nov?
0	Me want to go too.
18	I know ah - it's dinner ala carte   Thinking of 28/29 Nov bah...  They say got 60 dishes - no idea if any of them are limited to single order or not though...
13	why nice huh???
15	I am organising a team building dinner for my company at a budget of $60 per person, food must be halah due to a malay colleague, i need suggestion for good international buffet dinner. Any suggestion?
1	Carousel if you have the moolah. Sakura if you don't wanna spend that much.
7	rooks naise lehh the yum cha buffet.. can i join?
3	sure,  i went to cheers to get the "Today", we have two paper cut out if  including ur copy of "Today"?  for the date, see majority votes.  Pricing:  $32.80 x 1.17 = $38.376  $38.376 x 3pax = $115.128  $115.128 / 4pax = $28.782 ($28.80nett)  Each person save $38.376 - $28.782= $9.594, if we have 4pax.
4	Try Aquamarine.
5	Can you tell me what is on page 10?  I am just curious what news is hot now.
5	page 10 news - Floods threaten centre of Bangkok as north starts to rebuild  Source:   yum cha garden's promo is at the T section - page T3  If you count from the front page to the promo page - page 47
2	OIC, thank you very much for satisfying my curiosity as page 10 is censored online. I am just curious what news is  that it is deemed unsuitable to be published online.
6	Not bad their food
8	yum cha sgoon gardens food ish hokay. Veli near my hse only
1	You is elite mah - stay in elite district   Are you also a member at SGCC? Think members also dine free with 3 paying guests
1	near my office too... hmm looks interesting.....  regards,  wacky
3	review is not buffet.... de... n so short
1	Nose I ish onli member @ safra.
0	dun need to get the paper liao... just print...!   regards,  wacky
3	when u all going Yum Cha?
1	Read for the review on quality/standard mah
1	Actually on their facebook page, there is also UOB promo that is 4-for-3 as well...
1	Edit for you then...  SGCC is not elite enough
160	28/29 Nov lor   Promotion ends 30 Nov
34	near my boss house , ask him to treat me jiak
10	Menu for the yum cha ala carte buffet.  Think i will skip this one.  Enjoy!
1	Hmm...looks like worse than Cathay... Then we go back to Cathay then? hahah Or SCDH again? Evil? hahah
5	Is need 4 person - we can help you make up the numbers if he's treating
10	Yea, menu definitely not as good as Cathay.  Even peony is better.  I'm trying peony.  If good, i organise a peony outing, so stay tuned if you're keen on peony
12	Peony is lunch one right?   That one would be hard for most people unless they are on leave or something
7	Yea, but if its good, then already got 3 confirmed liao.  Just need to entice 1 more to go.  Year end liao, ppl starting to clear leave   Please go ahead with planning for Cathay or SCDH hor.  The more the merrier
11	i hav lots of leave tooo~~~ but no time :x
9	24 nov i apply leave ,anyone jio me to jiak?
10	Cathay think still got UOB 4-for-3 promo right?  SCDH heard is now 20% discount for UOB cards...  Peony Jade - let you go and be guinea pig first bah...hahah
29	paper leave
100	nope dun have... ended in oct... i dun mind trying yum cha one... at least something i've yet tried b4... cathay this yr ate liao dowan to eat again this yr... regards, wacky
56	Well, I also don't mind trying Yum Cha - not fantastic but still okay  I see the salted egg prawn I
33	What's Cathay buffet? Ha
532	This one:
59	Please give review of peony, i am keen to try it.
127	Saw the pic ant Cathay.. One word.. Yummy!!! Lol seems better then yum cha but not sure gt promotion Bo ha   End of nov?? Lol clearing leave ^^
112	so ish Cathay, SCDH, Peony Jade or Yum Cha ar?
145	Yum cha nice mth?
32	Just a reminder.  I already made the reservation liao.  Raven n Evil, i emailed you guys the vouchers a lot time ago liao.  Remember to bring it hor.  Date : Tue 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : Voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80 on top of S$12.50 instead of S$25.80.  Participants  1. Raven (own voucher)  2. Donkey (toons voucher)  3. PPP (own voucher)  4. Evil (own voucher)  5. Carey (own voucher)  6. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (Carey voucher)  7. Piggy (PPP voucher)  8. Piggy's better half (toons voucher)
36	ok boss
2	Haa the voucher buy from coupon ah?
2	From Groupon
1	When was the last time u email? Can email once more ma
0	Haa too bad no voucher can't join lol
1	PPP, Piggy &amp; Piglets' ma ma vouchers are with me.   Piggy, we still owe you for momiji, will contra that with Joaquim when we meet
24	You want to go?   You can take over my voucher.
61	Done..........
74	Liulian time!!!.go scout ard ~
85	I think he wld like to cause ssp is going
7	You must be feeling better liao, got energy to come here and suan ppl
40	Wah evil Suan me ah lol   Anyway u guys try the food before? Is it nice? Lol I go buffet is see the quality of food n the ppl I know n comfy w then go leh
5	wah i just woke up, regret never go melting pot eat satay with u T_T
2	Yup - damn nice their pork satay - hard to find those with the fatty bit also these days...hahah  Hot and tender - yummy...  But me still stuck in office - better get back to my work else I really no need to go home today
9	He is going because of me okay (as if...hahah)  Don't picha his lobang like that mah - no wonder called Evil
3	Who ish ssp? can i go because ssp ish going too?
33	I'll be going back again in dec again.  If you keen, i'll let you know ... although they dun serve satay everyday.
22	I think they will serve satay during lunch - always had it when I was there   Only went for dinner once - they had it too but can't be sure...let me go back a few more times
5	later u all scare SSP ,she mai come then .........
24	Haa u all like that say I where gt dare to go lol
42	When's Basilico again?
2	yes ok ....
7	thought u will say not going le
71	ya lor this duxy, really jiak ba bo sai pang
397	n1 ssp. wahahaha
8	So, you confirm taking over my voucher?
15	What you talking about?
4	Ya lor, if DF doesn't want, can I reserve it?
6	I willing to give up for voucher is for xdd to have a chance at meeting xmm.   Uncle carey wants another voucher to go another day or you got mystery guest going?
28	Secret
12	Fair enuff, a man deserve his own secret.   But all will be revealed on buffet day   I will see if DF gets back to me.
21	Let me know if keen.
34	I'm interested!!
15	Ok, me too
10	Oh I try this be4 but think 2 years back when my fren mum still a manager over at the hotel...the Peking duck was gd but ran out fast n refill speed so so the meat also taste not bad but tts 2 years ago dunno nw standard hw haha
9	I tried it a long time ago as well...  Not too bad - the fried chicken wings were fantastic as well
24	hahaha let's go there...but make it either tue or thur night or sat lunch as mon wed fri reserve for something else haha
2	Ha donkey nvm.. Perhaps join other outing.. The voucher can pass to Carey  haa   Wah looks gd the link
10	Sure or not? You don't want to go meh? hahah
13	I dun dare to buy for you as i dunno if can fit the outing to your schedule or not.
3	can help me buy?  didn't know got so many yummy side dish. the waitress nv intro.
9	tts sad
5	Jade room voucher bought for Carey, Manyu, Donkey, Toons and Bigmonkey.
6	Thanks Toons - now the issue of fixing a date...hahah
3	carey ya la..maybe the other 1 i join k?? lol
5	tts so sad...I have to miss it
5	finally found it, picture for jade room @ post #579
2	Any recommendations for nice Chinese cuisine in raffles city? Can b buffet or a la carte style. thanks.
23	ala carte-   old hongkong at lvl 3 - raffles city shopping centre
2	Okay, since DF doesn't want, can I take over the voucher? hahah  Thanks
2	haa carey the jade hotel de can join u guys? lol
1	Looks good - hopefully it's as nice as I remembered it to be
5	Of course can - just get Toons to help you buy voucher lor   Or you can buy the voucher yourself - your choice
2	but the date u guys plan to go? haha me this fri to tues on leave.. ^^ ha toons can help me buy 1 too? thanks alot
2	Sure. Provided I know who is your mystery guest   Will email you the vouchers when I am back in office.
0	Told you toons, I am old but not that old.  I remember BigMonkey went and did a review before.
12	so this is the one you went. but the way you posted doesn't seem to warrant a visit? i wonder if the crab is good. i'm more concerned for that. prosperous kitchen one is really not bad...i wanted to reply the same.  they have 20% off dim sum from 3-5pm if i remember correctly. just went last month.
0	Sure.  Date not confirmed yet, but will not be in Nov.  As long you dun tell me 'tue, thu n sat cannot make it' or only on weekend kinda of thing, then should be okay date wise.
2	How are the buffet outings like? Open to everyone to join? I'm interested to go for the jade room one...
0	liulian thread gone ar? ytsd i went combat with my butties.. we chose the premium XO.. and Wang Zhong Wang.. 6 liulians we hooted (2 XO,4 WZW).. 139bucks.. XO nt very good.. WZW very good.
0	everyone can come. just register your interest. unless is those got coupon one.. but u can see who got spare.
1	Keke, he never post the name, just the pics.  No wonder a search turned up nothing.  Btw, think he just complained that the staff in a hurry to go n not abt the food, hmmmmmm
4	You can purchase the voucher on your own then join us when dates are posted.
8	That place has been serving steamboat buffet for the longest time, cant be so bad.  I trust BigMonkey esp since got ice cream
8	Thanks, but... will it feel weird eating with strangers?
1	Don't worry, I don't feel weird eating with strangers
6	i wasn't even able to touch the ice cream, and the drink, i only had one cup. jin emo.
8	Then you have to eat more when we go there
10	Wah toons openly suan me
19	haha... let that person buy his own ticket.
6	Treat it as my revenge lor.  Anyways, true mah.  If outing end up on a fri n you cannot go, wat you want me to do with the voucher?
18	Everyone is a stranger at the beginning mah.  You have to start somewhere.  Dun tell me you only gonna eat with ppl you know for the rest of your life?    Besides, we are a friendly bunch, overly friendly n noisy to be exact.You went very late ah?  This time round, come earlier lar.
7	I reached about 8:30pm cos orginally wanted to go to another hotel for buffet, but once i reached the area, the place was a flat land.
1	Tempting. When you all going?
2	One time stranger, two times friend, three times
0	Thks bro.......
1	Live with it   It's not the first time nor will it be the last
2	Thanks  Mystery guest is me, myself and I  I still need one more voucher it seems
0	U knw tt if it's end up on fri n I can't go I will either give it to some1 else or I die die try to go if not just treat it I waste money ma  will still u the money ma  Anyway revenge for what  Wah new young blood for donkey to beo
12	I bought the coupon.  Date-wise, anything after Dec 10 should be ok for me (that's my ORD date)  Any date before that may be a little hard, especially Nov.
2	Will probably be after that then - we also have a lot of vouchers to clear in Nov
3	Swee ... like tat i get for you Tak siao, tak gong ...
3	Oei, don't scare newbie leh.   Revenge for bullying Donkey.
9	Previously you so nice to give up your extra vouchers to the rest and now you are looking for vouchers.  Actually I don't mind trying cos I never been there.  Got extra vouchers than pass me ok :
5	Yeah thanks just tt I prefer tue n thur only Nv bully....
1	ya... that is bad.
12	Same same - me also   Wednesdays are bad for me - I go to a not-at-all satki gym
21	Ya lor.  Heehor heehor . . Jin evil. You see above, I got evident.   No more present for you
26	Haa mine depends on shift work so can't confirm de lol
3	Closed ...........
19	Tempted but cannot - need to work late on Monday
6	if nov 24 / 25 lunch, i can join u :X both day not working
5	I got lunch meeting on that day, else would have join Toons.  If you need work late than all the more got good reason to treat yourself to the lunch buffet.
10	buffet eat fei fei~!~!!~
5	what time is the lunch? 12-2.30?
27	Yea.  I'm on leave tat day, so will be whacking from start til end
2	Err, having lunch wor, not dinner.
0	What time? I can make it
1	Haven't decide which day to take leave next week, going for the Orchid Show at MBS.
39	If I have to work late, means I won't be able to leave the office...  Me not so eng - can go for super long lunches woah
47	how many voucher u have?
16	Nara Japanese buffet   http://www.dealshop.com.sg/Deals/Alacarte+Japanese+Buffet+Dinner+at+Nara+Japanese+Restaurant.aspx
14	Toons how many voucher u have?
13	lol destiny.. i'm not sure if you have noticed it or not. You have asked what i've asked. TWICE!!
6	Haa!! Opps lol..
8	if got extra , u 2 couple can go together
31	Or ask Toons to give up his voucher for these two
29	dreamer shu shu any mmbb outing soon?
2	12 to 2.30pm.  1 voucher nia.
14	Jade room voucher bought for Dennyz, Evil, Carey, Manyu, Donkey, Toons and Bigmonkey. Just 1 more than close liao, 1 table just nice
36	I'll pass.  thanks!!! now we need to settle on the date and time.. wohoo..
1	hmmmmmmmmmmm
0	Toons can buy for me the voucher?? Thanks alot
1	Haa ssp u can join toons makan ma
7	................
3	WHAT??!?!?mai tu liao
2	wow that jade voucher thing....
0	I help him answer . . For 2 pax only. And confirm he offering only 1 pax to go with him.
2	what is this diversion...........zz
1	SSP join the jade room then full house le
2	I am still unsure abt the date and timing....
4	usually is friday night, saturday lunch/dinner or sunday lunch. everyone has to work. except me
2	Bo Lang hiew me  lol
0	I tot DF is the last one to join in? lol...
1	Toons now busy jiak buffet ah
0	You might want to buy the voucher yourself cos if Toons don't reply later, you might have to wait till next week liao.
1	gimme lor...haha jk~
3	Can have more - the most we sit at two tables mah
4	nvm, i'd think about it again...
23	y u quote me....rater toons or df not happy   anyway haven even cfm the date i dunno can go not ~ ~
2	Buy liao.  Paiseh, just finished cleaning up the mess i made in the kitchen.  Sigh, think i stick to eating.  Cooking not my thing ...Dun wanna split.  If split then i rather pull out.
4	Jade room voucher bought for Destinyfire, Dennyz, Evil, Carey, Manyu, Donkey, Toons and Bigmonkey. 1 table just nice, closed.
0	Evil cannot do 1, 3, 5  Carey cannot do 3  Toons cannot do 5  Donkey cannot do 7  So likely will be dinner on tue/thu, or lunch on sat.  Weekend cannot do dinner.  I prefer weekdays cos less crowded.
1	Table can sit 9 boh? I got a late addition...hahah  Also bought coupon liao
0	I thought you using the turbo boiler?  Shouldn't be messy mah.  I hope you didn't ruin the piece of meat.
1	If its the bossy one then no
1	,............
4	Confirm not - I won't do this to people one
0	Sigh, i totally overcooked the 2 pieces of beef.  I must be crazy.  Ppl pan fried a few mins, i actually go n cooked it for 15 mins then 10 mins   End up the meat so tough tat my jaws ache from chewing, end up spitting most of it out ... paiseh, totally ruined the meat to the extent tat i can't tell abt the quality of the meat.  The fats started exploding in the boiler, so need to wipe the boiler a couple of times to get the oil off.  Quite disappointed abt the fats.  If you thinking of rendering them like pork fats, then maybe can get the larger pieces, but if just cooking them, i should have chosen those small strips which they trim off the meat.  The large pieces have all those tubes insides n too big to cook normally.  So emo now.  Tot can enjoy nice beef steaks, but end up with a sore jaw, floss n clean up job!  Now can only look forward to the cebu buffets ...
2	I prefer weekday too.  To start the ball rolling, can I suggest 15 Dec?  Since we got more than a hand full if the dates are really bad for some, can always split up into 2 days.
1	Hahaha . . Now Carey got a lot of under ground arrangement
1	Then should be okay   Even if its the bossy one also okay lar.  I just kidding, heehee.
2	feel very pity for the beef , hope it is not wagyu
4	Errr, think i have DnD on fri 16 Dec.  The tue is fine though.
4	Hahaha . . My bad   13 Dec is cool for me.
5	Poor beef. Poor turbo boiler.  I was still hoping you will love it then I have good reason to stock up.  I will buy some this weekend to try and let you know if it's good.  As for the beef fats, I have already consulted Carey, I am using it to render oil.
13	lol next time u cook ..
1	I suggest 3 mins each side for the beef.  Then can decide from there.  Hmmm, beef lard ... should be interesting!Lol, got improvement liao.  The last time i cooked lamb chops, i almost burnt down my kitchen.  The lamb chops tasted better though.
1	13th I can ha.. If end nov u guys can??
1	who did the bbq at novena ???????
1	Tot doing blue garden during the week of 28 Nov liao?  Oei, carey, you organiser ler, do work!!!
1	I think is Evil.
2	Comes with experience.  I feel its easier when the steak is thick.  Look at the sides to see the colour.  I normally turn the steak when its still 2/3 red/pink, then the other side till the middle 1/3 still pink.  After that, just turn the steak round on its side to give it a nice coating.  Then take the steak out to rest it.  The done-ness should be about medium rare to medium.
8	Simi blue garden? Cos end nov I'm on leave few days. Lol  Anyway main page so far only the Sakura outing confirm? Or got others but closed le?   Anyway this kinda table if seat 11 should be ok right cos buffet ma.. Might be abit squeeze la
5	Yea, the chefs at my table were evil n manyu.  I just help to eat   Sibei xing fu ...Thanks!  Next time i try again will give it a try.The korean bbq at tiong bahru?  Can't remember whose in though.  Why squeeze?  Eat must eat in comfort mah, else how to enjoy?
11	toons dont like coziness...  .
6	Lovejade, you interested in the jade buffet?
3	At Sakura, you can try. Think should have some thick steaks. Don't expect good marbling or cut though.
110	Toons, should have stewed the meat. Save u JJ - Jaw Job
5	i dont know what is that
2	erm....... so... why r u crazy?
4	ur treat ar?  i know i m not free during wkdays
606	- Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.  --------------------------------------------  ok. i m not able to make it
10	Is this nice???
278	Looks like Korean chai png
35	- Newly added - This outing is open for members to join. - Outing ended or number of participants reached. - Waiting for a confirm date or a future outing.  --------------------------------------------  Taking own transport.
159	I got a coupon, can i join?
2	Can ah why not haha
137	later ask me sit on the floor. T.T
235	we where got so bad , the most we ask the store prepare a giant steamboat for u to sit inside
172	because he scare toons doesnt wan too cozi
110	Now to 19 Nov, Joaquim will not be serving pork or lard food
263	omg omg omg halal season ???? or they know toon ,carey n PPP coming :X ?
12	Only $19.90 Nett (Usual price $28.70) Chinese Steamboat Buffet at Hotel Royal, Jade Room Restaurant. Highly-popular with an Unbelievable Spread of 80+ Different Dishes including Chilli Crabs, Peking Duck, Free flow of Ice Cream &amp; Drinks plus more!
34	No pork eat what siah?  Only chicken and beef?
219	seems like a lot of merchants nowadays cut corner when offering voucher.
47	Date : Tue 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : Voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80 on top of S$12.50 instead of S$25.80.  Participants  1. Raven (own voucher)  2. Donkey (toons voucher)  3. PPP (own voucher)  4. Evil (own voucher)  5. Carey (own voucher)  6. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (Carey voucher)  7. Piggy (PPP voucher)  8. Piggy's better half (toons voucher)  9. Monkey (own voucher)
93	You might just wanna call the restaurant cos Toons might have just booked for 8 and he is out of town.
164	chicken, fish, seafood, yong tau foo, vegetables. a few cooked foods including one beef dish. kueys, hot desserts, icecream, fruits.
1	Date : Tue 15 Nov Time : 630pm onwards Location : Joaquim @ Suntec Price : Voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80 on top of S$12.50 instead of S$25.80. Participants 1. Raven (own voucher) 2.  3. PPP (own voucher) 4. Evil (own voucher) 5. Carey (own voucher) 6. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (Carey voucher) 7. Piggy (PPP voucher) 8. Piggy's better half (toons voucher) 9. Monkey (own voucher) 10. Carey's guest (Carey voucher)
85	I thought already includes my "guest"? hahah
20	buffet buffet 2.. my classmate ish in it. she told me the lamb ish damn good!
49	Beta keen to go try? Jio me hor.
547	.......................
19	hmmm... braised monkey brains?
0	A Medley of Flavours A tantalising medley of buffet spreads await at Bar &amp; Billiard Room and Tiffin Room. In a culinary display of creativity and flair, our team of chefs passionately prepares extraordinary dishes that will delight the discerning and casual diner. At Bar &amp; Billiard Room, gourmet antipasto, freshly shucked oyster, European ham and appetisers unfold into a colourful parade of live-action cooking stations, hearty roast and carving. Tiffin Room allures with the vivid flavours of Northern Indian cuisine, a delicious dreamscape of creamy curries, fruity chutneys and succulent Tandoori meats. Feed at Raffles members enjoy 50% off total food bill when you join us for lunch and dinner every Monday to Wednesday, until 31 December 2011. Usual Feed at Raffles privileges apply during the rest of the week. 1)  The eleventh and above guests will have to pay full price (following existing terms and conditions) 2) Applicable discount on food &amp; beverage are only valid for the Bar &amp; Billiard Room Menu and Tiffin Room Menu. 3) Regular discount in High Tea in Tiffin Room would apply; this offer is not applicable. 4) Members are limited to one card per table or party per visit and must dine at the table to enjoy this benefit 5) Meal period, menu, prices, change of concept and operating hours can change during the year (existing terms and conditions) For reservations or enquiries, please call Dining Reservations at +65 6412 1816 or email . For other promotions available at Raffles Hotel, please click here.  look at this..  We suppose to go try this right toons.. hehe now got 1-10pax got offer.
20	i nv jiak b4 such food u try b4? looks decent la.
54	Nice! So now 1 to 10 all 50. I go solo also can liao heehee. I am keen. You? But weekday wor. You can make it? You weekday dinner also not fixed right?
38	Bars and Billiards? Forget it - the standard dropped so much that I won't even go if it was free...
0	really drop ar? i have been there the whole of last yr n this yr..  been concentrating in Fairmont,swiss hotel area..
6	Carey say not naise lehs..  hmmm... wats the price now ar? u remember?
16	You guys can go try and give an updated review bah...hahah
61	maybe ba.. if 50% price attractive i wont mind going..
9	If in November, you can jio me and piglet.  Thanks.
131	Hi, i am selling away 2 voucher of $20 for Japanese Ala Carte Buffet Dinner at Honjin Restaurant and Bar (Worth $40): If interested, please contact me Thanks
54	bar and billiard ish the sucks.
59	Thought got grilled prawns and meats?
32	No idea on the price. I'll call for more details later.  I'll still try it since i never being b4 n always wanted to give it a try. Too bad sunday brunch not included in the promo.
3	$18.50 instead of $31.10, 41% off Authentic Korean BBQ Set by Seoulria. Includes 4 Types of Meat - Beef, Pork Belly, Spicy Pork Belly and Chicken + 6 Side Dishes + Free Flow of Barley Tea.
7	If dinner, I can join you.
12	too bad it's not buffet
69	opps sorry,i tot it was
2	Carey, Donkey should be taken off the list since you took over her voucher.
10	o well, nvm..just go la. shld be free.
25	Hahaha. . Its on Tuesday, by when can you confirm?
3	Ya hor - should take your name out...  The problem is that people keep quoting the wrong list and not the most recent one
26	Wah, swatchie's elite taste is same as mine ah? hahah But jokes aside, B&amp;B is a joke now Normal price for B&amp;B without discount is S$70+?
89	hi all buffet gurus! do u all know if there is any place having nice crab buffet feast or any places that sell nice crabs?
10	Crab buffet seldom nice. Or it will be cold crab legs or flower crabs. Very rarely you have nice good cooked crabs.
7	Date : Tue 15 Nov  Time : 630pm onwards  Location : Joaquim @ Suntec  Price : Voucher holders will have to pay extra $0.80 on top of S$12.50 instead of S$25.80.  Participants  1. Raven (own voucher)  2. PPP (own voucher)  3. Evil (own voucher)  4. Carey (own voucher)  5. Sweet&amp;Saltypopcorn (Carey voucher)  6. Piggy (PPP voucher)  7. Piggy's better half (toons voucher)  8. Monkey (own voucher)  9. Carey's guest (Carey voucher)  is this the updated list?
21	Confirm have enough vouchers hor?  Do they have baby chair?
6	Toons not going?
2	He is not going. That's why I ask that you guys check the reservation again cos i can't remember if he book for 8 or more.  Since ssp is not confirm yet, I will be the reserve should she pull out. Not unless you have another mystery guest joining
1	Yours and your wifey's voucher is confirmed. I email to Carey liao.
7	Yes, your 2 vouchers confirmed one.  1 is from PPP's extra, the other is mine.  I passed them to Donkey liao.  I'll call them to prepare a baby chair and to up the reservations to 10, if it is not at 10 already.Nope, i going Carnivore tomorrow!  Then wed got shiu somemore.  Tue need a break   Gonna try and fast all the way after my carnivore lunch til we dinner!
5	$58++ for lunch n $72++ for dinner.  So it will be $34.15 nett for lunch, unless they charge full service charge like some places.  Hmmm, k, lar, $34.20 to try out a new place ... how bad can it be?They told me tat the menu is the same for lunch and dinner, so not point paying more for dinner, since i clearing leave here n there, i will likely be going for lunch.  Beta likely going for dinner, heehee.  Oei Beta, you organise a dinner to BnB hor.Keke.
2	Selling nice crabs a lot of places, but the price is veri veri nice, heehee.  You're looking at $40-$50 per kg.  For crab buffet, the better decent one is the one at concorde hotel.  They cook the crabs when you order.  Theres about 5 types of crab dishes you can order.  The standard is not up to the nicer cze char stalls, but i found the crabs decent.  Dun ever go to the crab buffet at Ellenborough, at least not for the crabs.  I went there twice n the crabs absolutely sucks.  Not fresh until its like shrunken and watery ... yucks.
23	so who is going ??? me is consperm going on tue de
3	Thanks for the arrangement. Remember to order the butterfish and of course the grilled pineapples. The rest are pretty forgettable. I somehow remembered that fiesta was slightly better. Lol.
4	I more keen on lunch too. $35 is alright, unless it's another Indian Times. I read there is BBQ lamb chops, beef, and prawns. How bad can it be?
8	That will be more than 48 hours of fasting   You guys are amazing. I can't make it pass 24 hours.  And it's definitely not fast cos time pass so slowly when I am hungry
3	2009 lunch review. Salmon looks good.   2010 dinner review. Spread looks limited.   HGW's ratings are pretty decent too.
12	After my desserts high tea at MOF last Monday, I skipped dinner, next day's breakfast and lunch. The sugar lasted me very long.
1135	Let's just say don't get your hopes up...hahah I last went for dinner was in 2010  Prior to that was still okay - was a regular there for their lunches with my ex-colleagues almost every month Gone are the good ol days where the chocolate buffet at Bar and Billard was purportedly "the best in Singapore" and the cold seafood section "to die for".
2	it's normal for ladies
7	price is fine as long as is nice! i will always go to either  mellben or jumbo for crabs. but wanted to try something new this time round yet will not be disappointed. =) i have never try crab buffet before, have always wanted to, so i thought asking you guys should be right. ok i will check concorde hotel out! thanks a lot! =)
122	I think if you compare to melben, jumbo, seafood paradise stds, you will be disappointed.  Only some buffets offer fresh n sweet crabs, n those are the ones on ice.  I have not come accross 1 buffet offering cooked crabs comparable to the stds of those forementioned places.  Even the concorde one is so so nia, although its the better one amongst the buffets i tried.
1	Some pics from my bui bui lunch at Carnivore @ Vivocity.  The meats were overall quite tasty.  For me, only the chicken wrapped with bacon n honey baked ham were lousy.  Sausage was so so.  The roasted chicken thigh was crispy outside and juicy.  The beef hump was quite good, but the doneness depends on the cut which you get.  Can range from well done to rare (or medium rare according to Dennyz).  Although some cuts can be a tad dry, esp the well done cuts, but they are never tough, so still okay.  Pork was decent.  The lamb was quite good, with tat lambey taste which i loved.  Even though i surrendered at the end, i still cannot resist eating tat last piece when the waiter came over with the lamb skewer.  Esp since he was so nice as to come over whenever there was a fatty portion.  Another notable mention is tat the meats were served piping hot.  Some still smoking, heehee.  I had fun waving the lambey vapours at Dennyz to entice him to sample 1 last piece of meat   My fav was the beef rump, which was oh so fatty and tender.  If you like fats, you will love it.  The fats were so rich.  Dennyz, whose plate was a bit overfilled with meats, had a piece of beef hump tat sat in his plate for some time.  The fats on it even congealed into white clumps, but when he ate it, he said its still tender n tasty   Except for a piece of beef rump towards the end which was salty, the meats were otherwise not salty.  Which is a huge huge plus as the other churrascaria which i tried b4 had overly salty meats.  The butter fish was also good.  Dennyz said it tasted like the fish they used for fish fingers ... i liked it, since it had a slight fatty taste n nice texture, unlike the cheap dory fish they normally serve at buffets.  They also served grilled pineapple (sweet, slightly charred n still crunchy) n garlic bread which we did not try.  I also find their salad/appetiser spread quite decent.  Liked the olives, and spare ribs with black bean stew.  They provided quite a variety of interesting sauces, onion sauce, slightly sourish italian sauce, the slightly sweetish pineapple with cinnamon (which Dennyz drank!) etc.  They even had coffee n tea which i only noticed on my water out.  Oh, did i mention tat they serve plain water FOC, like any decent restaurant should.  Service was good.  Water was promptly replenished, the waiters keep serving us meats, catering to our requests for the fattier cuts, with 1 even specially making his way to our table whenever a fatty portion is available.  They even keep piling meats on poor Dennyz's plate when he showed them the red card signalling his surrender!  Must try, very fatty, very nice, they will coax him ... hehe ...   Again, a very refreshing change from the other churrasco, whose waiters started avoiding our table when we 'over ate'.  All in all, a nice lunch n not to mention interesting company  Will be nicer if they serve some fruits too.
41	Darn - looks like I missed a real good feast...sigh  Still working now and I haven't even started
38	Looks gd the food.. Ha Carey mayne next outing can org this lol
5	Oh man... Never include me... My post @  Bought the voucher liao =( Paiseh never reply to this thread in days since in camp... =(
1	Don't worry - I think the final count is 10 people including you and my guest
1	Sure but lunch most people can't make it unless it's weekend lor...hahah  Then again, Toons probably won't be keen to go again so soon
14	Heheh, that's assuring...  Doesnt that mean will have to split table though?
18	Actually i have not called them up yet, but i think 10 is absolute max liao.  Not going to increase any further liao.  Hope dun have to split table.  In fact i'm having 2nd tots abt punggol sakura cos have to split into so many tables.  Oh well, see how.  Tentatively on Tue 13 Dec.  You guys okay with it?Yea, while i like it, i dun know if i will pay full price for it.  Even with the 15% discount for most CCs, its still $31 nett for lunch n $45 nett for dinner, but dinner got extra beef cap, ribs n pork ribs.  Weekend even more expensive, but same spread.  Hmmm, i will not go back unless got special promo again.  I'm still keen to try out the churrascaria at 6th avenue though.
4	Bro, i confirmed the reservation for 10 pax liao, n asked them for a baby chair too.  Btw, you still keen on Senki, this coming sun 20 Nov?  Previously the voucher sold out, so cannot buy for you.  However, someone is selling 2 vouchers now.  If you keen, i can buy for you.  Then you n your better half plus piglet can join us.  Let me know.
23	I should be okay with it - let me also check with my "guest"...hahahToons - the beef ribs is in another world of its own...hahah  I would pay the price just to jiak the beef ribs alone   Anyway, lunch at S$31 nett is not bad ah - cheaper than Salta and more variety too...That one at 6th Avenue - I am always keen...heheh  Beef ribs all the way
21	I already confirmed. thanks
449	I'm keen on the 6th avenue one~ slurp~
25	6th ave is jiak simi?
40	Same thing as Carnivores - meat galore - but slightly better quality (bit more expensive too)...
5	Yes, saw your edited post that day.   Enjoy the buffet tonight
8	Just had dinner at  two days ago as my cheat meal and wanted to give a review. Cost: 2 Persons (Ala carte Sashimi + Shabu Shabu Buffet at $52++ pax + free flow drinks $30++ pax). Total came to just over $190. Food cost wise, its a bit more expensive than the cheaper options at Ikoi or Irodori. No they don't have snow crabs or fresh oysters (though they have a fried option) like Kushinbo. What they do have is a Shabu Shabu beef which is quite decent. When they first served the sliced sashimi, I wondered what the heck was going on. Who could be so cruel to sashimi and tuna? The slices were miniscule and simply ungenerous. Anyway, the two of us are big raw fish eaters so we finished these in a few minutes. Taste wise it was alright and relatively fresh. Not spectacular, but definitely around the same level as Ikoi. Its just sad how small they slice the fish though. Wafu steak was very nice. The meat was cooked well without being tough, the crisp garlic accompanying the dish added a nice flavor as well. Shrimp Gyoza. Usually gyoza is pork meat, but these gyoza were crispy and the shrimp meat was decent. Nothing to rave about, but they had a good texture. Beef carppacio  was sweet and tangy. Tasty. We polished that off quick. Sashimi Salad. Again, complaint is not much sashimi used, but I like to pack the greens when I'm eating heavy so the veggies were at least fresh and tasty. Chicken Karaage - Its hard to go wrong with deep fried chicken. It passes with flying colors. Tempura - This was a poor dish. Way too much batter that was not as crispy as it was soggy. Plus we ordered mixed tempura and the server interpreted it as bring out a order of ebi tempura, yasai tempura and a fish tempura... That's alot of tempura.  Handrolls - Tuna and California. Liked both. The seaweed was crispy and they didn't overstuff with mayo on the Cali roll like most places do. Meatballs - Good moist flavor. Can't comment much, but easy to go down. Now the shabu shabu deserves special mention cause it was really the highlight of the buffet. The australian beef was very tender, and the soup base didn't feel oily. Overall we polished it off very quickly. There's an option to refill the beef, or veggies, or add eggs, but we made do with just the standard portion. Veggies tasted good after soaking in the broth as well. We had a couple more rounds and in their defense, the sashimi slices became larger after we asked for bigger slices. Favorites were quite obvious, mainly the beef dishes such as the beef carpaccio, wafu steak, and shabu shabu. The rest were all good, but certainly not outstanding. The failure was the tempura. Dinner was capped off with two scoops of greentea ice-cream. Nice sweet way to finish the meal. Service was good, with smiling waitresses regularly clearing our dishes and bringing food at a good clip.  Oh, for the drinks buffet, my friend was polishing off shochu after shochu. Ask for the shochu neat cause if u order on the rocks, its really a lot of ice and you can barely taste the alcohol. I was mainly drinking non-alcoholic drinks since I was the designated driver, so in effect paid $30 for free-flow calimansi juice and coke-light  No big deal. The meal was still cheaper than a ala-carte meal at most Japanese restaurant with equiv alcohol.  Overall, I think I'll add this place to the list of Japanese buffets I frequent. Think of it as a shabu shabu buffet with some sashimi and japanese side dishes thrown in.  Plus since most of the best dishes are meat based with less caloric dense starchy/sugar components, its not as bad on the waistline. Might be a good option for low carb dieters who want mainly fish and meat in their buffet. Sorry guys, I don't bother with taking pictures of food in restaurants so no accompanying photos.
4	Thanks for the review   Great idea - think some of the guys (not necessarily low-carbers) have been there and they loved the shabu shabu too
8	I don't think they paid that much. I am not factoring the alcohol option. Think there is some promotion.
9	Carey, I got your pm. I will drop you a msg when we reach. I have met raven and evil before, plus with raven's face plastered all over edmw, I will be able to spot him if he is there.    Oh, today will be bringing 2 piglets. Bigger piglet will be on baby chair. Smaller piglet only 5 weeks old. He will be hopefully sleeping in the stroller. Hope you all can spare us the corner table. Thanks.
23	Hi. Onz. It will be 4 pax but the 2 piglets should be free right? Senki is at Serangoon Gardens right? Let me know if it's confirmed. I can pick you from Serangoon MRT. That should be the nearest train station.
24	Finally found the list. Toons, whose voucher am I using? LJ says she can't make it, ask me take over her voucher.
1	Tue 13 dec n 20th June is what event? Oo
2	You need how many vouchers?  I have 2 extra (need to get rid of them together) n lovejade got 1 extra.  If you only need 1, then you take over LJ's one.  If you need 2, then take over mine.  Date - Tue 22 Nov  Time - After 6.30pm  1. Twtan (voucher with toons)  2. Donkey (voucher with toons)  3. Toons (voucher with toons)  4. Shalome *TBC* (own voucher)  5. Shalome gas *TBC* (own voucher)  6. Carey (voucher with lovejade)  7. (voucher with lovejade)  8. Piggy  9.  *The end*
14	That's if you are willing to wait for them as they are likely to be late...hahah  Anyway, to spot me, look for the bui-est unker there can liao
6	Then put as open lor...hahah  See who else wants to join
9	how much is this??? sorry if it's repeated.
1	$20 got 10cents change.  You want to join us?
3	??? with voucher, 19.90?
65	Yes. With voucher you pay $19.90.
2	Interested!! Scholar Steamboat n BBQ Date - Tue 22 Nov Time - After 6.30pm 1. Twtan (voucher with toons) 2. Donkey (voucher with toons) 3. Toons (voucher with toons) 4. Shalome *TBC* (own voucher) 5. Shalome gas *TBC* (own voucher) 6. Carey (voucher with lovejade) 7. manyu  8. Piggy 9. *The end*
209	Scholar Steamboat n BBQ  Date - Tue 22 Nov  Time - After 6.30pm  1. Twtan (voucher with toons)  2. Donkey (voucher with toons)  3. Toons (voucher with toons)  4. Shalome *TBC* (own voucher)  5. Shalome gas *TBC* (own voucher)  6. Carey (voucher with lovejade)  7. manyu   8. Piggy  9. Carey's guest (TBC)
25	For Jade Room, can seat up to 10 pax in 1 table, but will be a squeeze, plus its only 1 steamboat at the centre, so 10 pax will have to share 1 steamboat.  Alternatively, we can split into 2 tables of 5.  Wat do you guys prefer?  Let me know so tat i can make reservations for tue 13 dec.  Thanks.13 Dec is proposed date for jade room.  You're voucher owner too.  You okay with the date?
19	Maybe we split into 2 tables then - should not be a problem if both are next to each other...  We can also play steamboat musical chairs
3	Split please.   Considering some are non seafood or beef eater.   I am ok with 13 Dec.   Thanks for the arrangement.
3	I will just take one. Looking at scholar's premise, I can't take 2 piglets there, so it will just be me plus the bigger piglet.   Oh, is Senki confirmed?
2	Paiseh can't make it on 13 Dec that week  Can push back 1 week to 20 Dec? Thanks
20	Can for me. Any dates in Dec except 9, 15 &amp; 16 is ok.
2	Since you only need 1 voucher for scholar, then take lovejade's voucher bah.  For senki, i just called through.  Weekends fully booked, so cannot increase pax as they do not have bigger table to shift us to.  If you still want the 2x vouchers to go on weekdays with your missus, let me know.20 dec okay with me.
1	I wonder if your wife is ok with you referring to her as the "bigger piglet."  I know I'd get certain privileges withdrawn if my gf heard that.
0	I wonder if piggy is ok with you mistaking his bigger piglet for his wife
26	He is not referring to his wife
7	The bigger piglet is my 20-month girl. The smaller piglet is my 5-week boy.   I wonder what more privileges you will get removed if you call your gf 'pork chop'.    Anyway, what are the privileges removed ar? So interesting.
35	Usual sleeping on couch sort of thingie bah
9	Date : ?? Time : 6.30pm onwards Location : Jade Room, Hotel Royal (Newton) Price : $19.90 for coupon holders Participants 1. Toons (own voucher) 2. Destinyfire (Toon's voucher) 3. Dennyz (Toon's voucher) 4. Evil (Toon's voucher) 5. Bigmonkey (Toon's voucher) 6. Manyu (Toon's voucher) 7. Donkey (Toon's voucher) 8. Carey (Toon's voucher) 9. Carey's guest (Carey's voucher) 10. LegendZenify (own voucher) 13 Dec and 20 Dec both okay with me, as long as its after 10 dec.
11	see all those who are going for joaquim tonight, buai buai
3	My most humble apologies.   It was an honest mistake.
9	No worries, we are just kidding around   Think piggy now is more curious as to what sort of privileges you get from your gf. Maybe he wants to compare notes
6	a gentleman doesn't kiss and tell
7	The whole (^@^)" family is now at Suntec shopping. See you all later.
9	Ok me too   Window shopping to work up an appetite lol
25	I need more workout. Had a heavy late lunch. Was busy with piglets till almost 2pm. Sigh.
38	We are here already
172	mrt got slight techinical issue, now walking towards suntec.
43	Thanks for the detailed review.  Yea, your experience is similar to ours.  The best dishes there are definitely, the beef dishes, the wafu steak (best i ate so far), the beef shabu shabu and beef carpaccio.  1 of the bros even dipped the carpaccio into the shabu shabu.  Tasted different from the beef for the shabu shabu, n just as nice.  Did you try the pork for the shabu shabu?  They are serving black pig wor.  Its also very nice.  We only realised it towards the end, and just managed to down 1 plate, wat a pity.  I like their tonshabu salad, swordfish sashimi n ice cream too.  We paid $48++ then, so they upped their price it seems, but glad to know tat the standards of their beef dishes still good.  If you wanna relive the experience, you can  taken by our resident photograher, twtan
7	so scandalous sia the outing today
6	woohoo.. you guys back! so how's today's outing?
4	Ask no questions and you will be told no lies   It was just marginally better than Indian Times and that's because it was a lot cheaper...  2 real meats - beef and chicken - to speak off and even then, they were funky tasting...
6	how to get vouchers for all these outings?
2	CMI very bad
1	im gonna complain to my mp   racial harmony my pigu  hw can say no serve pork just because above got dunno what thingy....
3	Voucher sites like deal.com, streetdeal, groupon etc.Tat bad?  Wah, indian times is really bad wor.  I tot joaquim should be much better given its long history.  The cooked food also cmi?The chicken rice not nice?
3	they have a total makeover of the menu....even i find them sh.itty ~ ~ worst meal ever~ ~
1	Special thanks to Carey for everything...
2	u once again amaze us with ur quick disappearing act
2	huh? no what...we all just went our separate ways mah
0	carey is my idol.today i see spp without glasses jin pretty
2	The spaghetti was not well done...raven said so and I agreed. The desserts and soy chicken were good but overall, the desserts were still the main highlight of the night for me.
5	She scared you stalk her mah
5	wahh... carey is the boss today?
2	ya lor...too bad i arent a devil  my face to like btss scare xmm away
3	Are you sure it's today's outing, or ......
3	What boss? I am just there to eat
1	thanks to everybody for everything, had a great time.   (^@^)", ur piglets are cute.
2	wah piangz aye...you want to talk jiao wei, bring it to low carb thread la...today you really jin bad hor...keep indirectly suaning me...but you jin funny
3	ya lor ya lor...  haha thanks...
1	huh? date changed?
2	yesterday outing then
2	i nv suan u woh what yesterday outing? what scandal??
4	must be so shock meh  aiyo relax la...
3	wonder whose mouth is so big n lousy....
12	the scandal thing?
3	Piglets are not cute tonight. They extremely difficult just now. Mini piglet is supposed to finish his milk then sleep, so parents can eat in peace but he never follow the script. Sibeh sian.
4	What thing?
3	Desserts are alright. But steamboat is epic phail. I regret not whacking the desserts from the start.
0	Yea, paiseh, forgot to pm you.  Something cropped up, so need to shift 1 day earlier.  Will you still be able to join us?
15	so u know about the scandal too ????????
26	maybe too many stranger, so he got a bit scared. or our volume too loud.
481	totally clueless only know someone stiring ...food again
29	Manyu, have you tried Zaffron yet?  You like it?  What they serving for their carving?
2	yea tried. their spread super small. , they have sliced mutton, roast chicken, broccoli, peeled prawns in some spicy sauce, pork loin( in mushroon sauce?), fried rice, noodle, some spicy tomyam-like soup, 3 types of cheese, salmon/tuna sashimi(very limited), smoked salmon, salad bar, mango mousse, green bean dessert,chocolate fudge cheese cake, fruits. i saw ice cream but i see no one taking. maybe they are not opened for the buffet. sliced mutton very dry. roast chicken okok.. not oily, quite dry nv try the broccoli the peeled prawns ok only nia pork loin taste nice but very dry fried rice - taste quite plain noodle - i find it nicer than fried rice. cheese - is like those can be bought from qb food one. some of it too hard to slice cos it's harden. salmon/tuna sashmi. i'd say it's freshly cut and served on the spot at the counter. but quantity too little liao. they give reasons like wait for 15 mins because it's too cold to be served. don't they have a chiller? smoked salmon - nothing special, like those from qbfood salad bar - never try mango mousse - not nice green bean dessert - abit dry.. i think cos put for some time. cheese cake - never try chocolate fudge - nv try overall, i would rate it just below sakura(the worst , prior) . not worth the 18.80 dollars.
4	No rating for Zaffron?
5	Then our at $2x even not worth liao.
3	u guys bought how many tickets?
32	I think 4 tickets. Got to check with Toons.
2	3 vouchers.   I been there before, agree that the spread is very limited.   But my last visit was very pleasant maybe because of the warm service and those few dishes that i like.
20	3 for the 3 of us nia.  You got guest again?  Dun scare me
75	so free to chichat now? what ticket or voucher for which makan place? o_o
20	Ok, I thought 4, me old liao.
58	Its still $48++ on weekdays, we went on Sunday and the weekend price is just $4 more.  Wow, read your experience. 8 servings of shabu shabu beef + pork as well for 4 people. And the incredibly long list of ala-carte orders too! Stunning. I'm constantly surprised at how much Singaporeans can eat and how these restaurants make money.  I'm not a small guy but I've seen svelte girls who outeat me at the buffet line. Scary. And the funny thing is they eat the smallest portions when you go to a regular restaurant.
135	10 persons fight for food in a steamboat ?
105	got to confirm again some other time.
356	think the stirring will be in non carb thread , wonder the person got stay until 2am + to stir bo like he promise
986	i only go kl when i have courses to attend.
70	Thai buffet
38	Looks not bad - exactly like Suanthai but cheaper   Only thing is the location - too far for me
0	I'm just curious, anyone up for Yanting Sunday Brunch? I have Astor card (25% discount) but I'm not sure what to order as I'm not too familiar with Dim Sum.
6	Same for me..
114	u can ask swatchie.... he's been there using astor card too...   regards,  wacky
70	Ya lor - my petrol there and back is
8	I look at the menu, not very fantastic.
125	36% Sakura International Buffet (Lunch/Dinner) Available At 9 Outlets! + Singapore River Cruise Ticket + $10 Attraction Cash Voucher for purchase of other Singapore Tickets... Singapore Flyer, USS, Duck Tour &amp; More! Only $34 nett instead of $54.90
11	Just came back from Shin Yuu and thought I'd do a comparison with En Japanese at Bukit Timah. Thanks to this subforum, I've realized there are lots of Japanese places close to my area and I don't have to head out to the city.  Some oysters, the salmon belly sushi and duck meat. Good to start the meal but not really "ooh aah!" inducing.  No comparison. Shin Yuu has generous portions and the sashimi just tastes fresher. I was honestly surprised by the generous servings and we only needed two orders. Tuna and Salmon was particularly nice.  En Japanese tastes better. Maybe it was the absence of crispy garlic (that En provides) or the texture of the beef, but Wafu Steak at Shin Yuu was alright while En was great. The Ribs were kinda disappointing as they were really small and the meat was so-so  Shin Yuu definitely does these better. I liked their Spider rolls and Californian Temaki, but the blowtorch stuff was so-so. I guess I just prefer raw fish to cooked fish.  Both places are poor in tempura although Shin Yuu was more acceptable. Both places serve it relatively greasy rather than crisp.  Definitely En suffers from the lack of grilled fish other than their "grilled fish of the day." The braised grouper was quite tasty without being too greasy.  Finally we ordered green tea and sesame ice-cream to settle the stomach. Nothing memorable there, standard Japanese restaurant desert although its not on the buffet so I think it was around 5 bucks a serving.  Overall, from the comments on the other thread, I was expecting Shin Yuu to be fantastic but it was alright. It would really be a toss-up btwn En and Shin Yuu as to which is better considering the prices are nearly identical for dinner. Shin Yuu definitely has better sashimi and sushi while En has much better meats and shabu shabu. Both are a good choice for japanese dining at the 50/head level. I guess at their lunch prices, it would be a pretty good deal.  Oh and suprisingly there's a 50% discount on all sake and some shochu bottles so it was cheap ($50 for 720ml 25% alco shochu) to get some alcohol into the meal.  Oh and service is great. Food comes really fast and our plates were constantly cleared and the waitress stuff were really attentive.
12	Thanks for the review. Ya, EN does the Wafu beef better. For me I rather go for lunch as I do not eat oysters so it's about $10 cheaper.
12	Thanks for the review   I am more of a raw fish sort of guy so I much prefer Shin Yuu...hahah  Did they serve you the "white tuna"? Nice and fatty - I miss it already   They also serve grilled salmon head - you need to ask for it - it's not on the menu   Different strokes for different people - that's why variety is good
11	No one doing Basilico before NY?
390	christmas la.......
50	Yesterday at the Asia Pacific Food Expo, I got to taste a piece of beef cheek meat and it really literally . It is the best piece of beef I had ever ate before.  Anybody knows which buffets can I get to eat beef cheek meat or beef that really ?
35	I think Toons had beef cheeks at a buffet before - you need to ask him  Beef cheeks are usually served ala carte though - Italian restaurants are the best bet
42	True, but oh yeah, parking is insane at Greenwood. There wasn't really a big crowd, but everyone drives there so there were no empty slots at all. I illegally parked and was lucky enough to get to my car just as the traffic warden was starting to write a ticket. The cars parked infront and behind me got ticketed while he told me not to park there next time as I was driving off.  I'm sure the parking gets worse on the weekends. The place is also probably impossible to get there by public transport other than taxi so I'll probably avoid it in the future. The thing I hate most is searching for parking before a meal.   Btw, a bunch of people were leaving the area with huge boxes of pizza. These pizzas were about the jumbo size that you rarely see in Singapore but common in America. Anyone knows what pizza shop is there and good?   The whole area gives me a vibe like Chip Bee gardens.
17	Greenwood Ave? it's the famous Peperoni Pizzeria
16	wow 91% rating at 95 reviews on hungrygowhere. Impressive. Looks like I found my pizza joint. Too bad I'm on low carb so will prob have to wait for my next cheat meal slot.
5	Cannot trust the hungrygowhere, they will hide the lousy reviews. Just take a look at Indian Times, the lousy reviews are filtered off.
2	didn't know that. You don't like Pepperoni Pizza?
1	Haha, I always go there for brunch when my gf is in Singapore. She loves that place and its so much cheaper than other Sunday brunches since I prefer hard liquor to bubbly and she doesn't drink.  If you're going let me know. I love their salads and meats.
2	I like pizza but that big pizza need a few friends to eat. You can check the remarks posted at hungrygowhere for the Indian Times buffet and you will understand.
8	You can organise one and see how is the response.
15	orrh... how was the food expo...?? the other day i went past the place and saw that they are still setting up the place for the expo.... anything else worth there...?  regards,  wacky
6	Oh I see. I doubt hungrygowhere would allow restaurants to delete reviews, but I would venture a guess that they sometimes do some cleanup if there's a sudden string of unflattering reviews.   Probably India Times bit off more than they could chew when they sold the coupons. I try to avoid the places where there are huge discounts advertised on the megadeal sites because invariably, the restaurants cut down on quality to make up for the huge spike in low-paying customers.   True its the restaurants/deal sites fault for not setting limits, but when I see 5,000+ coupons sold at a nice restaurant, I avoid it like the plague.   I like to use their hungrygowhere app to find places on the go when I was eating out virtually every meal.
10	For me I do not just trust a single site's reviews. Will try to find out more from other sites.
5	Did they tell you that was the white tuna?  They told me that was swordfish ha ha.    For the grilled salmon head, they just served one to us.  It was very nice and fatty.  I pratically ate the skin and fats.
5	Wah, so many low-carbers here  Got eyes no see Tarzan
5	Low carb? Based on the food you reviewed from Shin Yuu, it must be your cheat meal that day   I had to skip all the sushi and sauce while i was at Shin Yuu last month.   Even without the carbs, it still worth going back just that they dont serve unagi without the sushi rice
4	Ah Tan said it was "white tuna" - that's why I put it in quotes   It's swordfish - nice and oily I think we had a couple - just ask them for more lor...hahah  Same with some of their "one order" items - they kept serving as well
4	Ya, the grilled salmon Head, they served one to us without us having to ask for it. That time they told us was White Tuna, I think most of us heard it including Toons. But when I went back another time, they said the white tuna only for dinner. PS: In fact you were there too, carey.
12	They did serve unagi without the rice, you can see the pictures in the sticky thread.
15	any buffet is a cheat meal day   Yeah, I saw in some reviews for Shin Yuu that there used to be grilled unagi. Wasn't there in the menu much to the disappointment of my dinner companion as she is a huge unagi fan. Maybe we should have asked as it seems from some comments that they have "hidden" dishes.  Plus unless you really load up on the sushi, most of it is meat and fish so I would estimate that we had around 120-150g of carbs for the entire buffet. Most of the calories would be from the oil and meat.
1	I know ah - but I wasn't convinced it was "white tuna"
3	Not when i was there for lunch last month.
7	That mean no more unagi liao. Minus point for me.
10	I did notice on the menu that one of the item has a sticker paste over it. That could have been the unagi, replaced by tiger prawn.
4	Pepperoni's pizzas are OKAY. Not great, but decent. One thing I don't like is their service. I went twice this year in slippers and shorts and their wait staff appeared snobbish. Total turn off. Service was so much better a couple of years back. Won't be going back again. Would prefer to drop by timbre or 12 inch pizzas (also under timbre). Better pizzas, cheaper and better service.
9	I was thinking the exact same thing too!   It was the last entry on the inner flap with a "thumbs up" icon.
1	Anyone keen on Basilico on either Sun 11 or 18 Dec?  If yes, then indicate which of the above 2 dates you can make it.  Thanks.
5	Either of the dates are fine with me.
5	Me three   Looks like my "wacky" resolution got to leave for next year liao...hahah
37	I can only do Dec 11. 18 I'll be in TW
2	Looks like i am not the only one who notice.   Great minds think alike (lets's just ignore the other saying)
4	Please don't, we will miss you.
12	Yea lor.  You so disciplined, stop when you feel full.  Eat buffet or normal meal also no diff
7	Date: Sun 11 Dec  Time: 12pm onwards  Price: $81.20 nett  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Anon1  3. Twtan  4. Carey  5. Swatchie  6.  7.  8.  *** The End ***  ----------------------------------------------  Let our team of chefs elevate your gastronomy standards. From vegetarian and non-vegetarian specialties to delectable desserts, the buffet spread changes daily. Relish a lavish spread of regional Indian favourites with live cooking stations that provide a complete treat for the senses.  Date: Sun 18 Dec  Time: 12pm onwards  Price: $36 nett instead of usual $45++ ($53 nett) as i'll be using a voucher promo  Participants:  1. Toons  2.   3.   4.   *** The End ***
5	Wah, how come you took yourself out again ah?
39	Too many ppl, i shy   Besides, have to start working on tat 3 kgs i gained
5	who u trying to kid?? wow considering how often u eat buffet... u actually gain weight ONLY now...? perhaps that the first signs of aging...?  regards, wacky
6	Couldn't have said it better myself   PS - Aren't you and Toons around the same age?
0	bluff yang chewren
7	in terms of years i think toons a few years older bah...? but then apparently different ppl age at different rate... unfair...!  i'm way past the age where i can eat as much as i can and yet don't grow fat...  in fact nowadays i dun even have appetite for dinner so sometimes i skip it or have something non-carb and light...   regards,  wacky
2	But the Singaporean in me is saying boh hua...hahah
1	Compared to lao unker like me, you guys are so young   It's not hard to maintain or even lose weight - you got the gist of it liao
1	wat resolution??   regards,  wacky
2	The buffet is innocent.   His weight gain is due to his holiday
2	That I should limit myself to just 1 buffet a month or less?
2	i can't argue on this one... but i wasn't even trying to avoid carb... just that i don't feel like eating... but if i skip dinner... i would start to feel hungry when i go sleep... so instead i just have something that wouldn't fill my stomach for dinner so that i won't starve later at night....   regards,  wacky
5	I am taking out my name cos I need to settle my car issue. Will try to be there on my own if possible.   Based on the numbers of drivers, the car pool arrangement should be just nice.   Bon appetti
33	Maybe you should...hahah
12	Hi, just to check, has anyone been to 10 at claymore (Pan Pacific Hotel) for buffet(dinner or bruch)before?  I believe the price is 55 sgd ++ currently for weekend dinner.  I am thinking of bringing my mom there for her birthday as Singtel has this 1 for 1 birthday offer going on.  Any review or feedback - positive or negative will be great.  Thanks in advance
7	The spread is nothing to shout about but the quality is generally not bad (except for the cooked food they have out in the warmers)...  Think they are having a Feast of the Pacific promotion now where they serve up grilled kangaroo plus other stuff only when you order...  Best of all, they have free parking (ask for complimentary coupon when paying) and the place is not crowded
5	I suggest you go for mon to thu dinner as their plates of pleasure (several dishes which you order ala carte, unlimited servings) are only available then.  Their spread is otherwise small, n generally i only find 1 to 2 items decent, so you really need the plates of pleasure to make up for it.  They do serve lobsters though, n the place is nice n relaxed.
2	Do note that the singtel voucher is for buffet lunch and dinner (Sun to Thu), exclude Sunday Brunch.
15	Peranakan buffet
2	Hi can i put TBC first.  Will only be able to confirm nearer the date or that week if possible.  Can?
2	yah i ordered a few servings of the sashimi including the swordfish, the sashimi there very nice.  I had the swordfish for Sat Lunch.  Yah and when we went no more unagi without rice.  To me the selection of food not that much, but quality is good, except for the kimchi pork which was too salty.
3	Sure.  Its the end of the year, must give yourself a well deserved treat
5	Food fairs are always the same old stuff and same old stalls around for quite a while. Just like the computer fairs, you just need to go once and you will roughly know what to expect each time. BTW, that beef sample is from European Table.eu cooking demonstration.
12	originally i was considering basilico too.... but somehow now i just don't have much interest in most things.. means there is nothing much in the food fair...  regards, wacky
11	Depends on what you are looking for loh. Auric Pacific and NTUC are selling relatively cheap stuff. If you looking for high class and unique food then I think nothing special loh,  that beef cheek meat from European Table.eu.  But then they are not selling them, at least not on-the-spot. And they are there for a short while and no more demonstrations.
3	Wow, thanks for the feedback. The forumers here are really helpful and quick with the response. Think, i will bring my mom for the buffet on a weekday as suggested.  Thanks again
4	Remember to order from the Plates of Pleasure menu.
13	Date: Sun 11 Dec Time: 12pm onwards Price: $81.20 nett Participants: 1. Toons 2. Anon1 3. Twtan 4. Carey 5. Swatchie 6. kahlan ( tbc ) 7. evilduxy 8. evilduxy's guest ( tbc ) *** The End ***
2	Wah, just saw the price...  Think I need to start saving now - cut out lunch every day until then...  Wait - I don't take lunch already
7	im wondering if i take with the alcohol can we sit together? lol
4	If you are going to be dancing naked on the table after you become inebriated, then maybe it's a good idea not to sit at the same table   Just kidding - should be bah unless they are so distrusting...
3	nose worries.....i wont overdrink with u all cause there's no 1 to drink with me lol
15	Basilico is $81.20 nett with which CC discount? Non alcoholic version I presume?
4	Yes.No promo (no promo for the past 6 months, sigh).    Yea, $81.20 is for non alcoholic option.  $139++ for the champagne n wine option.
9	so u go there mainly to lim or jiak? I noticed tat many who opt wif wines de generally dun realli eat much; their main purpose is lim nia
4	Evil is in a world of his own woah...hahah
11	wat's the food like at Basilico for the Sun Brunch or normal wkdays dinner buffet? anyone has their menu to ssll?  81 dollar is not cheap sia, can go greenhouse alr...
4	wow u dun take carb... and u dun take lunch... so how much weight have u cut down with this kind of diet so far..?  regards, wacky
4	none has went b4 none.  he is only trying to deter the escalating weight increase nia means will drink to his heart's content?
46	Do they have the menu?
5	Wah that's super ex!!! Lol is jiak simi de?
5	i've been to the current plates of pleasure. if you are going for the normal spread, you can consider going. if for the plates of pleasure, i suggest you may wish to top up for something better. i brought my first time friend along with the offer and we have about the same verdict. if i'm going, my next visit might be next year, after the current PoP in december.
11	plates of pleasure available everyday and sunday brunch.
86	Tat bad?  More details?  Thanks.
833	The current plates aren't very appetizing to me as well...hahah
131	See, I am not the only one...hahah  As for road kill, I always suspect some restaurants (small diners along the road) use it as "chicken" in some nondescript dish...the meat is like a funky pink!  The only way to eat kangaroo is BBQ and even then, the seasoning must be damn good - only had it good once though
42	i am too late again  i wanna be TBC as well... (need to check work schedule)
11	Carey n piggy, you are both using lovejade's vouchers.  Please remember to get the vouchers from her.  For Manyu n SSP (if you're going), you guys will have to pay $21.80 nett cos without vouchers.  Date - Tue 22 Nov  Time - 6.30pm onwards  1. Twtan (voucher with toons)  2. Donkey (voucher with toons)  3. Toons (voucher with toons)  4. Shalome *TBC* (own voucher)  5. Shalome gas *TBC* (own voucher)  6. Carey (voucher with lovejade)  7. piggy (voucher with lovejade)  8. manyu   9. Carey's guest (TBC)
14	I have tried more than 10 times since 2000.  Standards have been nose-dived in recent years. It was very good when I first tried. I got the Hotel-Intercontinental card and have been going very often in the year of 2005-6.  The buffet has been cutting back on lots of things so if there is no good offers, I wouldn't want to go back anymore.
211	if shalome unable to make it, Manyu n SSP can take over.
25	Does it mean the current plates of pleasure menu will last through till end Dec?
57	There will be a new plates of pleasure menu starting 12 dec.
25	Great but I hope it's not turkey.  I want meh meh, moo moo or oink oink.
56	Now the beef also not bad according to Sw1ftz.  If the carving got lamb, n ht dishes got pork belly, then it'll be perfect
33	Dec likely to have roast turkey.
34	Basilico full niaos ar?
24	NOted.......
337	I think shalome reserves the right to go with his/her guest by himself/herself another day.
2	You understand me well   Got pork ribs also not bad.
3	Of course. Lovejade is giving a suggestion should shalome wants to find a replacement for her vouchers
102	When can we call to ask?
22	I think I will pull out of Sakura. Too close to Scholar and Blue Garden. All 3 buffets too similar. BBQ with steamboat. Will get sick after the 2nd one. Have not tried Scholar and Blue Garden so wish to try that.
7	not coming too.
4	In Dec mah.
11	btw, when is the blue garden??
4	Think 28th Nov. Scholar 22nd Nov. Sakura 25th Nov. Blue Garden 28th Nov. It's every 3 days one BBQ cum steamboat buffet.
1	I don't think there is a date for blue garden yet.  Cos I think organizer will be away to serve the nation that week.  Not unless someone else organizing
2	Thank you ah tan for helping to call
6	I got said I calling meh?  I highly expected roast turkey to be one of their Plates of Pleasure. How can Christmas be without turkey?
2	I print voucher and you call mah, division of labour   Even if got turkey, if the other plates of pleasure are good, still worth going.  You go find out then we decide ok
9	Later we talk over lunch. Me going out now.
36	shiok right?
46	Ok. I reach liao.  Now blending in at the red sofa outside the restaurant.
568	buffet back to back will be very boring for the taste bud anyway we have a long time before it expire right
8	Please take note, this outing had been cancelled. () BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:
61	Yup, you are right, no hurry.
42	Since Sakura is cancelled, we replace it with Blue Garden? Haha
9	can have it on tuesday or thursday bo ?
65	wow so sudden cancelled liao...?   regards,  wacky
76	Actually still got so many ppl going, why cancel?  Even if the 2 TBCs cannot go, there are still 6 paxes wor.    Besides, not everyone on the list going for scholar, plus blue garden not confirmed for tue 28 Nov wor.  Let those ppl going decide whether they wanna go or not bah.    Sakura Charcoal Grilled &amp; Shabu Shabu   BBQ Dinner Buffet   Date: 25th November 2011 (Friday)   Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue   Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm   Price: $26+   Click here for information on how to get there.  1. BigMonkey (own transport)  2. Evilduxy  3. DestinyFate   4. Carey   5. Dennyz (TBC)  6. Nickblitz  7. Nickblitz guest  8. Donkey (TBC)
121	y twtan can cancel without asking everyone ????
13	Ppl were dropping out like flies, so there was some talk of cancelling the outing.  After checking the list, since there are still so many ppl, then no need to cancel lor.
2	Hi guys, I have 2 Scholar Steamboat n BBQ Vouchers to let go. Anyone interested to take over pls PM me, thanks
8	oic oic oic
2	I actually asked for your opinion yesterday and you said to cancel. Now you doing a U-turn on this.
2	Maybe his guest really keen to go ...
31	I will leave it open, someone please take over the organiser role. () BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:  Click  for information on how to get there. 1. BigMonkey (own transport) 2. Evilduxy 3. DestinyFate  4. Carey  5. Dennyz (TBC) 6. Nickblitz 7. Nickblitz guest 8. Carey guest
2	I said I don't mind canceling if nobody wants to go   But since Toons reinstate it, I figured I show some support mah  Plus since I also drive, can help with logistics as that place quite inaccessible
171	No ah, we can always go somewhere else
24	Haa Carey special guest is love jade ah lol
3	lol if fri cancel we can always go some other place lol
3	You all very funny hor?  Wanna come but put name as someone's guests or as mystery guests.  Why so secretive?
14	I thought Blue Garden was 28th November.  That's why I not keen on so many BBQ cum steamboat buffets in the span of a week.  So Blue Garden is postponed indefinitely?
0	I think there was never a date set for Blue Garden yet...hahah  But it will be done before Feb as Manyu is flying off by then
2	When did any1 mention blue garden on 28th? Blue garden is the 1 at tiong bahru right?
1	You need to re-read my reply...hahahSee, even Evil uses "we" - it's a generic term   SSK if Sakura is canceled? hahah
19	Ya lor - I am also scratching my head plus Toons is bad for those dates as he's on reservist
6	See below.  That's why I always had the impression it is 28th Nov.
33	You based on what Toons think...hahah  But he is not the organizer ah
6	Please pull myself and guest out for scholar. .I will go another day. Thanks.
2	Go ahead n plan for week of 28 Nov bah.  I can do dinner.Yea lor, tats why my posts all got say 'i think' or 'not confirmed' mah
2	Want to do a weekday lunch at shin yuu?
18	Okay.  Carey, can your guest confirm her attendance?  Current count at 8, which is gonna be very squeezy ... i dun feel like going there to squeeze again ... see how   Date - Tue 22 Nov  Time - 6.30pm onwards  Meet at the restaurant directly ...  1. Twtan (voucher with toons)  2. Donkey (voucher with toons)  3. Toons (voucher with toons)  4. Carey (voucher with lovejade)  5. piggy (voucher with lovejade)  6. manyu  7. Carey's guest (TBC)   8. Dennyz  *** CLOSED ***
2	Toons, Scholar has baby chair?
5	Arranged for 1 baby chair. I remembered you only bring the bigger piglet right?
69	simple lunch or dinner make until so complex and complicated for what
14	Is this one still open?
5	Yes, still open, I add your name in?
24	Blue garden do it on 30th will be good
31	Thought we are fixing it in Jan for Blue Garden?
2	Yesh please Mr tan... Lol...   Rescue the low turnout...
55	() BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:  Click  for information on how to get there. 1. BigMonkey (own transport) 2. Evilduxy 3. DestinyFate  4. Carey  5. Dennyz (TBC) 6. Nickblitz 7. Nickblitz guest 8. Carey guest 9. OrLengJuz
55	Nvr like sakura... But this one got char grill... So go take a look..
12	For the eastsiders.  Not buffet, but still looks good.  Seafood baked rice with mozzarella cheese!
106	looks good o.o
165	Those like whole braised pork knuckle like me one can go CJ nom nom nom   27.50 for the whole thing
392	scholar gotch space? if got can jio me, thx.
96	[QUOTE=Toons;61664137]  Date - Tue 22 Nov  Time - 6.30pm onwards  Meet at the restaurant directly ...  1. Twtan (voucher with toons)  2. Donkey (voucher with toons)  3. Toons (voucher with toons)  4. Carey (voucher with carey)  5. piggy (voucher with carey)  6. manyu  7. Carey's guest   8. Dennyz  *** CLOSED ***
48	Boss, how about the list for Shin Yuu?
1	We just nice got 8 liao...unless they want to squeeze one more...hahah  Toons is the organizer, you ask him bah
52	8 is not just nice.  8 will be very squeeze ...  Furthermore, piggy bring 1 piglet.
10	They can't give us more tables?
7	Can, but i dun like to split into separate tables.  I'll rather have a smaller grp 1 table, than large grp, multiple tables ...
13	Multiple tables can be to your advantage   Anyway, your choice, I am there to jiak niah
7	Sounds like got hidden meaning.
4	not simple sia so many hidden meaning
12	Oh, he wants to be alone with his guest.  Keke, then we split lor, so tat Carey can have a separate table.
7	What's the highlights of scholar? you have been there 3 times right?
5	carey, this one confirm list? if yes, i buy the 2 vouchers from cbyen
18	Confirmed, tonight going already.
20	kindly refer to review posted.
1	Sure please do haha
4	The target is not me woah lol
34	You are so humble.  Dun shy lar, shes your guest afterall.  Wanna go on outing all go through you
4	oh?? who is the target woah??
3	Don't tell me it's MUM!    So later besides donkey, the other char bor will be the scandal between toons and carey.    So scholar is along liang seah street hor?
1	I am not in the picture haha  It's along Middle Road
5	is it SSP ????????
4	Heres the addy.  Click for map :-
4	How far is the walking distant from Bugis MRT to the place? 10 min?
4	5 to 10 mins.  Of cos, if you ask a housing agent or developer, they will tell you 1 min.
6	Thanks.   Heng I asked. Otherwise I will eat at Tian Tian steamboat instead.
17	Thanks, will print the map, since first time going.
16	Boss, as you walk out of the MRT, head towards the direction of the library. Just between the library and hotel intercontinental is middle road. Walk along middle road towards the direction of suntec and shaw towers. It just across the road junction from shaw towers.   We can do to Tom's Palette for ice cream after dinner since so near.
6	I thought the secret guest is lbb? Lol
2	Siang ish lbb?  If it's the same saga with Toons as mentioned during Joaquim, then I know who liao.
2	Thanks. I just had ice cream at Orchard Central yesterday, can't remembered the name.
1	Yesterday also got another name mentioned during Senki. Seem like Carey so many GFs.   Just recalled the ice cream place, is Cold Stone Creamery.
6	This one I always see them advertised on TV.
9	Nope, salah   LBB boh eng tonight...hahah
1	Looks good - though must pay GST and 10% service charge...haha
3	LBB = Little Bui Bui?
3	Lenggg...beibei
7	wah....looks good. but then too far.
0	Yesterday meal also need to pay service charge and GST.
3	It's cold stone I like
5	Got pictures but I no time to edit and upload yet. And yesterday's ice cream tasted even better since I do not need to pay for it.
3	cold stone creamery got 1 kor kor give me 40 worth of voucher
2	wei, wei, wei ... mai ruan ruan stir hor!  I attend buffet nid to appear as simi secret guest de meh?
1	so hungry... 5 hrs more to scholar. i think i better call the owner prepare more food for me
1	Ya lor Ya lor, I am a chick magnet mah....cai guai   Like I said liao, I am not the target and never will be...  Bui bui unker mah - who will want?
8	If you want, can meet me in town and we go together
3	Very far lor
7	Thks.Can i join you?
5	u veri bored ar? keeps stiring. stop it la.
11	Yum yum! More meat!!  Suddenly so many vouchers to buy
24	Wah if want go let me knw I also wanna go the food looks gd
120	very interested. include me if you gonna buy
59	LIVE Lobster Porridge ( Signature Dish !)Shark 's Fin Soup with Crab Meat Chilli Crab  Steamed Slice LIVE Red Garoupa With Black Sauce  Cabbage Chicken Claypot ( Signature Dish !) Slice Duck with Monglian Sauce ( Signature!) Crispy Prawn Roll Crispy Baby SquidCold Pig 's SkankJelly Fish Fried Crispy Pig's Large Intestine Seaweed Seafood Soup Fish Maw Seafood Soup Salad Fried PrawnFried Cereal Crispy Prawn Crispy Chicken In Prawn Paste Stewed Chicken With Chinese WineCrispy Sucking Phoneix ChickenBraised "Dong Po" PorkSweet &amp; Sour PorkFried Pork Ribs With Marmite SaucePork Ribs With Mongolian SauceBlack Pepper Sauteed Beef With Ginger &amp; Onion Fried Frog With Dried Chilli Fried Frog With Ginger &amp; Onion Fried Frog With Chinese Wine Chilli Spice CuttlefishFried Cereal Crispy Cuttlefish Braised Black Pepper Ostrich Meat ( Exotic Signature Dish ! )Beancurd With Golden Mushroom Beancurd In Mongolian Sauce Stewed Beancurd With Diced Chicken &amp; Salted Fish Omelette With PrawnOyster Omelette In Hot Plate "Fu Yong" Omelette Sambal Kang KongStir Fried Kang Kong With Preserved Beancurd Sambal Sweet Potato Leaf Stir Fried Bean Sprout With Golden Mushroom Fried Bean Sprout With Salted Fish Fried Long Bean With Minced Meat Spinach With Three Types Of Eggs Baby Kai Lan With Salted Fish Oyster Mushroom With Broccoli Egg Plant With Salted FishVegetable With Brand MushroomYang Chow Fried RiceFried Rice With Chicken &amp; Salted Fish White Rice Hokkien Fried NoodlesSeafood Mee Goreng Hong Kong Fried Noodles Chinese Herbal JellyAlmond Jelly With Longan
19	Can ah - meet at Raffles Place lol
53	Buy the voucher le let me knw lor...
72	The buffet 2 pax most worth it. 2 pax gets 2 crabs. 7 pax also 2 crabs. 8 pax then get 3 crabs. Crap lor.
101	i have frens who are CRAZED over coldstones... the ice-cream is sticky kind... it's nice but i prefer jap type (like azabu sabo) or urm local type (like toms)..?  regards,  wacky
4	4 group of 2 = 8 pax with 8 crab compare to 1 group of 8 = 8 pax with 3 crab 8-3= 5 crab more
3	Sorry. Left so suddenly. Got a SOS message from Mrs (^@^)" that piglet having constipation. So had to rush back to settle.
16	so piglet ok le mah ?
2	Np.  Hope she is feeling better now.
3	wonder who is carey guest
19	You can do which days again?
12	Tue wed thur n SAt lunch dinner oo
7	See ya!
49	Compare Scholars and Sakura Grill, I preferred the later due to more meat/fish varieties and bigger pieces. The grill items we sent for grilling does not tally when they are served, the number of items get reduced.
23	Eat too full. Not much selection..can do better. The duck meat was good. Thanks to Toons for the candies for everyone...no desserts except watermelons.
1	hw come when i go no candies at all ??
10	cause u neber come mah....
0	You're welcome.Aiyah, other than the mangoes, its the only thing that survived from my cebu trip.  All my canned bagus got confiscated   U sure you wanna eat it?  1 piece dunno how long more you have to spend at the gym.  Hmmmm, when is our next buffet?  I bring LOTS n LOTS of sweets for you
20	Those who can eat sweet stuffs got candies to eat.
7	i can eat sweet stuff...is i choose to or not to only quote from duckieokok remember to bring them!i come also boh sweet lor  is not for me de
51	then you just come lor...someone already offering you what
315	So this fri outing not cancel right??
79	oic , so SSP is carey guest
10	Friday's Sakura Grill outing is still on.
66	Haa ok ok
2	wah jin shiok.. just pang sai
10	Lol... if u din notice
1	So Toons was the one who let the cat out.
8	Who is making the booking? hahah
4	No wor, my posting was earlier mah, raven still asking who.  He did not realise it.  Think someone told him later
113	No idea, me not going. The person who initiated this outing also pulled out.
5	Japanese buffet
2	Looks good. Anyone tried before?
18	Take note. only can choose bbq'd/grilled n kusiyaki items. worth?
7	Thanks for sharing again.  You veri poisonous wor, heehee.  The menu looks good.  Definitely can try.
3	I saw the lamb chop, looks good.
1	I saw these items and i'm sold  - Salmon Fish Head - Saba Fish (Mackerel) - Unagi - Beef Short Rib - Pork Neck Collar - Lamb Chop
14	BBQ and grilled are perfect for us, we will be happy to skip the raman
28	hey, can you take my name and my guest out? i have something on on that day and i cannot make it.
3	hi! what is the latest buffet outings?
6	BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:  Click  for information on how to get there. 1. BigMonkey (own transport) 2. Evilduxy 3. DestinyFate  4. Carey  5. Dennyz (TBC) 6. Carey guest 7. OrLengJuz
9	tempted but SO FAR!!!!  I'll be at balestia le on friday
1	Has the outing been booked?
4	I think we eat the prawns, mackerel, unagi, lamb chops and beef short ribs, more than enough to make them pok.   Toons, on?
1	Already 'on'ed liao   Your schedule how? Sat lunch you can make it?
2	Can tonpang anyone to go there?  sho far
0	There are 3 drivers going, you can check with them.
1	Made for 8 pax at 630pm for this fri under Mr Teo.
3	Thanks. She is fine. Was worried that poop gets stuck and cannot come out again like the last time. Don't ask me how I remedy. This is a food forum.
1	I only know carey out of the 3 driver...  Me ish shy dunno the other 2 is who
2	Saturday is my off-day too. Lol. Let's do it. When?
1	Oo I'm on for sat lunch? But where's the location I can't find it
10	BBQ Dinner Buffet  Date:  (Friday)  Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue  Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm  Price:   Click  for information on how to get there.  1. Evilduxy  2. DestinyFate   3. Carey   4. Dennyz (TBC)  5. Carey guest  6. OrLengJuz   Can't go, got make up class on friday. Need to learn how to put on makeup.
16	Lol fri outing really alot ppl pull out
8	It should be near Bugis MRT. It says near the infamous Rochor Centre.
4	Wah another of those run by prc?
32	My apologies. It's Rochor Bean Curd, not Rochor Centre. My bad. But quite near la. Walk towards Sim Lim Square. Around there.
5	it's actually opposite Peace Centre.  The place is quite small.  Just besides the famous Rochor Bean Curd.
20	Nice meeting you piggy.   Didn't know you also left early.   He never join me hor
10	Huh?  No one said anything wor, someone guilty conscience?   Besides a lot of ppl left earlier wor.  Who you referring to? Ah Tan, see lar, lucky you waited for us.  If you left early too, you will become a saga suspect too, heehee.
3	Ya lor, heng I listened to Denny's and waited until he had his share of the mutton.
2	Who is he?    I never say anything hor.  You want to tell me something?
0	Wah Lao if I know got so much saga I wld have join earlier also
3	Sigh.  I haven't eat till song lor.  So sian.
1	Yesterday confirmed, they short changed us on the grill, I gave them one Mount Everest high plate but came back became Bukit Timah Hill size nia.
3	Someone mentioned your name and was relieved that you did not come wo.
1	Me too.   Never wack enuff of the meat.   But we can always go again with the regular. Even the boss recognises him and say he went there 4 times before (maybe even more).
3	Don't know where they put the rest.  My mountain also kenna cut down by half.    Anyway, I feel the lamb was good for the earlier sticks.  The later batch seems to be more rubbery and dry.
12	I actually don't fancy my meats cut up on skewers.  I prefer whole chunks on grills.  I also don't fancy steamboat as much.  Would prefer hard-core bbq or grill.
1	Nice meeting you ssp   Sorry had to leave early.
3	Think you will prefer Ssikkek then, but the environment might not be good for piglets.  If you can compromised on the meats a little, then blue garden for a much better environment.  Btw, Sakura grill got lamb and beef?  I know you only whack salmon, but i'm sure you got at least try a bit of the lamb and beef right?  How are they?
0	Got lamb, beef, pork, chicken and seafood.
0	Heehee, lucky you never try the last plate then.  Manyu complained he chew until mouth ache.  Dennyz n me still wondering wat he talking abt cos the mutton skewers quite tender mah.  Tot he always exercise chest n arms nia, so mouth weak ... until we tried the mutton skewers from tat last plate ... Sigh, tat place not very consistent.
1	Ya, was expecting mountains to come but it didn't happen.   I feel that earlier batch better cos it is bbq longer.   Later batch, the Q was longer than Great Wall so quality was compromised.
1	The meh meh n beef nice?  Tender n got meh meh/beefy taste?
1	And denny still dare to said he chose the fatty mutton, so tough one.
34	Got taste, they got marinated in varies sauces and also plain with no sauce. But both all non fatty except pork belly.
35	Lamb chop and steaks are too thin. So very easy to grill till too tough and dry. Not much fats. So I did not bother much with the meats. The bacon is good though. Very rarely grilled bacon can fail.
19	Hi I'm keen on this friday de buffet.  but wondering if anyone whose driving can give me a ride.  Dont mind meet at places which would be of your convinence.  but dunno what time moi dept retreat finish ORZ
7	I  1 or more of the drivers will be giving participants a ride from the nearest mrt.  They're all nice fellows  Wait for more details abt transport bah. If you're not able to confirm timing, might be an issue.
95	Where is your location, maybe one of the 3 drivers can pick you up on the way though you need to be able to confirm a timing and location.
30	Piggy n evil, so you guys wan me to buy for you?  If yes, pls confirm qty.  Thanks. It definitely be on a sat lunch, but date wise might have to be in jan 2012, cos 3 dec, we can't make it, 10 n 17 are both b4 rang mahal n basilico.   24 n 31 are pre christmas n pre new yr, i'm okay with those dates, but the rest might not be available.
38	If after 7pm I can..
20	u can at where?
1	Our Sunday's lunch. Located just a short distant from Somerset MRT station, the restaurant is housed in a two storey shophouses which is quite small in floor area.
0	Exquisite Japanese 3D dolls in Kimono lined the wall.
0	continue
1	We ordered quite a lot of the , maybe I should rephrase it: Muscle man ordered a lot of sashimi.
0	is actually just melted cheese on top of the steam egg.
1	- A nice refreshing dish.
0	- These wings are nice and juicy.
1	is nice but it's just too oily.
33	- Taste like Lap Cheong fried rice nia, don't even have the sweet unagi taste. When we were there, the aircon was warm even after complaining to them. They like to soak the foods in sweet sauces which I don't quite like it. Overall the service is not bad and the food just normal.
689	The food looks gd lol..  Eh if need lompang on fri after 7pm I can cos red plate
3	Thks to twtan14 for the pics n review.  Going to try it out next mth
7	Did u guys buy this?
14	Exclusive for atCrazy members only! Kushiyaki Ala-Carte Buffet with over 34 freshly grilled items to choose @ S$23.30 nett (U.P S$50) from The Ramen Stall HIGHLIGHTS
8	Bought the Kushiyaki Ala-Carte Buffet.
4	juz hoot the saba, unagi, salmon and squid hor...lol
1	And the lamb chop.
14	Looks gd
22	Thanks Toons. Can I have 2? If end up wife don't wanna go, I can always go again.
30	I doubts these two dates are valid for the voucher use. They should be having those chop carrot set meals for the occasions.
4	Done.They never list as blackout in the voucher TnC.  If you guys okay, then i call to make reservations immediately ... hot dates ...  Hmmm, actually i dun mind going on 24 Dec (on my own).  Who wants to join me?
203	I am ok with the dates.
6	Gotch any Christmas buffet specials to hoot nice juicy fat tender turkey?
12	hmm, check already, they allow use of this coupon on December 24, time of the high tea is from 2-5pm.  So you guys going on December 24?
20	Yea.  Made reservation liao. 1 more slot.  You want in?
11	me also gg on 24 Dec
2	Usually big bird is very lean.   So far i have not eaten a fat turkey, big yes but not fat
0	I support!  Dandruff is NOT snow flakes though ...
3	More fun like that mah.   You can dress like the elf but make sure your green t-shirt is 2 size smaller   If piglets going then i bring presents for them too.
1	I wan presents too   Can i stick a red prune on my nose n pretend to be rudolph?
2	Seeya!  Wait, your avatar fake one right?  Then dun wanna see liao   Kidding, heehee!
10	Of course, will love it esp since rudolph no wear clothes one
4	Donkey's secret fetish.
0	LOL..........
4	Tat one is manyu.  If i no wear clothes, wait you guys should no appetite one
8	I remember BigMonkey always call him dreamer shu shu wor.  Do join us with your partner.   But must come in Christmas theme ok
2	i act i nv see
2	wah seh....got theme sia
2	Do you do a search daily for your name too?  Like summoning spirit like tat, post name liao, suddenly appear  There are a LOT of ppl i dun wanna see naked one.  So you should be flattered that someone fantasizing abt you wor
0	Ah but then?  If dun come in theme, pay for everyone's drinks wor
3	Ok, lets get back to food topic, else later bo appetite.
2	i frequent buffet thread patroniser wo...
4	they selling the beer (can and bottle) at 7.90++.  juz now called n asked
0	ok i don't mind.  I should be free on that day.
2	woah..i every time hear his from my friend but it's super ex la.. is it worth the money?
3	I don't find it value for money. The cooked foods, very fast ran out of stock especially the expensive stuffs and no more refill.
9	todai not nice to eat de
46	I agree.  However, they do very very very nice roasted pork though.  Too bad, its not consistent.  If sure can get tat nice roasted pork again, i will go again.  Its 1 of the nicest roasted pork i ever ate.
19	Toons, 24 Dec, do i go buy the voucher or you already have an extra one for me?
27	We went that time, the pork always still on the grill so I never got to try.
10	Bought liao.  Just grace us with your presence tat day   Dress wise is christmas theme hor.
42	if you eat so much on 24th, where's the space for the christmas eve dinner and christmas day feast???
3	That will be our christmas eve meal for forever lonely people like us.   That's why we are dressing up (dressing down for toons) to celebrate together.  What better way than to eat with friends
8	Thanks,  Huh xmas theme?  Hmm just wear red t-shirt can?
0	Anyway, a bit of logistics here for Sakura outing on Friday. Where is the pickup point for those without transport in? I will be leaving from Raffles Place - those who are near can meet me directly around 5.30-6pm The other two drivers, please state your point of origin and time of departure   BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:  Click  for information on how to get there. 1. BigMonkey (own transport) 2. Evilduxy 3. DestinyFate  4. Carey  5. Dennyz (TBC) 6. Carey guest 7. OrLengJuz
2	Kaoz, realli dress down ah?  Just 1 tshirt?  Wait i nose bleed ah ... sec, my nose already red
2	I wear green but Toons hor wear his birthday suit leh.
76	Of course can.   Toons is just wearing the red nose.  Just make sure your red T-shirt is long enuff   Nowadays all so open minded
159	green cap/hat too????
3	wah u all so terrible, bully little old me..    no chocolates for u this year...
18	Sweet chocolate she buay sai jiak.  She now go jiak satay liao.
3	not involved, but i noticed bigmonkey has pulled his name out earlier. not sure the updates now though. you may want to get the updated list.
94	Ah tan understands me.  Never jiak satay today cos raining.  Tmr going to eat sashimi.  Any good recommendations?
6	Go parkway basement. The fishmart sells sashimi at good price and it's fresh. Otoro, salmon belly and hotate sashimi are very good. Otoro don't choose too big piece. Very siong on the pockets. The rest are ok.
362	Tamade. Say I very fat is it? Must wear 2 sizes smaller.    Piglets coming. No one look after them. No need presents la. They are not old enough to appreciate the presents.
24	Buy the 1.6kg one from the link I gave you.  Or go Shin Yuu which is near your work place.
27	I will be leaving ps ard 715 so if u guys wanna can arrange pick u all at there
24	Itacho?  Couple of bros here seems to like it a lot.
6	DF is leaving PS at 7.15pm   I can swing around to Tampines (Evil owes me big time) and those from the East can meet me there too  OrlengJuz - I don't have your contact - please PM me
2	I like it. Not too expensive either.
11	Bigmonkey said he got make up class today.  BBQ Dinner Buffet Date:  (Friday) Location: Marina Country Club (Ponggol), 600 Ponggol Seventeenth Avenue Time: 6.45pm to 10.30pm Price:  Click  for information on how to get there. 1. Evilduxy 2. DestinyFate  3. Carey  4. Dennyz (TBC) - please confirm 5. Carey guest 6. OrLengJuz
7	No lor, you are not fat then i ask you wear 2 size smaller  T-shirt tight tight then can show your body mah   Every children will like presents. You mai steal their presents can liao
19	Thanks for the recommendations guys.Was thinking of that cos ah tan got go and took pictures but ytd i just brought him there and we went to eat at Wisma Ting Tai Fong. Eat at the fish port?   He no like jiak buffet. I was thinking Sushi Teh at East Coast Big Splash cos near airport, after that sending him off. Is the sashimi any good at sushi teh? Is that in a resturant or over the counter?   Will stop by the durian stall Dennyz bring us there before. I hope it's open?
11	twtan dressing ? Kahlan dressing ? baby pigglet dressing? me n PPP de dressing toon de birthday suit ok bo ??
3	Tell him you can get the freshest sashimi there (while thinking it will also be lighter on my pocket ). Buy liao go sit in airport eat.
3	Hmmm, this one?  But a lot more bui bui, scared they tot i bui bui deer meat n grill me for the high tea ...  OR maybe this one safer ...
3	Man-kini, i like   If you are coming in this, i dont mind paying for your lunch
0	No need wor.  I wear like tat, i'll likely get foc meals at woodbridge ... Remember the case of the old man in skimpy shorts?  Some ppl wear liao, ppl go WOAH, others, like me, wear liao, ppl call police ...
5	Wah, this is as close to porn as can be in Makan forum leh. On the other hand, this is Donkey's food porn fantasy. I will bring camera just for this if you come in it.Your kind of fantasy.
26	oh my the pictures...
255	Haa!! Can faint
71	Think I need travel by kpe tpe Punggol better.. Cte sure jam lol
30	Anyone in the west need me to tonbang can call me   I going IMM now ^^ then going to Ikea Alexandra
2	Go counter choose your fish.  There got tables and then you wait for the chef to slice the fish for you.  Green tea is not bad also.  Not those tea bag kind.
2	Yup, correct.
2	CTE once you pass Braddell exit should be fine.  But CTE got ERP wo.  KPE not exactly smooth sailing.  Get stuck at 70km/h.  But if you know where to slow down, then no problems.  Just hope that no road-hogger in front of you.
44	My boy only wants milk.  My girl wants iPad and iPhone.  My stuff are now belongs to her.  Sibeh sianz.
1	my fave Otoro and hotate.  how much is the Otoro?  Too bad it is so far for me.
93	have you eaten your sashimi?  Just eat sashimi without carbo for meal going to be very siong for your pocket.
7	This 1 ok ?
9	where is ssk ?
33	wah you guys also find it warm, i go there will be sweating buckets.
12	This one:
3	You guys going for sakura trip, reach already?  Got a call from them asking if we are reaching else they release our table.
19	Ha on my way le
230	Book under what name? I'm there can't go in... Lol
47	Everything okay?  You guys enjoying your dinner?
3	toons... the duck meat BBQ is so good... u will lurve it deep deep...
4	destinyfate owes me $1000 and evil owes me his housing and all assets now. back to topic, the fruits and cold foods are nice sia lol
9	great company as usual.  thx carey for the ride into there, and thx orange for sending me home~  cya all soon
4	Yea the dessert n meat is gd.. Lol but too many Satay ha..
3	Ya lor, the duck is better than the lamb   We also got our duck chef to thank for that...heheh  The satay was good too - credit to our satay chef as well  And our guest for providing the special after dinner entertainment
1	Sorry, I can't go cos my Korean guest don't want jiak buffet.    We ended up at east coast Brussels sprouts for Belgium beer.  Follow by sashimi at punggol river front.  Thanks for the recommendation for parkway, will go try another day.
2	Tell me more!
1	lol.......n we got pwn by a xdd expert marksman but poor topo skill lol
1	Sorry, nowhere even near scandalous   Take your mind out of the gutter...hahah
1	End up, the sashimi is very cheap compared to the amount spent on sake and beer   Lucky not I pay else really jin siong.
2	Ya lor - he confirm cannot be sniper - probably won't reach objective to set up ambush   Must jio him along for more makan outings...see he will pwn how many more people
10	You're welcome   Thanks for "volunteering" to cook again...hahah  If me or XDD are the ones doing the cooking, we would all be eating charcoal
9	waa...seems that the outing was an enjoyable one...
8	But of course - was there any doubt?
12	of course not...but im looking forward to the next one
7	when is ur nxt 1
7	wahahaha we got 2 chefs cooking satay and duck meats.. everyone eat until mai ah mai ah.  how to be bad~~~
13	i dunno yet....huh so gd..shld have joined
4	u no scare me meh LOL
39	scared you???? wait rong rong ok
225	This is the first time i hear bbq buffet got duck meat one.  Duck meat bbqed liao nice?    Hows the fatty salmon and the rest of the meats?  How does tis compare to ssikkek?
288	Duck meat n lamb chops r fatty n juicy..we nv touch seafood cause too occupy with duck lamb n pork satay lol
5	guys, just to confirm, the blue garden outing is on this Monday? cos i saw that in my schedule..
1	No ah - who say deh?
33	when confirm , how come we duno
24	Anyone did homework for Sakura Grill outing?
11	Yea thanks to chief for cooking the meat ^^ lol
14	Ah, maybe he confirmed it with SSP niah
21	As usual if u r not there..there won't be any hw work lol
6	okok....... noted
0	EAT-ALL-YOU-CAN! $19.90 Nett For Ala-carte Authentic Korean BBQ Buffet + Free Flow of Tea @ Hankang Korean BBQ Restaurant! Valid All Days! Min 2 Buys! 5 Mins From Little India MRT!
16	any bro buying??
2	Ala carte i normally not keen liao.  Have to depend on them to bring the meats.  Slow = gg.  Also, the meats just chicken n pork, with 1 beef.  Boring.  Thanks for sharing though.
4	We go do HW ourselves aimah?  Coming week i will be at north side, so go punggol also nearer
12	oh, u guys like take-your-own-kind ah  What kind of meats still avail in korean buffet? No fish ah. prossss
2	Yea.  Been to a couple of those ala carte buffets where they really take a long time to serve the order.  Damn sian one.  Some got lamb, some got prawns, squid etc.  This one like only chicken n pork, same cuts but marinated differently nia.  At least if got different cuts also better cos the taste n texture will be different.
3	can recommend some nice ala carte korean buffet?
1	Today's Deal : 50% off Baba-licious Food Extravaganza Buffet (Lunch/Dinner) at Vanda Terrace, Orchid Country Club; only $18.80 nett instead of $37.60
16	I want. But you sure you will do homework to share or is it for personal viewing again   Next week you see which day you prefer.
65	Haa what's the next buffet I can join lol
37	Haha. You should have gone with them in the first place. Anyway, I have tried their duck and lamb chop. Maybe quality yesterday very good. I didn't have a good impression of it.   I have not been to siseki before. So those who went, how do you rate them?
3	Initially 10+ ppl, so big grp, i dun like.  Later drop until okay liao, but i have to OT n furthermore tonite got plans.  Anyways, since its good, next week can still go mah.
1	OK, thanks goodness the previous time I got take some photo.
63	Ok, when going?
8	Yup, Sakura really got a lot of variety but we didn't even manage to try 1/2 of them...hahah  We just stuck to duck breast, lamb and pork satay   Orleng did try a lot more though...  But would we go back there again? Quite unlikely
5	Cause it's too damn bloody ulu lol...ssk anytime for me
25	That's true - SSK is like our second home...hahah  But the XDD likes Sakura - or is it because of the arcade?
205	Haa xdd is pro in arcade lol   Yea there is ulu and we din try too many.. Ha miss out the salmon
32	This deal good?
5	Anyway next week mon to fri any buffet outing ma?? Cos on leave so quite free ha
40	Went there with carey for lunch before cos of their 1 for 1 cc promo.  Can't remember the price, but i think its around there too.  For the price, i find the food quite okay.  Nothing outstanding though cos i can't recall much of the lunch   I tink the satay, n fatty pork quite decent.  Lamb carving depends on the piece.
15	You so fast come back Liao ah.  Do they have salmon sashimi at the buffet In miramar?
7	Yea, eat til very full.  Come home immediately, song ah   Errr, can't remember.  Even if have, should be avg nia cos i totally no impression.  Frankly, for tat price, i think pay slightly more for melting pot, square or tiffany better. Ssikkek lunch should also be better.  Carey, can you remember?
2	I went once for dinner, but nothing fantastic. Won't go back again.
1	Hahaha . . Ah tan song there and you song at home.  I am quite happy with melting pot really, esp the sio bak and pork satay.
2	Wait till you see tonight's pictures.
3	I dont want to see your song pictures
1	Yea, tonite's spread is good, heehee.  Reaffirmed my liking for the place Heehee, the b4 n after pics for the sea cucumbers should be abt the same
0	Then I don't post lor. Ask Toons to post his durian flavour one instead.
3	But we missed the PK. Only on Friday.
0	The PK is weird one lor.  The one i had at cocobolo upstairs was so good, but the one i had at Brizo was lousy.  Just now i ask the chef, he still say they're all from the same kitchen ... hmmm ... i going to give it another try in Dec.  Oh yea, forgot to go with you upstairs to see their cocobolo poolside bbq buffet, heehee.
3	Not fair. The last time I went was pk and not very fatty.  Your sea cucumber and pork trotter seems like a better deal.  Quickly post pictures please.
2	See if I can join in Dec or not.Don't want to post liao, let you gian.
7	Got sashimi but not fantastic - was busy whacking the braised pork belly haha  Very tiong place now - 90% of the dinners/tourists are from tiong kok
2	Well, someone has to eat all the rice n noodles   Cham ... too long never eat so much sugar liao, now feeling hhhyyyypppperer!!  Wheeee!!!!
3	Ah tan jin notti now hor
11	How many cups of durian pengyet did you hoot?   Btw, ytd I bring korean friend jiak durian roll and he took a big bite but spit it out.  There goes my $3.70.  He say taste like toilet
3	You don't say ah tan hor, refer to the below, is that why u hoot so much durian   Durian is known to be a powerful aphrodisiac and is often consumed to improve the sex drive and overall sex function.
2	Yea, i'm surprised too.  I told ah tan, every buffet i went to which serves sea cucumbers, they will disappear very fast and you will only see the other ingredients, like sea cucumber with duck, only can see duck nia.  However, tonite's sea cucumber jiak buay liao, and its those large piece ones, not the small mushy ones you see at some buffets.  Eat tat one can cover back the $ liao.
8	Wah, is tat why you feed your korean hunk the durian roll?  *gena pawned!!*
1	So it's true lah.  You and ah tan are men on mission tonight.  Eat gao gao liao and after that song song gao jurong   If he is Korean hunk then I sure buy the $40 a box and force him eat.  Too bad, he is old man so only get to jiak the $3.70 one and he still spit it out
5	I won't call that Korean a "hunk". Your standard of hunk is so......
4	so many horny people lol
13	So if he looks like tat actor in city hunter show tat kahlan like so much, then it will be MSW?  Beauty is in the eye of the beholder wor.  You know something?  When i was on top of the lighting tower in cebu, i'm literally at the highest point of cebu, n guess what the 3 of us guys are talking abt?  How women are all the same after turning off the lights, whether its sg or pinoy women.  I know its shallow, sexist n childish, but tats guys for you lor   I guess the same applies for guys lor.  After turning off the lights, everyone is the same   At least it tells you its wats inside tat matters n not wat you see on the surface, heehee.
1	Share some knowledge with u all. The authentic method of how Koreans eat their bbq.
4	If it's him then I straight away drive him to durian plantation, mai tu liao
16	i read in Straits Times.. some hotels n restaurants removing Chilean Sea Bass from their menu. Coz over fished..
3	Thks, din know abt the grilling garlic part.  Will give it a try next time i eat korean bbq. Normally i just eat the garlic raw cos i read somewhere tat the health benefits of garlic will be lost if its cooked.  Of cos i'm not very pleasant to converse with after all Hmmm, time to give elements a call.  If they are doing the same, then i'll go back for a farewell meal
0	I will give judgment when I received your wedding invitation and seen your bride.
5	Thanks for sharing.  Few days ago, I just had Korean BBQ beef with my Korean friend.  The garlic should not be BBQ, it should be wrapped into the veg fresh.  He say that once you BBQ, it loses the taste and kill the nutrients so korean believe in eating it raw.
2	Wah, you're in pawning mode today!  Somehow, i think i will trust a korean more when it comes to eating korean bbq.  Cashcow - you got do research b4 you post n used words like 'most of you dunno how to eat korean bbq' n correct way etc?  Or you posting abt the local way of eating korean bbq ... like raining locally?
2	erm..........y today donkey toons n ahtan keep on talking abt bedroom stuff
3	Cause we ate horny foods.
3	Really is a friend mah.  I am guilty of BBQ-ing the garlic and so he politely pointed it out to me when we were eating together. And so i learn something new
5	Well, at least he willing to let you know how it's supposed to be eaten.
10	I went to Korea b4, this is the way my Korean tour guide teach us.  Dun be so arrogant and look down on ppl.
2	Hmmm, you're the one posting that most of us dunno how to eat korean bbq, and wanting to teach us the correct way?  Have it ever occurred to you tat ppl do know, but just prefer to do it differently cos it suits their taste better?
1	Actually your post sounds so much more arrogant
4	Its prolly b4 she tried to feed him something from the toilet
0	People got go Korea okay...  Don't play play   The rest of us are peasants - never travel overseas before - I haven't even been to Sentosa
1	I was just sharing knowledge so that more ppl can enjoy the food in the authentic way. Instead of thanking me for the knowledge, most of you just throw the insults.  I dun not how some of u badmouth me to the carey guy and other ppl but pretty disappointed since you can't give basic respect to the other members of the outing.
10	diff ppl have diff way of eating....then if u go eat malay food they say need to eat with hands do u eat also or u prefer to use cutlery?
4	We got thank you.
2	Bro, i am not being arrogant nor am i looking down on you.  I'm actually just making fun of you cos i think you're a funnie guy.  If you read the posts going on tonite, you will know tat we make fun of each other.  I did not badmouth abt you to carey or anyone wor.  Anyways, this is not EDMW.  Lets not argue over this.  Tats the end of this issue for me liao.
1	Sarcasm also sensed.  Especially the low carb diet carey. He admit that some of u badmouth me to him in private after the outing. Since this carey guy is a hypocrite, most likely birds of the same feather also flocked tgt.
6	Definitely cultery, esp when eating mee soto or mee siam *pengz*
20	You so sensitive today sister.  Come, come, I sayang you.  But this is not edmw, we don't stir da bian here.
336	Welcome to the Internet. If you can't take criticism, don't post on the e-web. And get off your high horse. Anyone bought the korean buffet?
64	Ummm... I'm Korean, and after reading Cashcow's post, umm....   BBQ meats is a very casual dinner. Yeah, most places you bbq the meat yourself, but if you go to a nicer restaurant (think hotel or nicer parts of Seoul), most will have the option to cook the meat themselves and bring it out. I prefer that option if I'm in a suit and I don't want to reek to badly off smoke and meat.  Also Koreans love garlic in all its forms. Cooked, raw etc... And no, most people eat meat cooked although there will always be raw food enthusiasts in any culture.   Some koreans like to wrap their beef in leafy veggies and place some spicy bean paste and sliced green chilli (without vinegar, soy sauce), but others will just take off the grill to eat. Some will wrap the meat with a serving of kimchi or "kennip". There's all kinds of way people enjoy their bbq beef and pork, but its not an exact science and we don't "look down" on people who eat differently.  Again, because eating bbq is not exactly fine dining, so table etiquette is not set down in stone. Hyang to Gol is a great restaurant run by Koreans, so is Chang and well-frequented by the local Korean community, but most of the Korean restaurants including these two have had to adjust the flavors and taste of their dish to be more inline with local tastes so they are definitely different from what you get in Seoul. Same with Japanese food in Sing and most other cuisines, so don't be a food snob and just enjoy the taste.
89	go where eat, sounds nice.  That one not bad looking, but my fav is still Song Seung Hoon  handsome guy..wah, lucky went to eat at Elements liao.
21	WOW din know that... if eat the korean way like bo hua.. my style of eating kr bbq - just spam the meat.  give and take - cooked garlic smell nice but raw has most of it's benefits.
3	I admit to who? You? Please, I won't want to waste time   Ya lor, we are hypocrites and you? Mr satki who looks like rain - enough said
6	First off, you are not donkey's korean "guest" right"?   Yup, everyone's taste is different - how we choose to eat the food is up to the person - IMHO, there's no right or wrong - just nice or not...hahah  If you want weird, just look at how Toons eat   Just kidding
9	Carey jin quick witted as usual   Wish he was but too bad he isn't   My Korean old man guest flew back to Korea on Friday night liao.   Couldn't agree more, when eating just enjoy the food however you like it.
25	You? Can even say energy is can be destroyed this kind of nonsense in order to insist that your low carb diet has no flaw.  Know why I dun go into your thread anymore? Cos I know such hypocrites like you is not worth my time anymore.
40	i tot this is a buffet thread... i guess i came to wrong place.
61	Brizo at Park Hotel, Clarke Quay.  1 of my fav buffets.  Last nite's spread was good, heehee. Wat til you see Ah Tan's photos.  Their salmon carving also good.  I got a friend who like to eat fish n always pick days when they serving it.  Hmmmm, come to think of it, should intro him to Elements ....  Oh ... tat !!!!  *followed by lots of weeping* guy? Wats so weird with the way i eat?
43	i see. ok will try that one day.  yah that "eyes so sad" guy.
9	anyone wanna go jiak Seabass Chilean at Element?  im free after Wed.. my job ish done..
25	chiu treat????
77	Nah, you didn't...  Back to the regular programming bah...  Mr Mod angry liao
98	You working here?  Wah, wait Donkey offer to treat you to durians
4	Think if you wanna quarrel, take it out of the thread and settle it over pm. I don't think the rest of us are interested.   Just my 2 cents worth. I like BBQ or grilled meats wrapped with veg, the type found at Korean restaurants. I don't put garlic in, grilled or raw. I just don't like it, whether it's authentic or not. No point following the 'perfect' way of eating but I don't enjoy it right?
12	Ya lor - haha  As long as we like it that way, it's good enough   So you want to go SSK?
4	Hope the salmon is not like the one at furama waterfront. That one is cooked rare. It's like eating slightly cooked salmon sashimi. Will be gelat after a while.   As for the way you eat, it's not the norm to me to mix desserts with mains. Most people eat desserts after mains. But that's what makes you unique and interesting.
16	I clear Blue Garden and the Christmas Eve high tea first. Too many similar type buffets.   I tried Jang Shin Jung at ECP on 3 occasions. Pretty decent.
53	Its similar.  Can see the salmon is still pink pink in the middle, plus its juicy.  The slightly sourish sweet sauce also complements the fish well.
21	Its nice at 1st but I prefer it more cooked.  Its like eating salmon sashimi that has been left in the open for a while.  I prefer it raw and slightly chilled, or nicely seared with a crisp outer covering and a medium inside.    Think for fish, I still prefer those steamed fish and deep fried soon hock, Chinese style.
33	ya think we overdue for SCDH.......anymore promo goin on??
2	Think is only 20% niah   Our XDD is also keen so need only one more for a table of 4 lol
3	Then you should go to SCDH haha  Free flow of deep fried soon hocks and steamed seabasses
1	Oh then u want it on wed?? Lol if wan shld set up a list lol
4	but i waiting for their dec promo soon
16	Wah like that we need to wait for Dec liao if the normal ala carte buffet is not available in Nov
16	The ala carte buffet is still available.  Just tat there is no discount for nov or dec according to the person i spoke with.  This hotpot buffet is a separate buffet.  You can choose either.
21	Hmm like that ah - unless got people don't mind paying full price   Else we can wait lor   What about our zhi char buffet at changi? Haha
14	if full price i prefer cathay for the pork chop lol...but scdh also fine with me
11	I am keen to try the changi buffet soon cos I bought extra vouchers   Any dates you want to toss?
72	count me in the SCDH..
7	Wah now I feel likle eating korena food, anywhere in sg can find authentic korena food? Or those buffet kind also can. Tmr I go whack straight away
33	SSK or 2d1n ?????????
80	Seoul Garden.   *runs away*
72	....................
6	SSK i rike!!!!!!
458	count me in for SCDH or cathay pls. everytime i come in the buffet slots are closed riao.
0	Buffet at amara hotel
41	xmas buffet leh....who buying??
73	Looks not bad leh - got Toons' favorite chilean seabass...hahah  What is the usual price ah?
9	Normal price is 38++ for dinner. About 35.80 nett after discount. But for christmas period the price prolly higher. Hmmm they list the seabass n cod separately
1	hi,   pai seh cant make it last friday.  what are the upcoming events? Thanks
7	Worth to buy?
23	Should be bah - still got turkey and other Xmas goodies...hahah
10	If anyone is interested in the , I can get the voucher at a special discount
43	How much huh?
43	goody afternoon all~~ any buffet to join recently?
5	Sunday brunch buffet
9	Wah, you keep poisoning us with all the buffet deals   Looks like I am destined to remain a super bui bui   Maybe I am safe - the most recent review like quite bad
1	I also bui bui bui bui
3	The amara one got further discount wor. tempting.
50	I hope it's good, gonna reserve my dinner soon   That day I went for dinner buffet at Global Kitchen at Pan Pacific, wasn't as awesome as I thought it would be. This Amara one looks good, looking forward to the seafood
21	The sunday brunch one a lot of carbo stuff. The loc is nice though.
20	That's why I am not gian ah...  Rather save space for Basilico bah...hahah  Marriotts also if they still got the brunch - last chance to use CIMB discount woah
4	Whoops, looks like the Amara buffet is sold out
6	Sian so fast? :'(
3	Cos it does sound like a damn good deal mah...hahah  Hopefully the quality is still as good bah   I will do a review after my Christmas makan
17	I thot it is still selling?   Just that the christmas special are mainly the turkey, desserts and log cake which are not attractive.
7	They released an additional 25 vouchers earlier.
313	dreamer got PM
2	Heehee, the star is the chilean seabass.  I normally pay $36 nett to eat it, but now i pay less to eat it, just for tat alone its worth it for me.  The added stuff is just icing on the cake   Hmmm, got cod on the menu too ...
5	Ya lor - hopefully the standard is still there...hahah  I called to book the slot I wanted before I bought the coupons
2	Arlow, where did you disppear to?  Building playing with your lego?  Hmmm, nowadays most of the outing all using coupons.  Unless you buy the coupon, otherwise to join in have to be pay full price, not very worth it.  If you like bbq meats, then ssikkek is coming up early dec i think.  Next week might have sakura bbq grill ponggol.  I got rang mahal, ala carte indian sun brunch buffet at pan pac hotel on sun 18 dec.  Still looking for 3 other victims, heehee.  The rest mostly closed liao.
47	Been there 4-5 times liao, everytime the seabass is good.  Its not difficult to bake the fish properly as long as the freshness is there i guess.  Just tat the sauce can be tad salty at times etc, heehee.  Yea, safer, esp if you going for the popular dates.  You going on the festive dates with the $10 topup ah?  The festive dates pricing actually quite attractive, just $49 nett for christmas or new year.  A lot of other hotels all &gt; $60++ for those dates.
72	PM u but u nvr reply de.
72	You still have?
380	The food was quite lousy when we were there 2 months ago. And the selection was lesser than what they advertised.
97	Wah, isn't that misadvertising?
40	Tats why they indicate the menu subject to changes. Got 1 buffet they even balatantly say tat they dun cook so much as not much ppl so dun want to waste food. I told them its not my prob. End they say will change the adv from over 30 items to over 20 items.
11	Sounds like Indian Times   Anyway, it's their problem and will become a reputation issue as well...
35	Element is a hidden gem la.
142	Not anymore - they sold 1731 coupons or something like that...hahah  But still not too bad - they really control the number else it would be crazy trying to get a reservation
14	corerevival , still got coupon for element ??????
3	Hope they sell the element deal again
19	goody afternoon to all again.... went crazy with work thats why MIA~unless i buy voucher also... nowadays all vouchers... but timing hard to match. indian buffet mai la~~ sakura a bit tempted~~wah ssikkek also tempted...
22	Wah, you put the link here but you never buy?   Think Shalome got PM you right? Maybe she got extra...hahah
5	Not sure whether gd or not n waited for u guys to comment. wait till sold out. so emo....think she also din manage to get .
11	Actually, Toons and a few others (Beta) like to go to Elements to jiak their seabass and chempedak cake so I figured it can't be that bad...hahah  So whack first lor - and for that price, it also comes with turkey and other Xmas makan
0	Got this voucher online for S$19.50 after some of us had tried it and liked it. For the price it came with these one time dish: Peking Duck + Shrimp &amp; Cheese Ball + New Zealand Deer Meat + Japanese Raw Oyster + Australian Scallop &amp; Seafood Tofu. You get the foods you want BBQed and they will do the BBQing for you.
0	Some cooked foods, though you can just skipped them. Nothing nice here. - A time dish, it had cheese inside but nothing special.
1	All the below are one time dish only. - Of all the one time dish, I only like this. I wondered what they do with the duck meat after that.
251	Only the  is on your table, the BBQ they do it for you. The  they kept under cooking it so it was still raw inside and we had to dip them into the hotpot. Overall, the foods are not too bad but I hate the turnaround time for them to BBQ your foods and worst, we gave them a Mount Everest high plate but came back only Bukit Timah Hill high plate nia. I wondered where some of our foods went? Next I preferred the meat to be in one big piece but here they are in skewered form. Overall I still preferred Sakura Grill over this place.
330	But Sakura Grill the stove is sunken into the table, making it quite hard to grill   Thankfully we have 2 master chefs that night - Dennyz and Evil - else we would all go home hungry (and angry)...hahah  And not forgetting the helpful XDD who kept plying our table with an endless supply of food for our chefs to grill
16	tt xdd is sabo kia lol...in the end we have to hide the food lol
1363	Erm, he just over-estimated your eating capacity...hahah  He thought you are like PPP mah
41	any1 got any opinions on the churrascaria offered by Senor Santos? currently it's on 1-for-1 deal with free flow wine and i wanna go try out with a group of friends..  the sixth avenue looks good but the budget is a tad too high =(
1308	Its a UOB cc promotion right?  Weird, when i called them, they said no such promotion.  Any details on the promo price?  Thanks.
34	Think is only 15% or 20% with some credit cards...not fantastic  Melting Pot at least for 1-for-1
2	Bored, so i amused myself by going to The Little Corner Place for korean bbq.  Compared to SSK, meats are slightly inferior, esp SSK's thick n yummy pork belly, but this place has an ace up its sleeve in the form of its lamb short ribs.  Love it a lot.  Its fatty n tender.  Will be better if they have a non marinated version.  Also, although it has a lamby taste, the taste is not too strong, so its suitable for ppl who are scared of strong lamby taste.  Here are some pics.  The lamb short ribs after i cut into smaller pieces and rinse off the marinate.  The fats marbling quite pretty hor.  After i bbqed it.
3	Wa... din know they got hotpot.
2	This is the fattest piece i can find.  YUM YUM!  Oily indulgence!  My conquests   Today, they also have fish in foil.  Its fresh.  Too bad they dun have a sambal version, heehee, else will be great!  Blurp!  Veri veri full now, meh meh!!!   Hmmm, dunno tomorrow go where ...  PS:  Donkey - tat guy definitely korean cos he was with 2 other korean mei mei eating there today, n they were conversing in korean.  Or he is sger but has a better korean teacher than yours
6	They din, its purely bbq   Tats my rinsing bowl of kimchi soup
118	wahh nice.... tt time u bought lunch voucher for this rite??
7	So lucky, got fish today.  The lamb chop is the best dish for me.  Do I still have any of the corner voucher with you?   I quite sure he is Korean   Let me learn few more lessons first before I go sian ... I mean talk to him.  Like they say, practice make perfect   Annyeong haseyo
3	Any takers?   Me and Toons will provide light entertainment
0	Yes, still got 1.  Evil said he wanted to use his voucher.  So tat day the 4 of us (excluding evil) is using your 4 extra vouchers.  You still keen on the steamboat?  If yes, then i jio kahlan again.  Have a feeling it will be nice.
4	I sing, donkey dance n they throw us all out ...
4	Ok, then I will confirm with my friend to take over the voucher.
1	I am keen but this week jin pack liao.  And I still have not cure my crab craving.  Plus I put on 1kg liao since I lost me swimming costume
7	Wah liew, food in tummy n out liao plus $ you collect, you still not confirmed?   Besides, if dun have the extras, i will be chopped to death when i am unable to produce the vouchers for those i supposed to buy for, heehee.
23	Tat one expires on 27 Dec, so no rush.  Plus its not buffet, n since we getting exp stuff like PK, grouper n US prime beef, i think need to drink a lot of soup to be full   As long as you keen, then we slot it later lor.  Kahlan also complained this 2 weeks a lot of buffets, heehee.  Hmmm, my reservist mate strongly recommended the black pepper crab at house of seafood.  He used the $25 nett for 900g crab promo.  He said their chilli crab so so, salted egg nice n black pepper crab is superb.  The promo is quite decent wor.  If you buy 5 vouchers, you can try 5 different varieties of crabs.  No min spending, so you can use the voucher to eat crabs only if you like, dun have to order other stuff.  Plus for SG pricing, $25 for 900g is pretty cheap.  If not for the fact tats its bloody far, i also tempted to try.  Tot you say your weight +-3kg?  You achieve breakthrough liao ah?
5	Ok, if no hurry to clear the voucher than count me in for the steamboat.  I will ask my friend too (the one that join us for corner), similar age group as kahlan *wink*  This voucher I see selling at a lot of sites. I been once to the changi outlet to try the salted egg and I didn't like it. Yes, I am bias cos I still like Tian Lai and Roland's crab hehehe  Maybe I should get 1 voucher and try the black pepper crab since your friend highly recommend.  Yes, I finally break through . . . break through the weighing scale   I need to buy a new digital weighing scale liao.
10	Hmmmm, you din like the sauce/taste or cos the crab not fresh?  If its the latter, then no need to try liao lor.  If its the former, then maybe can try again cos the black pepper crab is supposedly their signature crab.  So now is 3-X+4?   Yea, lousy scale. Aiyah, go toilet song first, then weigh bah.
39	The crab is fresh, it's the style of cooking for the salted egg that I don't like.   To be fair, I will try the black pepper since recommended.   Believe me, I have tried all means.  I go toilet song plus wee plus remove unwanted hair plus do mcchicken weighing, still heavier, jin emo   Curse the btss that took my swimming costume.
3	wah got crab i wan join....i think i had enough of bbq for the year alrdy ~ ~ lol
14	You sure or not?  Wait tomorrow go ssikkek again.  I tink you meant you have enough of non ssikkek bbqs for the yr
33	i just wen ssk on wed leh...lol...i think i'll stop for a wk lol.....too much bbq also not good lol but i found a nice way for cookin the bacon prawns n beef lol...
9	Wah, korean bbq on tue n wed, heehee.  Hmmm, how come you guys like bacon so much?  Its like a way saltier pork belly?  Its good for oiling the grilling iron, but if eating, its pork belly anyday!
269	When you PT matchmaker?  Hello! If same age grp as kahlan, then also same as you liao.  Dun use kahlan as an excuse hor
18	LOL - don't piccah people's lobang mah haha
53	HeeHor HeeHor, dont understand my intention Good things I will sure share with good people one.
1	Yah last month and this month i ate too much and too many buffets.  i've not tried the House of Seafood crab, but heard the chef used to be from the Eunos Crab and they are really good for their pepper crab.  Yah lor donkey.  i agree with toons, you just using me as excuse is it.
12	oh by the way anyone knows where's good to go for high tea buffet?  My friends wants to meet the eve of the eve and go someone for high tea buffet.  Looking for recommendations.
31	My friend recommend Marriot cafe.
264	Dress Code:Smart Casual Operating Hours:Breakfast: 6.00am to 10.30am (Daily)  Lunch: 12 noon to 2.30pm (Daily)  Dinner: 6.00pm to 10.30pm (Daily) Telephone65) 6831 6686 is that the plate of pleasure of the month ?
5	6831 6686
63	For the price, i dont expect to eat foie gras, but got beef and lamb, i very happy liao.   So which day in Dec is good?
24	Most high teas will served local food, just tat carousel's spread is quite big, so you get a mixture of local n international stuff.  If you want english high tea stuff like sandwiches, scrones etc, then goodwood park, however, their spread is small.  For rose veranda, even though its high tea, but their spread is part lunch part high tea.  You get the most substantial main course items (a few though) together with your sandwiches, scrones etc.  Note tat the above are from visits &gt; 6 months ago, so they might have changed their menu.  Carey is referring to tat incident where the daughter of the tea house owner called a diner cheapskate or something for just ordering the cheapest tea n yet still demanding good service.
3	can i ask a qn?   any confirmed date for jade room? i dun see any dates in sticky thats y i ask here.
476	hello bigmonkey, i have it as 13 dec in my phone calendar
29	r u guys planning on a christmas dinner buffet? i hope i can attend if there's one
1	Nope, it's 20 Dec
30	Think there's a brunch planned on 11 Dec...  But so far, no news
17	Yea, its Tue 20 Dec for Jade.  Forgot abt it too.  Basilico confirmed for Sun 11 Dec.  I made reservations already.
513	i'm keen to treat my family to a buffet spread for NYE.  a total of 5 person, any of the recommendation?  i got a few in mind after doing some searching on reviews on HGW and blogs.  mezza9 , 10 at claymore , equinox? , the line , triple tree  , melts ?   budget wise will be 150 per pax after SC/GST
4	the jade rm? if yes i''ll note it down in my schedule.
13	Yea, jade room.  13 dec was original proposed date, but carey cannot make it, so proposed 20 dec instead.
57	oscar n greenhouse ??
1	Oscars CMI these days...hahah Can forget about The Line too...
36	the oysters getting lousy ??
7	so jade room is 20th?? okok gotta note it dwn..
264	Equinox.. i last check.. if u paying full price still have place. But FAR Card offers all filled.
15	If bought, post here if you keen to go together.  Ala carte buffet, more ppl more fun n can try more dishes.
16	guys ,any xmas dinner buffet to recommend ?? budget abt 100 per pax
7	bought liao.  i aiming for wagyu only.
18	Errr, the wagyu is just toppings for pasta n stuffing for their 'curry puffs' wor.
0	can disect n just jiak? or its little bits n pieces? than aim scallop.
0	Basically I did not touches any of the foods show in this post except the scallop and Mussel which came in three different toppings each.
1	The  just lack the fragrant of more coconut milk to bring out its flavour.
0	- A nice dish that night but I found something else even better so this was neglected. - The flesh was firm to the bite, in fact a bit too firm for my liking. - This was cooked till tender and I thought I tasted a bit of red wine in there. Yummy. - A lot of hotel buffets had over cooked this dish but not here.
0	- Many diners that night just flipped open the cover and then closed it back but not me. I helped myself to many of this sea delicacy and the oh so tender pork trotter till the chef asked me why I like it so much. He said he don't like the sticky texture of the sea cucumber. - These prawns are quite big in size though my companion who tried it on the first round said the flesh stick to the shell and not fresh. Luckily, subsequent batches were fresh. - It's almost impossible to find nice fresh crabs in buffets.
4	The menu like not bad although got a lot of carbs  Bought Liao - aiming the grilled sticks
1	- The honeydew is the blandest I have ever eaten, totally no taste at all!!!
6	Foods wise, the varieties are limited but a few dishes like the Braised Pork Knuckle with Sea Cucumber, the Wok-fried Prawn with Har Lok Sauce and the Baked Salmon are not bad. Service can be lacking as they seem under staffed and plates took sometime before they came to clear it and to top up water. But for the price we paid, I will said it all worth the trip there.
14	Location : Tan Quee Lan St near Bugis MRT  Date : Tue 13 Dec  Time : 630pm onwards  Price : $15 nett using vouchers  Participants  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3. Manyu  4. Dennyz  5. the EVIL one  6.  *Closed*  Got 1 more extra voucher.  If keen, reply.  Thanks.
2	alright add me in
6	where is the menu for miss clarity cafe?
5	Lol, my tummy got trained b4.  It survived the roadside stalls at malaysia, indonesia, thailand, philipines n china wor.  For me, the highlights of the nite are the beef (fatty n tender), prawns (big juicy, nice sauce), sea cucumber + pork trotters, salmon n durian pengat.  Yum yum!!!  The lobster bisque n squid also quite good.  Sigh, i took so many pieces of the fatty beef you never take pic ah?
2	ohh looks good when u all goin to go?
0	I also survived the first three countries you went except the last two that I never been there before.  The fatty beef you only let me take picture one time nia, the rest you makaned all liao.
1	Likely to be on a sat lunch or dinner in Jan.  Although for ala carte buffets i prefer weekdays cos tend to be less crowded n serving spd will be faster.    So might be a Jan weekday dinner depending on whether i can psycho someone or not
4	Weekdays I will be late late cause very far. I will go on weekend.
1	You go scholar also okay mah, and its at bugis too.  Hmmm, how abt mon 26 dec (PH as christmas on sun) or mon 2 jan (PH as New Year on sun)?
12	No wor, you all eating liao.  Those dates I am ok.
9	like tt same as on wkend dinner ma...cause also alot of ppl?
5	Yalor, but since twtan said weekend, then no diff liao lor.  At most we order more at 1 go.  Btw, those 2 PHs are proposed only nia.  Still got other voucher holders yet to confirm, heehee.
5	anyway help me buy also leh...for me best of course is wkend lunch or dinner i dont need to rush dwn from work but if weekday dinner also ok....
7	You okay with those 2 proposed PHs?  If all okay, then we set on those days, else in jan.
88	ok with lunch
7	2 Jan is ok for me, else you guys go ahead bah
177	K, if donkey okay with 2 jan, then we fix it tat day, else we will reschedule to a sat in Jan.  This voucher expires in Mar 2012.  No rush, heehee.
3	Go weekday lah. I offer to drive you
12	I am ok with 2 Jan.   Thanks for organizing.
12	i am ok with any dates.
2	For the Brizo restaurant, when does the CIMB's 50% discount ends?
15	lots of varieties!!!
3	Must be you over eat on the sea cucumber or you never wear red underwear   The last time I went, eat so much also no stomach upset. But no have the sea cucumber dish.  The crab and prawn was pretty decent.  Overall,i like the place. Will go back if have the chance to take advantage of the discounted price again.
5	so is user problem not the makan problem ?
3	bot.........
2	Its via a voucher.  Normal promo is only 15% or 20%.
0	oh.......womder where did he get hold of that voucher?
24	Seems all can make it on Mon 2 Jan.  You wanna join us?  Let me know cos i making reservation tomorrow.
29	I think it is Toons' voucher.
1	okays onz.....2 pax here
9	oh....special Toon's voucher....
669	If I am not wrong, it's the welcome vouchers that came with every new CIMB card...  I think I passed mine to Toons the last time also...hahah
21	lao tan lao ya lahs.. lol.. jiak wrong things..
263	Don't start else he will say you boh jio him to eat good liao
1	Was intending to give up the voucher for this buffet due to my food poisoning last week but luckily my tummy took a turn for the better so here are the pictures though I must say I did not eat much at all. Got the voucher online at $23.50 and it's ending 7th Dec 2011. This is the second time I have been to  which is located at Oasia Hotel a stone throw from Novena MRT. A neat little restaurant decorated with blocks/cubes of wood along both sides of the wall. Had expected it to be a quiet lunch affair but seem like there was a seminar going on and ended up the place was crowded with diners. - The chicken was moist and tender but the skin could have been a little more crispy. They even provided you with those garlic chilli and black soya sauce to go along which is a nice thought. - I found it to be a bit tough so I only tried one piece, though I helped someone reserved his plate of lamb.
2	Accompanying the roast meats are , not to mention a host of other roasted vegetables. - Served warm and crispy plus it's stuffed full ingredients inside. - The highlight of the afternoon got to be this beef, roasted till just nice and then cooked in Veal Jus. The beef is fatty enough and the outer crust has that char roasted flavour. - Found this dish to be dry.
4	- Simple pasta dish in creamy sauce and baked with cheese, the result is a yummy dish I like.
3	- The cheese flavour is too light for me.
15	- One of the better Tiramisu I have eaten in a buffet.
113	Something on our plates. My dining companion like the charred fats on the beef. - A very slight cheese flavour can be detected only which prompted my dining partner to go add some grated cheese from the salad section. Me I like the crunchy texture of the pecan nut too. Almost could not make it for this meal but I am glad I did. As already expected, foods varieties were little but they were quite well done especially the Beef Fillet with Veal Jus &amp; Confit Tomato and they also served each diner a glass of mixed fruits juice. Thanks to my two dining companions who avoided sweet stuffs, I got to drink their share of fruit juices.  Only the sashimi got my friends thumb downs as it got fishy smell and the slices are not sliced up nicely as if the knife was not sharp.   Service is generally ok with me but the waiter forgotten to replace the jug of milk for the coffee after taking it away.
236	next trip is go where jiaks?
8	Monkey, carey, evil, twtan, donkey, and dreamer (2 pax), missclarity confirmed for mon 2 jan 2012 lunch at 1pm.  It lasts all the way til 5pm (last order 4.30pm), so can eat til pichak!!!
3	Nowadays, most of the trips using vouchers wor, plus reservation might be an issue too.  Upcoming will be basilico on sun 11 Dec n korean bbq @ bugis on tue 13 dec.  Basilico i getting those tbc ones to confirm.  If got opening, you keen right?  For the korean bbq, there is still 1 opening.  I should also be going to Elements on thu 22 Dec or fri 30 dec.  Tis one my own dinner, so let me know if you wanna join me.  Date: Sun 11 Dec  Time: 12pm onwards  Price: $81.20 nett  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Kunoichi  3. Twtan  4. Carey  5. Swatchie  6. kahlan ( tbc )  7. evilduxy  8. evilduxy's guest ( tbc )
42	Manyu, thanks for sharing.  You tried before?  Hmmm, the review looks quite good.  Any idea where to get the promo flyer?  Think i wanna go try, heehee.
2	Hi Toons, I think you can remove my name.  Don't think i can make it
8	Add one guest for me
9	i try ... very hard to call through wor ...  I'm not adding anymore liao, dun wanna go beyond 8 pax. Date: Sun 11 Dec Time: 12pm onwards Price: $81.20 nett Participants: 1. Toons 2. Kunoichi 3. Twtan 4. Carey 5.  6. Beta (TBC) 7. evilduxy 8. evilduxy's guest ( tbc )
3	Thanks Toons for buying the voucher and making the bookings.   But i dont want jiak until i pichak wor.   If want to jiak until their shop pichak then need to summon PPP liao
15	Sorry I can't make it either. Got last minute notice today that I will be out of town again
0	Hi Toons,   Can you help check if we can get complimentary car park coupons otherwise it's damn expensive to park there...haha  I was there for a conference last Friday - S$22  but heng got complimentary car park...
2	sambal maybe interested.
37	K.You confirmed?
120	bo leh... i just did a random search in google and found it. maybe i'll give it a try.
6	Thanks Toons
1	wah if i never check i wun know i'm going for this... LOL!!!  okie, i go tell my boss this sunday dun ask me to work~
1	Your name is so high up there somemore woah   Tell your boss you need a holiday break (even if it's Sunday)
1	Yw.  Reservation for missclarity done. For basilico, we can get 2 complimentary parking coupons.  Wagyu roast n foie gras, here we come!!!
7	Domo Arigato
576	You can get more. When we went 9 people with 4 cars, two of us got the coupons at the beginning of the meal, then after the meal, two went to a different person to get the remaining two. No big deal.
125	() Sunday Brunch Date:  (Sunday) Location: Basilico @ Regent Hotel Time: 12pm Price:  Participants: 1. Toons 2. Kunoichi 3. Twtan 4. Carey 5. evilduxy 6. Twtan's guest 7. Beta (TBC) 8.
4	twtan and friends.... this month got any gd christmas buffet?  maybe between now and christmas eve? i know christmas sure chop radish one
416	radish sis going ??
241	Check out 10 at Claymore, they have new Plates of Pleasure menu.
242	new plates of pleasure... MMmmm....
28	I mean ice cream buffet :S
364	my ice cream knowledge is limited. only know udders at novena has ice cream buffet.
141	It's okay I am not greedy - once a year is good enough haha
111	Why so pathetic, want to eat just eat la?   Say until carb like some sort of poison.
304	I am sure you do not know that carbohydrate  considered poisonous to him.
18	one man meat is another man poison
17	Before this get out of hand, I will delete any replies regarding the above from this post onward.
316	No choice - moi is bui bui unker  Should read as one man's carb is another man's poison
11	buffet in new York hotel. Bigmonkey???
15	i anything. if u wan to try than help me buy. thanks.   review are pretty bad thou.   if we go than treat it like a hawker fare. no expectation no dissapointment.
6	Beta, can confirm your attendance for Basilico?  Date: Sun 11 Dec  Time: 12pm onwards  Price: $81.20 nett  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Kunoichi  3. Twtan  4. Carey  5. Twtan's Guest  6. Beta (TBC)  7. evilduxy  8. Mystery Guest
27	But for S$6, can eat cremo woah
18	Date: Mon 26 Dec (Public Holiday) Time: 11.30am Price: $58 ++ (with 50% discount, so $34.20/$37.50 nett) Participants: 1. Toons 2. twtan 3.  4.  5.  6. *closed*
56	cheat once a year, and eat a year's worth woah....   i saw some review blogs say got lobby lehz... think will suddenly have oysters oso???
4	sorry for reposting. i kind of lost track, this post will serve as a reminder for myself.  we have jade room on 20 dec and the miss clarity cafe on 2nd jan, correct?
66	Yes. Clarity is lunch.
12	FAR have 50% discount for 6 pax?
21	thanks toons.   dennyz, wan to play game after clarity?
8	Love the Bar and Billiard deserts. Sign me up for a slot.
30	Special promo.  Now 50% discount up to 10 pax for mon to wed.Welcome n done!  Date: Mon 26 Dec (Public Holiday)  Time: 11.30am  Price: $58 ++ (with 50% discount, so $34.20/$37.50 nett)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. twtan  3. Ordway  4.   5.   6.  *closed*
4	sorry how to get 50% off?
68	Feed at Raffles card.
124	Amex Plat and above also.
21	Uob amex cc can?
12	The Sunday 1 still got slot?samba askin abt it..
91	Nope.Nope.  If got anyone drops out, i'll add him in.
703	okok....u let him knw then
30	Bigmonkey??
3	anything. minimum need 4pax thou.
52	Something is not right leh...  Their high-tea is more expensive than their steamboat dinner?  Both at New York Hotel somemore
140	what is their new menu   eat there until kind of sian last time
90	Date: Mon 26 Dec (Public Holiday)  Time: 11.30am  Price: $58 ++ (with 50% discount, so $34.20/$37.50 nett)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. twtan  3. Ordway  4. Donkey (tbc)  5.   6.  *closed*
388	Not buffet but very worth??
988	Hmmm, unlimited 1:1?  Means you get 2 glasses of beer/wine for the price of 1? Then it depends on the beer/wine and also on the price.  Wait they simply double the price, then back to sq 1
61	Ice cream buffet.
7	Sunday buffet meet where n wat time?
8	Meet at the hotel.
3	Yea, meet from 12pm onwards at the restaurant.  Date: Sun 11 Dec  Time: 12pm onwards  Price: $81.20 nett  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Kunoichi  3. Twtan  4. Carey  5. Twtan's Guest  6. Beta  7. evilduxy  8. Mystery Guest
67	Got dress code or not? hahah  Can come in bermudas and polo tee?
202	yah got dress code bo..
39	Must wear suit
15	Ok we see evil in a suit  The rest of us will be in smart casual   But not sure if that allows jeans haha
32	can i wear my tight fitting longkangs boosting gown come bo?
35	Guess its the usual no slippers, shorts or singlets.  You got $, as long as not obscene, they won't care one lar.I still have not seen your jeans with holes in the strategic locs
9	I was wondering if christmas/January is there any buffet slots?
17	1 for all , all for 1 lol....  btw whats the must eat over there?? the buffet show too long le i forget le...only thing i remember is the chocolate martini
27	yah i forget wats the recommended stuff there ~
107	French Oysters the give is simi variant? Fine De Claire?
3	The freshness of the food was good at claymore  The hot dishes was better than previous visits.  Oyster and lobster are worth the mention though the salmon sashimi is only passable.  The angus beef was good, strangely, the very very well done version taste better, charred on the ouside, tender on the inside. Unagi was too sweet. I pass on the kangaroo meat cos I never like it anyway and I am glad I didn't try cos the rest didn't like it too. I skip the crab too cos I know I will be disappointed. The fish otak was ok nia so I didn't bother to waste calories on that. Overall, for the PoP, I just ate lots of the beef.  Not to forget, the company was great. We concentrated so much on the food that we forgot to talk during the meals. It was only when we had coffee that all the interesting stories start pouring out   Thanks Toons, Kahlan and Dennyz.  Ah tan, do u still have 1 more voucher?
29	what type of voucher ?????????? how come got private outing bo jio
11	Singtel birthday month.  If u got the voucher, I jio u lor
10	me is starhub supporter leh
0	tmr maybe i blings camera.  need to use it for something later that day ~
3	I think so, did not pay much notice to the labels.  Was busy poking at the chef   I asked why the french one salty.  Is it cos they soaked or washed it in salt water.  He said no, then i said french sea saltier than US sea ah?  He just laughed.  Someone still said dead sea saltier wor, so french sea can also be saltier mah, but dead sea is inland sea wor   Hope its not cos the french piss into their seas Tats why never jio you mah.  Else fight liao
68	any buffet is good around 50++?
18	yeah i gt the oyster bible they say saltier.. i love it.
29	Dec still can use? Thought got block out dates.Finally will get a chance to know your camera.
18	he mention its for after brunch use....will use or not no ppl knws haha
30	i use auto mode one.
45	For Claymore they do tally the voucher against the ic right? I realise mobile can't quote post.. no this function?
48	The US one a lot nicer imo.  Never eat oyster so creamy one b4.Still can use for tonite n tomorrow nite, heehee.Yes, they will ask for IC to check.  Nope, the mobile version cannot quote posts.  You must switch to desktop version.
22	see your pic i felt happy, i book this place for my office christmas dinner. thank god, i think my boss will be please.
5	Any upcoming buffet outing? I'm interested.
1	All makan outings are listed on the first page of this thread.
24	Tomorrow we go big makan session leh.
74	Fine de Bretagne, whatever that means. Some pics from my trip last week.
3	What buffet is this? Looks awesome!
12	10@claymore pan pacific hotel. Good customer service. I also going.
7	UOB now got promo for 10@Claymore  1 dines free with every 2 for lunch and 1 free with every 3 for dinner
8	Brizo again? The Pork Knuckle looks good. Got sea cucumber with pork trotter?
4	How much is the buffet?
24	Price :  $52++ (dinner)  $55++ (brunch)
4	Citibank also same promo.
0	Who wants to go the 10@claymore buffet? I'm interested in going. But student so no citibank or UOB card...
7	May I know where is this buffet?
90	Should be .
3	Can't use your voucher Liao
124	No fair. How come my last trip don't have such ho liao.
13	hmm, they price increase from 12 December 2011.  Can't remember how much is the increase though.
713	same 55++ i call to yesterday to make reservation for next week dinner.
6	They increased the price recently, tink abt a month ago.  Was previously $45 for dinner and $48 for sun brunch.
30	Yea, the pork knuckle was good this round.  Nope, bo sea cucumber, but their beef was even better (marginally though) than the previous time we went, which was already good.  Prawns abt the same, but the crabs definitely fresher.Well, tat time we went still decent mah, plus at least you never LS
1	The pork knuckle could have been better. Other than that, I like the place.  That's because I am not weak nor did I eat any sea cucumber mah   Enjoy your buffet lunch today.
3	Watching the buffet buffet 2 episode featuring Basilico now, must do HW before going to whack   The featured stuff are lobsters, over 20+ cheeses with black truffle shavings!!! Roasted piglet with meat n rosemary herb stuffing, wagyu beef n various pizzas made on the spot.  Plus all the gelatos, got simi redwine, coffee, lime gelato etc.  The choc martini you need to take the alcohol option wor.  Yum yum, my stomache rumbling now.  Wonder why they never feature the foie gras!  Pat Mok really jiu gui, keep focusing on the alcohol, heehee.
7	Thanks.  You enjoying your jacuzzi?
28	Review:
6	See you!
7	omw.. freaking raining.. currynehs ~
182	Remind me of our first mezza9 outing.  Also raining on a sun morning, heehee.
110	Yeah. Lol..we abt to be done eating. Lol
15	hope u all enjoy, miss basilico
41	Location : Tan Quee Lan St near Bugis MRT  Date : Tue 13 Dec  Time : 630pm onwards  Price : $15 nett using vouchers  Participants  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3. Manyu  4. Dennyz  5. the EVIL one  6.  *Closed*  Got 1 more extra voucher.  If keen, reply.  Thanks.
45	added...........
10	Yes, jin song. But not in the jacuzzi hor, else will have UFO ( unidentified floating objects)    How is the buffet? Ah tan quickly submit homework!!
25	Sigh. So jelly. The only buffet I can go for in Dec is the Christmas Eve high tea. And I had to take no pay leave to go. Working every day.
135	UFOs?  At first i tot your waste flying all over your toilet one ... later then see floating.  Dunno to  or   Very satiated now.  Lots n lots of food n pics.  Tink its gotta be a while b4 ah tan post his massive HW.  Too bad he only took pics of food, cos the eye candy there was as good as the food   Ppl really go there to eat n be seen ... yum yum
67	Haven't do homework yet cause I just finished setting up my brother's computer. I got the Italian chef, waitress serving the pizza and waiter serving the coffee pictures wor. Still got something special inside Beta's camera but I doubt he will ever post it up.
5	Rated ah?   Or is that for private viewing like many of the pictures in Toons phone
4	where is the picture
39	Moi not BTSS like Toons. Still in the progress of editing.
35	i like Louisa zehzehs.
151	Simi BTSS?  Its BTDD The slang slang waitress ah?  Yea, she is pretty, but her taste in pizzas ...   Say simi we sure will like it.  You say she simi race?  Her features very nice, quite exotic.  Actually, quite a no. of the diners all look good wor.  The ppl eating there really different from the those at the more main stream buffets.  As the saying goes, there is no ugly women, just lazy ones   Really enjoyed walking around, looking at the food and the ppl.  A treat for both tummy n eyes   I can still envision tat fatty chunk of wagyu beef tat Carey took.
347	Welcome Bigmonkey.  See you guys at the restaurant from 6.30pm onwards.  You can click on the address for the map.  Cham, tink ate too much sugared stuff.  Now still feeling hyper!!!!  Weeeeeeeeeee!!!!!!!!  Location :   Date : Tue 13 Dec  Time : 630pm onwards  Price : $15 nett using vouchers  Participants  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3. Manyu  4. Dennyz  5. the EVIL one  6. Bigmonkey  *Closed*
44	Same here...hahah  Still full until now   Didn't cheat as much as I thought I would
22	yeah man. same here. hehe.. Angmohs if u realised they dress up for the occassion. Louisa .. i think she look like Pinoy lehs. hehe
24	Because in their countries, dining out is an expensive affair and they really make the most of it...  Most of them would even hire babysitters to take care of their kids while they go out for their dinner...bliss for other diners too...hahah  Yup, she looks like Pinoy...so Ah Tan is interested ah?
1	NOted!!!
31	Beta is the one who like her.  I finished editing the photos, will post later this evening. Yesterday theme was ""
1	Quite true - I absolutely love the fatty piece of waygu roast beef that I got   I never tried any of the Asian cooked food   Dessert also only ate the gelato
3	where is the picture , faster hand up homework
7	I only ate a piece of the cod fish and one super chewy lamb stew. The Wagyu roast beef was good as is the lamb chop. I like the truffle pizza sandwich too. The cheese pizza was too salty for me.Uploaded 36 pix, still got 20+ more to go plus I have to write the script for the "Love is in the air" theme.
2	woo got script sia got picture of the male n female lead actor n actress
53	Have pictures of the male lead but actress will kill me if I upload her picture.
5	is she in makanzone???????
1	Got chio Louisa?
1	The one serving the truffle pizza? Got that one.
4	I ate alot of the suckling pig. 6pieces of Foie Gras.  n i nv juak asian. Gelato i had 6 scoops. Pizza zehzeh i had 2slices. I quite like their lobsters.. pity no hab oysters.
5	Fun at Basilico? Must have been nice.  Just spent the past 3 days gaining 4kg while consuming 5 buffets in 72hrs. Girlfriend was in town so took a break off my cut. I'll put a few reviews of the places we hit including Prego Breakfast Buffet, Yan Ting, Keyaki, Todai. Still had the faint outline of a six pack during Zoukout but now unfortunately as of Monday morning, its become hidden under a layer of water and flab       The gf came in on a red-eye flight and she was in a rush before so she didn't eat anything for the past 12hrs. Economy class food always suxs, with omelets like rocks. One thing I like about the breakfast buffet at Prego is that it starts early. I think around 6am or something like that. It also has free-flow of fresh squeezed juices and you can ask them to blend carrots or other veggies if you want a "healthy" drink.      The bread spread is also decent with a whole bunch of waffles, muffins, assorted breads. Only bad thing is they're not warm, although you can ask them to heat it up and they will. One awesome thing is that they have all sorts of fresh made jams/creams and other condiments to spread all over the bread. I love their hazelnut and chocolate creams, and for those who like sweeter things, there's even a dripping honey comb that you can slice pieces off to add as topping on your bread. They also have the typical cheese plate with brie, blue and a few other types.     Oh the salad line is ok, but i stuck mainly to sliced meats and smoked salmon for the appetizer. Typical buffet quality.     They have a porridge/congee section with assorted toppings/side dishes (not sure is it taiwan porridge, cause I'm not exactly sure what that is) which i never partake of, as well as two types of hot dim sum, basically shumai and hagao. Nothing spectacular, but at least something decent to nibble on. The egg tarts were terrible, small with little taste. Veggie roll was ok. They also have a make your own nasi lemak station and I take the chilli paste to eat with my other food.     Omelet station serves eggs how you want them and had a couple sunny side up. The gf had an omelet mixed with all the veggies and an extra serving of cheese and said it was pretty good. Hard to screw up an omelet after all unless its served on a plane.      Also assorted cereals and I love their bran mixed with rasins, figs and walnuts. They also have organic yogurt which is great topped with a few preserved slices of peach and mixed with the cereal. Great blend of crunchy sweet tart taste.     There's also a few Indian curries and the cooked food line. They had Eggs benedict on top of smoked salmon on a sliced bagel which was decent. The other stuff wasn't memorable consisting of the typical streaky bacon, beef and chicken sausages and some kind of mini chicken burger that was more like chicken meatballs.       Service was the highlight, with a waiter who even refilled our juices for us everytime the glass was low even though the juice was self-service. Also we had a seat next to the large panel glass and as the morning sunlight streamed in, they lowered the automatic blinds before I even asked. Plates were cleared promptly and even our cutlery was replaced every now and then. This was even during the packed morning crowd from the hotel having their complimentary breakfasts. I do notice that service is always slightly better when I'm with the gf with smiles all round. It must be nice to be a girl.... kkkkkkk     All in all, I would rate the breakfast buffet pretty highly even against those of greenhouse, and Melt. Plus the cost can't be beat with Feed at Raffles/Amex Plat which gives u one for one. Cost was around 45 for two inclusive of all charges so 22-23 per head after 50% off. All in all, a great meal to start off the weekend.
11	I never had a chance to eat lobsters, all gone to someone's plate.
17	OMG - Beta jiak more than me   I was not on form yesterday - jin emo
0	U slow la. Me n her took the bodies till one jiejie nt happy.
112	Nv. U jiak more than me.
11	pity no beef carpaccio and giant scallops yesterday, like the roast beef, lamb, foie gras and smoked salmon. 1st round of crabs is good, subsequent ones are half-frozen... managed to try most of the desserts next time i wanna try the semi-buffet lunch @ Bologna... looks interesting
17	can i ask? did the foie gras ran out? like the last time, the experience at marriot.
10	Nope, plenty of foie gras.  The lobsters did run out midway through the buffet though.
5	Wah, you went on a buffet spree with your gf?  Looking forward to your review of Yan Ting n Keyaki.  The breakfast buffet at Prego sounds quite normal wor, i was expecting a more 'italian' breakfast, if there is such a thing   Dun worry abt the 4kg, you'll prolly lose most of it after songing in the toilet
17	Bologna also featured on buffet buffet 2 wor.  I go have a look at it.  Dun really like semi buffets though cos either way, will end up emo.  Food bad, emo cos have to pay for lousy food.  Food good also emo cos can only eat 1 portion
2	Don't need to be shy leh...hahah  I only ate 3 pieces of foie gras - you ate 6  I only had 2 scoops of gelato, you had 6  Roast piglet, only 2 small servings...you had a lot...hahah  Lobsters only 2 pieces too - the later refills were claws niah   Crab - only took 1 round - the later refills were so pathetically small (plus frozen according to Evil)
2	The foie gras like lose to Marriotts   Not as smooth and having to walk into the smoky room was   Disappointing that the lobsters ran out - left with claws
12	Beta and lover girl said the claws were good, much better than the body.
102	The foie gras for me is abt the same.  Then again, my pieces dun have the veins, heehee. Yea, i agree.  The body was a bit tough or chewy.  The claws on the other hand were sweet n juicy.  I find them just a tad salty though.
12	basket got crabs?! why i nv see until..  lol.. i just jiak lobster n heh poh nia..
31	Crab legs.
4	It's Alaskan King Crab legs
10	hello everyone.. is this still on?is the 50% discount available for all? Is there a menu or something?
5	Yea, still onz.  50% discount is available for all.  Should be $34.20, but might be more ($37.50) depending on how they calculate their service charge. No, i do not have a menu.  You can check out their .  Do note that we are not going during their festive period, so use the menu as a rough guide.  Its intl spread.
3	alright thanks.polo tee + jeans + vans can go in right? if can i want to go..
20	Shirts must have collar.
4	FAR for AMEX will end Jan 31st 2012. So eat all you can before it ends.
9	Can, so i add you in?No need, ytd i go Basilico also wore tshirt.  Just dun wear singlet can liao.  But if got cleavage, maybe wear singlet will get you more oysters, lots n lots of berries, specially decorated ice cream, better service etc  Somehow, ytd, i wave to the service staff, they treat me like invisible, but when someone else tried ... PS - just saw ah tan's posting of the dressing requirements.  Blah, i say its a load of crap.  I'll still go in Ts, but its at your own risk, heehee.
15	Thanks for highlighting it.  So sad   Must schedule some trips to equinox, cafe swiss's spanish nites liao.
11	You mean you also want the botak chef to pamper you ah?
47	yesh prease.. i will pm you my contact details &amp; etc. in a moment.
9	yah and they forgot about ur latte too...  and Basillico bor oysters lah!!! *emo*
9	Yeah, most places ignore the dress code. There were two gents sitting next to us at Yan Ting. One of them was wearing bermudas and slippers and he was happily munching away at the food. They did seat him in one of the side tables where he was basically hidden by the side partitions. I only noticed his casual wear when his flip flops made the "plop plop" sound as he strolled out after the meal   But I have been turned away from Equinox dinner a couple of years ago before by the counter staff at the lobby "checkpoint." I remember being a little pissed then because I had asked the stuff during high tea as to whether there was a dress code and the person clearing the tables said no.
103	Yan Ting was quite disappointing. I'll write more later when I get back.  Either that or my memories of the place (it was my first visit after a long hiatus) are rose-tinged.  Prego is definitely not "Italian" themed, but I think it beats most other breakfast buffets in its variety (especially the baked goods) and the fresh squeezed juices are an added bonus. I don't have much to compare it to, but it definitely beats Mandarin and Ritz breakfasts by a long margin. If you go before the crowd hits at 9am, its also a decent place to have a breakfast meeting, as far as a self-service buffet can be.
4	now Equinox lunch or high tea.. u can see ppl wearing shorts n slippers. Dinners maybe they more anal abt dressing.  1 altitude also.. gt dress code n age limit. isee this grp of angmoh n families with kids.. also dress very relax..
94	ang mo 1 standard sinkie another standard
7	any1 tried sharing the card among frens?
0	The Sunday morning's sky was dark and the weather moody but that did not stop me from going to  despite the rain. Located on the second floor of The Regent Singapore at Cuscaden Road, this is a huge restaurant capable of seating 202 guests in the main dining area and 33 at the outdoor terrace overlooking the pool.
1	A Christmas theme decoration in a heavy crystal vase. The open kitchen concept let diners view what the chefs are cooking.
0	- These are grilled with a nice charred flavour, yet retained the pink juicy meat without drying out. - Not exactly fall off the bone type but nonetheless is still a good grill. - Not sure how this tasted like as I did not eat it.
0	- A traditional Italian roasted pig with stuffing and herbs. I think most of us actually preferred the crispy pig itself rather than the stuffing inside. The  was a hit with all of us, tender juicy pink meat to die for.
1	A selection of . Chef slicing  - The fume from frying the Foie Gras turned this room which is enclosed in glass on both sides into a smoke house!!!
1	A lot of semi-hard and hard Cheese can be found here including these wheels of cheese. Beta, which was the cheese you said was nice?
0	Lets see what we are eating.  Porchetta with stuffing on the left and Wagyu Sirloin on the right. The traditional wood-fired pizzas are darn good but the Cheese Pizza above was super salty.
0	- Served with risotto rice.
1	ran out fast and was not replenished.
0	Lobster Bisque with pasta shells, cod fish and super chewy Lamb Stew. Waitress posting with , an Italian bread baked in Basilico's wood-fired oven and comes with truffle-infused mascarpone cheese and Cepe mushroom spread.
0	but all of them are just too sweet for me.
1	This mei mei was supposed to demonstrate how to fill the cup with the soft serve Espresso but she did not even wait for me to start up my camera so what you see here is cup number two. - Six flavours to choose from. I presonally like the Espresso with chocolate coated coffee beans inside and the Lemon Sherbet though it's overly sweet.
1	Our  managed to charm this Italian chef into scooping all six flavours of the gelato into 3 cups and then decorated it with his love.
0	While the rest of us had to settle with plain jane scoops.  Here he is seen sprinkling this love over the huge branch of cherry tomato and soft cheese.
41	Handsome boi boi serving us our .
25	You can't share unless you lend your AMEX card to your friend and he signs off as you. That's forgery.
30	i shared my FAR card with friends. Normally u pay with different name as in card n CC different they dont ask. if they ask u say friend treat. If nt best is pay by cash.   Good thing abt the card is can share la. Dont get caught.   Thats the good thing of the standalone card lo.
6	Date: Mon 26 Dec (Public Holiday)  Time: 11.30am  Price: $58 ++ (with 50% discount, so $34.20/$37.50 nett)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. twtan  3. Ordway  4. meBaoBao  5. Samba Fan  6.  *closed*
0	Ah Tan, thanks for posting all the pics.  How come never post pic of Louisa?  Oei, dun keep her pic for yourself hor.  Good thing must share mah   Heres my small contribution.  Damn, posting these pics making me hungry   Porchetta, an italian roasted piglet with meat n rosemary stuffing.  As mentioned by ah tan, most of us preferred the skin without the stuffing.  Parma ham with rock melon.  The melon is nice   Was very happy when i realised that they had cod fish!  However, the cod fish was just not fatty enough.  Slipper lobster with lots of roe.  Kunoichi was lusting for the eggs ... so i was eagerly spooning the eggs to eat too when Carey told me the eggs bo taste one ... he is right ... i'll stick to my crab roe
17	Carey's plate of wagyu roast  It might look very bloody n raw, but given the quality of the meat, it will be a waste to cook it any further.  It tasted great as it was.  Really bagus!!!    He liberated tat fatty chunk of meat from the chef who almost disposed of it cos its too fatty *pengz*  I was so so so tempted to do an 'ah tan' lick on tat chunk of fatty beef ...   Espresso gelato, baked pineapple with lots of nuts.  Think i finished 1/2 of the bowl of macademia nuts
120	Hmmm, i always tot Prego is an italian restaurant.  Although the breakfast a lot of carbs, but at $23 a head i really dun mind trying.  Plus it starts early.  Hmmm, anyone keen to go there for an early morning walk, maybe at marina barrage, then followed by breakfast at Prego?  Sounds like a great way to start a weekend morning
235	Sorry wasn't clear. Its an Italian restaurant but it serves the Fairmont/Swissotel complex so people have to go somewhere for the complimentary breakfast unless you're booked in a club room or order breakfast in bed. I think they use the Swiss cafe if you're staying at Swissotel and want to get get breakfast and the menu is roughly the same. (However, Swiss cafe is much smaller and the huge breakfast crowd can make you feel like you're eating in a wet market).  The restaurant reverts to it's Italian menu for lunch and dinner with a sunday brunch as well. The Sunday brunch spread is nowhere close to Basilico although they share the same price-point.
61	Louisa not the one serving the truffle pizza? I only got that one.
17	Yup, I thought she's the Louisa that they are talking about?  Anyway, I still like my cup of latte
3	I had already posted, Toons no see?
2	I tot its the more caucasian looking one?  If she is Louisa, then she is not photogenic wor.  Looks better in person.
1	I tot the sunday brunch at Prego is a lot cheaper than basilico, esp after you factor in the discount.  Hmmm, I dun really mind if the spread is smaller, but does the food taste good?
7	I'll rather have a cup with the foam forming 4 nos
2	Nicest piece of the waygu beef that day - and to think the chef wanted to discard it
41	Me , me , me
21	Which ones you interested in?  Equinox, Cafe Swiss spanish nite or Prego sunday brunch?
15	3 me for 3 places
5	got carbo u can go meh  or u using cheat code  ?
1	Can eat eggs, egg benedict, bacon, organic yogurt etc mah.  Anyways its just $23 nia.  Dun eat much still can chill out there
38	That requires the art of selective retention   Btw, how is your carbo diet going?
5	body fat n visceral fat dropped
37	Fantastic.   Look forward to see the slim slim raven di di in the next makan outing
2	im going to Regent again!
4	Beta bo jio. You going with which zeh zeh this time?
3	How is yogurt low carb?
63	wah lau... i just wanted to try and u say until like that  thanks ah~
95	go with sec sch crass mateys.  Yearly end year or start of the yr meal with them!
7	See you guys at the restaurant from 6.30pm onwards.  You can click on the address for the map.  Location :   Date : Tue 13 Dec  Time : 630pm onwards  Price : $15 nett using vouchers  Participants  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3. Manyu  4. Dennyz  5. the EVIL one  6. Bigmonkey  *Closed*
31	Manyu and Monkey, if you need a lift from the West, just let me know
4	Why never offer me?  I wan lift 2
1	Those unsweetened greek style yogurt has less carbs compared to the usual.  Besides, if a couple of spoons of yogurt are all the carbs i eat for the day, its still low wor YW.  Oei, dun act like a vulnerable innocent gal wor.
5	There is already a lift in your office, you anytime also can take what
6	His office got Lift No. 2 right?   Toons, we got any vouchers to use coming soon? I can't remembered what I asked you to buy liao.
4	You have honjin (not scheduled yet, exp Mar 2012), kushiyaki (christmas eve) and missclarity (day after new year) with me. Hmmm, you not in for jaderoom?
4	Jaderoom is what makan?
16	Steamboat at royal hotel with peking duck.  Next tue 20 Dec.  Nvm, tat one you did not sign up.
10	Hello buffet people, i need some help here. i am looking for a good buffet roughly budget of 40dollars..(with coupon preferably. ) Its for my gatecrashing brother's dinner for next week. Please recommend any.. thanks!
7	no name-calling please... just asking u not to use words that'll make people misunderstand again, i'm still mindful of Sunday's incident just fyi~
20	He jin greedy lor. His office got Lift No. 1, 2 &amp; 3 and he still asking for a lift   Ah tan, you so forgetful liao. I remember you are in Kushi cos on that day, you must come in green aka Christmas tree, complete with Green Hat hor
3	We're a bunch of jokers.  Some more than others, so dun take wat we say to heart.  Keke, will not joke more on it since you uncomfortable.
38	But Kushi is the one at Windsor Hotel.  Ok lah, this one kushiyaki I totally cannot remembered about it.
42	it's ok, i'm going elsewhere before this.. thanks for the offer!
55	thanks for the offer, i can't make it on time.
63	Any buffet high supremacy member to help me out?  please and thank you. =)
182	Go to the sticky thread makan sessions see photo and decide?   If none suits u then ask again lo..
25	Thanks to all the makan bros here.  I've been organising buffet for my colleagues as well.  After being inspired by the sticky buffet thread which I always seem to open just before lunch time, we have so far gone to eat at Si Chuan (when they had the 4 dine 3 pay), and Kiseki.  Next will be Triple 3 as they are having a 1 for 1 again.
11	thanks to everyone who went for tonight makan. eat until v full.
2	Glad you found the reviews here helpful.  Do you like SCDH?  If you like it, you should give cathay a try too.  The votes are pretty even btw SCDH and Cathay.  Hmmm, funny you should mention kiseki cos i think the reviews here are negative, although i do find their lunch worth it.  I feel tat there is enough decent stuff there to justify the price charged.  How do you find kiseki?  333 will likely have the 1 for 1 indefinitely.  Imo, their strategy is to take the price they wanna charge and then double it before offering the 1 for 1.  Having said tat though, they do nice sashimi, wagyu roast, chilean seabass,  n teppanyaki prawns.  Enjoy yourself!
14	Yea, the company is certainly much better than the food, although the food is still better than compared to indian times or tat satay steamboat at east coast   Btw, this is better than xian pin guo right?  Need to be mentally prepared, heehee.  Oei, you so fast finish playing arcade.  Terminated all of them liao?
1	If you want recommendations, you should give more details.  Weekday or weekday?  Any preferred cuisine?  Any stuff you particularly like, eg, seafood?  Meat?  Desserts? Veg?  Any stuff you wanna avoid?  You prefer a big spread or you're okay with a small spread with a couple of nicer items?
7	this one have marinated meat. xian ping guo have good drumlets which i dun think will run out.  service and seating arrangement, xian ping guo will win.   for food, each have their own strength.  for game, dennyz keep winning. i only can stand there n let him wack, cannot move an inch.  he air kick n combo timing is superb. i think he should go for the gameaxis tournement this friday.   evilduxy is indeed very evil, trick me into corner n wack until nothing left.
3	when did i became pro in street fighter... my monkey master?
2	i noob one, there is only one spot left in the noob corner n its mine. u trashed me.
13	What can I say but wait until that XDD come bah...hahah  Then can see who is the most "noob"
4	Wah, more relieved now.  Tonite although not good, but still okay for the price paid.  At least xian pin guo is comparable.  Wah, dennyz n evil so pro one.  Next time dennyz try to lock you again, use your hands to tickle him until you can break out.  Tats wat i will do   Or i better stick to hitting those ground rats with the hammer
35	wah monkey anyhw tell lie....only u n dennyz pro...im the 1 tt tio jiak...guess i must buy ssf4 go home train le lol
30	waa go buffet also got play game huan...
17	Confirm better that Indian times.  Just that the pork belly don't get replenish enuff.  They boys so pro at playing the stick
19	hokay. i chiong until high supremacy member then tell u lor
292	shushu, ish the rm8 ktv cum buffet still on?
16	Wah, last nite dun have oysters, sea cucumbers or durians, how come so kinky ler?
1	She got high on muscles, opps, or was it mussels
3	Advertise again?  Must be business very bad...hahah  I rather go Suanthai due to the location
5	Lol, you got spy ah?  Someone was also saying the same thing last nite.  There also no mussels, so its prolly the other one The Suanthai menu looks better too.
2	Last night next table burn joss stick, lots of smoke   Then in arcade, the boys play with joy stick.   So I emo 1 corner play with nemo. Mussels dont have.   Muscles taken
348	Ya, seems like advertise quite frequent.   The place is quite near my place but i still dare not take the risk.
431	u want go? count me in =D
437	If the marcoroni and cheese is free flow, that would have been perfect.
468	2 bad it is not
7	hou mai dawg, I checked out Greenhouse's buffet prices for Christmas eve and it's 218 bux!
11	Christmas is chop carrot season.
67	Probably with alcohol included too?  Make you drunk, then chop
109	Ya lor...I went for Christmas Day dinner instead last year...  Slightly cheaper but still chop carrot
33	crap crap crap.... since the weekend, I've been on a feeding binge. Sigh... Its going to be painful to lose those kilos again. Anyway one more trip to Shinyuu before PSMF till Christmas.
23	It's not hard once you know how...hahah  Just ask Toons lor - he can continue to eat buffet and not gain weight cos he's eating the "correct" stuff
89	mmm... I'm a carb fiend and I don't want to restrain myself in the presence of good food. When you're going to indulge, you indulge. But I guess I'll  just have to pay the piper, with blood and tears....   Yeah, when I restricted myself to just meats and fish at buffets, I was surprised the weight didn't fluctuate much.
10	Read this liao, feel a bit guilty.  Actually still got gain.  Although eating the 'correct' stuff, i'm still eating way too much of it   However considering the amt of buffets i am going to, i'm 'pretty happy' with my weight gain   Btw, did you watch the news abt how butter prices are skyrocketing in europe due to poor cow milk production plus the low carb crazy tats sweeping across europe now? Heehee, we're gonna be mainstream soon!!!
5	Tried the festive spread over at Elements, Amara.  Quite disappointed.  Esp since they were serving fried chilean seabass which was so much inferior to their usual baked ones.  Oh well.  Managed to score myself a large plate of salmon belly.  I was really surprised as the sashimi over at Elements tend to suck.  Dunno why today got so good salmon belly.  The chef also gave me a large plate. Maybe cos i was grining like mad.  Din even go back for seconds cos i was struggling to even finish this plate.  Mussels which were surprising nice.  Talk abt not judging food by its looks.  The white sauce was slightly hot, sourish n sweet.  Similar to salsa sauce.  Got a bit of herby fragance too.  Yum yum, whacked abt 10.  Pork with asparagus.  Okay.  Turkey.  Edible.  Honey glazed bone in ham.  Edible.  Sigh, the festive stuff basically so so nia.  I'll rather they junk all these festive stuff n stick to the old good n tried baked chilean seabass
3	Some additional jap stuff  The ham n turkey  Softshell crab.  Pretty good actually.  The batter was light n crispy.  The crab fresh, n the chilli sauce sweetish which goes well with the fried stuff.  They also have ebi.  Complimentary 1 serving of 0.5 lobster.  Today's one better than the one from the previous visit which was overcooked.  Freshness okay, i liked the sauce.  Creamy, rich and flavourful.
3	Now on to the dessert spread.  Macarons  All kinds of pasties  Vanilla butter log cake ... too sweet  Cempadak cake in the guise of a log ... as the saying goes 'A rose by any other name would smell as sweet' ... as nice as ever!  Banana cake  Damn!  Someone made off with tat golden axe b4 i had the chance
3	Today no one stopped you from taking photo?
12	My sugar cheat for the month ...   Yummy cempadak cake.  Think i whacked more than 0.5 of the log by myself   Tiramisu.  Nice!  Disbowelled tiramisu  All in all, i found the food so so nia.  Din see the cod tat was listed in the menu.  The crayfish were small, but not tat fresh.  Oysters surprising quite big n juicy, but still not as nice as the US ones at Claymore.  The cold crabs never try.  Cold prawns also quite big n looks fresh.  They had lamb stew (tender! bagus!) and beef (tasted flat) too.  For the voucher price, still okay.  More than okay if you stick to the oysters, crabs etc.
4	I am going on Boxing Day   Looks good enough for me considering the price haha  I paid many times more for worse before
8	Nope, but then again, i was complaining to the manager abt the chilean seabass.  Maybe he decided against agitating me further
6	For the price, definitely no complaints, just tat i prefer their normal spread.  Even their normal lamb at the carving stn also better than the ham n turkey they serving now.  I'm probably just disappointed by the lack of baked seabass.  For me, elements is a 2 hits wonder.  You remove 1 of the hits, you're left with 50% nia ...   But considering the price for christmas dinner, its a steal!
94	It's ok I am not a fish person haha  And since I never tried the baked seabasses, I won't miss it right? Haha
36	as what beta always says... Bo Jio~~~
7	toons did jio me.. but i was in a movie..
501	Its a last min thing.  I asked beta cos he said b4 he wanna go.  Pay full price you still wanna go?  Its quite a bit more X compared to normal.  Personally i dun think the so called festive menu is worth the premium.  Anyways, i might be going again either on 28 or 30 dec, depending on which day have the baked seabass.  If you keen let me know.
5	We do have some stuff in common   You so have to try the crab in Tian Lai.
34	You went ytd? I felt bad that i fly u aeroplane and went JB instead cos my crab craving was getting to me. That is why i am making up with Durian today   We set a date for jb crab next week? Durian uncle across the stall say nice durian coming.   MSW - RM20 per kg   Sultan - RM10 per kg
2	Yea.  Normally if plan to go eat, even if last min cancel, i will still go somewhere else to entertain myself.  Cos looking forward liao to a good meal liao, cannot disappoint myself mah   So the durian got motive one   Its okay lar.  I know wats it like to lust after a certain food.  So you bought the durian from tat store across tian lai where we had the old tree durians previously?  The lorry uncle at the pasar malam back already?
8	Evidence!!!
10	Yes. The Tian Lai aunty recommend me go buy the sultan durian.   I have not been going to the pasar malam in Pelangi so i dont know if the lorry durian uncle is back. But i think it is worth a visit there again to check. But next Tuesday we got Royal steamboat so it has to be the week after.    I bought 5 big sultan durian for RM80. Later you see if it is worth it
4	Bring to office eat like the PK and roast duck?
0	I wan go jiak crab...!!!!
8	Lunch time you take taxi come my office and we eat together?
3	Today cannot, Friday is moi busy day.
21	Let you know next week hao ma?   And where is your less than $100 MK hotel stay in HK?
128	Have its 650 per night but it's corporate rate lol...so technically I'm right abit I ask normal is 800
6	anyone interested?  DBS Indulge:1 dines free with every 3 paying guests  Christmas Prelude  @ Carlton Hotel Singapore - Valid till 30-Dec-2011.  christmad prelude price - $54++
79	Looks interesting, hmm~
14	sounds interesting...  depends on date
144	If you can't get 4 or more than 4, there is a 20% discount too.
7	Dennyz!  'U r de apple of my I' is out liao!  Gonna get a PK to munch on while watching the show this weekend.  Happiness!
9	check your phone~
14	Jade room on tue 20 Dec n kushiyaki on 24 dec (christmas theme!)
54	i emailed mosaic cafe for christmas prelude's menu, waiting for their reply.
30	ok ok, but still need location / time / meeting point. haha
11	You wan in for raffles bar n billard on 26 dec? Still left 1 slot.
3	may i know what's the schedule for blue garden?
8	thought at korean bbq i told u i am in?
1	Tat one must ask carey kor kor. Should be in jan.
86	K. My mind on the pork belly tat nite. Will add you in.
46	Anyone interested in this. Not buffet though.
11	Swiss cafe also got spanish nite on wed with roasted piggy. Tat one i keen
207	Going for my buffet at Elements tomorrow! Saw those pictures earlier, looks awesome XD  Happened to see some more food deals on deal.com.sg being posted... if anyone is interested in getting them, you can contact me
2094	Enjoy!  Do give us your comments on the food.
15	Mosaic Cafe @ Carlton Hotel - Christmas Prelude Menu  Page1  Page2  Page3
122	Looks not bad   But me got too many buffets liao
59	You all got the menu from Basilico? i asked they nv send n they take forever..
2	u use personal email or coy email?
229	any idea the diff between the taste of spanish sea bass n chillian sea bass?
3	Thanks for the menu.  Have buffets on alt nites til next yr, so i'll have to give it a pass too.  Enjoy!  Ah tan might be keen cos got sea cucumbers Hmmm, no idea wor.  Its only the chilean seabass at elements tat tasted like cod.  The other sea bass, whether at buffets or those chinese restaurants all tasted like normal fish.
2	carey, blue garden sch out liao buay?
96	Date : Tue 20 Dec 2011 Time : 6.30pm onwards Location : Jade Room, Hotel Royal (Newton) Price : $19.90 for coupon holders Participants 1. Toons (own voucher) 2. Destinyfate (Toon's voucher) 3. Dennyz (Toon's voucher) 4. Evil (Toon's voucher) 5. Bigmonkey (Toon's voucher) 6. Manyu (Toon's voucher) 7. Donkey (Toon's voucher) 8. Carey (Toon's voucher) 9. Carey's guest (Carey's voucher) 10. LegendZenify (own voucher) *Closed* Will be 2 tables of 5 each.
72	Personal.....
1	try using coy one.  i won't bk chiu.
22	almost forgot.
5	hi mind to ask if where is the location here... thank you!!!
725	Scholars Hotpot &amp; BBQ  (5-mins from Bugis Junction)  23 Middle Road #01-01  Tel: 6333 9608
64	Valid for Eat-all-you-can ala carte buffet  More than 130 ala carte varieties to choose from ala carte buffet Free flow of green tea Buy as many vouchers as you like Multiple vouchers can be used for 1 table Private room are available for functions,gathering or birthday celebration Reservation is required May buy multiple vouchers or as a gift Non-exchangable and non-refundable but transferrable Not valid with other promotions,vouchers or discounts 1 voucher for 1 pax Valid from 19.12.2011 to 31.03.2012 Valid for Mon to Thurs dinner from 18:00 to 22:00hr (Last order at 21:30) Not valid for eve, on public holiday and 22-24 Jan 2012 Prior reservation is required / no walk-ins Please call 6734 5565 for reservation,and quote "Madaboutdeal" Vouchers are not valid for alcoholic beverages and soft drinks Excluded GST and service charges Mad voucher printout must be presented upon order Refunds will not be given to expired vouchers Purchased vouchers are sent via email and can be conveniently downloaded as PDF after you logged into your account
9	We went to Senki not too long ago...  Not bad but also not fantastic...  However for that price, can't complain lor
4	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (last week of Dec - 28 or 29?)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (8 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6.  7.  8.  9.  10.
1	This one more ex right? Think you all paid $20 the other time round.
13	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (last week of Dec - 28 or 29?) 50 Tiong Bahru Road Link Hotel 01-07 Singapore 168733 S$18 each for dinner Interested 1. Carey (8 coupons) 2. Carey's guest 3. Carey's guest 4. Manyu (2 coupons) 5. Manyu's guest 6. Toons (29 Dec only) 7.  8. 9. 10.
0	My blue garden coupon is with who? 29 is good
1	But ours was lunch mah  This one is dinner
3	Then please add your name to the list   Vouchers are with me - 8 and Manyu - 2
3	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (8 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6. Toons   7. Evilduxy   8.  9.  10.
17	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec) 50 Tiong Bahru Road Link Hotel 01-07 Singapore 168733 S$18 each for dinner Interested 1. Carey (8 coupons) 2. Carey's guest 3. Carey's guest 4. Manyu (2 coupons) 5. Manyu's guest 6. Toons  7. Evilduxy  8. Donkey 9. 10. Last 2 vouchers if no one want, i wanna buy over
82	Destinyfate cannot make it tomorrow for Jade Room.  Anyone wanna take over his voucher?  Date : Tue 20 Dec 2011  Time : 6.30pm onwards  Location : Jade Room, Hotel Royal (Newton)  Price : $19.90 for coupon holders  Participants  1. Toons (own voucher)  2. Destinyfate (Toon's voucher)  3. Dennyz (Toon's voucher)  4. Evil (Toon's voucher)  5. Bigmonkey (Toon's voucher)  6. Manyu (Toon's voucher)  7. Donkey (Toon's voucher)  8. Carey (Toon's voucher)  9. Carey's guest (Carey's voucher)  10. LegendZenify (own voucher)  *Closed*  Will be 2 tables of 5 each.
26	my blue garden coupon with who , add me inside
2	Any idea for a simple yet nice Japanese buffet for 2 with each pax under S$25 ?  Scan thru groupon and atdeals, there's japanese buffet but the review seems not so good over at HGW.
21	Senki lor...hahah  It's not bad but not fantastic - the price does meet your budget
9	My Basilico brunch pushed to 8 January 2012.. too late man my friends confirm. No slots.  But good thing is i managed to book the private dining area.
7	Beta, you interested in steamboat at jade room tomorrow dinner or elements dinner on either 28 or 30 dec (depending on which day got baked sea bass?)
163	Bway sai. Tmr wa bway sai..  Tentatively i can on 28. Can i sms u on Friday to confirm? Coz my Mom Bday on the 27.. duno they going which day to eat.
68	Just called in to make a reservation, only sushi bar is available, no other table left.   Guess i look for other alternative, non-japanese will do too.
8	Hey, for the jade room buffet, the coupon has to be printed out right? Will it be accepted if the printed coupon's color is different? My printer likes to print stuff in pink lol.
900	doesn't matter what colour as long as the code can be clearly seen.
13	Had my buffet at Elements over the weekend... The grilled lobster was great and the mussels were nice, but other than that the rest of the food was just so-so... slightly disappointed... =/
12	Destinyfate cannot make it for Jade Room.  Anyone wanna take over his voucher? Meet at 630pm at the restaurant. Its actually between newton n novena mrt.  Walk from novena mrt, along the road towards goldhill plaza.  Can click on the location link below for directions. Date : Tue 20 Dec 2011 Time : 6.30pm onwards Location :  Price : $19.90 for coupon holders Participants 1. Toons (own voucher) 2.                  3. Dennyz (Toon's voucher) 4. Evil (Toon's voucher) 5. Bigmonkey (Toon's voucher) 6. Manyu (Toon's voucher) 7. Donkey (Toon's voucher) 8. Carey (Toon's voucher) 9. Carey's guest (Carey's voucher) 10. LegendZenify (own voucher) *Closed* Will be 2 tables of 5 each.
478	Meet at 1.50pm at the restaurant.  Date : Sat 24 Dec 2011 Time : 2pm to 5pm Location :  Price : $23.30 nett (please bring $0.30 change hor  ) 1. Toons 2. Donkey 3. Dennyz  4. Evilduxy  5. Twtan  6. Kahlan  7. Piggy 8. Piggy's better half *Closed*
126	Umm, how do we meet up for the jade room buffet? Already reached...
68	cya at the blue garden outing Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec) 50 Tiong Bahru Road Link Hotel 01-07 Singapore 168733 S$18 each for dinner Interested 1. Carey (8 coupons) 2. Carey's guest 3. Carey's guest 4. Manyu (2 coupons) 5. Manyu's guest 6. Toons 7. Evilduxy 8. raven1019 9.
6	Hi, wondering if newcomers can join? I don't have a voucher though.  Interested. Let me know if anyone going has a spare. Will transfer $18 to your bank a/c. Thanks.
1	blue garden de got slot for you to join we welcome new comer and it is fun making new friends
7	Sure you're welcome, we always welcome newcomers!  New meat to torture   Kidding.  But i think the last slot might already be taken up.  Hmmm, can't remember who though.   Carey, who did you ask earlier?  Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (8 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6. Toons   7. Evilduxy   8. Donkey  9. Raven1019  10.
3	If you have FAR card, its pretty worth it at abt $35 nett imo.  I remembered their turkey was pretty good when i tried it last yr.  Still got oysters, cheese raclette, movenpick ice cream n beef stew etc.
65	The entire piggy family will come with headgears, including the piglets.
31	Okay, just nice - all filled up My two guests are already on the list  Striker - please confirm if you are going else we will open up the slot again Payment - cash when we meet up No fuss, no hassle
19	Confirmed! Will be there. Thanks. Edit: Just read the ventilation quite jialat. Everyone smell like come out from smokehouse. Better don't dress too well.
5	Sure, see you on 29 Dec then You may want to PM one of us your mobile in case you can't find us... But the booking is under my name - you can just walk right in and look for the most bui bui unker there - that's me  Yup, that's a downside to eating at Korean BBQs...hahah Some of us actually like the smell
6	Blue garden quite okay.  Not so crowded, ventilation quite okay (can feel the aircon) plus got decent stove.  Will have some smell, but definitely not as bad as ssikkek.  Ssikkek, i feel like burning my clothes after i get home, but scared the clothes will burst into flames n burn down my house   Actually tats 2D1N ... ssikkek a lot better than 2D1N.  The one without much smell is shiu yakiniku.  Ps:  Wear something with high polyester component, dun bring camera, ipad, tablets etc.  Try not to bring exp bags, or shoes ...
102	Next thing you know, someone comes in their birthday suit...hahah  But some people are not meant to be seen in such a state
13	Hi guys, I have 2 extra vouchers for buffet dinner at Elements, Amara from deal.com.sg. Valid until 2 Jan 2012. My friend can't make it for the buffet and I've already gone once, so I'm letting go of both for $60. Please PM me if interested, thanks!
336	Can it be used on 1st Jan? If can, I will take it. Thanks.
35	It can be used on holidays, eg, christmas n new year, but you have to pay an extra $10 surcharge per pax.  Also, i would suggest calling to make sure that they still accept reservations for 1st jan as its a 'hot' day.
9	This few days a lot of festivals, won't be attending any outings cos need to accompany my true love. Dun miss me too much.
1	Errr, is it santa or 1 of the reindeers?   Enjoy your holidays!
18	May everyone find their true love!
10	Great. I also got ready my costume and headgear for the event liao.   Looking forward for the makan session, esp Toon's man-kini
1	Is that a hint?
7	Aiyoh, you never read Carey's hint ah?  Furthermore he is being kind ... should be most ppl rather than some, heehee, myself included.  Its really amazing the things clothes can hide
2	Hi.  If its still available, can I take it?  Thanks.Yups, just checked.  Made a reservations, awaiting confirmation from corevival to go ahead.
16	Hope piglets cooperate.  Otherwise won't get to enjoy the food.  Oh, to drive in the area, any way to siam erp?
6	If Toons comes as reindeer, ah tan as christmass tree and kahlan and ms Santa, i am sure piglets will be entertained   I dont think can siam erp. I may not be driving.
40	Just have to cover your face and the problem will be solved   Dont worry about us
15	so which day element got seabrass????
4	so it isnt everyday? i didnt see any seabass when i went leh...
24	not everyday
7	Thanks for sharing. For those interested, do note - Not cheap, plus weekday lunch only.
47	Not to mention is from 11.30am to 2.30pm only so need to take one day leave.
224	Sigh. corevival sold off his vouchers le. Anyone knows Element's festive charges for dinner buffet?
102	According to Element's supporter, it should be about $50
65	dreamer shu shu, no more the rm8 ktv cum buffet. now is rm43++ ktv cum buffet.
2	Hi Carey,   I have to give up my slot. My boss just tell me that he booked Dept Lunch that same day at Jang Shou Korean BBQ. I think I will explode if I eat so much of the same thing all in one day.   Anyway, appreciate if you open up the slot again. If by then no takers, I will transfer $18 to you.   Sorry again!
0	Don't worry about it - we can always find someone   I will just open the slot again
80	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (8 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6. Toons   7. Evilduxy   8. Donkey  9. Raven1019  10.  Last slot up for grabs
2	no need so troublesome. Just sell me the voucher bah
21	No wor. 49 is based on the voucher price of 39 plus 10 for holiday surcharge. No idea wats the price without voucher.
15	Can't split woah - each voucher is for 2 paxs
36	Too bad I can't go cos if I not accompanying my true love, I will be at the gym maintaining my muscular body.
73	Me plus the extra voucher = 2 lor
20	You got an extra voucher ah?   Ok then, we use your voucher and you can buy over my voucher for 2pax
29	Can i go? =x
319	Paiseh, last voucher i take liao ..... nah, kidding, let you have the voucher. Welcome
126	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (8 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6. Toons   7. Evilduxy   8. Donkey  9. Raven1019  10. Ahpan86  Closed
50	yay! 29th Dec dinner @ Tiong Bahru.   I PM Carey my contact?
79	Received your pm liao   See you on 29 Dec - meet at the restaurant itself  I have booked it from 6.30pm onwards I think - lao unker's memory not so good
12	I see the slots all nicely filled up liao.   Will join you guys next time.
50	Sure   It's not hard to find a replacement if the deal is decent enough...hahah  And there were times that there was overwhelming response to some of the more popular dining venues
41	did we went to this Eunos eat this very nice bak chor mee months back??  donkey,toons,me,tan,duxy etc? is it at Eunos ar? after that we go ah loon durian, Foie Gras and all?
42	Yes yes...y y y y u wanna stalk the boss daughter Si boh ? Lol
16	But she no come to the store that day.
151	i wanna go jiak with my SJY..  wat time close ar?
40	Monday close, Tuesday - sunday -&gt; 7am - 3pm (while stocks last)  so don't too late go
21	okays!!!!!!!!!!!!!! kam sias ~
307	You never give timing for the xmm? You know beta lar.  He go there cos 99% for XMM n 1% for food
895	Can anyone suggest those romantic buffet places for u and yr true love only?
130	Was there earlier, just in time to see them turning away a guy dressed in berms n slippers.  Seems like they're pretty serious abt the dress code, so do turn up in long pants/jeans and shoes/sneakers hor.  Saw ham n turkey, but lucky by mon, no more christmas theme, so no ham n turkey *phew*.  They have black cod wor!  Happiness   Seeya on mon!  Date: Mon 26 Dec (Public Holiday)  Time: Meet at 11.30am at the restaurant  Price: $58 ++ (with 50% discount, so $34.20/$37.50 nett)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. twtan  3. Ordway  4. meBaoBao  5. Samba Fan (TBC)  6. Dennyz  *closed*
9	Is there any dress code for Prego?
2	Last reminder - meet at 1.50pm at the restaurant.   Date : Sat 24 Dec 2011  Time : 2pm to 5pm  Location :   Price : $23.30 nett (please bring $0.30 change hor  )  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3. Dennyz   4. Evilduxy   5. Twtan   6. Kahlan   7. Piggy  8. Piggy's better half  *Closed*
5	Dennyz called me to tell me need smart casual.  He thinks i going there in running shorts, heehee.  Well, i was in track pants, tshirt n sneakers.  No prob.  Its breakfast lar.  If you go in pyjamas dun tink they will blink an eye too.  Afterall, its a hotel ... wake up from bed, jiak bf, go back to slp ...
4	Evilduxy, please bring additional $42 hor
3	Yeah, ytd he told me you going jogging wor.   Was the BF good?   Any homework done?   Next week you try to go in pyjamas, i shall see if they will blink an eye
20	Why I kept thinking BF = Boy Friend
53	It is becos ah tan watch too many bollywood show liao
14	End up never jog.  Dun wan go there sweaty n stinky.  I bui bui uncker, sweat a lot.  End up just walking around marina bay, fullerton, esplanade, 2x helix bridge nia.  Very relaxing   I like BF  *oops, this is NOT me coming out *  There's really something for everyone.  Different types of breads and spreads like pomegranate, blood orange or something, nutella ... toaster.  Lots of pastries, eg, pancakes, cinnamon french toast, apple cinnamon, croissants.  Fruit juice kiosk where we had fun pair the different types of fruits, honey apple, gran smith green apples, starfruit, carrot, celery etc, they have into juices, freshly squeezed.  You can also choose to eat the fruits.  Cold stuff section, with various hams, smoked salmon, salad.  Cereals section with organic cereals, 4-5 types of muselis with nuts, organic soy milk, fresh milk.  3 types of organic yogurts, eg, with strawberries.  Cheese platter with big strawberries n like 10 types of cheeses.  Egg stn, where you can get your eggs done the way you like it, with ingredients like smoked salmon, ham, capsicum, chillies, tomatoes etc.  Western hot dishes, like streaky bacon, asparagus, mixed vegs, egg benedict, hashbrown, mashed potato, grilled chicken.  Asian hot dishes, like porridge, nasi lemak, dim sum, ginger fried chix. 4 indian dishes like dhaal, cottage cheese paneers etc.  On top of the juices, still got latte or cappuccino.  Really eat from 7.30am til they close at 11am   Very relac, very slack, very shiok   Took lots of pics.  Post them later.  Exercising now.  Eat buffet liao, exercise also damn shiok.
123	black cod ish jin ho jiak ah?
103	Actually if you eating with your true love, normal food oso taste good.
8	Ah tan, got watch buffet x2?  Plaza basserie got nice sea cucumbers wor.  Onz?
29	No watch but I know cause I have been there before.  What is the price? They got durian pegat too.
3	durian pegat!!!!! droolll~~~~~
88	Wah, up to now I still haven't eaten any durians   Elements got durian penyat or not?
126	$38++ i think.  Dunno wat discount they have.Then you must try to join us for Straits Cafe.Bo.  Elements got cempedak cake though .. although now its known as cempedak log cake   I'm scheduling straits cafe in Jan.  After their current nonya or christmas theme   Miss their durian pengat.
2	Any New Year Day buffet?  Finally can relax. Was working for 50+ hours for the past 5 days. Looking forward to the 2 days break, then another 60 hours the following week.
506	Wah. Full liao.
2	You wanna go?  I check with samba as he is TBC.  But its only 1 slot wor.
6	Never try bar n billard b4, but i love cod fish!  However, the cod fish served at oscars n basilico all not fatty/fresh enough.  Only the chilean seabass (taste like cod fish) at 333 n Elements sedap!  If the black cod at bnb is good, i will go a few times more
3	What time is lunch till?  I am working on Monday so I need to leave at 2pm latest. So even if I were to go, I can't bring wife or piglets down as I need to rush to my workplace.
2	Starts at 12pm.
1	It's not Hotel California - you can leave anytime when you are done...hahah  Hopefully the standard improved since the last time I went...  But in general, Raffles food is quite good
8	1130am to 2pm.  Timing just nice for you
3	If buffet till 5pm and I had to leave at 2pm, I would feel abit unbalanced.
42	You all keen to check out the new plates of pleasure from 10@Claymore on New Year's Day? It's a Sunday, but not sure if there is a surcharge or if their promo applies.
94	We got lunchie on 2 Jan liao
10	It raining cats and dogs now. Look like have to take a bus to the MRT station cause surely get wet of I walk there.
4	The place is between bugis, dhoby ghaut and little india mrts.  Its also abt 3 bus stops away from those 3 mrts.  Troublesome to get to ...  I'll be taking bus there.  You going by MRT?  Wanna meet Dennyz n Evil at MRT first?  They asking.
39	I have not decide if I will be transferring to bus or not. Beside Dennyz always late one.
43	The rain is sibeh heavy at Bugis. I am here now waiting for missus to cut hair. Looks like the rain will be over soon.
5	Good luck - traffic jam around there is terrible when it pours  Was stuck in a jam for 1 hour along Rochor towards Bukit Timah last evening
199	Rain stopped. The sun is out.
13	The piglets and parents want to thank donkey for the eye-popping kurobuta toy, Evilduxy for the piglet clothings and Kahlan for the chocolates and all the shu shu and ah yi for the company. Merry Christmas to all.
5	Merry Christmas too
55	You made that? The base is potatoes or bee hoon? We had very nice grilled prawns just now. Including bacon wrapped ones.
2	Your 2 piglets are very cute.  Glad to have them ..... errr, of cos n the parent too   Thanks n Merry Christmas!
14	The carrot figurines are so cute.
0	Of course not haha  Think the base is minced pork or something haha  Glad you enjoyed yourselves   Tomorrow is my time to feast haha
1	Thanks Kahlan for the present. Their prawns are big sized ones and really yummy be it the plain grilled or wrapped in bacon or topped with fish roe paste.
13	Simi carrot - think they are sausages haha
45	Finally lugged back the 5kg ham from NTUC.
14	Wow looks good. How much did that cost Twtan? Wonder you go after Xmas got discount for it o not hahah
63	5kg can eat for many many days haha
53	1kg can eat almost a week. Think 5kg will last me a month. But of course if the weight includes the leg bone then maybe half a month.
17	Storing it would be a problem for me - don't say eating it haha  Confirm will be sick of it after 2 days lol
3	Cost $69.90I think the max one week can finish it liao. 3 persons feasting on it plus give my brother some.
37	Actually will not get tired of eating it, my family love it. Already bought many breads and lettuce to go along with it. My mum even asked me before if can buy for CNY but I no see bone-in ham for sale during CNY leh.  After eating, my mum use the bone to cook mei cai kou ruo. Very delicious.
7	I think your mum is a good cook.  The home made pie looks yummy!  Did she baked it too?  Kinda surprised cos i tot your mum gravitate towards chinese cuisine, n i know its definitely not you who baked it
39	The pie not made by my mum, it's from my brother friend's wife. Even if I wanted to make one, my toaster oven cannot make it.
572	Could I trouble the organizer to pm me their contact number? I've never met you guys before so wouldn't know how to recognize the group. Alternatively, just let me know whose name the reservation is under.  Cheers and see you on the 26th.
205	You are all welcome and Merry Xmas!! everyone.
0	Woke up to a bright sunny Christmas morning and made myself two sandwiches with the left over Gammon Ham, lightly toasted Focaccia bread with lettuce and cheese.
145	PM Toons with your contact number.
8	Wah looks very nice...  Sweet or not the Gammon Ham?
122	Nope not sweet nor salty. My mum like it a lot.
135	Ok thanks - will hoot one for next Christmas - provided the world doesn't end on 21/12/12
5	No $ buy elite ham, so i end up DIY sio bak   Yum yum, enjoyed.
3	you didn't use 5 spice powder? Anyway, how did you get the skin and edges to char like that?
14	Nope. I just sprinkled some salt over the meat.  I'm a lazy bum   Turbo broiler.  This is my tastiest attempt so far.  Tink i'm starting to get the hang of it
184	You can get HappyCall pan from G-Market. There are people who made sio bak with it but I haven't tried.   I get back to you by 9pm ok? I am keen but I need to make arrangements.
45	orhhh....so sad.
16	Where is your homework?
2	Anyone wanna go on another day instead?  Cos 2 pax per voucher, n i looking to reschedule as 29 dec not ideal for me.  So looking for another person who wants to go on another day also.
74	Hi Dreamer. Hope we did not scare off your partner.  We can be pretty noisy n crazy at times
2	Such Christmas stuff should be available by early December. You can still hoot before the world ends.
1	i am hungry for the lunch later already ...
954	True - I better celebrate Christmas 1 month earlier then I head for the hills   Anyone knows a good property agent in the Himalayas haha
26	Her loss is our gain. These were very nice, so soft and tender. Regretted not taking all the 3 pieces.
7	I also had a meat feast last night - Brazilian BBQ at 6th Avenue  The meat was oh so nice  The beef loin was melt in your mouth  The beef ribs was a bit over done though - my companion said it was a bit rubbery around the bone but the later batch was better  The lamb was damn good cos I asked for the fatty parts  But the ribeye was too bloody even for me   The only thing I don't like was the pork ribs - both of us found it very tough
0	Although the menu is quite extensive but we are limited to ordering from these two pages of the menu minus item K26.
1	Look who dropped by...  And the presents courtesy of Kahlan and Donkey.
1	- These are large sized ones and best of all they are fresh, firm and juicy. Kudos to the chef for the grilling. - This one they deshelled the prawns and wrapped in bacons. Another nice dish.
0	- A change from the usual bacon wrapped ones, these beef rolls are nonetheless flavourful and a low salt alternative to the bacon ones. - Not too sure if this is the Garlic Pork or not, can someone confirm it? - May be a bit tough but Toons like it.
0	- These are grilled so that they are still undercooked which make them all the more juicy and yummy. Toward the end of the buffet, they ran out of fish head and this one supposed to be served to 's table ended up on our side but alas, it still went to his table after all. - I do not like it as I find it too dry and worst of all it get served to us many times. I wondered who ordered that many.
1	- Looks can be deceiving, the skin are still crispy. - My favorite dish and it's not salty nor too sweet. - After eating the Salmon Fish Head, these just don't make the cut. Not as soft and fatty as head portion.
1	- These are perfectly grilled and they came still warm and tender. Coupled with the sweet sauce and it's so delicious. - These were plump, not the skinny ones you get at some other places. - Somehow I did not enjoyed this as much, think is the seasoning which doesn't suit me.
0	- Quite nice with the spicy seasoning. - Many of us like the fatty portion of this dish. - Would have preferred a a lightly charred skin compared to this.
36	- I actually liked this a lot but by the time we reordered it the second time, I was too full to eat it again. Throughout the time we were there, they only have a few tables occupied, don't know if it's Christmas Eve or due to the rain. We actually find the foods to be quite good but then they do not have buffet other than this voucher promotion. After that we went to have some beancurd at the  stall. I like the silky smooth texture of their beancurd.
17	wah went secret outin boh jio lol
23	Updated my foodblog   share share with the butties here
16	- recce mission haha Plus 3's a crowd  Actually, there were a lot more meat - several cuts of beeft, lamb, chicken, sausages, the usual pineapple and of course, chicken hearts - which my companion didn't dare to try...hahah But very nice and crunchy - yummy
200	Ah Tan, i like the prawns, squids and unagi as well.   Actually i din order the fish head   Dunno who ordered so many salmon too.  So many plates on my table too.
9	I try to get a refund.  Hopefully can ... else really another indian times in the making like bigmonkey say, but i tink it will be better than indian times, just tat it will also suck.  Indian times is quite unbeatable ... lousy wise
2	Anyone wanna go ssikkek for lunch tomorrow?  1130am to 2pm.  $12+ nia. PM me if keen.  Thanks.
19	Going JB tomorrow.
2	Enjoy your trip
7	Will do, hope it don't rain. Your breakfast got cancelled?
3	Think could be worse hahs  Rather go SSK for that price
33	Can't got a breakfast tomorrow   Too many makans - so many of my friends and buddies are back in town   So Blue Garden how? You can't make it?
33	Yea, prefer to go another time.  Blue garden i can go on any nite, but ssikkek lunch only when i'm on leave.  Will rather do lunches for this week as far as possible.  Ordway said asian market cafe's lunch at fairmont or swisstotel also decent for its price after FAR promo.  Gonna try squeeze tat one in.  Tat, plus ssikkek = reschedule blue garden
2	Hmmmm this looks soooooo goood  gonna pamper myself to a good lunchie tomorrow heheh
21	Today also did not rain.  So tomorrow got chance no rain   Besides you guys got transport mah.  Even if rain, at most skip pasar malam and start dinner earlier.  Yea, i cancelled it cos i still very full from lunch.  Bar n Billard's spread quite meaty wor.  In fact, i think the better items are all the meats.  The beef cheeks in red wine, veal, leg of lamb, lamb rack, turkey n even the cod all either nice or decent.  I ate all lot of meat today.  Tink earliest can only handle lunch tomorrow
416	It was a pleasure to meet you guys as well. Very easy going and friendly folk. Sorry for being a bit late as I woke up around 10 on Boxing day.  Yup, Bar and Billiard seem to be the same without much change for Christmas other than replacing most of their deserts with various forms of log cakes.   Still can't complain considering the amount I ate.
39	how was it?
23	anyone kind enough to tell me where i can view all of the credit card promotions for buffets? thanks!
102	You go to their respective websites to check?
65	it was great. got fatty char siew n some other food. i think the lamb steak we ordered quite a lot. can try. if chiu wan to eat , can call me.
47	Okay, I have just managed to get a refund on my vouchers...hahah  So anyone for SSK on 2 Jan lunch or dinner?
49	i wonder what is the business impact when refund is given. will they wake up their idea and make it better for those customer who didn't seek refund or just carry on with what they r serving now.  any inputs? thanks.
25	better to wake up their idea and make it better... else will end up like this =&gt;   ...   regards,  wacky
90	Good riddance to lousy restaurants haha  If the food and ambience is good, we don't mind paying  Bad food, terrible service = recipe for failure and no amount of promotion can save them
7	They agreed to give you a refund? Wat did you tell them?
3	Just told them that the reviews after the coupon deal were very bad...haha  So I suggested a refund of credits instead - easier for them to agree
33	helo everyone.. any idea which buffet or restaurant is nice and the ambience is good too.. going there to celebrate my birthday. budget 150 and below for 2pax..  thanks.
30	The refund of credits is a gd idea.  Did they agree outright or say they will review?
76	eh toons.. ytd forgot ask you this.. how you make one? looks freaking sedap leh.. the skin like so crispy siol~
183	Immediately and they sent me email to confirm
13	tried calling them today but line always busy.  will call again tml.
1	Yup took me damn long but persistence paid off haha
11	Turbo broiler haha
14	roger!!  55rm+??
12	"Hang Over" Brunch Buffet at Magma German Bistro
62	rm55nett, not sure if they got increase price anot.
9	Hmmm, over the phone they say can, but the email reply that they sent me said tat my cancellation request will be reviewed by their support staff.  Hope it means okay.  So, the clarity outing on mon 2 Jan canceled.  Will keep you guys updated on the result of the cancellation.  The ssikkek lunch is really great value wor!  Although the selection of meats not as much as dinner, but its still enough for me since even if they have 10 types, you still normally only focus on the 2-3 nicer cuts.  No bacon or prawns, which is fine to me since i am not a fan of either.  The tang hoon also really nice.  End up eating 1/2 plate   Now ask me to pay $10 more for dinner, like not worth it liao   Must squeeze in another lunch there this week Yea, using turbo broiler.  Thanks for the tips carey.  Cooking the meat at low heat, then full blast for 5-10 mins at the end really produced nicer result.  This sio bak is my tastiest product so far
439	Guess I must sound sweeter than you over the phone  Mine was an instant approval...lolGlad that Dreamer brought it up else we would be cursing and swearing on that day - not a good start to the year...hahahThe deal breaker for me was bacon  They also don't have the thinly sliced beef but got sotong right? Overall very good value for money but unless you work around that area and don't mind going back to the office smelling like a BBQ, lunch is usually out...hahahNo wonder they call you the buffet prince...hahah I need to work off my Christmas feasts - oh, my Elements trip was quite disappointing leh - no chempadak cake and no seabass Trial and error...hahah Cooking is all about controlling the heat (or the wok hei in Chinese cooking)...hahah Next time I will charge for advice
2	Yup kam sia - don't want to start the year on such a bad note
173	Blue Garden Korean BBQ (29 Dec)  50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (6 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Manyu (2 coupons)  5. Manyu's guest  6. Evillduxy   7. Raven1019  8. Ahpan86  Closed
3	I still got 1 day leave to clear. Thinking lunch buffet if can squeeze in.   You roast the pork belly we bought from QB? Photo looks jin delicious, esp the cracking on the skin. Must teach leh. I have yet to progress from roast chicken to roast pork.
68	how about this...? got this from a flyer today...  regards,  wacky
11	50 Tiong Bahru Road Link Hotel 01-07 Singapore 168733 S$18 each for dinner Interested 1. Carey (6 coupons) 2. Carey's guest 3. Carey's guest 4. Evillduxy  5. Raven1019 6. Ahpan86 CLOSED
4	Tot you taking 0.5 on thu n fri?  Hmmm, will be tight for 0.5 leave.  Cos if you leave by 1230, you will reach ssk abt 110pm?  They stop at 2pm.  50 mins should be enough though, cos i took abt tat time too for lunch too.  Then again, i usually focus more on food than toking   Yea, its the pork belly from QB.  I did 150 temp for 20 mins.  Then 250 temp for last 5-10 mins.  Was there at the last stage to monitor the cooking.  I also did the soft bones.  Somehow i dun find them juicy enough.
4	Who says about leaving at 12:30?   SSK go another day bah else you will have over doze of BBQ meat.   I tentatively apply first before it gets forfeited in the system.   Still have not decided which day to take.   So tonight confirm? Where ah, i lost track liao?
4	Tonite elements.  I will call abt 3pm to confirm the seabass.  If they dun have, then elements switch to Fri (die die must go liao).  Then tonite will be Xian Pin Guo.  You wanna prepare the $10 ribs vouchers (the one with dennyz included), just in case we need a round 2?  Thu i think i will go back to raffles bar n billard lunch again.  I really like their lamb racks n dark choc log cake n to take adv of the promo b4 it ends.   Actually thu can also do peony jade lunch at clark quay or even shin yuu if we can get 4 paxes.  Hmmmm, so much food, so little time.
8	I want go B&amp;B cos never been there. I join u on thur if you no got dining companion yet, it's lunch tio bo? Then i will skip xian pin guo tonight if no elements   xian pin guo is not expiring anywhere soon right?
0	Wah the crystal jade tml what time??Feel like going...
9	Yea, XPG expiry 19 jan, so still got time.  Sigh, just remembered the BnB promo only applicable for mon to wed, so today is last day.  Hmmm, maybe i switch to Asian Market Cafe for lunch on thu then.  Only 20+ nett plus got durian pengat
45	I cant confirm Prego for this weekend cos i might have plans.   You let me know about elelments then cos its approaching lunch time ... to eat or not to eat is the big question   But B&amp;B, i am on. Ideal will be B&amp;B tmr (or whatever buffet) and Elements on friday night.
0	50 Tiong Bahru Road  Link Hotel 01-07  Singapore 168733  S$18 each for dinner  Interested  1. Carey (6 coupons)  2. Carey's guest  3. Carey's guest  4. Evillduxy   5. Raven1019  6. Ahpan86  CLOSED
1	so 10 pax reduce to 6???
21	Ya lor - everyone makes their own special arrangement
54	got sausage,  me interested.
49	Peony jade ala carte buffet lunch on thu 29 dec, 11am to 2pm. Will be abt $29 nett after 1 for 1 promo.  Participants  1. donkey  2. donkey guest  3. toons  4. Evil (tbc)  5.  6.
4	I hope Evil knows that he has already put his name down for the Blue Garden buffet at night hor...
9	Okay, will boot him out then  anyways he can only make it 12+. By tat time we might be 0.5 full liao
9	ya I knw...can eat twice I'm ok de haha but my medical ends at 12 lol
49	Wah you more solid than me. Let me know. If you not then i will make alt arrangements
31	Peony jade ala carte buffet lunch on thu 29 dec, 11am to 2pm. Will be abt $29 nett after 1 for 1 promo.  Participants  1. donkey  2. donkey guest  3. toons  4. Evil (tbc)  5. dennyz  6.
34	toons, any date for melting pot? thank you.
4	tml night i would be late will reach around 7pm
20	Not yet. 9 10 16 or 17 jan all okay with me. I suggest we decide on 2 days. Then on the day itself we can call to confirm the carving. Sometimes they dun have carving one. If tat day dun have then we go on the 2nd day itstead.
2	all dates i ok also.
2	Ok. I had lunch at Clarity Cafe. On the positive, they had oxtail stew, triple choc cake and lobster bisque. For lunch, only about 3 or 4 tables were filled, so it was quite quiet and leisurely. That's where it ends.  Some protein like the lamb slices and fried beef w/ onions, salmon sticks, saba were actually quite Ok. The bisque was oversalted, as was the wagyu meatballs, maybe their way of telling you not to order so much. Oxtail was burnt and the entire stew flavor off.   The foie gras empanadas had a hard and thick crust and tasted more like overcooked chicken liver. Wagyu ones not available. Oysters, scallops, mussels all very small.   Seems like they really push the useless carbs. Order potato croquette and they served us wedges instead and in portions meant for 4-6 persons. Brownie also 4 portions when we indicated one. It was dry and hard. Avoid mini pizza at all cost.   Triple Choc cake was ok, especially with vanilla ice cream. Unlike some reviews on HGW, only about 10% of the items were not available to us such as wagyu empanadas, beef stew and ice jelly etc. The service was polite enough and they checked with the kitchen on orders they didn't know. I think a lot of the really bad reviews was written in the heat of the moment, maybe because something or someone angered them, I recall someone having a meal there without groupon coupons and was unhappy having to pay the price, I would too.  However, the food overall was not enticing enough for us to eat more. My friend who is usually a David Wang, also could not eat alot. Too many misses. The wait was long, especially considering the very few tables served.  The kicker is that they expect you to pay another $2.50 as service charge after your meal on top of your coupon. If you can get the coupon refunded, I would say do so, you won't miss much. If you cannot, just go and whack the grilled meats and pan fried dishes.
9	Wah, you guys all damn steady. Eat this on the same day, still can go Blue Garden eat Korean BBQ.
15	wats this like thingy.. i anyhow like will get infraction bo?
8	this one for one only valid for weekdays?
241	Yes, and required NTUC Link card.
2	Ellenborough is not that bad IMHO haha  Ordinary lor - run of the mill hotel buffet - for that price, I much prefer Melting Pot haha  Haven't tried Asian Market Cafe so no comments
23	I am not celebrating my birthday ah - are you? Haha  PK and bacon - enough said haha
2	Date : Thu 29 Dec 2011  Time : 11am to 2pm  Venue : Peony Jade @ Clarke Quay  Price : Abt $29 nett after 1 for 1 promo.  Participants  1. donkey  2. toons  3. dennyz  4. donkey gas  *Closed*  If you wanna join, as long as you can get 2 (even nos) then welcome
75	Twice i went to ellenborough is for their durian buffet.  Loved it!!!  The spread at ellenborough is a lot bigger than melting pot wor, but also a lot more X
11	I saw the spread at Asia today.   I would prefer ellenborough.
3	Yup, someone commented that he rather eat his money
0	Think I am an lao unker that's why - I prefer consistent quality...not play Russian Roulette with the durians...hahah  I was there to jiak durians at Sentosa only mah - the crabs were secondary
1	The sio bak is very nice too. Last month, I went on a weekday, got sio bak but not oxtail.  If they have the best of both on a sat then hoosay liao
13	Good suggestion - adds to the experience   But wait they need IC how?
1	That was an outing to remember   The amount of durian we had on the table was stomp worthy.  And the amazing part is, we finish them all.
19	We had PPP on our side - there's no way we can lose
12	Its decent but a little more watered down than the one at Ellenborough.
77	Tell them you all hide the birthday guy wallet somewhere in the car because you don't want him to end up paying for this meal.   Or just hope someone's birthday is in January.
4	erm my birthday on jan
3	Indeed.  It was a memorable outing.  Open air.  Beside the sea.  Lots of kakis.  All KS, rush to grab the durians.  So many different types of crabs to try n complain abt   then there is PPP ... Pawn all Prawns n Pork?
1	Hmmm, i never tried the ellenborough one b4, even though i went there twice, but i heard its good?  So if this one is decent, then worth a try.  Besides, the place looks quite nice, esp the window tables.Wah, then join us lar.  We can poke poke her.  She really sounds like a interesting piece of work.  Its 1 thing to be rude but to be so rude ... its art wor.
1	ya loh. bring an external cake. test the fire...
3	donkey using his charm on the durian uncle...
4	Hmmmm, talking abt yusheng in buffets, it really brings back memories.  I really had fun at oscars during last yr's cny.  They had a yusheng section in their buffet.  So we were taking their sashimi, fruits, all the chapalak things we can tink of to make our yusheng   So fast 1 yr liao ... really bitter sweet
1019	She bought him a glass of water n first aid band wor.  Better than someone, so goondu, go n take a whole durian, dunno for wat.  If know how to open, then at least something ... but end up also have to return to the uncker Poke the 'nazi' lady boss at magma.  .  Huh?  But bigmonkey said he keen on magma wor?  So he going jb with you or magma with us?  Anyways, you sure you wanna go jb on new yrs day?  I scared you jam until next yr
5	How is the food? any pic/review?
7	all in stomach, plz wait for us to digest. thanks !
40	sian make me gain only   how much is it for 1 person? i don't have uob card so cant enjoy their promotion...
123	Ok i need to go and check it out... I will ask my colleagues for preference first ba. Since both of them about the same... I dun eat Durian, maybe nothing interest me in the dinner buffet haiz
16	I.was spotted  ....  Hehe
48	New dining club for Amex card released... you basically get a free membership at palate: (see link)   There goes the Feed-at-Raffles which was a great plan especially with the discounted hotel vouchers for when you have guests visiting Singapore...   Highlights I guess are 1 for 1 at places like Tung Lok (never frequent them before)... The other restaurants aren't really popular or well-known from what I see other than the ones in Rochester and Garuda Padang. My Humble House sux big time when I went there two years ago...   Overall a downgrade unless anyone can share good experiences from any of the places on the list?
64	They hv a standalone card too.
40	Boh jio
20	long time friend mahs. hehe.. come out jiak then she go date her bf niaos.. catch up catch up. hehe
49	Sigh, thanks for sharing.  Personally, i find the new dining membership scheme way inferior to FAR.  Oh well, really can terminate the card liao.
407	maybe i play photohunt too much or my sensory very sensitive
70	credits.  and very fast.  think many complaints abt miss clarity lol
2	The Miss Clarity Cafe refund settled?
1	Yes, just checked.  Should be okay.  Cos i bought via cc n paypal.  Paypal one refunded.  CC one i lazy to call to ask, but should be okay.  So mon is off.  You confirmed on for sun magma?
1	For those who went to Blue Garden last nite, how was it?
2	how was your lunch at Peony Jade?
4	Yes, confirm on for Sun Magma.
2	Quite nice.  Do you believe that the 4 of us ate almost as much or more compared to the previous time when i went with my colleagues in a grp of 10???  There were hits n misses, but on the whole std is there.  I liked the fried soon hock, pork belly in garlic, and smoked duck.  Dennyz n donkey preferred SCDH though, but for $28 nett, really cannot complain.
48	Nothing to add from my side.  Thanks for the work!
7	Smoked Duck, one serving only but quite ok cos very generous portion. This dish score as well as it juicy despite part of it was duck breast. Plus, it's served hot.    Fish Maw and Mushroom - Fish maw is thick and the texture very nice. Though sauce is rather blend and gluey. Mushroom quite tasteless probably due to the sauce.   Crab, one serving only. I find the crab meat a little to mushy after deep frying. Toons commented that the crab taste better than his previous trip. One of our dining companion finds it good for certain pieces but not so for some.     Pork in sweet and sour sauce - i dont like this dish cos i find the flour too thick and taste too sweet.   Four seaon beans - my tortoise favourite food but it's a miss for this dish cos they didn't "de-vein" the beans.
3	1. the cheng tng uncle, sometimes open, most of the time not open. zzzz. 2. beta gf pretty? hahaha
3	Ostrich - nice dish, better than the beef. Plus fried with the big chilli, can taste the wok siang.     Double boiled soup - taste is gao gao cos they added red bean to the soup base.    The frightened dish (translated from chinese) - surprising good cos the egg still runny, simple dish but nicely executed. Ho Jiak.   Overall, worth the visit with the PLUS card 1 for 1 offer.  Plus eat with , priceless
1	The 1 for 1 promo ends this year.  Dun tink i will pay full price to eat.  If choose i will prefer cathay n scdh over peony, but too be fair, they are more exp too.
2	Cheng tng unker is open only on even days - Tue, Thu and Sat...hahah  I asked him before mah   Erm, I'll take the 5th amendment on the second question
6	1. not true. loh, he likes he can also close on even days.   2.i m not going to amend.
1	duno y spotted u so easily  should have disturb u through SMS first then walk to you after that
0	Of course but 2, 4, 6 are his usual opening days...hahah  Timing is very uncertain though - he can decide to close whenever he likes   Like yesterday, we reach there at 9pm, he already closing up...jin   Then you got to ask the rest lor   Raven probably got the best look at her...hahah
1	Ya lor, somemore we all took pictures liao
2	beta like can liao :X
6	someone still even went back to stalk beta
19	We are here to talk about foods not Beta or his GF.
4	Orh...  But that is food for our eyes also ah
5	ah tan ah, seems like a hav a grea christmas, wishing u a great new year ahead !!
12	Had some nice home made BKT during yesterday night gathering and of course the ham is yummy too.  My mum (not short for chrysanthemum or any similar dead or alive person) only have good thing to say about the ham.  And Happy New Year to all.
5	missyoumuch lol ????
400	(not short for chrysanthemum or )
16	I actually find their smoked duck very nice. Then i tried the one at chui xiang. Although both tasted good, the one at chui xiang is fattier n came out slightly ahead because of it. Really surprised tat the smoked duck at chui xiang tasted so good. Wonder if they smoked their own or if bought it from somewhere. Must remember to ask them the next time.
92	oh man.... just saw that i have one miss clarity voucher. original price was $45, fwah~ $45 for cheese fries.
1	Chui Xiang is the one at Changi Village?  That one also very nice ah haha
25	Con job haha  Almost like Indian Times
6	Be careful there is another Indian Restaurant deal going around again. Different restaurant name but same management as Indian Times.
6	Ask for refund bah. Striker went n it seems not as bad as wat the reviews said. At least the items are available. But you 1 person a bit hard to eat ala carte buffet? Paiseh we like abaandon you.
12	Sometimes I wonder why they even bother?  Can't they like freaking do it properly instead of relying on such shams - open and shut Jin fun meh?
25	For Ellenborough, raffles-feeds voucher cannot be used for dinner buffet haiz. Think can only go and try Asian market cafe.
19	I dun think they close n reopen under a different name. Its another indian restaurant but under the same management. Tink i saw the deal. Its ala carte buffet but the spread is very small. Indian food not suitable for buffet imo.
57	Now i know LJ dun watch US court room drama one ... carey also very notti ... answer in a roundabout way   ''
41	Ya lor - forgot we are not Americans haha  I don't want to incriminate myself mah - less said is more
22	Yes.Agree that chui xiang smoked duck is better than peony. We ordered so many serving previously.   Am looking forward to my reunion dinner there. Hopefully standard don't drop.  That's why I am going 1 day earlier than you
3	Thanks for sharing.  Any nice dim sum buffet to recommend?
115	Check the above sticky thread or click on my signature.
2158	Oei! Leave some duck for me!!! Jade at Fullerton.  Jing which is nearby at 1 fullerton has a wider spread (like crabs n fish) but their dim sum not as nice.  Cherry Garden at Mandarin Oriental if you feel like splurging (not have tried b4 though).  I heard Peach Garden dim sum buffet quite decent too.  Wan Hao at Marriott is so so nia imo, and i will not recommend going to Swatow at Toa Payoh.  K, back to watching my 'Scent of a Woman' ...
43	Not nice. The pk skin not crispy enough. Meat can be a bit dry. Spread not big. Desserts so so. But this price on new year cannot complain.
1	wah can eat until 5pm but u all left alr, food muz be tat bad huh...go other places eat lo, chinatown market near there and got good food oso...
1	Yea we are at wei xiang yuen eating desserts now.
2	You are so smart haha  We are at the dessert stall at Chinatown haha
38	heng i nv go
3	Dennyz mia, never return our sms at all.
2	Hung over haha
72	means got good news  9 month later mini dennyz will be born :X
75	Bigmonkey, donkey n dennyz.  I made reservations for melting pot on Mon 9 n Tue 10 Jan. I intend to call on the day itself to confirm tat they have carvings (i'm okay with anything except chicken).  If mon nothing, then i will go on tue.  Now for the bad news ... they no longer have 1 for 1 promo.  Its now 3 pay 2, so will be $29.80 nett instead of $22.40 nett.  Personally, for this price, unless they increase the spread, else i feel tat you'll be better off going to either the square or tiffany @ furama (assuming they still have 1 for 1 promo).  I will be using voucher.  So only if ALL 3 of you going, then you will qualify for the 3 for 2 promo.  Else full price.  But like i said earlier, whether its 3 pay 2 or full price, i feel tat there are other better options for the price.  Let me know.
263	i hab voucher.
35	Call me cheap skate but without the 1 for 1 really not worth. Salmon so-so and the only attraction there for me is the sio bak and pork satay.
665	I agree.  Quite depressing, have to cross out both elements n melting pot from my list of buffets worth revisiting   On the other hand, i have not tried tiffany or asian market cafe, so can take the chance to try them.
390	Dinner buffet at Suanthai, though it can't be used on Fri, Sat and eve of PH, and still have to top up $2 for Sun or PH. Plus blackout dates 20-29 Jan and 14 Feb. The food was not too bad though, ate there once before . About 5-10 mins walk from Somerset MRT. When I went the place was full house even though it was a weekday. Then again, I estimated that their seating capacity is only around 50 at most.
252	any chinese restaurant recommendations for CNY reunion dinner?
0	The restaurant has a rather rustic feel to it with tables, chairs and bar counter done is wood and Christmas season is very much still in the air as seen from the Christmas tree, decorations and the fairy lights.
0	A whole row of .
0	is quite nicely done but I preferred the type that is pan fried. - Big deshelled tiger prawns that were crunchy, whats more could you want? - This oily fish is always a nice dish to have on the table. The creamy sauce helps toned down the oily aftertaste.
2	is quite nicely done but I preferred the type that is pan fried. - Big deshelled tiger prawns that were crunchy, whats more could you want? - This oily fish is always a nice dish to have on the table. The creamy sauce helps toned down the oily aftertaste.
1	- Surprisingly this juicy tomato coupled with the bread crumbs like herbs topping is very pleasing to the taste buds. - The meat of this young cattle is rather tender though not fatty.
1	- The big bird was still juicy provided you do not ask for the breast meat. - The meat are tender but not fatty enough, they rotate this lamb roast with that of the Rack of Lamb.
1	- This one came out once and after that it's back to the Roast Leg of Lamb but it can't be compared to this oh so tender almost melt in your mouth meat. - Back to this again.  _ Three kinds of pastas and sauces (Tomato, Bolognese and Mushroom Cream) and for you to pick and match.
0	Now to see what each of us had chose to eat.
1	More from our plates.
1	- This is a meat-based sauce for pasta originating in Bologna, Italy which I enjoyed. This  is done just perfect, even;y pink on the inside and so tender and juicy. Too bad, they rotated it with Roast Leg of Lamb.
1	You can't celebrate Christmas without log cakes so I presented you with these yummy desserts. - Nice rich bitter dark chocolate and soft creamy center. - I don't like ginger in my dessert so I gave it a miss.
2	or Strawberry &amp; Christmas Spices Log Cake - I quite liked this though the others found it too sweet.
4	- Someone stole my whole bowl and left one miserable nut for me. Look like got one big squirrel among us.  The spread of hot foods were not much though they do have many cold dishes. The Black Cod, Rack of Lamb, Provencal Tomato, veal and Tiger prawns were some of the dishes I enjoyed. Without the 50% discount, I doubt I will be coming again.
1	Ssikkek @ New Bridge Road operational already.  Anyone keen to join me for dinner?  Its $26 nett.  About $2 more than the novena branch, but the new bridge outlet has proper stoves
2	You went recce already? When going?
62	u so fast go liao?
48	tried the Afternoon Tea set at Boulangerie () not worth going back again as its not worth the $25++ I paid for
5	Tiffany is pretty decent for lunch at about $24 after 1 for 1.  They have satay too but no pork cos it's halal.   I was there about 3 months ago, they had sambal bamboo clam, that was good.  Plus they got your favorite durian dessert   But I have never try their dinner though.
18	Ah tan, it looks like hazel nut to me.
12	I ate there when it first opened. Desserts were horrid and expensive.
5	Still got one for one?
4	I tried the buffet dinner at festive hotel and I had the same feeling.  It was about $80 and not worth it at all.  No lobster, no oyster and not even salmon sashimi.  Guess I was paying for the live band
2	i went liao.  better ventilation, cooler aircon, food i feel got more variety, free flow drinks (soft drinks, water, sweet rice drink)  the stove is better, non-stick one, no need to use foil also  and.. dont need queue
2	bo jio bo jio
2	Not sure. You can call and ask tmr
4	Wah, thanks for the review.  I want go
5	this sat or sunday ?
25	Err . . Raven di di asking me ah?
9	wah seems like better then novena de....like tt i also keen to go there ssrr oo
31	but... got more AT...
1	Jenets goes with chew toy korkor??  Btw guys how much we paid for the Basilico brunch that time? Hehe  going this Sunday with crass mate.
17	No more chew toy riaos.   Is went with friends.. Happen to walk pass see no queue then go jiak.
14	U bo jio me go jiak anymore..
22	i want go go too, i miss ssk tanghoon
329	asked u and the rest of the gang
121	OK, later I go change the details.
7	I prefer weekday over weekend cos weekend tend to be very crowded.
9	You bluff my feelings   Becos you say got Mac nuts, I went B&amp;B look high and low also cant find the Mac nuts.   No lamb rack when i was there, only turkey and ham. No tiger prawn also.    But i like the oyster and black cod. The tomato is nice too until i realised it is made of bread crumbs after asking the chef. By then too late, i already down many.
9	But both are still nuts right?  I got post that it's bread crumbs like thing leh but then you have already eaten. Just treat it as your cabo cheat lor.
9	Very different nuts lor.   I went B&amp;B last Wed, before your post.  But you did tell me its Mac Nuts when we went JB.   This weekend i am going to buy the nuts from four horse road, since you say both nuts the same, i know what to buy for you liao
49	I got sore throat now, no heaty foods for the moment.
34	i can vouch for u he say mac nuts
7	Buy normal peanut for him can liao, since he cheat your fweelings.
90	No harm done.   We are forever kidding around only   Plus i must always respect lao ren jia
22	Wah, Donkey's feelings kena cheated ah?  New saga in the making?
119	Oo lol something new to stir
35	Can you help me check out what is the price for Shandong groundnuts there?
18	oh... my............ heng not so suay last time...   anyway help u quote article:  regards,  wacky
320	14 diners had food poisoning at Todai SoShiok.com | Tue Jan 3 2012 14 diners had food poisoning at Todai The two different groups had consumed raw oysters and sashimi in the seafood buffet on December 9. Singapore, January 3, 2012 Fourteen people from two groups suffered food poisoning after eating the seafood buffet at Todai restaurant in Marina Bay Sands on December 9. Two of them had to be hospitalised, reported The New Paper today. The Ministry of Health and the National Environment Agency (NEA) said they were informed about the two suspected food poisoning incidents happening on the same day in December. A health ministry spokesman said the 14 had consumed raw oysters, salmon and tuna sashimi at the buffet. Six other guests in the two incidents who didn't consume the raw seafood were well. The oyster supplier had since stopped selling oysters from the same batch even though there was no official confirmation that they caused the food poisoning. Todai restaurant had reimbursed all the diners, compensated those who fell ill, and also apologised to them. The first case saw 11 people falling ill over the next two days of their dinner on December 9. They were part of a group of 16 diners, all colleagues working in an investment management firm. The New Paper reported that Mr Shawn Teo, 29, who organised the dinner, also came down with food poisoning. He said his doctor confirmed it was food poisoning. Mr Teo suspected that the raw oysters he and his colleagues had could be the cause of the problem. Although the health ministry and NEA said they didn't receive any other feedback on food poisoning from the same restaurant, SoShiok.com was told by a reader that he had food poisoning there last year. He received $100 compensation from the restaurant, like the affected diners in the two incidents. But he didn't complain to the authorities.
195	My sis just shown me that she bought these for CNY.
52	this is related to buffet..??   regards,  wacky
1	Yes. Toons ate macadamia nuts for buffet. Don't play play.
321	I quite keen for lunch. Also $12?
128	Piggy is so smart.  Donkey, my sis bought the macadamia nuts at $3 per 100g. How much you bought previously?
10	Lunch there is S$16 nett if I didn't remember wrongly...hahah
2	Yea, lunch at the new bridge outlet is $16 nett instead of $13.20 nett at the novena branch.  Still more worthwhile for me as it nearer coming from west end of mrt line.
3	$81.20 nett.  Enjoy!  I missed their beef roast
5	I am keen to try the SSK for lunch or dinner.   With the new stove, should be less the splatter but hope the meat will not be too dry as cant soak in the oil anymore.
36	I bought from China so can't compare.   This sun i go four horse road then sms you the price.   Last night at JB pasar malam, they were selling the chio nut at RM44 per kg.   Slightly cheaper than SG, which is about $20.   Think they should be selling more goodies nearer to CNY.
193	Hi, can I ask what is the address for Ssikkek's branch at New Bridge Road? Thank you in advance.
5	If they never remove any items, then it's okay  Otherwise  hahah
98	Great recommendation!
0	None of the SSK has steamboat option and no fish for BBQ.   They may serve fish under the cooked food section ... like today
3	Nope, purely bbq.  The only seafood for lunch is squid rings.  BBQed quite chewy n nice.  As mentioned by Donkey, today got fried fish. For dinner (novena branch), they have prawns.
0	My ang mo no good, what does this mean   " One order limit per dish per voucher. No limit on number of orders. Order up to 80 dishes"   One order limit per dish per voucher?
3	Thanks for sharing.  For those interested, do note :-  'One order limit per dish per voucher. No limit on number of orders. Order up to 80 dishes.'
5	Yes.  If two person go, can only order each dish twice, eg, 2x salmon sashimi.
5	Chey, bluff young chewren again   Like that not call buffet liao.
22	You might be pleased to know that the lunch at new bridge outlet has bacon. Their lunch spread is similar to tat of novena outlet. marinated chicken bacon pork belly thin sliced pork, shabu shabu style (like bacon but not salted) pork collar marinated pork marinated beef squid rings kimchi stew seaweed soup rice fried fish fried chicken with sauce fried mee rice sweet rice drink plain water + softdrinks kimchi, corn salad, lettuce, pickled radish etc Quality of meat is as good as novena.  The beef was better.  More tender.  The marinated pork collar also juicer then novena.  But the difference is slight to be fair. I also find their marinate better than novena as it is very light. The stove is indeed nice.  No splattering of oil, minimum smoke (can actually go back to work after eating  ).  Cons: is its not as hot and the oil sorta drains off, so it takes a bit longer to cook n its hard to get that crispy or 'char ness'. The place is cool (can feel aircon), got nice korean MV to watch, got pretty lady boss to oogle, not crowded (in fact there is only like 3-4 tables occupied). All in all, i like it a lot more than the novena branch, esp since it more convenient transport wise too.
5	korean ?? got SNDS de standard bo ?
4	Yea, korean.  Kaoz, if got SNDS standard, then you will be paying for concert n not for bbq buffet liao.  Anyways, she is showing just slightly less meat then the ones on display
0	muz be the lady boss from 2d1n move to new bridge road outlet.
1	Got beef short ribs? That's also one of my favourites...hahah  Extra S$2 for bacon is definitely worth it to me   And it's closer to my work place - can even walk there
3	Unless you like older women lor...hahah  Otherwise, no further comments
1	Maybe her daughter bah ... but with koreans, its hard to tell.  Their plastic surgeons can do wonders Bo short ribs.  Its those thin sliced beef, but its fresh, tender n juicy if you dun overcook it.  The ones at novena i eat already no feeling, but the ones here i quite like.  I know my lunch mate like too.
3	or maybe im wrong?
26	so when want to go jiak , heard SSK my blood flowing very fast
12	The lao ban niang jin pretty   Keep covering her blouse cos she wear on top low, below short   I am sure after my post, tonight will have long Q there liao.
2	She so sweet, got extra beef come over to tell us.  When we leaving, she so happily wish us goodbye with a nice smile .... hmmm, come to tink of it, maybe she is happy cos we're finally leaving ... but then we did not eat tat much too hor
4	thanx for the review..wat sauce do they use to marinate their meats wif? isit those thick n starchy kind? oso wats their lunch hrs like arh..
6	Reminds me of our first trip to the Tanjong Pagar branch, the lady boss also came out to sent us off. Still remember she smile wide wide to Carey. But that one is obasan, this is SNSD standard.
4	The marinate for the beef is very light.  In fact can hardly taste it.  Can't see if not for the presence of sesame seeds.  For the chix n porky, the marinate is stronger, but still okay as in not overly sweet or strong to overpower the meat. Its like those dark soy sauce liquid. Not starchy.  1130am to 230pm for weekdays.  For weekends, should be a full day orgy ... might differ from outlet to outlet though.
50	weekdae oso can achieve tis de mah
6	@@ SNSD standard drooling  bo jio
8	Weekday you can?   Thot you want go weekend mah.
15	weekday at night can
1	walking towards miss clarity cafe now.  someone on hungrygowhere wrote that he/she went yesterday and it was closed. wish me luck.
1	tried going to  b4 or not...?  regards, wacky
5	Go monkey go!!!
0	Flow where?
1	san q. will do another thread to show pictures. the service ok. server is a waitress, v chio.  other than me, there is another group of office workers(6pax)
6	Jia you BigMonkey!   For the sausages, walk faster
30	Must remember to try the triple choc cake, oxtail stew, beef stew, lamb, scallops, wagyu curry puffs and lobster bisque hor. If good, i call to cancel my cancellation
3	zzz missed out ssk! i need meat....
9	ermm....... my review cannot be trusted.
19	where got nice foods to eat? buffet /restaurant type?
56	Anyone tried this Turducken before?  Sound wierd but yummy
12	around my body  adrenaline rush
53	overall good service but only two items i ate is good.
2	Most stuff at Miss Clarity were either on the extreme ends of being oversalted or super bland. Might be their way of telling you to order less. Really cannot eat alot there.
5	got the ribs leh when i went for the dinner..  the meat buibui one  got prawns got scallops too
10	Wah!!!  Bui bui uncker eats bui bui ribs   I must try their dinner liao.
25	At least you never end up paying $25 for cheese fries, heehee.  So wats the 2 nicer items?  The rest all so so or lousy?  Worth going overall?
42	If one of the items is Cremo - I think you have got your answer
3	simi is cermo
18	Cremo ice cream.
11	oxtail stew and triple chocolate cake.
15	Aiyoh, the 2 items tat i most gian   Ask me to pay $25 to eat them i also okay ... esp if can eat a lot of them
52	the meat for the oxtail stew is soft but the soup very salty.  lamb cannot make it, cold n tough.
136	ya why got such weird restrictions?
363	Where is the new bridge branch of Ssikkek? Any directions/address?
185	Tel. 62256964
9	quick OT question, that time the Thailand makan trip who did HW? i wanna re-read the threads coz going in March  oh and Happy New Year, i hope everyone ate well...
120	mod shushu
2	It is directly at oriental plaza?  Thank you.
13	Yea, twtan did the review.Yes, located at ground floor of oriental plaza, facing the main road.
5	The spread is very very small ... only got 3 more enticing items nia, the lamb chop, beef striploin n baby back ribs ...
6	okok today goin to ssk at chinatown for dinner....need to book not o.o   i go there help u see if got fatty beef ribs not lol...
10	So fast to recce ah? Haha  Eat more for me hor
6	Wah, evil, since you are eating for carey, you can send the bill to him too
3	toons n donkey went for lunch liao...boh jio i whole wk off also boh jio lolidea hor....nxt time i meet u u help to pay thanks!
8	Lol, how we know you on leave
8	i mention i on leave till 10th jan lol
15	Next Tuesday you want join us for JB pasar malam?
200	oh so little ah
92	k, found thanks... enjoying the pics now
77	SSK would be better if it's other outlets...haven't tried them out yet.
39	almost got lost finidin this place as i headed the wrong direction lol anyway the food basically the same but got an extra braised short ribs which are extra tender n nice....a plus point over here lol no 1 try this chicken thingy lol some seafood soup....abit sour though
1	Huh?  Wat do you mean?
79	So are you abandoning the novena branch for this one?    Got beef short ribs n scallops?
9	I'll stick to novena...nearer to me plus the meat cuts i feel tt novena is better...But then the 1 at environment at Chinatown is def more bearable lol...anyway I thnk Dennyz in love with the female boss..keep on commenting hw chio is her but then too shy to take photo lol the short ribs def more fattier but then there isnt any scalloP
8	where is the picture of the lady boss
16	simi bosss ar ?
15	Haven reach home yet
15	in what way better? i wanna go eat tomorrow, but dun no if should go novena or chinatown one.
12	the meat for me i feel novena better cut and more thick so taste more like meat lol...plus novena feels more lively n 1 more impt thing less tiong haha
60	this is the grill they use...really no smoke as compared to novena and the food here also can be crispy ma lol...we did it lol  aftermath of everything  and lastly bonus pics of the SNSD lady boss lol...  and this extra pic for dennyz to fap fap
8	wah ... denny oso fetish wif milf ar  hao abt the marination of the meats? which branch better?
21	novena more sweeter so if u like stronger tasting go with novena if u like lighter taste go with chinatown lor...  n hor hor hor ur hubby $$cow run lion with other ppl le...
411	I find novena one too sweet, carn realli taste savoury. heng lor, my innocent ish thus proven
103	wah.... anyone thinks that she resembles guo mei mei.......  so that guy in the photo beside her is dennyz...?? must feel high liao.... she stand so close....   regards,  wacky
50	You got it right.   No wonder i find the beef at chinatown better cos the seasoning is not as sweet.   That day i went, the lady boss wore mini skirt with white jacket, looks much better wor.
44	what to makan at waterloo street that area ???
2	Roast duck roast pork char siew at the coffeeshop across the road from Iluma. The scissors curry rice at the same coffeeshop also decent. Otherwise have your pick inside Albert Street FC.
77	She is worth paying extra $5 to go to that branch, even though food is the same.
7	At the Albert FC, I used to like the teochew noodle with their home made fish ball and fish cake. Long Q plus usually sold out by 11am.
64	I find the pork also juicier.Its only $1.80 extra.  Much better environment plus slightly better meats (imo) makes it worth the extra $.
14	Gotch fwee flow coke, sprite, H&amp;E Ice lemon tea, plain water, warm water and sweet rice drink.
5	got free coke n ice lemon tea?  then must go liao
248	yeah, moi drank 5 cups yesterday.
3	korean bbq have this?
37	only the chinatown branch have, novena and tg pagar dun hab.
140	how come got 1 extra kia at the left  she in actual person look quite pretty lah i feel also leh  i went on tues, somemore she quite friendly also
17	Then must be evil liao lor   Dennyz, how you find their meats compared to novena branch?
5	surprsied chinatown have.  cos been to tg pagar and novena ones.
0	almost same, marinate lighter but eat till end also same. but see no tanghoon, abit sad?
14	Business must be good  Ask evil to take a stake earlier he don't want haha
8	Hi ppl.. anyone interested in the Kitagawa buffet on deal now? Didnt know only can order max 1 per dish..  Got a pair to let go cheaper, anyone taking?
25	got the saba fish enough for me liao
51	Then it's a steal. When going again?
59	I went today!!!! the ladyboss has such a small waist!!! today dress till very fashionable. he environment, stove and all is good but i do agree with evil. I think the meat cut at novena is slightly thicker. And most importantly, no tanghoon....was so looking forward to the tanghoon. haiz. Novena got more koreans also.  if i got craving for tanghoon, i will go novena one. if not chinatown will do with the better environment and pretty ladyboss.
4	You liked the fried fish?  Hmmm, although its not fishy, but the taste just not there for me.  Too small, not juicy enough?
2	Wah liew, simi eat til end also the same?  Then you eat indian times, in the end also the same also ah   Yea, they dun have tanghoon.  The lady boss quite friendly mah.  Maybe if you guys tell her abt the tanghoon, she will consider offering it.  She does have mee goreng instead.  Did not try it though.
110	I'll have to wait til after cny then got time to try their dinner.  I tink the other guys here will go again sooner   Which nites you can make it?
91	tonight they have this char kway teow look alike thing which is quite tasteless. I wanted to ask her about the tanghoon but she is pretty busy tonight, full house.
209	seems like chinatown outlet keep changing cooked f00d menu O_O  i want go ssk again~ be it chinatown or novena outlet. hahaha
44	Then you should have gone with us to Auntie Kim That Saba fish was one of the better ones we had Hey, wait - maybe your nickname for her is Saba fish
7	the tanghoon nice ar? I din even try when I went recently
165	u mean the 3838 eating hse which belle sic at local food thread?
27	That day I went got tanghoon leh!   Think maybe they change the cooked food menu daily
29	Wednesdays and Saturdays I am free. Just cleared my IPPT just now, so no RT for this year. Come April I promote to Cat Z so will rush take IPPT again so can forget about it till 2014. Whoohoo.
12	Thinking of going ssikkek to eat with friends... Need to reserve anot? Anyway their chinatown branch not answering lol.
8	Yes, you need to do reservation. Their Novena branch whenever I passed by on weekends is forever crowded with people in the queue.
1	Thank you.  Will same-day reservations do, or must it be a few days prior?
8	Best not to do last minute booking, what if you can't get reservation?
4	I see, Then much time is estimated to be spent in the queue?  Coz I initially planned to go today.
96	No idea, we usually booked at least one week in advance.
2388	Depends on availability of seats bah  Small group is easier than a huge one haha  But usually see people queue for around 1/2 hour but no guarantee hor
10	We regret to inform you our partner, MJK Korean Crystal BBQ has ceased operations due to circumstances, that were unforeseen even by our crystal ball. Your MJK Korean Crystal BBQ Groupon is now invalid. No worries! Your unredeemed Groupons have already been refunded back to your original payment method. Please allow up to 5 working days for the refund to process. Sorry for any inconvenience caused.
11	haha, so fast ceased?
34	ya loh up lorry liao
24	went to Basilico yesterday.  Booked the private room. haha..
2	so satki sia
23	You are elite mah...hahah  Not that fantastic in my view - prefer their usual lunch buffet
5	worth to go?
67	$28.00 give n take mah not like u eat alot also
21	You want big spread can go Melt lor.  But be prepared to pay 2+ to 3x the price.
1	I wack quite a lof of the suckling pig.. I told the fella no stuff. More skin.. He tore the bloody big piece of skin gimme. hehehe  No lahs.. Cox got 10 ppl. So i ask can book the Private room, they say ok. Got minimum spending of i think 300.
21	300/10 = $30  more than enough
20	hmm.......just realise something. drink sweet drinks after buffet, make me wan to explode.
40	Paiseh, have to go off.  Took a quick look at the spread b4 i left.  Today's spread like not very good wor, simi curry chix n ham ... At least still got satay.  How you find the food?  You drink simi sweet drink after buffet?
37	Oh, you guys went Melting Pot ah?  The quality dropping ah? Expected after Toons go there   I went back to Shiu Yakiniku just now...  Still okay but the premium buffet (+$10) is not really worth it though...  Maybe because my dinner kaki boh jiak sashimi...hahah
50	still ok, nothing made an impression.  only like two items, the satay n one of the cake. for the ice cream, i think the freezer spoilt, the ice cream was in melted state when i wanted to try, so didn't take any.  the ham not good, prefer the one we had at "the square".  drank coke at one of the kopitiam near by.
314	Yea, we each got 1 voucher to clear.  Hmmm, i just took a quick look at the spread n it looks abt the same or slightly lousier than norm cos of the curry chix n ham.  Tomorrow see how ... or rather later see how.  Actually i tot since they now changed their promo from 1:1 to 3:2, i tot maybe the spread will be sightly better, but it seems not the case.  Oh well, another buffet into the pits ...  Oei, i also went to shiu abt 2 times liao hor.  Std still okay right?   How much is dinner?  Hmmm, so you never try their sashimi?  Even if your partner dun eat, you still can eat mah.  I saw their sushi b4 n it looks singularly unappertising.  Wonder if their 'premium' sashimi will be better or not.Heeeheee, other than the bad service you received at the square, the food is quite decent for its price right?  Anyways, the square now also no more 1:1 liao ...
189	If it's 3:2, then I probably won't bother...hahah  Only liked the satay and oxtail there No wonder   The first round, all the food kena stuck to the grill - prefer SSK...hahahS$39++ lor (we didn't want to pay another S$10 for the wagyu beef)  Nope, didn't try their sashimi - we already had too much to eat from the grill...hahah  The so-called premium beef was okay niah - but we both love their salmon and scallops
0	har? got bad service at the square? dun recall any.  btw, those buffet at hotel. r they privately owned or owned by the hotel?
4	Do they have sio bak?   The sio bak there also very nice.
3	they dun have, but i hab it around my waist, 3 layers of it.
1	Err . . . not the same   Plus i worry yours got stretch mark ^_^ lll
1	That one  I got more   But it's not sio bak yet - still pork belly niah
4	Wah, you know all the intimate details
25	You also go stretch mark    Dont say liao, later ah tan scold
11	3 layer monkey meat , yummy yummy
6	Wah nwadays all the secret buffet outing lol..  Yesterday went back to ssk at Chinatown n theres is scallop n saba fish..both of them are good the Saba fish almost as good as auntie Kim just abit cold only lol...this time rd the slice beef are thaw first but then it might not appeal to every1 as there's a slight beefy taste..
14	secret buffet i bo chance to join
1	Wah like no bad leh...hahah  Maybe we should have gone to SSK Chinatown instead   But since we were already at the west, so lazy to go back into town
2	Tot they made you guys sit outside or something, plus hard to get them to serve you water?  Refused to give you a jug or something?  Most are operated by the hotel.
0	We each only have 1 voucher mah, how to jio?   Keekee, tonite i going to melting pot.  You willing to pay $40+ for their food, then join me lor  Wah, tot you prefer novena branch?  Your eyes hunger for eye candy issit?
1	when going keep me inform
12	hannor... and nobody jio one...  and correct for both of u...... regards, wacky
27	I went with my fren she say she want try the 1 at Chinatown then I anything lor...if give me choose I will choose novena cause the meat more thicker cut lol but the additions of scallop n Saba fish is good...I clear alot of Saba fish lol... I still full from yesterday night outing lol... Speakin of eye candy yesterday got 1 grp of Korean dancers I think wah pretty n figure damn good..even my fren a she not bad herself also can't help staring at them as they sit beside us lol..yesterday I machiam like some big shot surrounded by beauties lol...
10	Dinner slot full. I booked for lunch. Anyway, for the price, can't complain. Last year I had my reunion dinner at Kopitiam. Damage is $118. This year they raise price to $138. Most places 3-4 pax is $138. I paid $138.50 for 5 pax for the voucher deal, get to have a relaxing 3 hour lunch in an aircon environment (better for piglets) and complimentary parking. Really cannot hiam.
56	SSK is evil's territory...hahah  You need to ask him - I am just supporting cast niah
84	i think thats not me. i only went with you once.
8	extra charges for - Prosperity dishes includes Mini Buddha Jumps Over the Wall and Prawns in Ginseng Soup
28	Oh yea, i remember liao.  I was eating their chilli crab n it flew out of my hands onto my shirt.  Lucky i was wear a high polyester shirt tat day.  Managed to wash off the stain.  Tats b4 you came. Later we ate the durian pengat n found a seed inside  Sq better than melting pot right?
489	yup. better but will only go if there is 1 for 1. since now dun have than won't be interested.
31	Any buffets outings tomorrow?
918	I will pass on these 2. Soupy stuff fills you up very fast.
36	Carey, that time you go Blue Garden, you parked at Link Hotel?  Did they give you a parking coupon?
85	Get some new threads dude
259	Nope, don't have
83	That time you all go Blue Garden, after that spotted Beta? I am now at Blue Garden. Spotted 2 Buffetlicious participants.  :p
52	Let me guess - a furry creature from down under and a cousin of the mule right? Haha
1	My guess is manyu n ssp
5	Why ler?  I like tat shirt wor.  Anti stain.  Go eat bbq, or anything tat might splatter, its the shirt of choice
3	couple ??
8	How is the food at Aqua Marine @ Marina Mandarin. Any food to recommend?
24	i quite like Aquamarine. But now ish Halal liao.
11	What's affected with it becoming halal? They still packed, even on weekdays with their 1-for-1 lunch offers.
26	I haven't been to SSK or 2D1N. So how is Blue Garden compared to them? Blue Garden only marinated beef belly nice. The beef ribs and ribeye, pork belly are alright. The pork collar and beef collar very dry. The prawns were miniature in size, cooked liao become hae bi. Cooked food all cold due to powerful aircon. The abalone porridge is plain tasting, but after dipping some meats into it, it's not too bad.
209	The prawns are not that miniture.
3	The meats at ssikkek are better.  Thicker and tastier.  Got more varieties too.  The prawns are decent sized (confirmed over can watch RA movies liao), and at the new bridge outlet, sometimes got scallops too.  Blue garden has more cooked dishes n condiments though.  Environment is where blue garden use to come out tops, eg, less smoky stove, no oil splattering, can feel the aircon ... but the new bridge outlet's environment is as good.  Tat time when i went, blue garden also not so crowded, so nicer more relaxed ambiance, but when carey went recently, seems like full house too.
203	For me, its not so much their becoming halal, but rather their removing sashimi from their lunch buffet.  I find their sashimi very fresh.  Now their lunch machiam like local food liao ...
21	when we reach there it was still ok, after 7pm the crowd seem to come in
40	I can skip the cooked food. The place is only half-filled today, maybe coz it's a Wed. Ya, aircon is cold and not much oil splatter, but still smell of BBQ after that. Looks like other places going to be worse.
91	Ssikkek new bridge outlet, you'll smell abt the same.  Novena one worse.  2D1N machiam like sauna for you and bbq smoke room for your clothes
38	The only thing I liked from the cooked food section was the pork belly   The chicken wings tasted funky to me but some of them liked it...hahah  The rest were carb-dense so didn't try   Best for me was the beef belly - very fatty and nice but get gelat very fast   But as long as got no bacon, me is not that keen
58	any upcoming buffet to join?
1	Go stalk Toons. He has buffet for every meal.
12	any CNY buffet gathering or something?
7	That one difficult to do now, not unless buy air ticket   My tummy taking a rest till he is back
29	Somehow this came out somewhat wrong...hahah  Then again, it's unker's cheeky mind at work
2	nowadays if is NOT buffet ppl dun jiak liao ah...??   for me... is more like if is buffet i no jiak le...   regards,  wacky
26	anything. Non buffet also ok.
570	u treat jiak sure have de
9	chix wings nice what...  I liked the kim-chi and other preserved vege... all nice!   plus yea environment not bad for a bbq place.
185	The wings were too sweet and tasted a bit funky haha  Definitely a no no for bui bui unker   Kimchi is not bad but the meat quality is not as good as SSK
481	You are in the wrong thread.   Anyway, doesn't mean you don't go buffet, you will eat less.
18	oh i DO eat less if is not buffet... cos i will have the typical KS mentality when go buffet i must make my $$$ worth and eat until i REALLY ISH FULL... but in non-buffet i don't even think of eating until full.... as long not hungry can le...   regards,  wacky
24	Is it? I don't think you eat a lot at those buffets we went to also what...hahah  Anyway, I just eat until I am full and stop - no point forcing myself to get my money's worth...it ain't worth it (lao unker stomach boh ho)
40	corrected for you... i think the only buffet u saw me eat b4 is todai...??  todai food is nothing special anyway... so there wasn't that much variety that attracts me to keep eating.... and besides i'm no raven so cannot jiak that much...  for non-buffet... i don't need to eat until i'm full and stop... i eat just the standard portion and as long as i am not hungry i can stop le... regards, wacky
20	Think this has been talked about many times. I just like the variety at buffets. I don't go and calculate how much I must eat or what I should eat to make my money's worth. I can have appetitisers, main-course and desserts with repeated orders of what I like, which can be costly if it's ala cart. This is like going for a club med holiday. Pay a fixed price, do and eat whatever you want without having to consider the cost.
0	OT - Club Med food sucks most of the time...hahah
5	y am i in the pigture ?
48	You are the makan legend mah
41	yalar i know la... i different cos i cannot eat so much liao and i sick of buffet food in general... cos u are THE eating platinum standard for makan zone... eats anything and everything... buffets... non-buffets... carbs... non-carbs...   regards,  wacky
13	i dun stuff myself full.. if not i cant walk or function properly.. like that time a jade.. duno who ask me support the glutinous rice.. i ate 2.. n others.. i cant even walk properly wanna jua all out.
31	not PPP meh ?
93	He is just your understudy niah haha
248	To each his own.   It's all in the mind. For buffet, I also don't stuff myself silly and it don't mean i enjoy less. As for non buffet, i not necessary will eat less too.   End of day, its quality over quantity.   Whatever floats your boat.   But i do enjoy eating with big eaters.   It takes the guilt out of eating.   I miss PPP
363	where PPP run to ? like MIA very long liao , someone drag him back with fatty bui bui meat
611	Swadee ka everyone!  Just reach back home. Been walking since 2.30pm after my buffet lunch @ lord jim.  Tats about 8 hrs of walking.  Now although not hungry, but dun really feel the food liao   Glad to report tat the food is as good.  Wat sucked previously still sucked though heehee.  But sad my appetite really like smaller. Only managed to wolf down 2 pieces of foie gras n 4 slices of their beef. Maybe i tried more stuff this time.  Sigh dunno if i should still try tat brunch this sunday. Its a mega buffet spread over 3 restaurants in the hotel. Tat one can sample the food until burst. Hmm come to think of it, wonder how it works. Cos i make reservations to seat in the jap restaurant with the nice surroundings. Dun tell me if i take food from other restaurants, then i have to walk from 1 restaurant to another holding plates of food?
2	Maybe got girlfriend liao bah...hahah  Chong ser qing you
43	Yeah.. PPP MIA.. i damn long nv see him.
7	gong xi gong xi him
2743	Are the dishes still the same or there are changes? Roast station still got beef, chicken and lamb?
1880	Please GPGT when you are back   And please book mark those nice makan places for us.   Ytd, i just had cod fish head for dinner at a canto resturant at people's park complex. Jin ho jiak! Sorry, forgot take picture again
3	Breakfast @ Prego Resturant   Location : Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT  Date : Saturday 28 Jan 2012    Time : 7.30am - 11am   Price : $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card   Participants  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)   4.   As we are taking advantage of the 1 for 1 with Feed @ Raffles, we have to closed at 4 pax, not unless you can get another participant with the card or you don't mind paying full price to join us.    Morning walk at marina barrage will start at 6am for those keen to join.    Participants to come in Chinese New Year wear so we can all HUAT together
7	Me want to go. Breakfast @ Prego Resturant Location : Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT Date : Saturday 28 2012 Time : 7.30am - 11am Price : $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card Participants 1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles) 2. Donkey 3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles) 4. twtan
12	But this time you confirm must wear Chinese new year theme ok, else after meal dessert on you.   Toons, no table cloth allowed   Beta di di got the card too, wanna go?
6	I don't have Dragon printed shirt.   Calling Beta, don't say I no ask you to go hor.
3	I say CNY theme not dragon theme lah.   You can hang ang bao on your shirt or come as a big mandarin orange   Else i will bring marker and help you with the dress up or dress down
8	i din know prego now got buffet de... long LOOOOOOOONGGGG ago i remember eating there for lunch... if is not buffet maybe i would be interested... tot full liao anyway... unless he got the feed card too....  regards, wacky
27	He got the card.
8	paging for beta shu shu or can we borrow the card
48	so prego is buffet??? i go to their website:  ... i only see got sunday/pub hol brunch buffet de...??   regards,  wacky
44	Breakfast @ Prego Resturant  Location : Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT  Date : Saturday 28 2012  Time : 7.30am - 11am  Price : $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Participants  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 .
12	hi guys! I was wondering if anyone has tried the buffet dinner at Basilico at The Regent? How was the spread and quality of the food?
40	so tempted!  but so early...
73	We tried the Sunday Brunch:
8	thanks for the review~~!!
44	Me also tempted but must resist...  Got to cut down on makan liao - times are bad   Too bui bui also
58	Sound good.  Thanks for sharing.  Will definitely check it out.
21	and i got ignored....   regards,  wacky
35	i passing my kard to duxyevil.   I cant come i think but i really feel like going. Friday I go sec sch lo hei.. sure lim until luan. Duno cant wake up in time. Then Sat Im heading to RWS another drinking party..  Some fella Bday..
18	Bro, i'll be frank with you.  1.  You do know the name of this thread?  If you are not keen on buffets, why hang around?  I believe nobody minds if you just hang around, but i dun think ppl here like hearing about your dislike for buffets ... over and over.  Face it lar, saying you dun like buffets in a thread named buffetlicious ... and you wonder why no one bothers to reply?  2.  Yes, the outing to Prego is a buffet breakfast.
3	Prego got buffet breakfast and brunch on sunday iirc..  The rest of the timing ish Ala carte.. Hope this helps.  Btw their Tiramisu not bad..
8	beta sho elite  got sign up the new amex palate thingy?
3	chao beta when meet pass me card let me know
13	not enough salary..
72	good... finally someone replied me... and by the way... usually when i am *adamant* of getting a reply for my question... i usually have good reasons why i repeat my question... 1) if this outing is not buffet then i may be interested... 2) if this outing is a buffet... then something puzzles me... because from their website... and from google search... i only find info about prego having  buffet... and you guys are going for sunday brunch  (28 jan 2012)... hence i wonder... maybe: 3a) either sat buffet is a brand new thing... and the website isn't updated yet... and considering the price $23 nett doesn't seems to be brunch buffet (which is $78++ normally... at 1-for-1 it's still $39++...) ...  OR 3b) it is not buffet and the $23++ is for sets... (i did consider maybe this is posted in the wrong thread...) OR 3c) someone got the dates wrong... and ppl are going to turn up that day and end up not having buffet... in which case i'm very sorry for being too KPO for pointing this out...  also... it's my own personal opinion that i dun like eating too much buffets... and i didn't bring this up as i see no relation with this prego outing... but i don't see why you need to bring that up...  and lastly... (i thought) this is an open forum (or used to be) so i can speak up and express my own opinions about my food preferences... and so ppl don't mind listening to it... but then i guess it seems that it ain't open as it used to be.... i guess perhaps that explains why this section has grown quieter and some ppl who used to be quite active have "disappeared"... and there are also lesser outings too... if that is the case... maybe i should just keep things to myself in future and disappear too... regards, wacky
4	Bro, feel free to continue expressing your opinion.  I am just telling you i dun like reading yet another of your post abt how you dislike buffets in this thread.  Its just not the appropriate thread lor.  You express your opinion, i express mine, 'open' enough?   Lastly, if i dun like certain posts, i just ignore them ... but since you asked, so i replied why i am ignoring your post.  Dun make it sound like your opinion or tat of others are been repressed hor.
3	Did not try their dinner buffet b4, but i tink its a semi buffet, meaning you only get to order 1 main.  The appertisers and desserts are buffet style though irrc.Actually its buffet bf everyday, n buffet brunch on sun i tink.
385	Aiyah, elite ppl where got need to work one.  If you just show them your $ in your bank account.  They'll deliver the card to you personally within the hr
4	Location : Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT  Date : Saturday 28 2012  Time : 7.30am - 11am  Price : $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Dress theme :   Participants  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 .  Up post for last slots
6	i don't see why a negative opinion about buffets is not appropriate in a buffet thread... it's probably just not popular only... when one discuss about any topic... anything positive, negative or neutral should be considered as "appropriate" to the topic... however... i thought my comments on buffet somewhat around post  and it ended with donkey's comment on post  4 days ago... the prego outing started on post  and i started questioning about it being buffet on post  because i wondered why sunday brunch buffet outing is held on a saturday (din know they got daily breakfast buffet) and was kinda keen if it ain't buffet... your response with post  could have just simply answered with point 2... i don't see the appropriateness to bring up point 1 after 4 days later and it isn't even related to the prego outing...  regards, wacky
60	Why so emo?   Actually, if you have been following the forum, few people here went for the Prego BF buffet before. Ordway gave a very detailed review and Toons went with someone from makan thread too. Somemore GPGT the outing too.   Of course not everyone have read those posts and on the same note, not everyone have read your post fast enuff to respond to your question when you want it   P.S. I read your post #5258 and i seriously think you should just do what your signature says .... find peace.
8	The AMEX CSO told me FAR tie up with AMEX plat has already ended. In place is the Palate program. So if you are going to Prego, better check with them first.
17	Thanks.  Was told its extended til end of Jan 2012.  The vouchers can still be used til jun or jul though.
12	Location : Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT  Date : Saturday 28 2012  Time : 7.30am - 11am  Price : $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Dress theme :   Participants  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 . (^@^)" + piglet  Thanks for organizing.
2	() Breakfast Buffet Date:  (Saturday) Location: Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT Time: 7.30am to 11am Price:  using Feed @ Raffles Card Participants 1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles) 2. Donkey 3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles) 4. Twtan 5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles ) 6 . (^@^)" + piglet Closed
5	Just tell them you beta tester. They will send chiobu to ask you sign up. Anyway, how much salary needed?
15	Marina Barrage very far from City Hall leh. Drive there then drive back? Can bring kite go there fly. On a nice windy day, good for kite flying. Pretty unblocked.
5	Reservation made.  Confirmed can use FAR discount.  Have to be 3 tables cos only 1 card per table.  We reach there then psycho the staff there to give us 1 big table bah.  If waiter we send donkey, if waitress we send evil Yea, tentatively for those looking to get some exercise so as to eat more, we drive to barrage first, then leave abt 715am and have our bf at 730am.
3	So early, Donkey fetching us is it?
0	Never ask yet, but should be okay since donkey very kind one, Thanks donkey!!!   We prolly meet at the nearest mrt, cityhall or marina, then get a lift from donkey bah.
0	If MILF send twtan.    Die la, if gay, we got no poloboi or CC to send.You want exercise, start walking from Marina Barrage at 6am.  By 7.30am, you should reach Prego.
20	I need fetch my friend then after that can fetch you all at mrt before go barrage.   But i have to check with my friend first if he joining us cos he is not a morning person. Will confirm again.
3	i can meet donkey zehzeh first lol....aiya i tackles gals n gheys...problem solve lol..
54	No problem   We arrange time nearer the date.
38	Is Marina Barrage open that early?
41	The barrage itself is open all day.  Its the gallery thingy tat is open only at 9 or 10am.
7	just came back today, slot bo liao
107	http://voucherlicious.com/singapore/deal/eat-all-you-can-@-vivocity!-$15.90-only!-feast-at-the-popular-bei-shan-chuan-spicy-steamboat-buffet?utm_source=Voucherlicious&amp;utm_campaign=42a78cd9c9-VC-Jan18-BSC%2BWEEKLY&amp;utm_medium=email
59	Then you have to sacrifice bah
4	Umm... Just saw your posts on the breakfast buffet. Please be careful bros, Prego is usually service with a smile, but since you pay at the end of the meal, they may only allow 1 FAR card for the entire transaction especially if they notice you guys eating as a big group. By the way, might join you guys if its ok for the organizer. I have Amex (but does FAR membership expire Jan 1st or Jan 31st, I forget) and have FAR card as well so can add in up to 3 more people excluding me if there's more interest and you guys are sure can use so many discounts. If its too inconvenient at this time that's fine too. Been a while since I ate there.
27	if u got FAR and it is vaild , i will join
335	We will be seated in separate tables.
1	() Breakfast Buffet Date:  (Saturday) Location: Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT Time: 7.30am to 11am Price:  using Feed @ Raffles Card Participants 1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles) 2. Donkey 3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles) 4. Twtan 5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles ) 6 . (^@^)" + piglet 7. Ordway (FAR) 8. raven1019
5	Somebody got experience one wor   Tat time got bring those strings with cans attached at both ends to whisper sweet tidings or not?
6	That time even though not much diners they also wanted us to sit at separate tables so we picked side by side tables. No cans with string required.
3	Weird ppl.  Actually even after sitting at different tables, you just move your stuff over, or just leave your stuff at your table but eat over at same table, they also LL.    Just tat for our case, its hard since got 8 pax.
4	speed dating? 5 minute change table?
4	No, I meant that I have Plat Amex, so I can use to get 2 for 1, then I also have a separate Feed At Raffles card so someone can use that card to pay for two people. That's why 3 + me = 4 people. I don't think they'll check that same name on Amex and FAR card right?  This is assuming what a previous poster said about FAR privileges for the Amex card continuing till end of Jan. I thought it expired 1st Jan but I can't remember exactly. Also assuming that another 2 people want to join.  Sorry for not being so clear. Didn't read this makan forum recently so missed it when the outing was being organized.
3	31 Jan 2012, i say one, heehee.  Keke, so basically, other than you n raven, can add another 2 more since you have another FAR card.  Btw, wanna go eat lunch at asian market cafe on wed 25 Jan 2012?  We can lao yusheng together.  Your 'new year' should be different from ours right?  Nevermind, still can celebrate n FA! together
1	Just lao yusheng today with my colleagues.
2	Date: Wed 25 Jan 2012   Location: Asian Market Cafe @ Fairmont Hotel, Raffles City   Time: 12pm to 2.30pm   Price: TBC, but should be &lt;$30 nett after 1 for 1 FAR discount   Participants   1. Toons (FAR)   2. Dennyz   3. (must be FAR holder)   4. (only onz if can get a FAR holder)
19	So nice.  Last nite at cafebiz also got yusheng, but we lazy to lao (or rather i dun wanna eat the carb n sugar), end up just ate the salmon sashimi, which was surprisingly good.  Must look for healthier fruit yusheng!  PS:  Thanks Twtan, btw, cannot restore the entire post?
66	toons, wat is nice at asian market cafe arh?? do u have the menu to beo beo? tot of joining u all but i dun have the card....
568	asia market like become halal liao.
14	Who huh?   So lomantic ah
270	Never try b4, but i saw the spread.  For $20+, i think its worth a try Errrr, one can left ear, another can right ear?
9	hi, anyone can advised whether can i bring my 9mth old daughter to 10@claymore? want to try there as singtel has a 1-for-1 birthday treat offer.
67	Should be can ah...  Service is not bad
25	Best to call and see have baby chair seat or not. Have children going but never notice anyone sitting baby chair seat.
5	thanks for all the advises, i think i'll ask my in-laws to babysit my baby.
54	Can just call them and ask mah...hahah
16	If can add 2 more, can add Mrs (^@^)" in?  But need one more then.
56	duxyevil, when u free?? to take the card. tmr i should be in suntec in the afternoon.
200	He claims he is very eng - cho boh now
93	Oo I nxt wk onwards free cause clear leave lol..tml still got work although i now damn high dunno can do work not lol...I SMS u again tml
52	kana banned by cockroach so sian
14	you are raven ?
21	ya loh ya loh
9	You post raisins, abalone or trolling?
31	name calling x 5, and he admit that that is his name by issuing me infraction point
276	sorry i cannot stop laughing at this man  btw tmr the ssk u going?
66	what time n where
56	Duxyevil next week then. I will mostly be at east side next week.  Raven who ish kajua?
66	Sorry toons, spending some time with the family during the CNY period so won't be free till the weekend for the breakfast buffet. New Years and Christmas is the rare time when our whole family is together in one place. Even the gf is a distant second priority during this time   Have a great time folks and Gong Xi Fa Cai!
35	some bad reputation mod in hwc
9	That's lame. At least you post porn, people will respect you and you bow out with a bang. Kenna banned for name-calling is like primary school issues.
9	people is xiao qi and ji chou what to do
2	So they got a female ginna pi as mod?
3	Sexist pig!!!
3	Trust me. If you are in my line, you will know that I know alot about this.   And I am a male chauvinist pig.
83	Can i bring my korean textbook next sat for some advice?    My korean friend sent to me from Korea but not much english words inside, so diff for me to understand
34	so later how ????
10	u sms duxyevil to confirm. chinatown 6pm i think.i think ish same as this. see below abit
36	wher are u guys going?
88	i have no idea also.....   regards,  wacky
3	Bui bui outing to SSK Chinatown
10	meaning not bui cannot join ah...??  kidding!! i'm not free anyway... going to L33 tonite...  regards, wacky
29	Can ah - as long as you are willing to jiak buffet
9	twtan, can add Mrs (^@^)" into the list since ordway has another card?  It will not be 50% but only 20% (I think) but good enough.
17	()  Breakfast Buffet  Date:  (Saturday)  Location: Fairmont Hotel @ City Hall MRT  Time: 7.30am to 11am  Price:  using Feed @ Raffles Card  Participants  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 . (^@^)" + piglet  7. Ordway (FAR)  8. raven1019  9. Mrs (^@^)"
4	confirm me for ssk thanks
83	Ok - you know where right?
6	If 9 pax, 6 will be enjoying 50% discount, n last 3 will get 33% discount.
68	And must also see if the odd person wants to accept a lower discount or not mah...
28	will be late reaching 6.45pm
2422	My wife not be keen to wake up so early, so it will be 8.  Even if its 9, I will pay the difference to the other person to make it fair, don't worry.
97	Going for dinner using this voucher tomorrow with Dennyz.  Anyone wanna join us?  Let me know so tat i can buy the voucher.
18	finally a re-run of this offer.
31	Good ah? Haha
5	You tried b4?  Food lousy?  If so, can save us a trip there.
3164	No ah, that's why I am asking since dreamer knew that it was a repeat offer
955	Happy CNY to all the buffetlicious folks here. Wishing that you will get to sample great buffet food at great discount offers.  May you fast-hand-fast-leg get those heavily discounted offers. Maybe you siam those lousy buffets like Indian Times. Maybe you eat all you like without getting fat and compromising your health. Lastly, may those buffet places recognize us as a club and offer exclusive deals to us.
35	anyone want go greenhouse? or any buffets that dont use coupons? CC discount is fine, but i feel coupons usually for cmi buffet...
110	Hey Toons  How's the place? hahah
8	There are some gems for coupon deals.   Just avoid Indian buffets or buffet places run by tiongs, you should be fine. Read the reviews about the place before buying.
5	just went Chang Korean for lunch earlier. Its crap.....totally.. not worth the voucher at all. no ice water/drinks provided, need to pay. No serviettes provided.... i think all food is MSG loaded, darn thirsty after eating the meats. (kinda like force u to buy drinks) Meat variety and quality is bad... only warm cooked food available is the spicy rice cakes. Got rice and seaweed soup (i think they cooked it with sea water - very salty) Stove heat is very small, take a long time for the meat to get cooked. Whole place only got 2 waitress, 1 waitress still got to double up as cashier.... super disappointed...i ended up at the si ma lu hawker centre to fill up my stomach. I rather pay more and go ssk.
2	WTF - so bad ah?   Thanks for your review - think I will give all the coupon deals a miss from now onwards...
49	Problem here is that the quality can drop quite drastically during the coupon period   And even on HGW, the bad reviews can be hidden...
5	A great CNY to you and your family too.  May all your wishes come true!  Esp the one abt 'eating all you like without getting fat', heehee.Hmmm, my experience for the dinner i had there on first day of CNY.  Yea, no drinks provided.  No biggie for me cos i dun drink much when eating buffets.  Not sure abt the serviettes, but since they dun have desserts, i dun really need serviettes (those who ate buffets with me will know wat i meant  )  The meat variety n quality i had tat nite was okay. Less than SSK, but only by 2-3 types?  Quality was also okay.  The pork ribs were juicy n tender.  Very good!  Dunno why they called it ribs though, when its more like a slab of pork chop.    2x Pork ribs (before)  2x Pork ribs (after)  My only beef with the meats was tat most of them were marinated n the marinate tends to be sweet n similar, so everything ended up tasting the same.  Tats why i focused only on the non marinated pork belly, non marinated beef n pork ribs.  The beef though slightly chewy, can taste the 'beefiness'.  Other then the pork ribs, the meats still better at SSK.  Cooked dishes were only the seaweed soup (i used it to wash off the marinate so dunno how it tasted), kimchi fried rice (no nice) n rice cake (never try).  They had dory fish, mussels n squids (with spicy marinate n without marinate) on top of abt 10 types of meats.  The seafood all quite fresh.  Spicy n non spicy squids n mussels, spiced dory fish  Squid  Non marinated beef, pork belly n short ribs.  Mussels  They also had watermelon n dragon fruit as well as 2 types of ice cream.  The flame at our stove was also quite small, so its a bit irritating waiting for the meats to cook.  We did notice that there were other tables using the infrared heater stoves (same as the ones in SSK).  Those should be better.   There were about 4-5 waiting staff the nite we were there, so the plates were all cleared promptly.  For $18 nett for a bbq buffet on chinese cny, i think its good value.  Yes, i would prefer to go chinatown SSK even though its $8 more, but for $18 nett for dinner on weekends n PHs and $15 on weekdays, its quite a bit cheaper than SSK.  With the cheaper price in mind, i tink its a decent korean bbq buffet.  I definitely dun regret going there.
36	Anyone wants to go on Sun 29 Jan with me instead?  I have to do OT on sat, so i would prefer to go on sun instead.  Date: 28th January 2012 (Saturday)  Location: Prego @ Fairmont Hotel (on top of CityHall MRT)  Time: 7.30am to 11am  Price: $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Participants (even nos for 50% discount, else odd one might not be able to enjoy full discount)  1. Toons (Feed @ Raffles)  2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 . (^@^)" + piglet  7. Ordway (FAR x2)  8. raven1019  9. Dennyz  10.  *Closed*
101	joined.   dennyz, mai sabo me hor.
36	I thought (^@^)"'s wife joining too. I have added her in the list on the front page.
3	oh i have dragon fruit too but they stop refilling after the first plate. lol  Seems like more variety during dinner. I can only blame myself for going on a bad day. Nevertheless, all those that bought the coupon, hope you have a better experience than me.
28	well, i guess its up to individual. I went on a lunch day.  Toons went for dinner and enjoyed it. Maybe u will like it.
2	Errr, he posted that she will not be going due to the early timing.Yea, tell me abt it, sometimes its all luck.  Tat time 2 grp here went to straits cafe on 2 consecutive days n the experience quite different cos of the difference in menu.  Even melting pot also had days where they dun have carving at all.  WTF!  Its 1 thing to rotate from beef/lamb/chicken etc, but to totally drop carving???   On those days, i will usually change to another place to eat.  And then there is also individual preference.  Like i say, things like no water is no biggie to me, but i know lots of ppl instantly turned off by it.  For carey, no bacon = no turn onz liao
10	Well, I don't have Toons' luck...hahah  So I will probably be keeping my fingers crossed
2	You bought also?  You used your clarity credits ah?   I also have 2 more weekday dinner vouchers.  Wanna go together?
38	Can but I don't think it will be so soon as I am entering into my busy period   The voucher expires in Mar right?
3	Np, later better.  Yea, 3 months validity, so in Mar.  I need to space out my buffets liao.  After today's buffet, jeans damn tight.  Scared will pichak if i continue on
17	Ok, later probably better...hahah  Hey, check your PM
92	Ah Tan, you booked for West Coz Cafe liao?  For lunch, must book hor, else will be long wait.  Some of us going for ala carte lunch at West Coz Cafe (west coast plaza) tomorrow.  Anyone wanna join us?  The food there is pretty good n reasonably priced.  Considering i'm a firm supporter of buffets, if i can be bothered to eat at a non buffet place, you can bet the food there must be pretty decent ... to say the least Thanks, replied liao.
64	I told Donkey already a few days ago, Thursday they are still closed.
3	Thks for sharing.  Those interested, do take a look at the menu hor.  The pics bluff ppl one.  Pic show simi cod fish, but the menu actually is just fish slice ...   Of cos they do cover their ass by stating pics are there for illustration purposes only, but i feel its misleading lor.   *thumbs down the for deal*
1	wah....so bad ah..  i never try their food before tho.
7	Yeah, ah tan did sms me.  But i too busy to post.   Today fish head lunch is off since they are closed.   Happy Chinese New Year everyone
38	Paiseh, have to pull out cos i have to OT on sat   Anyone wants to go on Sun 29 Jan instead, let me know.  Date: 28th January 2012 (Saturday)  Location: Prego @ Fairmont Hotel (on top of CityHall MRT)  Time: 7.30am to 11am  Price: $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Participants (even nos for 50% discount, else odd one might not be able to enjoy full discount)  1.   2. Donkey  3. Donkey's Guest (Feed @ Raffles)  4. Twtan  5 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  6 . (^@^)" + piglet  7. Ordway (FAR x2)  8. raven1019  9. Dennyz  10. Bigmonkey  *Closed*[/QUOTE]
32	Just had lunch buffet @ Restaurant Bologna yesterday. It was slightly below average. Variety of food wasn't much to speak off and food quality ranged from terrible to slightly above average (in the minority). Desserts dominated much of the above average segment. $53/pax. Totally not worth it.
1	Bishan got this Thai restaurant called Matta Thai selling curry fish head at a promo price of $10 instead of $18. I thought it's very good. Maybe you all can try. It's near Blk 501 Bishan St 13.
8	[/QUOTE]  We now short of one FAR card and have one more pax. How ar?
4	There might be some changes to the list.   We are waiting for some confirmation before updating it
7	[/QUOTE]  any bfast menu?  i am conisdering the sunday slot.....but i want go marina barrage walk walk too....can see sunrise?
146	Toons and donkey wanna try? Think 2 pax to one Claypot fish head just nice.
8	You want bring us go?
11	Wah, again ah...hahah  Too far, I rather pay a bit more and go Suanthai
6	ya...they dun give up
19	Ya lor...hahah  What I want is a repeat of Khmer Delights buffet - that one was really worth the trip down
136	Unfortunately, my guest can't attend the event as well   So i have to withdraw him and myself.   If everyone is ok with sharing the discount than it will be $26 instead of $23 with 7 pax.   Date: 28th January 2012 (Saturday)  Location: Prego @ Fairmont Hotel (on top of CityHall MRT)  Time: 7.30am to 11am  Price: $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card  Participants (even nos for 50% discount, else odd one might not be able to enjoy full discount)  1 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles )  2 . (^@^)" + piglet  3. Ordway (FAR x2)  4. raven1019  5. Dennyz  6. Bigmonkey  7. twtan
5	You borrow his card and join in?  So number just nice?
19	You all meet me at Bishan CC, I bring U all there lor.  The fish head is very well executed.  Tender and fresh.  I am usually not a fish head person.  Gravy also very shiok.  Pity no bread or you-tiao.  Only rice.
6	Sorry all, I've got a last minute commitment I can't get away from. I hate to do this at this late hour, but I can't make the buffet on Saturday. Feel terrible. Anyway, if anyone wants to borrow the FAR card, I don't mind passing the card to you sometime before. I live West so anyone can pick up from me in convenient location (Holland v / Clementi / Buona Vista area). Looks like its an odd number now so maybe works out better?  Sunday morn is fine for me though if anyone else is going.
3	But if you pull out, means less FAR cards, so less people can benefit.  At the present moment, only 1 FAR card, so only 2 pax, with your FAR card means 4 pax gets discount.
5	Mine is Amex cc, not FAR card.Hmmm, down to 6 pax, so need 3 cards.  But even if one of them borrow your FAR card, its still 2 cards nia cos your amex cc cannot lend. I suggest shift to sun lor.  Then ordway (more imptly his 2 cards  ) can go.  Then it will be back to 7 pax, heehee. Date: 28th January 2012 (Saturday) Location: Prego @ Fairmont Hotel (on top of CityHall MRT) Time: 7.30am to 11am Price: $23 nett using Feed @ Raffles Card Participants (even nos for 50% discount, else odd one might not be able to enjoy full discount) 1 . evilduxy ( Feed @ Raffles ) 2 . (^@^)" + piglet 3. raven1019 4. Dennyz 5. Bigmonkey 6. twtan
152	As in donkey's colleague.  I know you using AMEX.    Sigh, Sunday I am working.  So not much of a choice for me.  Looks like the outing going to be cancelled.
49	I don't mind going on Sunday as I have got BBQ outing on Sat, so the less I eat on that day the better.
18	i can shift onto Sunday too, but monkey and piggy how?
117	i m too fat, can't shift. so i pull out.
12	suddenly i not around , come back so many people not going
14	Ya, tats 1 good buffet!  Interesting n good food.  I doubt we will see a repeat of tat offer.  They prolly learnt their lesson after we went
4	Can go also not enough cards.
98	not enough card then i pull out also
10	sunday cmi for me also.... so who is can sat ?? if need to borrow card i can go find ordway for 1 card since im takin beta card tml...anything just let me know
7	Based on my analysis of the situation, this should be the arrangement: Saturday: evilduxy (with card) and (^@^)". Just nice. Sunday: Toons (with card), ordway (with 2 cards), twtan, and dennyz. Can even slot in 2 more persons.
58	Beta stay where ar?
259	meetin him at raffles area tml...
55	Ya lor...the ribs are oh so good...hahah  For me, that's the best deal so far
0	We did think of that but Toons and my guest are holding the Amex CC, not the FAR.
5	Saturday: evilduxy (with card) and (^@^)". Just nice.  Sunday: ordway (with 2 cards), twtan, and dennyz.
5	Today i already cook my 3 layer meat &amp; LKB to bring to work.   Next week then we arrange a day to meet and eat
6	Where you ate tat jin ho jiak cod fish head curry?
27	That one is steam cod fish head, not curry.   It's located at People's park complex level 5, directly infront of 5 star travel. In fact, it's own by 5 star travel.   It's about $40-$50 for that dish.
347	Saturday: evilduxy (with card) and (^@^)". Just nice. Sunday: ordway (with 2 cards), twtan, and dennyz , raven1019
74	After giving some thought, I think I will pull out from the breakfast buffet since I am having BBQ on Saturday night. Gammon Ham, here I come.   Saturday: evilduxy (with card) and (^@^)". Just nice.  Sunday: ordway (with 2 cards), dennyz , raven1019 and ...
15	Sorry.  So many people pull out, I also sianz half.
2	wonder dreamer75 want to take over your slot bo
146	if u wan to pull out, let me know. i can go with duxy than we can have sunlight breakfast.
74	i just gave duxy my card..
84	You already show that face le, how can I be in the way of you and duxy?
14	not simple sia
70	Alway jiak buffet very sian, wanted to jiak ala crate this time round since last yr de seafood paradise @ flyer. Anyone missed the crab ? wanted to organise to go defu lane de seafood paradise because twtan say the yum ring until got dragon got tiger. then we went to flyer de to order but they say only defu lane exclusive.  I also missed the sauce for the crab , thus will organise a crabby affair for 10 pax  Anyone want to join ??? slot for grab !!!  Price: ??? per pax (price will be divided among those who went) ( previously think 40+ per pax) Date: 25/2 (sat)  Time: dinner time (7pm) 1)raven1019 2) 3) 4) 5) 6) 7) 8) 9) 10)
36	ordway so where and when to meet for sunday ?
114	wats yum? ??
82	Went 2 Saturdays ago. The cream crab is no horse run. The black pepper crabs is also better than Eng Seng. I paid $145 for 3 pax with 2 crabs and a veg dish.
376	2 crabs n a veg only 145?? wah tts freakin ex i guess i cant afford to jiak such elite meal
424	so want to join bo ??
12	don't need to worry about food standard. It has been exactly the same for the past 3 years. The breakfast menu hasn't changed since 2009.
6	Dropped by Kuishin Bo in Jurong Point yesterday after a whole morning out at the West side. Compared to the branch at Suntec, this one has limited varieties of foods. with Ikura. The Ikura I added it myself. The slightly salty salmon roes goes well with the silky smooth steam egg. - The pork belly was almost melt in your mouth texture, so yummy.
55	- Since the lunch buffet cost $30.90++ and I did not seem to eat enough to justified the cost. To reduce the loss, I made up by eating one bowl of the Salmon Roes which is supposed to be for the porridge topping. Thanks goodness they are not too salty.
11	then organise in 2 week time ? as next sat i working , thus next next sat / sunday either day i can go
8	can see that raven really really really wanna go eat.. but :x
6	I also want to go de. But...haiz....  But think after Jan, those who are holding their AMEX got no more promo?
70	borrow FAR card to use
110	Will be troubling those who have mah. Paiseh.  So how was your cockroach saga? Continuing to harass him with your account?
80	anyone wants to organize a makan outing to one of those Korean BBQ buffet places... I have always been wanting to go but unfortunately my acquaintances aren't into Korean BBQ...
1	korean bbq sure will have , SSK is the hotspot for here.
127	boycot the subforum , let the traffic fall
18	Tried the CNY Plates of Pleasure at 10@Claymore just now Not too bad - the best dish for us was the Sea Perch (boh picture cos we ate it up so quickly)...hahah My dining companion also liked the shark fins broth... Cooked food - as usual didn't touch  Carving station was salted baked salmon - very nice too Otherwise, everything was the same as our previous visits
54	The Plates of Pleasure look good. Any cc discount during the CNY period?
415	Wah, now weekend they also have plates of pleasure?  Does the sea perch taste like cod?   The meh meh looks fatty too.  Wats the item in the last pic?
2	The usual 4-for-3 for UOB cards
257	Yup, the sea perch tastes just like cod - nice and oily   The last one is US Angus beef - not as good as the one at Marriott though  We had like 4 rounds of the plates of pleasure...  Didn't eat all that much - just nice
17	Want to go?  I have never been to this buffet.  All of you said till got dragon got pheonix.  makes me so jelly.
15	It's actually quite nice - one of the better buffets around...  The only thing is that the refill rate for the lobsters are terrible - they kept coming out with just claws - I didn't even get to eat one body last night...  The sea perch was especially good - my dining companion had 5 servings
194	We mainly goes for the Plates of Pleasure and the price is not too expensive after the discount.
6	Is this Yum Cha a la carte dinner buffet good? $29 nett and sold 2800 coupons already.
151	Alway jiak buffet very sian, wanted to jiak ala crate this time round since last yr de seafood paradise @ flyer. Anyone missed the crab ? wanted to organise to go defu lane de seafood paradise because twtan say the yum ring until got dragon got tiger. then we went to flyer de to order but they say only defu lane exclusive. I also missed the sauce for the crab , thus will organise a crabby affair for 10 pax Anyone want to join ??? slot for grab !!! Price: ??? per pax (price will be divided among those who went) ( previously think 40+ per pax) Date: 25/2 (sat) Time: dinner time (7pm) 1)raven1019 2) 3) 4) 5) 6) 7) 8) 9) 10)
21	The menu does not look good n the pics n the actual items dun match one.  I think its rather misleading.
12	Last night just two of us - boh discount
37	We go again la, in groups of 4 pax.
5	I think I will wait for the next menu change haha
13	go when when when
5	You, me, twtan and toons?  Where is xmm pics from Sat?
128	i dont take pics only im not ah tan lol.....
63	He takes food only.  If he takes xmm, I will be
26	Wah, then its abt $61 nett wor   Unker jin elite
54	Once in a while indulgence   But considering that I didn't eat for the previous 4 days - works out to less than S$12 per day
314	wtf u nv eat for 4 days? u puasa ar?
226	Yup, fasting - bui bui unker mah - need drastic measures
6	You have just upgraded from cactus to air plant   The PoP looks good. For the lobster body, must go at 6pm then can take many many, esp those with roe
16	Think I am now truly undead   The PoP is not bad - although I only tried a bit of the sharks fin soup, it had lots of fins inside - quality is definitely there...  The sea perch was definitely the highlight of the evening - flaky and oily   Well, we reached there around 6.30pm - traffic on a Sat evening is horrible  I think they did replenish, just that we weren't fast enough...hahah
9	Wah ... i so looking forward to go liao.   Miss the cranberry cheese.
12	How? Put up sign-up list? Can go on a Wed or Sat?
5	LOL - go go go   Erm, I didn't see any cranberry cheese that day - probably not looking hard enough - I only scooped up my cottage cheese
9	I dont like going buffet on weekend, not unless at ulu places where it is not crowded. Plus i already got plans to go with a friend   But if it's really good, i dont mind go again   Claymore was my first outing and it's one of the better buffet for me with the PoP.
64	But i not air plant like you.   You eat 1 meal can last long long.   I every few hours must feed   So i must plan my meals properly.   I hope they still have the cranberry cheese. I like the combination and sweet and savory in the cheese. It's my cheat there.   The last PoP, only the beef is good. Kangaroo meat i dont fancy, unagi too sweet and crab i didnt bother also. The lobster and sashimi made up for it. But surprisingly, the cook dish wasn't bad that day. And with 1 for 1, can't complain liao.
126	Cos you are nowhere as bui bui as me mah...hahah  I have lots of reserve to burn off - someone said I could probably last as long as 2 months without food Not a sugar fan...hahah  We didn't even have any dessert that night - not even fruits This time round, the beef was not fantastic - a bit overdone   The lamb was okay but the highlight was the sea perch   The carving station was salt-baked salmon - very good as well
66	Is 4 days the longest you ever fasted?  Your fasting with with liquid stuff like yogurt n some cheese, nuts etc or totally just water?  Regardless, i am really impressed!  4 days! I at most 1.5 days nia.  Kudos to you!   The beef cannot ask them for rare?  Only once i went they very weird, said the chef insisted on cooking it well done.  End up the beef come out also chapaleng doneness *pengz*.  Got beef, lamb, n yummy sea perch.  I am so looking forward to it
1	What singtel deal?
87	UOB cards I have.  Wednesdays or Saturdays are good for me.  I not working.
11	Lol, your dining companion, the one tat takes and takes but dun eat one ah?  Then really cannot eat much.  Tat one must control, else gena slapped with wastage charge
8	Singtel red rewards for Birthday.   They have 1 for 1 for Claymore.   I used mine last month liao
1	Oh, so I get it in during my birthday month?  Is promo ongoing?
4	No idea but I doubt she used it.
7	Toons was saying tmr is the last day. Provided your birthday month is Dec or Jan. You can check out the singtel red rewards website for more info. I printed my voucher from the website last month and redeem it in Dec.
61	I agree some items don't match the menu pictures. Edible though. If they do this deal again i will purchase next round. Expiry too close now
9	Wah isit 1 for 1? I also Singtel user if have who wants go with me tml?? Haha Im jan birthday also lol  Okok I check le is I dine free but who wanna go we split among ourself wanna go let me know
31	here:  regards,  wacky
12	Nope, it's not...hahah This dining companion actually can eat but on that day, still a bit hung over
38	If your bd is in jan, then no rush.  The voucher can also be used 1 month after bd month, so its still valid in Feb.  Plus this current CNY plates of pleasure is until end Feb.
4	oooo delicious claymore CNY PoP. letz go soon~
91	me
4	Me suspect you and duxy got 1 leg.
4	We go?  Get 4 then 25% off.  I no bird-day in Jan.
2	Let put the name here.  1) (^@^)"  2) twtan  3) dennyz  4)
2	I only can make it on Wednesdays and Saturdays.  If the rest can only make it on other days then ignore me.  Thanks.  Will you all be organising the breakfast at Prego again?
16	Will have to ask those with the FAR card. I am still keen to go.
710	next sunday ?????
429	Don't Sunday leh.  If Sunday I will have to go at 6am then leave at 8am for work.
141	then sat can bo ?
11	for me sorry, will be going to Basilico on Sunday so will pass on buffets this week. As usual if anyone wants to borrow the card, as long as twtan/toons/denny vouch for them, I don't mind lending. (sorry, I've only met these three gents so far)
54	Can I borrow? hahah  Probably be for end Feb or end Mar
53	one thing to note, just use the card n pay cash.. jus in case they ask why your card and c.credit card different. And if guy name on card then make sure a guy is there.  Coz they have the right to gantong the card if owners lend the card to other ppl or use when he/she not around.
25	Thanks for the tip haha  Can also get one guy to show the FAR card and the other one to pay
37	If can borrow ordway and beta's card, only 4 pax can go.  The AMEX offer ended on 31st Jan.
6	we going next sat morning can bo ? this sat , i working shift and next sat ordway can go also right as he say this sat he cannot make it
2	i will go look see one day. seems nice..  just use it on Dinner or lunch.. since the card is being passed around. Maximized the usage lahs.  Other restaurants also just use ~
11	beta bo jio
5	i never even join them jio simi. u go dating with A&amp;F gals u also bo jio!
25	i jio u go sampan trip ai mai
600	u jio beta only boh jio me
50	my sampan only can sit 2 people de
19	Check closer to the day. Will probably be overseas then.
250	Sure, thanks in advance
15	For the lovers of indian food :- PS:  Personally, i tink their weekend buffet is a better deal.  Although its $38++, you dun have to take leave cos weekend plus its an ala carte buffet.
31	Thanks but no thanks - my Indian food phobia is still there
1	You guys should sue indian times for emotional distress!  After eating there, develop phobia for indian food.  Scarred for life
21	Btw, piggy, how was your cny meal at Gallery hotel?
48	Ya lor - jin emo...hahah  Haven't taken curry since
8	Maybe you can try ? Not happy with food, just pay S$1 and fck off. Damage kept to minimum, if any.
16	Nice but it's vegetarian
23	eat vegetarian once in a while? if need meat after the meal can go jiak something
47	Bui bui unker only got so much space/calories to fill each day...  No point wasting my quota
1243	Not bad. Nice environment. Limited spread but for the price, it's ok. I would have paid more to eat reunion dinner at a coffeeshop. So I am not complaining.
45	Anyone?
14	letz go then? lol
3	Keke.  The stove looks unique hor.  I tink look like UFO, donkey said like xue di zi ... as long as it is beheading the meh meh n oink oink ...
6	Count me in. After eating we go roller blade?   If confirm i bring my blades.   Only worry the wheels will pichar   Btw, just now i think i eat the PK is too barbaric liao cos not only waitress stare, the cook also beo plus delivery man also make comments. So embarrassing
29	I can't blade wor.  Last time i tried learning, end up 1 big bruise on my ass  Lol, what did they say?  Still ask why i eat with the PK plate far away ... tat is called 'si wen'.  Take from big plate n eat from small one mah.  Where got like you, plong the whole big PK in front of you and use hands to eat. Quite full now.  Burp also can smell the PK
6	u want to roller before u eat ??? exercise liao more hungry can eat more blade also lesser chance will be pichar
1	Now i know your strategy, you kay kay wan, kay "si wen".   Next time i will learn from you   Can't hear what they say exactly when their stares are loud enuff.   Lucky i thick skin
48	Thank you raven di di for your vote of confident ... jin emo now
31	Wah, so we can eat from 2pm until 2am ah?  Like that must chio PPP liao - those guys will go bankrupt siah...
4	If can, I will buy.
59	Buy liao then join us go jiak together
247	lol when goin the ufo thingy?? but it looks like those ah tiong restaurant when i walk past last wk lol
93	Good News - Bad News...  Let me start with the Good News...  CIMB World Card has extended its discount promotion for Marriott Hotel Singapore   Bad News is that Marriott Cafe has not resumed their famous Brunch
430	Then it's no news no more brunch
33	Well, once they finish their renovations, they might bring it back mah...hahah  Otherwise, without the CIMB promotion, not very worth it even if they bring it back
63	Saw the advertisement, no brunch yet.
45	Got almost one whole year to wait for the brunch to come back
200	No dates yet.   You keen?
29	Yeah I'm keen but only on this mth..nxt mth onwards not very free
245	If keen then buy voucher on your own ok   End of this month is ok for me but  gotta check with the Toons &amp; Dennyz cos they also bought the vouchers.
105	I n Beta ghost jiak prego tml at 8am...who gotch the far card wanna join meet at 8am
18	Thought you ate there last Saturday with Big Monkey?
15	Ish can eat again ma
109	That's what I thought too...hahah Guess he must really like the place  The only brunch I want to go back to is at Marriott
36	ok la...tt time got a few items nv try i dont mind go back plus 23 n i still need to pass him back the card so what better way lol...
1138	anyone got the card wanna join us?  if not just both nia.. hehe
217	arh, realli gd news, cos I hvnt jiak b4. so they extent the card for how long ar?
42	You so elite ar? Got the CIMB World card.
1	Until 31 Dec 2012  But I only gian the Brunch - the usual buffets are CMI haha
8	Now then you know ah
72	carey your side still not yet call me for the credit card leh
7	Oh forgot to tell you that I didn't manage to get 2 names so they won't be processing my request
21	so the promo ended ?
3	Yup ended
9	sho mani peepur apply for the hsbc visa infinite  sho muddy
85	LOL - no more exclusive haha  But the dining offers are terrible for HSBC anyway
589	I only qualify for ATM cards. Sho moody.
82	All the banks reject my request for CC..  im left with Debit kards nia..  So no meal discounts much leech discounts from ppl here  ~
27	me too :p but lust time my fwen went dinner oso not bad.  extent for 1 yr is gd news lah, re enuff time for them to relaunch the brunch. I juz scare tat the price will be very elite after reno
30	Why they reject u?  Your credit history is bad or cos u earn very little?
1	Beta is elite woah  You believe him? Haha
111	With the 50% discount, think will still be affordable haha  Only scare quality drop niah then sian
28	haha, not necc, juz look at the price of 333 b4 n after reno
65	Nope haven't been there after the reno
28	Elite like to act peasant.  Purposely mocking at peasant.
10	Actually SC reject me nia. I duno why rehs. My brother say bcoz always got cash back.. I get it liao i cancel kard. now they mai gimme. Basket.. Other than that cant be bad credit history, i got no loans, no unpaid stuff.
110	Ya lor
21	im really a peasant la. i act elite like log keel nia.
1416	Of all people want to act like logkill. Really kiam kan.
18	just ate at Basilico yesterday. Is it just me or has the spread changed alot?  No more prawn/shrimp/scallop salad. Seafood selection is skimpy. Used to have a great salad section but it seemed like the usual hotel salad section.  Pizza is decent as always, but the wagyu beef balls tasted bleh and the wagyu beef rump was meh. Sole fish was average too. The deserts were terrible too! Other than the gelato...  Don't feel like its nice anymore... Felt the brunch was worse that Melt the World Cafe's usual dinner spread.
62	Yup, I wasn't all that impressed by the brunch...  I thought the weekday lunch was better...hahah  Still waiting for the Marriott Cafe brunch to return
7	Hi guys, any place to recommend for a friday dinner? Can be buffet or ala carte. Any ongoing promotions would be a bonus.
100	sexposed piggy n his family de photo
32	If I have so many kids, it will be a nightmare bringing them out to eat.
573	Canton i sells them little critters
99	Swatchie, are you the one with the discount card for M Hotel?  Wats the name of the card?  The discount structure is the same as for FAR right?  Thanks.
1	Its called Ala Carte Membership.
64	hey guys.. been quite a long time since i check out this thread.. hahaha..  any upcoming buffets?  oh btw, i was walking around tampines mall and i saw this banner on japanese hotpot buffet.. anyone tried before?
56	Hey guys, any recommand buffets recently? Been to claymore few months ago. Was great.  Thinking of trying something new? Will be bring my family along. Abt 8 pax. Go claymore again? Saw the plates of pleasure like very nice? Or any other place?
619	I just went to PoP about two weeks back - their latest theme is more Asian - got sharkfins soup, scallop, sea perch (fantastic), Angus beef and Tasmania lamb...
1	Same lah - they just changed the name for CNY   UOB 4-for-3 promo applies
13	Hihi.  Never hear from you after raffles bar n billard.  Tot you gena scared off by our antics ... or appetite, prolly both   Now busy clearing vouchers, so not really much 'public' buffet outings.  Which place you interested to go, just post here n see if others keen to go or not lor.  If you interested in korean bbq, there are some who goes there regularly.  Hmmm, i saw this suki ya at katong 112.  Unfortunately, they deliver the meats only upon order, so cannot see the quality.  But i find pure steamboat a bit boring.  Prefer those combi bbq + steamboat deals.
4	Np.  The pricing for the ala carte card is similar to FAR right?  Cannot find the pricing on the membership website.  This ala carte card got quite a no. of participating restaurants wor.  Even Orchard Cafe @ Orchard Hotel also inside.
31	Aiyoh, you never tell them rich ppl no need to work one.  Just show them your bank account or deposit 1m or 2m in their bank lar.  Anyways you're a peasant with FAR card n drinks louis 13 hor.  Like tat i not even peasant liao
19	should be going to try next week bah since reviews for 10 @ claymore has been consistently good here. so long never eat buffet liao. old already cannot eat much
7	haha.... !! he is so rubbish !dont go there with too high expectation la. incase there is no lobster body left on display tray.
2	Cafe2k's breakfast so so. I held my wedding at M-Hotel, so had breakfast there the next day. I also stayed during Christmas eve so had Christmas Day breakfast there. Limited spread. Pretty normal stuff.   For Cafe Brio, I went quite regularly when they had the perpetual 1-for-1 buffet offer. Not bad if it's at 50% off, otherwise don't bother. Also, book early so you don't have to sit outdoors, warm and away from the food.
5	anyway are the rest of the buffet spread generally good?
14	its one of the nice buffet that i put in my list. If no lobster body, just tell chef, he will serve it to your table, which i always do that.
4	Works for chiobu. Not for bui buis like us.
7	i no chio bu, i am auntie. Haha
14	ahh great. hoping they have good desserts too.
0	sorry. dessert spread... i didnt hav much of impression.
5	Can one lar.  They are generally very obliging n helpful.  I once got them to grill the lobsters for me   Today, the ice cream fridge like a bit spoiled, the ice cream too soft, when i told them, they also change 2 new tubs of frozen ice cream.  Came over to my table to inform me of the new ice cream.  After i tried the 2 new flavors, i still like their  previous triple choc ice cream.  So i asked them to give me 2 scoops n they went back to get, plus its now properly frozen liao   You order from the plates of pleasure, dun want sauce, dun want veg, wan 4 pieces in 1 plate (highly recommended), all can tell them.
448	But bf spread cannot compare to lunch or dinner wor.  Hmmm, k, will wait for good promo then try cafe brio.  Thanks.  I also tried cafebiz @ traders recently when they had their 1:1.  Quite okay wor, considering the price.  I remembered tat time you also tried their brunch and found it pretty decent right?  Our eval std pretty close, heehee.  Any other decent buffet to recommend me?   Next my my radar is tiffany cafe.  I also heard good things abt it, considering its price of cos.
2	I think they do - just that I don't have a sweet tooth anymore so never try
19	Of course, if he's peasant, then the rest of us are Ask and it will be served...hahah  But my previous time there, we were too full to bother...  Just kept whacking the POP - more than enough
24	I agree.  The pop so yummy.  I esp like the sea perch n lamb.  I use to think your partner ate 5 portions nia, so little, but i eat 5.5 liao end up so full cos the fish is so fatty!  Machiam like eating the fish equivalent of pork belly   Shiok!  The lamb also got an outer layer of fats and is slightly charred n crispy.  Very nice too.
29	I actually had some reservations about the CNY PoP but glad that it turned out great...hahah  Yup, the perch was oh so shiok but gets gelat very fast...being able to down 5 portions is already a very big achievement - I only managed 3...hahah  I think the only "miss" that night was the Angus beef - not tender and maybe a bit overdone...  But I think using the Marriott Cafe's standard may be a bit unfair...hahah
14	Yea, the beef was not very good. While i like the sauce, the beef was chewy, even the later portions which was not overdone.  The Mariott ones using a higher grade of beef wor.  Meyer natural angus.  I tink their cows eat better than i do   The scallops we had last nite also not good.  While big, not very fresh, so the texture a bit weird.
276	Thought both Angus beef - should be around the same...hahah  Too chewy by far - a bit disappointed   Hmm...the scallops were okay for us that day - big and juicy - guess it may be the batch last night...  I was told that the sharksfin soup was good - my partner had like 3 bowls at least - I only had a spoon - too starchy for me
3	I tried lunch at CafeBiz. Not bad for the price. Limited spread but the quality is not bad. Think ah tan's friends didn't rate it that well.   Cafe Brio has some themes from time to time. Like Greek, Philipines etc. Their satays and teh tarek were quite interesting. Spread is pretty extensive. For about $45 for 2 pax, I would say it's worth it.
1	Ah tan, are we going for the pop at 10@claymore?
5	hahaha.. nope.. it was fun the other day.. been pretty busy nowadays..  i see thanks for the advise.. imma go try the suki ya some time next week with my friends.. hahaha
15	Let us know how it is hor.  If nice, can organise a trip there   Gum sia!
1	similar to prego?  nv state cannot use on weekend, but the selection looks misely.
2	Nope - it's NOT a buffet
5	opps wrong section. thanks for pointing out.
33	Tink carey just saying tat it not a bf buffet like prego.  Okay to post non buffet here lar.  Dun have to be so strict. Btw, tot you might be interested in this :- I like their pork ribs, but dunno abt the beef though.
67	Posted below liao. Can we put the name list up again?
20	Triple 3 has 1 for 1 buffet for SCB cards until 29th Feb.
4	I saw the recent reviews like quite bad
74	333 forever has 1 for 1 promo.  Even with the promo, you need to pay over $50 for weekday dinner.  Can you imagine paying over $100 if without promo?
4	I don't recall paying more than $60 for 2 pax including taxes and svc charges for lunch. It's not bad, but don't stand out enough to warrant a trip there.
19	They have quite a variety. But their sashimi quite fail to me. Not fatty and doesn't have the sweet crunchy taste that I like.   I think i paid $60-70 for dinner for 2 pax and it comes with a cheese baked lobster as part of some credit card promotion.
12	The price looks ok.  Taken from website.
4	Maybe cause of the 1 for 1 promo   Last time I ate once, not too bad. But even then wasn't cheap even with staff discount
23	It was good before the reno. After the reno, ambience got better but food went downhill.
22	I think so too...  It was one of my favourite haunts many years ago but haven't been there like for 5 years
53	Why you keep posting this?  I thought the general reviews were quite bad here? hahah
41	earn $8 referral?   bad review yet there are over 5000 sold?
11	my friends just went there for a lunch buffet. they said the sashimi was good but the fried items not as good as before.
0	not nice ah.....sorry
1	no such intention.....
82	tried it 2 yrs back.  food pretty nice.  fallback is its quite inconveinent.
1478	No lah, just then when an offer repeats itself too many times, we start to suspect about the quality...hahah
555	urrr...   regards,  wacky
93	seem like need to wait another few month for the 4 for 3 promo
13	quick check guys, wat is the full name of the korean bbq restaurant at chinatown tat some of u guys here frequent? can't remb the name and i need to make reservation for tonite....
4	Siseki?  Check out the chiobu boss.
16	Her name is Karen...hahah
11	and her no. is?    Was she the one who ate 5 portions of the perch?
30	Hahaha ... you don't give up do you   We feel happy for you carey
5	For me to know, for you to find out
58	I know who is the 1 from pop
34	arghh can't find the phone number of the korean bbq at chinatown in google...anyone still remb the number to call to?...
10	62256964
13	Trust evil to have it at his finger tips   Oei, i'll psycho the name outta you ...
1	thankx evil! u muz be a regular there sia...
1	Maybe you should try - shareholder
197	No need so difficult - Evil will say he's open to bribery   Of course, that's assuming what I told him is true
265	oh wow... my fav dinner buffet... Jan 28th somemore. Damn!  And the hotel is denying all responsibility. That's kinda of a dick move.  Lucky I don't really eat too much of shellfish at buffets. Never thought it was smart to take something that's been sitting out on display for so long. Especially oysters which is one of the most common food poisoning vectors.   I love the comment that she had so much diarrhea that she ran out of clean underpants. I remember the last time I got food poisoning in Singapore I was just hugging the toilet bowl all night and leaking out of both ends... Lost 6kg of fluid and stomach/intestine contents in one night... Master cleanser holds no comparison to good ol' honest food poisoning.  Never get food poisoning elsewhere but with Singapore's tropical weather so far got hit twice.
16	evilduxy, see u tml in the outing
2	back from ssk chinatown...good assorted quality of meats, marinated ones were nice but kinda sick of the taste after about 10-12 slices and went back to non-marinated meats...cooked food was forgettable though the braised pork belly was decent which i took a few slices (the others were fried saba fish and chicken parts in some tomato sauce thingy)...spam all the meats and bacon......service not say the best, and yes the cheerful lady boss quite chio wor, in a seductive white mini skirt somemore...
37	next up will be POPs at pan pacific...initally wanted to go today but it was alr fully booked (maybe thanx to this thread ) den decided to head to ssk instead...
10	wah... heng u are all right after eating...  been melt buffet once b4 and was my fav buffet too... but now looking at this i wonder if i would ever go back again...  regards, wacky
14	Melt to me is just another buffet, no outstanding dishes to make me want to go back again and again. And then the price is on the high side too.
2106	cant seem to find the ssk chinatown u guys are talking about. only found the novena and thomson. anyone knows the exact location or has a link to direct me too? tahnks
670	This joke very old n lame.
505	Just had breakfast at Conrad today. Spread quite limited and food quality not very good. Best dish was their pork sausages  $39++/pax.
246	any one going claymore today? if want, can PM me
3	Go on a wed la.
53	Piggy, want to fix a date to go? Even if not enough people, I can borrow from Toons his card to use for 20% discount.
7	This Wed or next Wed?
2	I also feel like borrowing the card from Toons...hahah
2	Go with us la. Then we can see the lady boss also.
11	Is his right hand.
15	Went on sat (Dinner) with my family to claymore. Place getting crowded. Not like few months ago. ( Sunday branch) Was full housed and we grp of 8 got to squeeze in a table of 2 or 3 i think?  Order for plates of pleasure, took quite sometime xia. Even ordering coffee, need to repeat order a few times. In the end, order a bottle of white wine, then they start paying attention to us. Lamb chop was great as usual. I think the source not bad leh. Sea perch also. Live station I tio salmon. Not bad. No see penang laksa like someone mentioned
1	I think your "menu" is the same as mine - also Sat with salt baked salmon...  Those guys went on weekday - so I suspect they rotate the menu...hahah  Did you get waffle/pancake/crepe at the live cooking station? If so, then the weekend menu is probably the same...
128	Then go to SSK lor
5	Huh?  Claymore also got chio lady boss?    Yea, then the 4 of you (with dennyz can enjoy the 4 pay 3 promo).
128	You need to read his post again
3	juz made a reservation at 10claymore, seen the menu like not bad sia, hope it is worth it for the price...u can email them for the menu if u wan to confirm the foods u like den reserve, they will reply u within 30 mins...
17	Piggy, why go on a wed?  Actually I celebrating so need see my dates..   I also hope can go with discount and promo.   If not wrong, monday is lamb. friday is Chinese meats at the carving station. Saturday is salmon. Both days at live station are crepes.no penang theme. That probably is on weekdays.
22	if i m not wrong, penang theme is only available from mon-thur? anyway i think the penang food they have there is the assam laksa + maybe 1 or 2 cooked penang dishes...fri is indeed chinese roasted meats for the carving station...
5	Wow, you guys are good...hahah  The salt-baked salmon was really good - especially if you can kope the belly part   Am tempted to go back again but I am stuck in my busy period
7	Next Wednesday cause I no time to go collect the card from Toons. But if we can get 4 persons then no need for the card already.
12	Ya lor, then the card can pass to me
63	Subjected to if we find 4 people to go.
119	got crepe. Pancake waffle I dunno.  Ice cream not bad leh. In the end, I think drink too much wine and coffee. Waste.   Lamb only ate 3 piece nia.
2	Why u guys so pathetic?  Sound like long time never touch women type!
26	anyone interested? nid minimum 4 pax thou.
6	I would like to go but only if weekday. Small eater though.
15	What kind of cuisine?
1	chinese menu, asked the boss. no diff in quantity from the their normal serving. their serving r very generous, make sure you bring an appetite. got mee siam thou.
13	Menu looks good. Where is the place?
112	Address:   6 Sin Ming Road, #01-01 Sin Ming Plaza, Singapore  Tel: +65 6455 4948
6	Count me in.  I always wanted to go there.
6	great, i do up a list soon.  i am lousy with suggesting dates. u have any date in mind?
5	If anyone going, I want to go too.
4	Weekdays I end at 10pm. So I can only make it on Wednesdays and Saturdays which are my off-days.
1	You all doing lunch or dinner? Minimum 4 pax?
0	Np, just let me know when you wan the card.  Btw, Carey, if you going on sat again n dun mind company, let me know.  I very tempted to try the salt baked salmon
5	Lunch I doubts many are free unless is on a weekend.
2	Keke.  See so fast already got 4 liao, you, me, ah tan, n piggy.Either wed dinner or sat lunch since you only free on those 2 days.  Rest okay?  If can, then indicate preference bah.  Yea, min 4 pax.  Wed 15, 22, 29 OR  Sat 18, 25.  I am okay with above except for wed 22.
7	Thanks Toons...hahah  What's the saying again - three's a crowd?   Just kidding - may be hard to confirm as we are usually very very last minute - I often have to beg and badger them to give us a last-minute table
3	Another way of telling Toons, he will be a spotlight.
6	Wah, got to be more diplomatic mah  Let me at least borrow his card first...hahah  20% discount not bad hor - I can save S$24
20	My priority is 10@Claymore as their current POP till end of the month. I can also do Saturday for dinner. I wonder what they have at the carving section on Wednesday. Maybe it's a suckling pig.
11	Okay, quick update...  I checked out the new Marriott Cafe just now - walked around the place and it's fairly decent...  They have a nice roast place - got beef roast, pork roast and baked fish...  Also had the usual cold dishes - includes crab legs, oysters but didn't see lobsters though...  Never open the cooked dishes but counted &gt;10 pots easily...  Hmm...but at $60++ a pop, probably only worth it with the CIMB World Card bah   Without the 1-for-1 discount, I rather eat at PoP
13	can i come too ?
365	Date: Wed 15, 29 OR Sat 25.  Location: 6 Sin Ming Plaza tower 2 Time: 6.30pm onwards Price: $22.90nett (weekday dinner)          $26.20nett (fri - sun dinner) Bus 410 Board at Bishan Interchange (53009), Bishan Street 13 in about 9 min. Alight at Sin Ming Plaza, Sin Ming Road, 9 stops later. Or take circle line to marymount than cut across the HDB and pass by ShunFu mart. Menu  1 . BigMonkey 2 . Evilduxy 3. BigMonkey's Guest 4. Twtan 5. Toons 6. Dennyz 7. striker22 (weekdays only) 8.
63	I am going Bar and Billard room for buffet with my wife and daughter.  Anyone can lend me the feed at Raffles card?
92	Then must be crepe - I didn't pay too much attention to it since I can't eat that...hahah  Also never tried the ice cream - maybe next time   The lamb - I think I had 4 bah - not bad at all   The disappointment was the beef lor - not as tender as I thought it would be...
42	The beef taste like beef mince leh. Sea perch not bad. Although my family got a few plates, felt fishy.
47	I am thinking we all go ahead with 15 (this wednesday), any opinion?
4	Date: Wed 15, 29 OR Sat 25.   Location: 6 Sin Ming Plaza tower 2  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $22.90nett (weekday dinner)           $26.20nett (fri - sun dinner)  Bus 410  Board at Bishan Interchange (53009), Bishan Street 13 in about 9 min. Alight at Sin Ming Plaza, Sin Ming Road, 9 stops later.  Or take circle line to marymount than cut across the HDB and pass by ShunFu mart.  Menu   1 . BigMonkey  2 . Evilduxy  3. BigMonkey's Guest  4. Twtan  5. Toons  6. Dennyz  7. striker22 (weekdays only)  8. Donkey (TBC)
16	So fast full liao?  Tempting.  Especially the garoupas.  I think I will just make my money worth eating a few garoupas, a fish head and some prawns.  LOL.
91	nv will be full for this restaurant.  if u interested, can add a number and ur nick to the list.   the more people go the more dishes we can try out.
37	Hmm...my beef tasted a bit tough...never really specify doneness...hahah  To me, the sea perch was very good - my dining companion is also quite picky but can clear 5 plates means it can't be bad...hahah
10	I will definitely be late cause need to transfer to bus at Bishan.
1	doesn't matter, most impt is you reach there in one piece.   can ask your colleague(the one that went to the black out restoran with us) to join us?
1	Date: Wed 15   Location: 6 Sin Ming Plaza tower 2  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $22.90nett (weekday dinner)           $26.20nett (fri - sun dinner)  Bus 410  Board at Bishan Interchange (53009), Bishan Street 13 in about 9 min. Alight at Sin Ming Plaza, Sin Ming Road, 9 stops later.  Or take circle line to marymount than cut across the HDB and pass by ShunFu mart.  Menu   1 . BigMonkey  2 . Evilduxy  3. BigMonkey's Guest  4. Twtan  5. Toons  6. Dennyz  7. striker22 (weekdays only)  8. Donkey (TBC)  9.  10.
54	New Super brunch from Ritz.
36	S$208++ per person?!   Too elite liao
3	Yea lor, just need min 4 pax, no max.  Anyways, i orginally added you in, but you said you preferred to go claymore.  So you wanna go for this or not?
3	I think some of us tried Jtown b4.  The food not bad.  At $9.90, if i dun remember the prices wrongly, i tink its superb value wor.
4	If tomorrow wed 15, then i have to pull out.  Tummy no space.  Paiseh.  Sat lunch okay though.
32	i think i stick to 15 feb, tomorrow.
14	Post review hor.  Then can whack the better dishes   Thanks!
4	Date: Wed 15, 29 OR Sat 25.   Location: 6 Sin Ming Plaza tower 2  Time: 6.30pm onwards  Price: $22.90nett (weekday dinner)           $26.20nett (fri - sun dinner)  Bus 410  Board at Bishan Interchange (53009), Bishan Street 13 in about 9 min. Alight at Sin Ming Plaza, Sin Ming Road, 9 stops later.  Or take circle line to marymount than cut across the HDB and pass by ShunFu mart.  Menu   1 . BigMonkey  2 . Evilduxy  3. BigMonkey's Guest  4. Twtan  5. Toons  6. Dennyz  7. striker22 (weekdays only)  8.   I have withdrawn cos i can't do tmr dinner. Oink oink, you can take over my slot
111	He last minutes very hard to jio him want. Later I go ask him. PS: I just asked him and he ok with tomorrow makan outing.
87	Date: Wed 15, 29 OR Sat 25.  Location: 6 Sin Ming Plaza tower 2 Time: 6.30pm onwards Price: $22.90nett (weekday dinner)          $26.20nett (fri - sun dinner) Bus 410 Board at Bishan Interchange (53009), Bishan Street 13 in about 9 min. Alight at Sin Ming Plaza, Sin Ming Road, 9 stops later. Or take circle line to marymount than cut across the HDB and pass by ShunFu mart. Menu  1 . BigMonkey 2 . Evilduxy 3. BigMonkey's Guest 4. Twtan 5. Toons 6. Dennyz 7. striker22 (weekdays only) 8. twtan's guest
14	1 . BigMonkey  2 . Evilduxy  3. BigMonkey's Guest  4. Twtan  5. Dennyz  6. striker22 (weekdays only)  7. twtan's guest  thank you all for your interest. i have made reservation for 10pax under my name. see u all tomorrow.
80	Er, what is your name?  Me forgotten already.
24	Bersah Monyet
9	those interested in the brunch , the highlight for that day
17	You saw the price or not? hahah
18	$244.80 for adult only , but the food is nice tried previously liao, worth the money for me
14	Wah, so many elites around.  My mouth cannot appreciate such fine food.  $244.80 can eat at claymore n other nice places a lot of times
14	different people different objective
6	True true   This one is to bring true love to enjoy one
78	Ya lor - too elite for me liao  I rather go back to Claymore more often (pun unintended) as well...hahah
1	Guys need some help here. Helping a friend organise a B-Day treat so wld like to know which wkend buffet dinners serve lobster? Personally i did some research and i narrowed down to 2 choices, Melt the world cafe or Greenhouse but wld wanna confirm with u experts that these 2 places do serve lobster? Which of the 2 wld be a better choice then? I am also open to other suggestions but budget limit to $80/pax. Thanks for the help~~
2	Don't you start on the true love thingy too.
5	Greenhouse. With UOB credit cards, it will be about $80 nett. Boiled lobsters. Not iced ones.
9	I rather go 10@claymore 5 times too.   Or top up abit more stay at the club level rooms at Ritz Charlton to enjoy the drinks and food. For 2 pax.
16	u know hor... i'm think there would be some ppl who enjoys splurging $$$ on elite food who don't like ppl who keep on saying again and again how much one would rather spend the $$$ on eating at &lt;insert place&gt; for XXX times... nor about how one dunno how to appreciate such fine food....  regards, wacky
3	Lol.  You're quite petty for a guy wor.  Oh well, as long as it makes you feel better
10	A no. of buffets serve lobsters, but like piggy said, , only greenhouse serves them hot.  The rest either serve them cold poached or in some lousy processed form like lobster bisque, thermidor etc.Only for today!  Or rather ytd
9	244bugs sho expensive brunch!
3	With liqueur wor.
33	petty...?? about what??   i'm just showing u that ppl are free to post watever preferences they like or don't like... and they are free to keep on doing that... there is no need to ask ppl to stop doing that just because one doesn't share the same preferences and doesn't like reading it...   regards,  wacky
44	can i meet someone near mrt or how to go? haha
1	Ok noted with thanks. Any idea whats the full price per pax without using UOB cc for dinner buffet on sat?
17	meet 6pm at bishan mrt. u wan to go bishan earlier to play game?
5	sounds good.
21	dreamer shu shu sho late haben sleep? tomorrow ghost zoo see panda?
498	u no work? meet what time?
36	club food at Ritz suxs.  Just cheeses, and hors d'oeuvre. They did have a promotion period once where it was a cheap upgrade at $30 per day. That's a steal then.  Only good if you're a drinker. Plus the club rooms are the same as the standard rooms. Admittedly Ritz Carlton Singapore rooms are one of the nicest (largest with huge panel windows with great view either of Kallang  or cityside). Bathroom and Bathtub is excellently large. Great place for a quick getaway with a loved one during the day if u work at Raffles Link especially since the corp rate for Ritz is one of the lowest.  Speaking of which, how was everyone's Valentines? Spent the day all by my lonesome self... Sigh long distance is good most times but crappy in some situations.
19	Will meet you all at the restaurant.
33	anyone went to the newly revamped marriott cafe so far for their buffet? previously went before it was revamped and it was pretty good, dunno if the quality is still there now... heard the main chef who was previously in charged was changed...
23	I went to take a look when I went for my dinner at Wan Hao the other night - not bad - quite a lot of few counters, including a big roast section - roast beef, roast pork and baked fish...  Counted no less than 10 pots of cooked food, the usual cold section with crab legs, oysters (didn't see lobsters though)...   Also big section of desserts and carbs like bread...
71	Wan Hao dinner is ala carte Chinese dishes?
8	Yup, it was when I went there for dinner...  Not bad but not fantastic - I left half-way through the 10-course dinner so may not be a fair opinion...hahah
3	Wan Hao must eat ala carte. Their sets usually not so good. And they serve good but expensive Chinese tea.
6	I wasn't the host...hahah  My HK client typically orders ala carte but don't know why he chose a set that night   The tea we had was supposed to be tieguanyin but it tasted more like a pu-er mix
9	went recently under the CIMB World Card 1 for 1 promo. The way they charge 1 for 1 is similar to Triple Three. The food was lousy after the reno.  Price is similar to say.. Claymore but quality was much lower. Won't go back again.
18	Thanx for the inputs ...took a look at their friday dinner menu and it wasn't really appealing, quite a amt of changes i see from their old one...yeh claymore is prob better or even the slighly pricier carousel...least they have lobsters there...hmm tot wan hao is more famous for their dim sum? lol
118	Wan Hao I think they only serve dim sum during lunch.
367	Anyway, I never really liked the Marriott buffet, other than their brunch...hahah  But given the 1-for-1 with CIMB World card, it's quite "cheap" - maybe that's the only saving grace? hahah  And I think I would choose this over The Line any time
26	thank you all that turn up for today buffet. it was fun, see u guys tis sat.   dennyz, wan to plAy game before buffet?
56	bad news woh....sat is full woh...might have to change to sun or some other days le
654	i suggest sun.
30	Thanks for sharing.  I'll be getting this one.  Looks interesting.  I also getting this :-  If you getting too, let me know if wanna go together
1	- A wee bit on the "Q" side but it goes well with the sambal sauce. - Their Peranakan version of mee siam which accounted for a much richer taste. - OK, a couple of us find this to be on the the sweet side, that is the sauce I meant. - The crispy batter hide a juicy mid wing and best of all you can taste the prawn paste.
0	- The chicken cutlet is crispy on the outside and still moist on the inside but the Thai chilli sauce seem overly sweet. - This Prawn &amp; Meat Roll is too finely minced, could do with a coarser mince. - When I dug into the flesh, it was just too hard. Apparently the fish head had be steamed much earlier so the flesh had dried while waiting to be served. The fish head was quite fresh though.
0	- I am not sure this dish is called as I did not order it. - Another mystery dish, hope I got the name correct. - Spicy and sour enough for me.
1	- I don't about others but I actually find the mango too hard although it was shredded. Instead of the usual crushed peanut, they use hei bi (dried prawns) here. - Denny commented that they had used Yee Mee instead of the yellow noodle. - A very small fish, fried till a bit too dry. All of us were wondering if this was sweet and sour sauce or really sambal... - Too soggy for me. If only the prawns were crispy and fresher.
0	- Very tender beef which everyone liked. - At first we thought this was black pepper beef till we asked. Not a hit for us. - Came with sweet and sour chilli sauce but I found the batter too thick though crispy. Denny said it tasted like very soft fish meat.
0	- Did not eat this so the rest please comment on it. After that the young children wanted to go eat desserts so we two old men follow them to  further down the road. The place was crowded with customers even though it's 9pm plus in the evening on a weekday. Salted Caramel 246F Upper Thomson Road Singapore 574370
52	- Very thick shiok dark chocolate but it overpower the Avocado's taste. Can't remembered what Monkey and Denny ordered for the drinks. Home Sweet Home
6	Hooked on Heads doesn't look appealing. You all only ordered one garoupa? Try Matta Thai at Bishan. $10 for Claypot curry fish head. Well executed and value for money.
50	Anyway, later I am going to Chui Xiang with my parents...  Hopefully I remember to take pictures
22	i went before already, very normal.... scholar will be better... if u sit indoors, u will come out smelling like the hotplate...
4	I tink it looks good.  Knowing them, the food in the pics were only the tip of the iceberg   Hows the curry for the fish head?  The fried fish fresh?  Small nevermind since buffet, impt thing is must be fresh or at least not fishy.
1	Enjoy the smoked duck!!!
0	Thanks bro.  Prob with scholar is its inconsistency.  Scholar has wider variety or fresher food?
3	I also rushing to go before expiry date
5	i heard the smoked duck in special sauce and the claypot chicken wrap in cabbage was good in chui xiang...the lobster porridge oso i think...wanted to go but i at west side sia...
1	I intend to but my parents like can't eat much also...hahah  Don't want to over-eat cos tomorrow still got makan Ya lor, 22 Feb is the last day right? hahah  Today is the last day I can squeeze this makan in - next week is like no need to sleep...sian
12	Then you should have joined us the last time - I also stay west
2	Yea, the dishes you mentioned all good.  Although i dun eat porridge, but i end up drinking the broth.  Too bad the porridge n cabbage chix only 1 order.
23	You should know Piggy got "high" standard one. Remembered what he said about Prosperous Kitchen?
22	Yeah, ends 22 feb.   Even though i am trying to find time to go this week.   I might still have extra to clear next week   But i don't mind since the food is decent.
3	wah gotch xtra coupon can let me know
5	You want eat with my family meh?  Mai lah ... i shy
361	chey...i thought u gotch xtra n notch goin with ur family...okok
18	Chui Xiang the standard like dropped a lot leh... No mood to take picture  Anyway, we spent only an hour there... The only things I ordered twice were the smoked duck and deep fried intestines... Otherwise, the rest were forgettable - even the "house specials" Oh, the place is damn quiet - only like 4 tables besides ours...
76	No la. I more particular about fish and prawns. The way you describe the curry fish, garoupa and cereal prawn like very disappointing leh.
21	order twice? is it ala carte or buffet?...bo order the claypot chicken arh...
17	It's ala carte buffet...  The claypot chicken is single order and for 3 persons, it came in a bowl, not a claypot...  Got super a lot of MSG, I started to have itchy throat towards the end of the meal and my mouth is super dry now
539	tat's the thing abt eating outside lo...super lots of salt and msg den mouth very thirsty esp when drinking soup or curry n eating pork knuckle with the thick sauce...when reach home always have to drink at least 5 cups of water... actually tat time when i went ssk and spam lots of bacon oso feel damn thirsty sia after tat...
63	Alamak ... I going soon leh.   But Toons went before CNY and he say still good.   I hope my trip will not be disappointing.
1	Bacon has lots of salt. It's normal.
6	You never hear before this saying that food standards will go downhill after Toons' visit?
5	Hahaha. Geez, i overlooked that.   Some more that CNY was not his 1st but 2nd visit to the place.   Double whammy
80	Gum sia hor ...
2	All I can advise is go with a lower expectation...hahah  Anyway, the "service charge" for 3 pax came up to S$22 (we ordered tea)...
8	thats what i learn also after eating with him a few times =x
0	orh, Carey kor kor.   I bringing my father there so hopefully he will not make noise.   I dont remember the last time we went, we paid so much for service charge.  Or is the tea expensive?
70	so wat about claymore ley??   regards,  wacky
4	Can you don't jinx the place please?!  Later going you know
28	I don't think it's "bad" but not as good as I remembered it to be...  Maybe old man memory boh ho...hahah  The tea is S$2 each, then got pickles and paper towel and then GST and service charge on top of everything
6	Anyone knows if can claim parking from hotel when dining at 10 @ claymore?
47	Yes, you can - doesn't seem to have a limit on how many complimentary coupons you can claim too
6	So it is true, not CSB.  Nooooooooooooo.
30	We paid only $26 extra the first time we went there, and we have like 6 paxs right?  I also paid around $6 per pax extra when i went right before CNY.  Tot it was due to CNY, so did not make noise.  The first time, did we order tea and throw back the pickles?  Go chinese restaurant for buffet, i normally throw back the peanuts n pickles one, but the 2nd time, they said cannot
14	The first time I don't think we ordered tea - just plain water (no charge)...  Yup, the T&amp;C now changed, saying we cannot return pickle and paper towel...  But how come I paid more than S$7 each extra?
22	$60 and above. So each pax is already eat over $60 for buffet can claim I think
25	Anyone interested in joining dennyz and me for this tomorrow?  We will have a look at their menu.  If lousy, then go to plan B (not decided yet, but prolly another buffet in the area  )
8	[QUOTE=Toons;64180941]Anyone interested in joining dennyz and me for this tomorrow?  We will have a look at their menu.  If lousy, then go to plan B (not decided yet, but prolly another buffet in the area  )  /QUOTE]  monkey say add his name down~. we going lunch hor?
3	Okie!  Yea, for lunch.  Dinner only ala carte nia.  If the menu sucks, then we go to bugis jiak bbq steamboat.  I bring the vouchers for bbq steamboat just in case.  Onz?
5	the bbq steamboat voucher, u buy how many?
7	3.  Still selling though.
9	i anything~
18	if we r changing location, can i use 1 or have to buy my own?
76	Use mine.  3 of us, 3 vouchers, just nice
19	hahahaha... enjoy your claymore... u favorite phrase huh...? don't always everything also anything... wait ppl bruff u bring u to geylang and sell u also anything...   regards,  wacky
16	u very weird leh.. we talking about go where eat, u also anyhow link.. plz leh -.- and also, i was thinking to if u want go eat KL hokkien mee at geylang anytime soon .
17	wat bbq steamboat voucher?
35	thanks
31	At 10 @ claymore. Quite disappointing :/
232	wah u mean it really got jinxed ah...   regards,  wacky
18	For the roast station, only sio bak and char siew. No lamb, beef, salmon or anything. Quite disappointed when I saw them serve those meats for it :/   Lobster were of a decent size, taste ok, though I'm not a big fan of any seafood on ice. POP were...meh. Shark fin was diluted, stock wasn't good. Diddnt like the scallop. Lamb was nice, sea perch too. Beef was way too thin. Tasted like a normal piece of striplion then angus. Cooked food was forgettable. Lamb shank was decent. Desserts weren't good. Crepe and ice cream were ok. Service was good though, attentive servers and manager were nice and courteous.
6	I was there too just now...hahah  The sio bak was okay niah...but not spectacular  The scallop was different from the first time we went - they switched from the big juicy one to the small shriveled one...  Beef smelled funny and only had 2 pieces...  Lamb was okay although my companion didn't have any...  Perch was also smaller and didn't taste as fatty as before...  CONFIRMED KENA JINXED BY WACKY!!!
10	Yeah...thought the perch tasted like the seabass from the cooked food section. No fatty parts at all. Felt bad as was my brother's birthday and he diddnt enjoyed it too much lol.  Desserts were honestly pretty ****ty lol. Asked the chef what one of the shooters was, she told me chocolate moose. In the end is passionfruit moose with some chocolate shavings on it. Chocolate moose?! Not to mention flies on the fruits...  Think I enjoyed the crepe the most. Durian crepe. Quite nice but of course not those D24 durian paste or what
12	Pooor Carey ~~~~~   Didn't u feedback to managent ?
12	went to carousel juz now...perhaps u guys should gone to that or try it nxt time? it was pretty gd even for the costly weekend price...they had 1 whole huge baked salmon there (funny no one took the belly so i hoot all of it), another whole snapper, baked trout and another huge fish done in mediteranan style...other cooked foods got beef rendang/lamb curry/king prawns etc...roast section got roast beef/ribs/whole chicken, the usual cold seafood section of sashimi, lobsters and oysters...desserts were decent as well...service was good too...one of the better buffets i have try so far...
1	Nah - it's okay   Won't be going back so soon...hahah  And the company more than made up for it
16	lol.... wan to blame... blame toons first.... i tot he like went there for... wat... at least 5 times...??   after blaming him den come and blame me for reminding...   regards,  wacky
4	buffet must go before toon go loh
21	wah sianz....like tt dont feel like goin to nxt wk le
332	you missed reading out those.  maybe they save the effort and good foods for tomorrow private function booking. hope the day i go, food will be considerably decent
158	The main highlight was supposed to be the POP anyway...which was nothing to shout about
9	Yup, the standard definitely dropped in just two weeks...  Even the sharksfin soup - much lesser fins as commented by my dinning companion...sigh  The first time we went, it was chocked full of fins...  The scallops were also different...
82	Got ppl already posted that fri is likely chinese meats liao.  Sigh, actually the main draw is the pop, but if those the stds also drop ...
3	Frankly I don't mind Chinese roast but they don't even have roast duck - that was what we had during one of our earlier POP outings with donkey...  The braised lamb shank was okay as well but that's about it...  As usual, we never eat dessert although we did try the ice cream
25	Still remembered someone took the drumstick.
27	It's a buffet mah - of course can ask for the drumstick
176	Did you try the seafood pot beside the lamb shank? Had the boston lobsters, prawns in it. Not too bad cos the soup was sweet, could do with a dash of cream... The vegetable lasagna wasn't too bad too.
12	Nope didn't... Too much work to peel the prawns and crack the claws...hahah We don't eat carbs - so no lasagna for us...hahah Were you sitting in the round table just beside the dessert table?
20	no hoot the desserts oso? like tat can get ur $$$ worth in buffets or not...i c u eat like will lugi lei...
5	The ice cream not bad wor.  They said its Kipatan or something, imported from NZ.  I like the triple choc one.
14	any outing today? i very steady one, can go now.
2	Nowadays, the amt he eats, confirm lugi one.  Tat time go korean bbq buffet with him also.  End up he waiting for us to finish eating.  But then again, he is there for the company, food is secondary
5	You used the singtel bd voucher?
2	carousel uses magnolia ice cream...can u actually believe it? lucky i ask b4 i go take, if not i waste space on this rubbish ice-cream lo...i c many pple go take i ....
0	huh korean bbq can hoot lots of meats and bacon ma...no need to feel guilty if on low carb...
8	Nope... Used UOB. 4 for 3.  Wah the ice cream damn disgusting yesterday. Got 2 flavour. 1 is like vanilla with some raspberries. Another tasted like soap. Think it was lavendar. Only brought out the choc was at 9.30pm, was nice...  And nope, was sitting like infront the ice cream there.
1	Yea lor.  I remembered the choc desserts there quite good.  The bread n pudding also not bad.  Dunno why ppl bothered with the ice cream, besides, its forever those 2 miserable flavours nia.  I also liked the whole salmon there.  But never tried their roasted beef n lamb before.  Nice?  They also have a molecular gastronomy section right?  Anything exciting there?
21	Its more his appetite a lot smaller now.  Too much fasting if you ask me
64	got 3 flavour yest...almond pecan, choc, vanilla iirc, it actually looks appealing on the outside but when i think it's magnolia brand i juz can't go near it lol...roasted beef was v.gd (tender n pink), lamb was rendang style, tad hard but passable...they had this chicken meat which is use in the turkish kebabs, i had lots of this, juicy n oily...molecular gastronomy means? the live station or the seafood section? they have chefs there to prepare hot aglio aglio, pasta too etc..downside is no pork meat cos halal....
13	Ah Tan, are we still going 10@Claymore next Wednesday?
53	How much is Carousel now?
2	Er, so far only two of us nia. Think we postpone it till more people going.
4	Aiyah, eating out is for the pleasure and the company, not to get my money's worth...hahah  If I want to get my money's worth, I rather cook at home
2	LOL - the other ice cream is lemon grass flavour...hahah  We thought it was quite nice...  I remember got a group of guys sitting near the dessert - maybe it's ice cream   Lao unker's memory no good...hahah  Wah, you guys stayed until so late ah, we left around 8.45pm  Not bad liao, almost 1.5 hours there - but maybe it's because service was slow last night that's why...sigh
18	Bui bui unker is like that mah - cannot eat too much liao   No lah, that day the Korean BBQ wasn't that nice...hahah  Don't have my favourite bacon - sian half   But if I go SSK, confirm can eat a lot woah - I think...hahah
12	elite sia...no wonder pple say u r super elite in the low carb thread...go buffet spend so much but eat so little...
471	No lah, people CSB niah...  Anyway, I definitely eat less buffets than people like Toons woah...  So his buffet bill per month is definitely much higher than mine   Most of the time, my meals are very simple - I cook them myself and usually cost &lt;$5 per day (since I just eat a meal a day)...hahah
426	Ahh. Nope, was with my family. Right infront of the ice cream got a group of girls, was just behind their table.   Dono leh always have the tendency to stay till late for buffet. Reached about 6pm left 9+.
700	Oh okay, wrong group then...hahah  Quite forgettable experience so we left early
717	can whack meat mah.
10	There is also a limit to how much meat I can whack ah...hahah  I don't have a bottomless pit unfortunately
38	Hi Elite Carey unker.
176	Wah lao - kena suan by real elite   Don't like that leh
7	Now got new term. We are all known as tau geh.
107	Bought the Tung Lok Groupon Vouchers. Any recommendation on which Tung Lok Buffet to go to: Seafood dinner or Zhou's Kitchen?
600	When u feel heypi jiaking, tat is marnee worth le mah. Intangible worthiness
52	Oh, i feel better already.  Cos that night i definately eat more than you
1	That's why the mentality is so different between us Asians and the Ang Mos...  In US etc, they treat the whole dinning out as an experience - they even take the trouble to hire a babysitter etc so that the couple can spend quality time together...hahah  Definitely there's more to just the act of stuffing our faces with food
17	Like I said, food is secondary, the company is more important...hahah  So when is our next makan outing ah? hahah
75	Waiting for you to jio   Btw, my chui xiang experience wasn't that bad. My dad likes it.   It was full house on a Sun lunch, only becos all the tables were using vouchers   I have a session there again tmr cos it's the due date.
3	Hmm...do we have any more voucher gatherings? hahah  Glad to hear that your Chui Xiang outing was still quite okay...  Maybe we went on their off-day   The food quality is definitely not enough to entice me to travel that far to go back on my own...hahah
201	anyone know wacky hp number? can whatsapp/sms/pm me? Kamsias..
77	You can PM him here mah...  He replies quite fast...hahah
4	We still got honjin.  Will be in Mar as the expiry is end mar.  You also bought siamese cat right?  Tat one if you wanna go together so tat can try more dishes n for my company  , let me know.
38	No comments?
414	Ok - will wait for you to arrange Honjin  Siamese Cat is expire when ah?  I also bought for my parents...hahah  The UFO one is through which coupon site ah? I forgot...hahah
679	yeah, like when they go for the exp sundae brunch, they r there mainly to consume the wines n champagnes but we stuff ourselves silly wif so much food as if we hv been starved for months
60	Ok, my next brunch, I will drink like that - maybe it's more worth it   But too expensive for me
28	if i earn 25k per month, i also can be like those ang moh, drink wine whole day.. i have to make my money worth while if i got peasant pay.
115	if u are a good drinker and u like to drink.
44	I know got fish n chip, not too sure about the duck.
91	Aiyah, we are all here to share our views mah...
9	hi guys anyone knows if there currently is any 3 for 4 buffet credit card promotion (for any credit card) going on now - application for sunday lunch and hopefully lasts till end march? i got my ah ma bday in mid march and we are thinking of having a big family buffet gathering at a hotel (want it to be alittle posh)  group size ~20 pax do advice. thanks!
8	If you're interested in Claymore, give them a call, ask to speak with their manager n see if he can give you a discounted rate for your grp of 20 paxs.  If dun wan claymore, then got other hotels offering 1:1, 3:2 or 4:3 promos.  Got budget n cuisine in mind?
3	For the cc problem, you can alway check with the hotel. Anyway do make reservation in advance since you have a big group. Also for March no idea what they will be serving for their Plates of Pleasure.
209	ok thanks!
36	Evil duxy and i went to Equinox for lunch buffet. Today so heng got special. Freaking big arse Scallops live station. Cozx got big shots from the hotel come. Some set up are new.. the mains also more choices! he took pix for lao tan!
8	bo jio
25	Wah, so heng.  If they bring back the foie gras, even more heng
4	kk beta kor kor main  moi main  the big ass scallop tt beta talk about...very the juicy n yummy  today got ham ham ham   oysters n shellfish
24	jiak dessert  this creme brulee ish good   ice cream also jin ho jiak   then now ish bill  nv take too much photo cause i ish busy jiak food
1	show them the shell + your palm!
1	Got.. if u pay extra 15bucks, give u 70g one if u order the main of beef.. lol..
4	59++ before discount. 1 main dish + the rest buffet.  Dinner ala carte.
1	scallop leh???
4	tt 1 cannot show inside gotch sexpose some1
26	right after the main jiu shi scallop....big juicy scallop
8	What are the choices for the main?
12	if ish zeh zeh, prease sexpose. if kor kor, pls blank out the face. san q.
61	Wah, they grilled the prawns together with the scallops ah?  Looks so yummy!!!  How many did you guys whack?   Also got clayfish.  Other than tat, the rest looks like the normal spread.  Still, you guys damn heng wor.  The scallops, if big n fresh, already worth it liao.  When the big shots visiting again?
159	we wacked 3-4 nia.. i eat lots of crab though.. they do until out of stock.lol.. one of the better dishes there! Freaking huge n fresh though!
270	hey evilduxy, how come it is 1 for 1? :p
77	They are using the FAR card.
46	Speaking of which, I need to borrow a FAR card for end Mar   Want to chiong the Equinox Pink Champagne brunch
1	Beta promise to jio go Equinox but bo jio
39	For tian mi mi ?
14	Siang si tian mi mi?   How come I don't know?
11	I was referring to the ice cream at Equinox   Who are u referring to ah?   Btw, ytd Chui Xiang was good. Coupled with good company, it was very enjoyable. Although i feel like ordering a few more dishes but the gentlemen full liao so i pai say   They are closing by end of this month. They will move close to where Toons is. The waitress so nice, ask me to look out for the voucher deal coming out in April. Let's keep each other in the loop if we see ok
7	They'll probably move back to the east by the end of Apr ...
10	Hahaha ..... all thanks to the Prince of Buffet.   Esp they still don't know they are moving so close to the Lion's den   But please let us go eat at the new place first before you go
8	Amara buffet:
19	Auntie n boy boy damn lousy.  How can stop b4 you?  Nvm, next time we go together, you can order all you want.
13	That is why i like eat with you all mah.   Sure eat more than me and i will feel less guilty.   Boy boy eat very little ytd, maybe his backside still painful
3	Omg...what kinky stuff btay do with the xdd pigu
9	borrow your post thanks  is this buffet good?  TIA
16	Lol ... you remembered! For us to know n you to find out
5	Their Chilean Sea Bass is very good. You can also search for pictures and reviews by some of us here.
30	rast min huans.. i ish duno why gotch special ystd.
3	I got AL to clear, I jio you go can?
2	card not with me now. is with duxy.
31	OK lor, then I go jio Evil liao.
19	Buffet any onE??
15	Since u got AL to clear, wanna do lunch?   If u jio evil for Equinox then i can't go liao.   Not unless got 2 cards.   I not xmm so beta di di no jio me
2	Then I go take the card from Evil and jio you instead.
6	ok thanks bro
9	Wah ... like that also can ah   If no have the card, we can do other lunch too.   I think we keep saying Shin Yuu but have not go yet.
4	i go with guy nohs.  i think he needs the card this weekend.. so after he use u all can have it. hehehe..
29	i wanna go the breakfast one.. and the Japanese Ala Carte one. Anyone keen?
3	Saga in the making ... You meant prego for the bf?  Jap ala carte one is which one?
11	Thank you Beta
4	Want card must find me at east side lazy travel far
4	Ok .. i am at east
9	can shun bian jiak overated n sexpensive hokkien mee.
9	Can try tat tze char with the nice sambal chilli at bedok fc mah.
13	Since you mention this, last night i already jio Denny to go next week.   I miss the BCM there, intend to cheat on the wanton    Anyone else keen to join in?
0	hahahaha saga!   Yeah.. i love the eggs.. and some dishes.. np. Just be sure to pay in cash or go with a guy. Just in case the fellas are awake n they realise the card name n credit card different name. Cash.. they wont ask. Cant be they ask to show ur NRIC etc.
3	I got good timing when it comes to food   How come you miss the BCM, but then intend to cheat on the wanton?  You referring to the fried wanton in the BCM?
6	evening after work or off days go?
1	he lib at eunos
3	Thanks for the advice.   I no xdd to go with me so will just go find a lao nan ren to go with me Go after work. Say next Thurs at about 6:15pm?
1	bedok fc bcm...?? which one..?? at the interchange??   regards,  wacky
0	The wanton is from the BCM stall.   I will skip the mee and just wack the wanton and minced pork soup.   Denny say the reason why the wanton is so nice is becos they put the crispy pork lard inside the filling. Eat with the chilli padi is jin shiok   The kidney mee sua stall also there.   And of course Denny fave sambal kang kong and BBQ.
12	No. I am referring to the one at Blk 511.
2	You pick a day for Shin Yuu, I go take AL. But hor, next week Tue, Wed and Thur cannot hor.
12	Weekdays or weekend?Then I cannot go liao. Got buffet.
120	Ok but i prefer do Equinox first.  Will arrange with you again after Evil pass me the card
1	Wah, you got buffet on tue, wed n thu too?
2	Wed only but I don't want back to back buffets.
90	Oh, i tot she referring to the outing to Bedok to eat BCM n tze char? So Bedok on tue n thu okay for you.  Just not shin yuu?
69	Bedok ok but not Shin Yuu for those dates.
19	Just went for lunch...  Horrible is the word - really tionged place..  All the marinated meat tasted the same cos they were just covered in chili powder...  The "ginseng chicken" soup was full of MSG and there's no chicken inside...  Place was damn hot and quite stuffy even though there were like only 2 other tables occupied besides us...  And seriously, oil-less Korean BBQ is a flop - the meat all came out dry and tough...  Really got to stop buying these coupon deals...hahah
14	haha not all deals are bad la....  some like santouka pork cheek ramen deal is damn good....   anyway between that place and indian times... how would you rate it...??   regards,  wacky
16	India Times is the ultimate liao...hahah  At least there were a lot of food but just not very nice...hahah  IT was just bad - period
3	Cham, they still post :-  'Signature! Herbal Ginseng Chicken Soup for Steamboat Soup Base  NO MSG! Nourishing and delicious!'  At least can use it to wash the meats
7	sounds jin jialat...so wat did u choose to eat in the end?...
2	oh the kidney mee sua....i also wanna join...the mince pork noodle not bad...try be4 last time ~ ~
3	okay i guess IT is still the benchmark....   regards,  wacky
45	toons, any buffets u have go so far or recently tat is gd and u wld recommend? i know taste is subjective but after seeing ur photos, i'm like u too mainly go for the meats and fats and desserts...
73	I ish very easy one - I anything also can eat...hahah  As long as not carbs can liao   My dining companion also boh jiak carbs so very easy
571	hello people here, i am hungry
8	For fats n meats, its korean bbq buffets FTW!  Ssikkek or Corner Place@Marina Sq are my favs.  For complete buffet experience, its those hotel buffets.  Good value ones are Tiffany (Furama Citycentre), Square (Furama Riverfront) n Straits Cafe (Rendezvous).   If i feel like indulging myself, it will be 10@Claymore due to their current plates of pleasure menu, Elements (Amara) for their baked chilean seabass n cepedak cake, Carousel which i find quite consistently decent n Brizo (Park Hotel Clarke Quay).  In terms of better desserts, it will be Line (Shangrila), Oscars (Conrad) and Melt (Mandarin Oriental), although their food not outstanding enough to justify the price imo.  Actually desserts wise, i am happy as long as got durian pengat.  So its Tiffany, Straits Cafe and Brizo.
6	bro, whats the damage range for hotel buffets... say Tiffany and Square @ Furama's
8	Sorry for the confusion.   Bedok outing on Thurs ok? Cos some of them got buffet on Wed   Ah Tan, this is not buffet, can i start list here?   Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:15pm   1. Donkey   2. Donkey's guest   3. Denny  Please add on
6	How long you all staying till?  If 10.30pm still there, I will pop by after work.
6	guys, what are your having at Bedok??  I finish work at 5pm, Pasir Panjang area... should be able to make it by 6.15pm-6.30pm...
27	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:15pm  1. Donkey  2. Donkey's guest  3. Denny 4. twtan
58	so early........ cannot.........  regards,  wacky
2	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:15pm   1. Donkey   2. Donkey's guest   3. Denny  4. twtan  5. Toons
2	will be 11 pm by the time u reach there!
8	Abt $24 nett for weekday lunch at Tiffany n Square.  Abt $30 nett for weekday dinner.  All after 1 for 1 promo with uob n citibank cc.
7	I'm kind of worry. My wife often buy those promo coupon from Groupon and Deal and got makan buffet... Now she a bit like the hamburger...
2	the element coupon sold out already.
2	U want offer, must be patient lah...The offer will come back again. But must fast fast.
3	10.30pm is a bit too late even if we eat very very slowly
5	I mention before that i like the BCM, esp the wanton.   Denny like the sambal kang kong and BBQ items.   The kidney mee sua also quite famous there.   Some say the nasi lemak also not bad.   Joining us?
31	Kahlan zeh zeh don't sad cos Toons already bought for you and Denny   Lucky he fast hand fast leg.
7	elements gt ppl sell in market place..2 for 65bucks.. u try to bargain lo.
13	1 for $39, 2 x $39 = $78  pple sell $65, still got room for bargin meh?
5	1st time going for outing with EDMW ppl... are you guys ok with it?  i like BCM i supposed that is Ba Chor Mee??
21	Of course, you are most welcomed to join. I also made the first move and attended my first outing last year. That's where i met so many nice friends and we continue eating till today.   Yes, BCM = Ba Chor Mee. I am not referring to Business Continuity Management   I will be coming with some of them from the west so we should be there about 6:30pm. If you keen, can drop anyone of us your mobile via pm so we can contact on the day
220	u nv know? he said neg,,. if i nv read wrong.
3	ok... hopefully i don't have anything on Monday.   In that case we can meet at EW line MRT station and go down together?? i only know how to take bus 30 to interchange... then must ask for help alrdy....
34	dont dont take the EW line. so u hav to head and meet them direct.
26	hmmm then how shld i get there from Bedok interchange?
1	I ask Denny to help you cos Bedok is his territory
1	10:30pm I expected to have my beauty sleep leh. Eat noodle, don't need that long wor.
13	Dude, 1st March is a Thursday.  Good luck if you go on a Monday.
1	Looking for 1 more diner to go Claymore tmr night for dinner. Looking to take advantage of 4 for 3 promo else i will just settle for 20% discount which is just as good. Highlight will be the baked salmon which is not served on weekday dinner. Also the PoP.  Anyone keen can PM me.
2	Jie jie, you might want to remove your number.  Wait you get many many calls from BTSS.
1	I PMed her also on this issue too. Edited out the HP no. liao.
22	Thank you Piggy for your kind advice. I forgot   After they found out that i am lao aunty, i think they will regret calling me   Thanks ah tan for helping me remove.
20	They are called BTSS for a reason.  And you are not that old la.
16	Tio fake no wonder I called 1 ah ma picked up
49	ai ya, i too late. no hamfone number to beo, can sic?
8	whats Claymore and how much is it?? sounds expensive... hmmmm
7	Check the sticky thread above, price, reviews and pictures are all there.
13	Its a restaurant at Pan Pacific Orchard serving intl buffet.  For $46 nett, you will get oysters, lobsters, beef, lamb (nice), scallops, sea perch (taste like cod!) etc.  Sat nite serving salt baked salmon also, which is recommended by a bro here.  Keen?
1	I wonder what is at the carving section on Wednesday nights.  I hope its a suckling pig.
14	sounds like a good deal... however i on a tight budget and i dont really eat oysters / scallops... abit bo hua when i go for this buffett... but im tempted by the lobbies !  maybe some other time...  $46nett + GST and Svc charge = $50+++?  the closest I have went to is Vienna about $48 after all the what not GST n svc charge
2	Bro, nett means all the ++ nonsense all in liao.  I am not an oyster person.  Scallops on ice are also not my cup of tea.  The rest of the items should be the star of the buffet.  Check out their POP.
8	$46 is nett after service charge and GST.  This is definitely way way better than Vienna wor.  Just for the sea perch n lamb, i feel its worth it.  In fact, this will be the 2nd trip there this month
10	The scallop mentioned is not on ice, it's part of the POP.Will soon be my 2nd time this month if you know what I meant.
23	Wah.  Shiok.  Another dish to whack.
4	Dream on
16	Up for 1 more slot for Claymore dinner tmr
3	Just a word of caution though...  My second visit there was a great disappointment...hahah  The scallops weren't the big white juicy ones anymore....  The sea perch wasn't as fatty as before also...  See Erwin's review as well - quite disappointing lor - good thing my dining partner was quite forgiving...phew   Should have gone over to Marriott instead IMHO
21	whats POP??  but the $46 is it during promotion or special?? cos i thought for hotels will be more expensive....
4	Then you and Ah Tan can also mah - he give such a big hint liao   I is because our schedule is very last minute - won't be able to get enough people to enjoy discount one   The number of times I called them to change the dinner date is scary...hahah
1	Carey kor kor memory very good   Yeah, that's why no tian mi mi for me, I will stick to my cranberry cheese.  But u was saying the ice cream not tian right? Maybe it's other stuff that is sweet   Confirm tmr got salmon that's why I am going to brave the crowd instead of going weekday.
4	You don't need discount, just a cosy candlelight dinner.  So good, keep changing the dinner date just to suit the tian mi mi.
3	noooo.. im just asking... i will be going for the one at Bedok, 1st March...  ~.~
1	Sure. See u then
2	Of course - I am bui bui like elephant mah...and elephants don't forget   Oh really? Is that a hint to Ah Tan? hahah  Other thing that is sweet? Hmm...desserts but we both don't eat   Yup, the baked salmon is good - go early and grab the belly...hahah
173	Simi - can't be I go alone mah...hahah  Hence got to suit my dining partner's schedule   If got discount, of course the best - else boh pian...hahah
223	might be st louis ribs.
25	Sianz.  So no heroes went on a Wednesday before to confirm?    The steak can ask for no sauce one hor?
16	do they ever have suckling pig on craving? lol..
262	Sounds like sianz lousy ribs.
79	Nope gone on Friday and Saturday  The lamb also can cos it can be a bit too sweet
182	The black pepper sauce for the steak is nice ... in fact its the only thing abt the steak tats nice   The lamb must ask for no sauce.  They are using some sweet orange sauce tat reminds me of those sweet thai chilli sauce.
14	It was a citrus sauce for the lamb. IMO, the black pepper sauce was nice but too overpowering.
7	Is Citrus-Sesame Reduction.
12	Watever its called, it tastes like thai chilli sauce
57	Taste more like some sort of marmalade to me haha
9	Paging for 1 more for a feast tonite!
14	can i ask? if u eat eat maguro sashimi and got a slight iron taste. what can it tell you abt the quality of the maguro? thank you in advance.
6	gg tio posion liao
13	Hey, you are going for the elite brunch tomorrow right? Haha  Remember to give review hor haha
4	tt 1 i cancel liao......tmd some1 not free to go then i have to wait till nxt time le
5	siao liao, moi going to uplorry. priest pray for me. dong dong chiang.
3	if u eat maguro = normal tuna = abit red/dark red that type, it should taste abit bloodly which is what u call metallic taste, quite common.
6	Yea, tats why i dun like to eat tuna sashimi.  Tuna belly dun have tat taste though.
48	tuna belly = otoro = all the fats = sweet! (nearly everyone's favourite,but some only die die eat salmon)
14	i don't eat ribs, so not sure. sat brunch also ribs and salt baked salmon.
23	Sat one is lunch, not brunch. Unfortunately their lunch dun have pop else i prefer lunch over dinner. Seeya.
6	who so bad ????????
44	Yes, sat is lunch. Sorry about typo. Thanks for correction.
3	i think next month elite carey korkor wanna borrow the kard for that buffet.
0	i got dips over the rights first
11	Equinox person email me say some test n trial they are doing. The scallops.. i think she said not all the time cook ala min so maybe got chance will have or maybe one off la.. its the smell ppl dont like i suppose..
8	i dont mind the smell..nicer also...aiya all the elite dont like the smell what to do
10	what type of smell is that
65	very nice smell lor....seafood nice smell lol
7	10@claymore rly got so up can go so many times ah?
6	their plate of pleasure keep changing varities
4	Cos they change the plates of pleasure, so you get to try different food n their pop generally quite decent, in part cos they prepare them when you order. Of they have lobsters too.
25	but the lunch sux imo
76	ahh i see. other selection wise also not bad rite? thinking of going  rly ah i want to go for brunch leh. got simi diff from dinner?
5	brunch n dinner should be no much difference
40	Their hot dishes generally not so good, cos only like 10, out of which 3 are carbo, 1 potato dish ... but these past few visits got some nicer items.  Like today, got lamb stank, vinegar pork trotters n chicken in cream sauce, which were all nice.  The baked salmon at the carving station also very nice.  Sun brunch is slightly more expensive at $55++ , plus they have free flow juices (n softdrinks?).  Food wise about the same as dinner as mentioned by Raven.  PS: if you wanna try claymore, i would suggest doing it this month cos the pop for Mar got 3 carb 'hawker' dishes, penang prawn mee, char kway tiao, penang laksa, plus angus beef, tasmanian lamb n salmon.  To be fair, i tried their penang prawn mee b4, and its really good, as good as the one i had in penang.  Ended up drinking 2 large bowls of the soup.  Plus the manager said their penang laksa and the salmon are very good too.  So if you dun mind eating carbo 'hawker' food, then you might actually enjoy their mar pop.
4	This coming wed, the carving station is serving beef.  I ask the chef so piggy will wake up from his dream   I like today's dinner.  Carey kor kor is right, the baked salmon jin ho jiak, worth going on weekend.  Plus the company was hilarious, esp got McChicken, milk and so many stories
12	Is already elite why still need to borrow leh. Let us poor souls borrow first.
3	Well, as long as you're not laughing at us   I also enjoyed tonite's dinner a lot.  Although, tink i ate too much.  Tonite dun need to sleep liao.  The lamb shank, baked salmon, pork trotters, cream chix n pop really too overwhelming together ...   Sigh, good food, fun n enjoyable companionship, a lovely dinner on a sat nite ... i'm contented liao. Gum sia   PS:  Can laugh at the guy who jiak charcoal ... tat one funnie
1	So who cope the belly from the baked salmon? Own up...hahah  Yup, the salmon was jin ho jiak   My humble dinner tonight was ala carte at Table @ Pips (impromptu to the n degree)  Surprisingly good - we had a Cod Fish Papilotte and a Duck Leg Confit   But the Mozzarella Tower was hopeless though - small balls instead of the large slices of mozzarella   Oh, the chef was quite nice - came out to ask us how was the food twice...hahah  He did mention that they are having a BBQ brunch on Sundays - not sure about the charges though...
2	Simi elite?   Beta is the real elite...  Anyway, I only need it for 1 Sunday woah...  Already reserve hor Beta
3	Wah ... Sound good.   Got picture bo?  Got tian mi mi bo?
3	The one who looks like he is pregnant now   I use to like the salmon at Carousel (too bad its served cold) or the one at Indulge at Grand Park Cityhall, but this one is better.  I tink Donkey even preferred the salmon to the perch.
1	Wah, dunno whether you wan to see the food more or the person more
2	Opps, forgot to take pictures...hahah  Was erm, pre-occupied  with eating   Got - we went next door to get Udders
1	Wah, that must be Toons liao...hahah  Sibei song right? I almost wanted to cope the head but don't want to embarrass my dining partner   The perch's standard dropped right? It's not as nice as before...  Anyway, if Mar is going to be carbs-heavy, don't think we will be going back liao...zzzz  I miss Marroitt's Angus beef - so soft and nice
1	As long as the dining companion is good enough to "eat", er I meant stare at, nothing else matter.
0	U no show me leopard preen, how to laugh at you   I think the talking and laughing helps in digestion and increase appetite.   Btw, claymore got 1 Korean waitress jin sweet and swee.  So much so that someone couldn't get angry at her even when she didn't understand the orders.   Plus he ask mei mei got milk a not
2	Simi person? hahah  Seriously, their selection of mains quite a lot - even got grilled stuff like steak, lamb etc...  Also got foie gras but duck though - never try...
1	Wah, say until like that...  I of course was attracted to the food
0	And he asked for charred lamb chop and it came really charred till chao ta not to mention tough.
1	But the head looked shriveled n dry wor.  Yea, the perch not as fatty as b4, but still tasty.  The last 2 pieces though were very good.  I dun tink Mariott is serving their Meyer natural angus in their buffet liao wor n i dun wanna know how much it will cost ala carte ... Errr, so the one you staring at across the table tonite how?
2	Now I know why Toons wants to go back for the March POP liao...hahah  Luckily he didn't go home with 5 fingerprint marks...  Korean girls are very fierce one hor
0	LOL - self pwned
1	Across me in the next table is some huge sized Ang Mos with some young kids which someone said reminded her of....
1	But I was the victim.
1	Even if i wanna show, i also need to edit the length first ... ooppps, treat as if i never say   Its my fault tat i so demanding.  Simi, charred.  Can eat can liao.  Who needs milk with their coffee anyways Lucky i din get the chance to eat it   PS:  DUN ask for your meats to be more charred ... period ...
1	Will meh? I scooped out the cheeks for us - still very tender  Wanted to also do the eyes but I don't want to appear barbaric Quite sad cos the perch was one of the better POP How's the scallop? Still CMI ah?Ya lor - boh brunch - I just checked, they also don't know if they will reinstate  May do lunch there tomorrow - see whether I can remember to file a field report if I do You asking Ah Tan right?
1	LOL - this one is more epic
8	The head you referring to is the parking lot or the salmon?   I agree with Carey, the sea perch not as fatty as our first trip. But the salmon didn't disappoint. The beef was also nicer than first trip.  U mean the 2 lao ang mo and 2 chinese xdd
5	Just tell your partner you ''.  Good for the eyes, but tat means you cannot eat sausages infront of her liao.Perch is still good mah, just not as good as b4.  Yea, the scallops although shrank, but it was actually slightly better than the bigger ones we ate previously.  But still so so nia.You see whose post i quote lor Lol ... somemore he gleefully told us can smell the charred fragance wor ... then he took a bite ... n the rest is history ...
1	The charred smell so good but not when I put it into my mouth, so bitter.
1	wah ok tmr go
4	Tomorrow may be different dishes hor.
0	seem like a nice outing u had
1	bo pians
1	If you never reserve your table, i dun think you can get in liao.  Weekdays should be okay though.    Actually if you tink of it from another angle, going in mar might not be bad.  Cos even now, only 3 items on the pop are good.  If the 3 non carb items in the mar pop are good, plus the penang dishes are actually as good as the manager claimed they are, then it might actually be a winner wor.
1	And it was fully booked with at least two birthday boy/girl celebrating too.
4	nvm tmr try try 1st. if rly worth it dun mind going back again in mar
0	I think she must be new cos we didn't see her on our previous trip there.  Her name is Ariel btw.   Hmm, speaking from experience?   Your dining partner really wet your appetite.  From cutting down on buffet to thinking of going Marriott tmr right after today's tian mi mi   Happy for you esp every outing you enjoy
2	Yeap   You gonna have a good time tomorrow too wor.  Help me check out the mains can?  Cos their normal lunch, i like their mains, but its only 1 order.  If tomorrow the mains are as good, then i'm tempted to try too.
1	Think your outing tmr will be nicer cos got even nicer food.  Please gpgt for us
1	Raven will take pictures one.
9	I tink she is a younger version of the pretty ssk boss. Ariel?  Angel wor   Yea lor, the power of .  He also eating ice cream now ...  Hmmm, just realised today you also ate crepe wor.  Fess up, who is it?  The one staring at you across the table issit?
6	will update u
6	You too ate the crepe.  The durian crepe with sliced almond is a good combination.
0	Wah, what head, what parking lot? hahah  The perch was a disappointment cos there wasn't salmon on Friday night   Wah, got saga ah? CC or PBB?
1	Agree. She qualify to join SNSD. Lady boss in ssk must join Lao-NSD.  But both pretty.  I though whole night my chair was tilt towards you   The truth is, did u notice the xdd at the crepe station, looks a bit like manyu with the spec minus the muscle
2	Oooops. self pwned   Btw, wats the point of moving a post to another forum if we can still see it in makan forum?  Is it if anyone post in tat thread, it will not longer be updated in makan forum, so it will just get bumped off?
0	No woah - I also got family members to entertain mah...hahah  I always enjoy every outing - good food, good company
3	I left a 1 day redirect for the user so they know where the thread gone to. After 1 day it will automatically be removed.
3	Erm, I said we went to Udders...  I never said I ate any ice cream   So who was the one opposite Donkey? Ah Tan ah?
2	But from your posts, your eyes already eating "ice cream".  Talking about ice cream, the chocolate ice cream with chocolate chips was good.
4	Yea, thick brows, honest boi boi look.  Bowl haircut.  Indeed looks like manyu.   You missed him right?  Or miss the muscles?   Wonder how manyu is doing in aussie now.  Carey, did he post anything in no carb?
3	Ah, gum sia for the clarification.You tried the kapitan ice cream at claymore right?  Wah liew, the ice cream at udders is better.  How can you not try?  Can give me 4 nos?
2	udders got MSW ice cream, still no chance to try it yet.
2	If I miss him, I still have the waist 32 muscle man to admire mah   No fish, prawn also good   One is super junior, the other is super senior
15	Its good although i will rather save the $ n go tiffany jiak their durian pengat.  Its just lacks tat slight bitterness nia, plus its not frozen.
14	think of tiffany = drool
0	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:15pm   1. Donkey   2. Donkey's guest   3. Denny  4. twtan  5. Toons  6 - Zac
6	this bian tai ah Yi is really dangerous sia...
3	Errr, why you worry?  She got prerequisite one wor.  Unless you finally got your muscle memory into play
513	nah I nv worry...she will nv aim bui bah but then still scary....later she 1 day too hungry smlj also hoot
1	Wah...my eyes were on my duck confit   Quite nicely done - the meat fell off the bone sort...  See Erwin's review bah - the chocolate ice cream only came out around 9pm - we left by then
1	Siah ah? hahah  Must be Evil right?   Wah lao - super senior - jin
16	I worry for you liao   Would she do an "ah tan" and lick your pork chops
5	so slim one..  moi ish 40 inch waist fattie.   btw u can take the card from duxy to go Equinox.
96	Thanks Beta - I hope you are referring to me WRT the FAR card
78	The chocolate ice cream was there from 6pm onward and half way they changed to a new tub.Don't worry, she rather lick the muscle beefcake, I meant beef.
7	Voucher for Ramen Stall, with its yummy skewers, is back.  Remember the big juicy prawn skewers   Hmmm, however this time, we can order from the entire menu n not just the bbq n kushiyaki items.  This includes non alcoholic drinks, ramen, sushi, sashimi (got swordfish!), Teppanyaki Beef, hokkaido scallops, soft shell crabs etc.  Of cos, the price is also at a much higher $38.80 vs the previous $23.30.  Well, their ramen is abt $10+ per bowl, teppanyaki beef $16, soft shell crabs n scallops, $13 each, so if you just order any 1 of these items, then its already worth it compared to the earlier deal.  Positive tinking   Plus its valid for dinner throughout the week, except for the usual PHs etc.    Anyone keen?  I'm definitely in.
2	I prefer the previous deal. But comparing this to Kushi, this deal is better. Hmm.
12	Yes, help me buy. Thanks.
1	Yea, the previous deal already got enough items to jiak ba ba, but variety a bit limited.  We ended up eating the same items over n over.  Furthermore, this one got my fav meijiki sashimi.  I also dun mind the beef, soft shell crab n scallops, if they're good Onz.  Got 3 paxs confirmed liao.  Rest out, so will let me know later, but i know dennyz wan to try their ramen previously liao, so i guess he should be in bah.
2	It's a compliment wor   So many people don't even qualify.
1	more vouchers to clear liao...   regards,  wacky
0	Yalor, everyone will grow old, but not everyone can qualify for super senior wor ...
3	Got meh? Next time let me measure for u to confirm   Thanks beta, he say will pass me in march when he done.
86	Oh, can pass u esp if u going for tian mi mi  I can't tian mi mi so my timing more flexible.
4	ah tan lick lamb chop
3	You never even read who he is referring to?
1	wah im in for this also...previous meal are nice...especially the prawn with dunno wat sauce
2	i know....he meaning donkey lick ur meh meh chop  didnt know here turn sooo kinky le
17	Again you never even bother to read properly. He is replying to you and saying licking .
20	i got read but i choose it to interpret it my way
9	This is where the Moderator comes in to set thing right.
2	Sure or not? hahah  I rather be young and not qualify
2	Well, now these days not much interest in dessert   Only went to take some cos we know that the bill payment will take damn long...hahahWah - but Manyu is not here now ah...he is Ozzie beef liao
38	Erm, Equinox brunch is more drinking than eating - should be with different makan kaki
243	i'm keen.  can get for me.
19	came back from equinox . drink at least 8-9 glasses x MOET Champagne + kahlah x 4 + some cocktail x 3 glasses
1	they open the brunch until so late?!!
9	Good bo? hehehe.. whats the cost nett after discount ar?
1	bo lah , last order for liquor is 2.10 /2.15pm , food is 2.30pm then by 2.45pm need to be out le walk to suntec  waited for bus go home  then go jogging finish koon until now
42	Good good good , but some item is not available due to changing of menu monthly
5	Hows the food?
9	good will post the photo tml.
26	Thanks.  Looking forward to them.
12	tml confirm with u about passing the card
7	BTW u all feel free to take the card. Don't lose or damage it or get it gantong can liao.   How much per pax ahh..after offer.
32	will take note not to get it kantong or lost not to pay by credit card or the other diner pay
4	i wanna go try the Brunch some day. looks good. This few days i think they all have trial menus n all.. Email n give feedbacks.
85	after discount 115 per pax
738	u so lazy. forget it la.  refering to the "feedback" portion
43	ehh i give feed back thats why i know the Concierge Manager lehs. She also notice i come with a guy this time.  She got ho liao will sic with me!
4	who else gt the card then we all can gather a few to go together.. one day?
1	Boss, Wednesday's outing on or off?  Its one of those rare off days, which I hope is not wasted.  If off liao then I plan my own stuff.
29	Ah Tan wanna email them ask if FAR can offer a special rate for Buffetlicious members?
12	lolol.. he can try? haaahahahahaha
142	Should be still on, Evil is the organiser but like no news from him leh.
1	she told me herself one..  Btw Raven havent post the pix ar? sexcited to see whats the new stuff for the Brunch!
1	Oei!  Photos ler?  Know you drank a lot ytd, dun pretend drunk liao forget hor
7	See lar, even the equinox concierge manager also know you 'chee hong'.  Everytime bluff mei mei there, but this time bluff di di
20	i nv.. i go on dates, go with my Mother, few Aunties mahs. lolol..
235	tonight still under today mah
0	- We took all the Boston Lobsters leaving the claws behind as the restaurant was slow in replenishing it. Overheard two diners who came later saying there were supposed to be lobsters but she did not see any. Smiling, me turned around to my dining companion and whispered that they (the lobsters) are all in our tummies.
1	- None of us tried it this time round.
0	- My dining companions came here specially because of this which did not disappoints. The fish was fresh and the seasonings complement it nicely. No fishy taste detected, just yummy soft light pink flesh especially those near the belly which was quite fatty.
0	- Usually we skipped the hot dishes at the counter but that night a couple of the dishes were good and this was one of them. Tender fall off the bone lamb was what you get. - Wasn't interested in this dish till one of my dining companion tried it and only had good thing to say about it. Very tender and boneless chicken in a creamy sauce. Sedap.
1	- "Wah, got Salted Vegetable Duck", my dining companion was parroting what he overheard to us. - Braised till tender but unfortunately we did not take to it's sweetish sauce. We would have preferred the salty soya sauce kind you get outside in hawker centers. On the other hand, someone still ate a lot of it.  - The main reason we are all here, unlimited ala carte orders.
0	- Not bad but just too plain for me. Guess I am spoilt by the sweetish grilled Hokkaido Scallops found in Isetan's fairs. - Can't go wrong with black pepper sauce, goes well with the tender yummy beef.
1	- Was told the sauce don't go well with the lamb but still I just had to try it once myself. The sweetish citrus sauce was just too sweet and it's like eating lamb with fruit jam. Get me my lamb naked.  without the sauce And then someone just had to go sian the zha bor, telling her he wanted the lamb more charred. This is what the zha bor give us, a piece of chao tar and overdone lamb.
0	- Firm fish seasoned with light soya sauce to bring out its freshness. - Come in a small dainty casserole but where are the shark's fin? Maybe they are trying to save the sharks but how can they called that tiny shell with little meat the Boston Lobster Claw!!! The soup base was good BTW with enough flavour from the chicken/pork bones.
0	From 12pm clockwise - Garlic Mashed Potato, braised pork trotter, baked salmon, Salted Vegetable Duck and the lamb shank.
1	- We just take the skewered strawberries to eat fresh. First batch was sweet and the second sour.
0	- Been there many times and they only seem to be alternating between and the Banana version. with sliced almonds. - I don't know who started it but most of the crepe uses the ingredients from other sources like the strawberries from the chocolate fountain or sliced almonds from the ice cream's condiments.
21	My not so browned . The durian paste and almond goes really well together. vs the charred crepe. Have been there many a times till the manager recognized us. He was asking why I took lesser pictures this time round. Service were good as usual but with more foreign talent helpers, they need to brush up their English first; I don't want to have to eat another chao tar lamb from someone else disastrous flirting.   And this place is getting crowded ever since the first time we went. Either they have done some pretty good advertisements or our reviews had been noticed by many a person. For those going in March, the Plates of Treasure will be Tasmanian Lamb, Angus Beef, Salmon, Penang Prawn Mee, Char Kway Tiao and Penang Laksa. For the meats, they will be using different sauces.
1	suddenly realise i had 180+ photo or more
3	I support you all the way to the 180th photo.
4	Sigh. I got a bad feeling. Your "should be" doesn't sound convincing.
11	I already applied AL for that day liao.
0	Piggy, ah tan, dennyz n monkey, already got 4 liao mah for the 4 pay 3 promo.  Evil is just 'calafair'
1	u can find 1 more person to join??? since we now short of 1 lol
0	post ah post!  Raven got angmoh hostess there bo? Iana Jiejie..
1	boh leh i partner with big monkey le  4 for 3 need 1 more as at first include u but now cant le
0	lao tan hows the French oysters ar?
2	kuku u want jia POP boh lol...anyway u meant tt time tt ang moh zehzeh in qi pao  the perky ass gal
1	jiak wat? Yeah that day that one.
2	oh tt perky ass zehzeh...jiak what lao tan just jiak recently minus the salmon oo
0	You asked me who don't eat oysters, how to tell you har? See the person who ate them want to reply or not.
1	Paging for shalome and lovejade.
2	Other than the crepe n 3x choc ice cream, the choc cake with the biscuit layer is the only other dessert tat i like.
2	piggy, twtan, bigmonkey, evilduxy = 4 ?my pager spoilt  i can't make it for wednesday, that was why i been asking you on saturday but you ignored me
1	pig ahtan denny + ??? = 4  me n lao gao = 2
1	I tink only tried the US oysters cos the french ones salty ... the chef said seas beside france saltier, i say it is cos they pee in the sea?  JKing ...   The US or issit canadian oysters were very very creamy in dec.  Really good.  Now no longer as creamy liao.Lol ... try lj bah.  Shes not called xiao longnu for nothing
0	Big Monkey and Duxy use Singtel birthday offer. So only Ah Tan, Dennyz and me, 3 pax. You wanna join?  Speaking of which, is Dennyz confirmed? Wait find one more pax then he can't make it, then we GG.
2	I was supposed to just take a bite but it was so good so ended eating one piece by myself.
1	You and Lao Gao got 1 leg izzit?
1	Monkey said is his gay partner.  Don't quote me hor, I heard it through the grapevine.
0	No la, was busy. That's why never post here much too. I won't ignore you de.
1	Pai seh lar, but at the start from 3 paxs to 5 paxs now to 6 paxs.  I dun even know you wanted to use the 4 for 3 promo too, so i went on sat for the salt baked salmon.  If you want to combine 2 different promos, better let them know in advance.
1	So they will lick the same lamb chop one?
0	The salmon is salt baked? Not salty leh.
1	i like the french ones. salty shioks.
0	I think it's Pork Chop between them.
0	ur grapevine is who.......or isit code name for shooting star hoyawe got 4 leg i sms him now
2	oh, sorry i didn't notice dennyz going. try the xiao long nu , love jade  i replied above i can't go on wednesday
0	I stewpig. Don't appreciate oyster. Quite wasted hor?
2	Tats why its good mah.  The salt on the skin layer which they peel to 1 side.  I got a bit of the skin when i took the belly portion, so can taste a bit of the salt,  but definitely far far better tat some other salt baked food where you literally have to spit out the meat which came into contact with the salt.
2	no nahs.. somethings u no like dont eat nohs..  i dont chiong oysters too, At most i eat is 4-6. No more no less. i just like those saltier ones.
3	Where got wasted. I spent $17 to eat aston 250g ribeye.  The angus beef i ate on sat was abt 200g, n tasted better.  I ate 4 pieces.  Tats excluding all the meh meh (&gt; 4 pieces) n sea perch i ate.  You do the math bah
2	The angus beef pic Ah Tan took looks thin leh. I bought 2 slabs of sirloin from mmmm, each 2.5cm and 280g, pan fry them for lunch just now. Eat till song song. Damage less than you in total.
1	Thin it may be but it was tender. Beside you can always order more.
4	ya i call n book n confirm everything last wk le...i didnt know u goin sat also lol...nvm lor...see can find 1 last min ppl boh lol
0	Anyway, your chao tar lamb chop looks ok leh. Nicely charred on the outside. Very dry meh?
2	Bro, if you wanna compare cost with home cooked food, then i dun think you need to eat out liao.  Besides, the beef was just 1 item which i ate there.  I dun tink you can buy 4 pieces of angus beef, 5/6 pieces of tasmanian lamb, 7 pieces of sea perch, 1 lobster, etc using just $49?  Even if you cook at home?  Then again, you dun need to eat so much to be full in the first place   Then then again, if you are just eating to be full, why go to buffet?
0	He was quite happy with it initially.  Said can smell the charred fragance somemore.  But when he ate it ... the rest is history ...   PS: Ah Tan, the korean waitress pretty wor.  Even Donkey said definitely can qualify for SNSD.  Can't blamed me for talking with her.  Besides, its our fault for being so demanding.  Just eat our meh meh can liao, simi char more ... It is never a pretty lady's fault
0	It was burned, not the usual charred taste. Overcooked till dried as someone wanted "more charred".
3	I mean damage less than your Astons' visit. I comparing with your aston's steak, not with the claymore buffet.
5	Power. Must have pissed off the chef. Fatty lamb cooked till dry quite high level liao.
2	Ahhhh.  No choice.  Normally i will satisfy my meat cravings at buffets, but i had to eat at Aston to do a review comparing 2 steakhouses.  Aston is the more affordable yet decent quality steakhouse.  Even eating at Astons already bust the miserable review allowance, not to mention Morton etc
2	Normally charring is high flame but not too long.  Tink they used normal flame, but long long ... I am so so happy the 2nd piece did not come as we ordered 2 portions initially.  Given so long haven't come, i was expecting them to serve me a piece of charcoal
1	DIY lo. I only add abit of salt and pepper. I like that mmmm vacuum sealed the steaks for me. Can keep longer in the chiller. Can choose my own thickness too. The ones at cold storage too thin for my liking.
1	i confirm going claymore unless u can't find last 1 at last min to enjoy 4 for 3...then i shall rest my tummy for thursday.  i went 511 to confirm our bbq seaf00d and BCM open for thursday, and i can't tahan the sambal tempting me all along~  i ate sambal kangkong, sambal LaLa and 3 crayfish~  and the End of the food...  end of my scout for thursday at 511~
0	Hmm. If this Wed still on, maybe just ask them to sear the Lamb Chop? Maybe pan grill the lobster too.  :p
2	Looks good. Thanks for the pre-outing review, looking forward to it.
3	You ordered from Chan BBQ? Their stingray is power. Pan-fried fish also not bad. Veg very salty though.
4	nope, from my favourite stall at blk 511 bedok north street 3. Mei Mei BBQ seaf00d. nicely done veggie, super fragrant sambal with lots of dried prawn inside... i don't like chan bbq, sambal is watery -.- i lazy to eat stingray, so i go for crayfish.. so sweet i can't rate much on my own, wait till our team goes down on thursday for better reporting!
1	I only cook for enemies   There was once, i cooked a steak for 25 or 30 mins.  Tink i ki siao ... ended up with a nice piece of beef jerky.  Thicker steaks will be tougher right?You're scary n they say i eat a lot ...I highly suggest letting them cook the way they like n just stick to simple requests like, 'no sauce', 'middle rare' etc.  Anything else is at your own risk   Even asking for milk for coffee also gave me a scare when the waitress said 'HUH?'  I tot i have to demo 'moo moo' n squeezing my breast ... lucky she understood when i repeated my request.  Again, since the waitress is pretty, its my fault for wanting milk with my coffee
1	claymore short of 1 person?
0	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:15pm  &lt;- u sure 6.15pm?  1. Donkey   2. Donkey's guest   3. Denny  4. twtan  5. Toons  6 - Zac  7. Evilduxy (he say he want go)
2	Can i just order 1 bowl of their sambal?    I still wanna eat the pork spare parts soup, BCM etc.
1	toons ah, i dunno leh, u want assam fish head too if they have? they only steam it after u order  and plus we eating so many different f00d, u sure u only want 1 bowl of sambal + soup?  and toons, i where got scary, only a handful of kangkong, a bit of LaLa and 3 crayfish, not even 1/3 of buffet feast
1	1 qns.  If evil is he say he wanna go, then the rest is who say one?   Timing wise, can all of you make it?  Cos if only 1 or 2 late, i scared by the time they come, everyone else ate n full liao.
1	Cannot be 6.15pm as I meeting Donkey and Toons at 6.15pm.
1	thats your answer, Toons
1	Yes, currently short of 1 person. Can be 2 of you want, I very flexible.
1	i think the makan is meet at 7pm-7.15pm at 511?
1	7.15pm should be fine.
1	7pm you have to send the food to hospital liao.  630pm bah.  Cos 4 of us will be there together.  You should be okay with 630?  Only left Zac.  Can he do 630pm?
1	if u want bring 3 of u, i also very flexible.
2	Tot you took AL tat day?  You wanna bent to where if not claymore?
0	erm.. you trying to say me = 2pax?
2	he means u can bring friend or friends &gt;_&gt;
2	got no friend to bring la   me only
0	As long as you're paying, you can bring me anytime you like   Ooops, tat sounded weird
3	then if u confirm, we eat with u loh ^_^
4	Can u bling me as gas n blanja me?
0	why not you treat me
1	Chao beta, see mei mei only must sianz ...   Wait eject you as gas into the toilet bowl
0	quote you first.
1	Oei, almost 2359 liao
4	No need quote lar, i not like lj.  Post liao will edit within 5 secs one   Cham, must be the choc from the fondue tat i dumped into the coffee.  Post so much rubbish, on sugar high liao.
3	Coz I peasant n I treat u very nice!   Toons:  dun say me lehs. I m a good Yang chewren.
1	i more peasant than you
1	Keke, yang chewren, how much you paid for your FAR n when expiring?  If going to expire soon, you interested in getting another sup?  PM me if more convenient?  Gum sia.
5	so claymore is this coming wed right?   what time will you all be there?
9	dunno leh, organiser Evil is outside...
11	orh.. anyway.. i should be on leave that day..
4	What thing u wanna knw?wah I knw in Thai pub sia first time inside not to my liking but the gals  lol
18	now we know u like exotic non sg girl =p
1	Claymore. Wednesday what time ? I should be on leave that day..   Bua ah bua~
3	Are we sure that it's really a girl to begin with?
2	oops i forgot its a *thai* pub. anything is possible ~ sha la la la
1	The thai bars at patpong ... really an eye opener Well, i'm not sure it matters to him wor
4	ah toons ah, go sleep, or else wait no work again!!
1	He sure looks like he eats everything and anything!
2	Yes, mum!  Now can sleep liao.  Just now my accounts short of $3.  Now then remember i bought the $3 miso soup paste at Isetan on Sat.  Now everything balance liao
236	Turn off the lights, everything the same OR everything also come out the same in the toilet bowl ... take your pick
67	I meet chiu at 530 orchard mrt station? Lol
35	equinox photo in facebook will translate to forum version
1	I also got Emicake's D24 Durian cake that day so I won't mind not going.
72	u can bring there treat us makan the D24 durian cake
2	Oei, homework leh?
10	You better don't let Poloboi or Chilli Crab see this post. Wait they sexcited.
6	still long end of Oct sexpire.. my card ish like 150bucks.
5	in facebook
15	Er, it's used for praying to my ancestors, you still want to eat?
10	Will be there at 6pm least all the Boston Lobsters disappeared.
2	Dennyz, i remembered you said the alcoholic ice creams there shiok :-
2	cant see anything lehs.
90	told u all before.. I waited n waited till i ask them.. they say will come.. But come out like 4-5 gong. nv get to eat any body that day.
71	I confirm with you on the timing again. Coz tmr going to buy furniture with parents! Moving house next week!   Anyone wanna lose some weight?
3	u sure cannot see anything ?
5	Can't see anything too.  Cheat moi fweelings.   This content is currently unavailable The page you requested cannot be displayed right now. It may be temporarily unavailable, the link you clicked on may have expired, or you may not have permission to view this page. Return home
2	Can help me take first?  My timing depends on how early the tigress wakes up.  She will be damn pissed if I wake her up too early.  Oh, Duxy, did twtan tell you to help me add a baby chair?  The tigress-in-piglet-disguise coming along with me.  Thanks.
1	Once Upon A Milkshake's Bailey's Irish Cream has quite a decent alcoholic taste.  I think eating the ice cream straight more power.
10	Got good lobang?
7	Thicker steaks less likely to overcook.  You can char the outside but inside still medium rare.  Only problem is too thick, your doneness may be uneven.  coz the heat doesn't travel to the inside enough.  I use Happy Call Pan to char the sides first, flip only once, then seal it to give it a more even cooking.  So far it turned out well.  Nicely charred on the outside and medium rare to medium doneness on the inside.  Timing must see one.  You can tell by the colour changes and flip it when you see about 60% cooked from the side the steak is facing the pan.
3	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @   1. Donkey   2. Donkey's guest   3. Denny  4. twtan  5. Toons  6. Zac  7. Evilduxy   I have changed the time to 6.45pm.   Who ever reach first choop table
66	piggy just posted why we cant see.  see below.
18	Oh he nv mention okok I ask them to prepare 1 baby chair btw the table is a round table we sitting
235	previous deal was $29.90 for all days. but i went on a thursday. could have save $3 x 2. the top up for $5 seafood and sashimi not that worth imo. mainly salmon sashimi, cold prawns and snow crab legs. but they don't look appetizing to me.
15	I can't even access FB in office not to mention I do not have an account.
11	i need the FAR card back on the 12 March 2012 for use for Lunch..  Kam sias ~  after that u all can take from me again..
12	Sure, beta didi  I will collect it from you closer to 25 Mar
2	can can.. u all arrange amongst yourself..
7	Mind if I join? Newbie at makan section. I can come earlier chop seats if y'all want.
33	u all prefer sit inside the centre or outdoor table? ^_^
12	Welcome!  You have the contacts of anyone in th list?  If not, then PM me your hp bah.  Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:45pm    1. Donkey    2. Donkey's guest    3. Denny   4. twtan   5. Toons   6. Zac   7. Evilduxy   8. sonrockerI prefer aircon table   Outside will be cooler?  Then outside, as long as can fit 8 n dun look like gonna rain or will have bird droppings  Gum sia!
16	i go prepare the storm clouds and rainbirds
6	You kiam pa hor? Humble brunch.
18	They elite ppl mah.  This kinda of meal is peanuts to them
60	This time round, nobody stop you from taking photo?
50	Ya lor, so elite hor
8	You saying yourself elite also?  You going for the Mar one right?    Carey, did you end up trying the buffet at the marriott cafe?
1	i set wrong setting in facebook to myself only no wonder y cannot see
2	no one stop me
8	then u want me to put raven1019 de 26/02/2012 de hao lian brunch ?
36	i suspose they realised they nid food photographer to have new flow of customer.  in the past, i think they link photographer to stealing idea.
27	Raven1019's elite/splendid/fanastic brunch will be better. Your humble doesn't sound humble leh.   But anyway, $119 is good value, considering Greenhouse cost $80 after discounts, with no foie gras and champagnes.
539	act humble mah
47	You ish elite. I saw a CIMB credit card booth and ask them if I qualify for the World Card. They ask me go fly kite.
1	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:45pm    1. Donkey    2. Denny   3. twtan   4. Toons   5. Zac   6. Evilduxy   7. sonrocker  My guest cant make it tmr night cos he needs go pray.   Sonrocker, most happy that u can join us   Denny, i prefer table outside, cooler. If i bring my 2 dogs, we will sit outside  Tmr i bringing 2 nan ren there instead
73	They ask me don't play when I ask..
13	meng nan ??????
3	Beta is the real elite   I can't even afford a FAR card
18	Evil, tonight the reservation under what name?
3	They didn't even bother to talk to me
32	Because you are way out of their league...hahah
28	My name but I'll be there ard 545 to chop the lobster oo
6	What is your name, me forgotten, cannot be Evil right?
1	NB, it's not CSB la. 3 elites of buffeticious suaning me. Me so moody.
7	I will say the 6 pax with a baby chair table.
4	i feel like going but this month i really leongs..  i just paid reno for hse + school fees + my coy forget to claim reservist.. i got like 3 days celery nia..  I feel like crying..  Everyday chap cai pngs for a month i think. knn..
16	Your company have to reimburse the money. High class chap cai pngs with mei mei or zeh zeh, sound elite wor.
84	i asked already the payroll close. Then the Head of payroll on leave till March 10.. Petty cash max can claim only like 3-400bucks.. That suck la..  Ask me wait till next payroll cycle for daily rated staff which ish like 2weeks later..im gonna kpkb to my boss. just join doesnt mean get such nonsense.  * my chap cai png all vege no rice no meat..  2.20nia.  too poor to eat meat n 50cent rice.
140	Your 3 day salary can pay for reno + sch fees  Everyday you earn 10k?
78	Under my  surname lim  Wah 3 elites Carey beta n swatchie all act peasant...what's the world coming too??? Real peasant like me feel soo sad   N I cldnt get thru to get a baby chair but I'm sure theres extra chair lol
2	Erm, how come my name also kena mentioned with 2 real elites?
168	I paid alrdy.. i meant. Those were my savings. My coy paid me 3 working days night nia.. the rest of the days reservist..
133	You in which industry?  Maybe you elite can intro!
3	Our roast leg of lamb was very good tonight. So tender and fatty even better than the Tasmanian Lamb. And I got Toons' little mermaid - Ariel for him on picture too.
1	Wah, the pop tasmanian lamb already very good liao, this one even better?   Next time i must aim wed liao, heehee.  How was the rest of the food?  Std still comparable to sat?  Gum sia.  Her engrish got improve or not?   You got my email addy   Got help me ask abt the voucher?
2	my ice cream   drew a dragon using the melted ice cream.
7	3x choc!  Yum yum.  You like the ice cream?
2	I still got chao tar lamb from her.  She is only 22 years old nia. I already told her I will be posting the picture on the internet liao.  Need to show NRIC for the Singtel voucher.
1	Monkey came so late, we already stopped eating except Evil. Of the two ice cream, only the chocolate one is edible, the other one cmi.
4	After chiu left we ish gotch her number
2	gratz gratz
4	I know, but the pt of my qns is whether the actual person needs to be there, or show IC plus voucher can liao.You still dare deny you buaya ...   hmmm, or is tat Beta?
1	Ahhh, I never ask if the actual person needs to be there.
41	erm this I think u need to call them n ask? but if the person not there hw u show the Ic unless u borrow frm the person   I nv deny anything plus just to make more fwens nia
1	Erm, don't mind me but you guys were at 10@Claymore earlier this evening?
4	My lamb slabs all got more fats than meat. The last big slab is ultimate. Whole chunk of fats. Think he was about to throw away. I ask for it and boy, it was sinfully good. It's a cross between soft butter and jelly. Better than the lamb chop from POT. POT's lamb chop's taste, especially the smokey flavor hits you immediately. The fatty lamb leg's taste is more delicate due to the soft tender meat and oily fats. Definitely the highlight of the buffet.   The Angus beef is flavourful but a pity that it was too thin, so most of the beef came out medium-well or well-done. I ate all the beef with no sauce to appreciate the flavor of the meat, and feel that the chef is abit over generous with his salt. I would think that with the sauce, it might be worse.   I did not get to eat any sharksfin. The first bowl I had was sharksfin soaked in brandy. The alcohol smell was so strong that Dennyz smelled it when I open the lid. The second bowl I had, smell wasn't that strong but the taste of brandy is still too much for me, so I gave up.
2	I had 2 huge scoops of that. GG. Some fig with dunno what ice cream. The chocolate chips one is ok but not fantastic. I miss rum &amp; raisin.
1	I ish got piglet with me. Cannot try anything funny, otherwise she go back report, I die.
2	You were there?
2	the sharkfin n lamb n perch was good to me...especially the sharkfin can taste the liquor smell damn solid LOL...
3	Yea, you guys were the bigger bunch sitting near the entrance and with a cute lil girl? One of you brought along a bridge camera/DSLR? Towards the end of the evening, you guys were actually bantering with a pretty tall waitress?
3	u all sitting ard at the round table??? just beside the desset? LOL
3	Nope~   10buffets~
2	Oh, lobsters were plentiful. I had 5 half lobster bodies. 1st 3 were not bad. 4th one sucks. Abit of smell. 5th one not that good also. Had 2 claws which I find to be too dry.   Durian cake sucks. Mango cake abit sour. Desserts quite disappointing. I only like the mango/peach tarts and the chocolate coated strawberries. Had only one piece of chocolate. After that cannot find anymore.
1	Their rendition of the Cantonese Vinegar Braised Trotters were excellent though.
2	dont tell me u all were the table at the side with 2 gals n 2 guys
4	Erm, moi has a clean record and has no wish of getting 3 points~
3	well, the gravy is fantastic, but.. hardly any fatty or skin, which is a disappointment with all the dry meats, so in the end no choice i gotta eat some 3 layer meat
4	I actually dug out quite some fatty bits for my first 2 servings~
1	Tat will be Ariel, SNSD grade cuttie
1	Got, must slowly dig.  Too bad its sweet.  I prefer the soy version.
1	Let me guess, you were with ahgong_hippo?  On the other hand, think is not.
5	y wld u get a 3 point ang bao?? LOL
13	i did dig out some fatty skins, but they cut until so small, mostly melt into the gravy already, thats why gravy so bagus! toons : well, u r eating vinegar trotters, of coz sweet and sour... salty then will be too wrong.  nvm la. tomorrow we eat salty, spicy and fragrant sambal f00d, and we can call assam fish head if u want to cure your fish head thirst!
13	Tats why i prefer the soy version mah.  Eating the vinegar version makes me feel like i'm pregnant   Their assam fish head also good?  If not tat fantastic, i might as well go try the ones at Hooked on Head.  Furthermore, got a lot of food to try, plus i crazy full from the seabass now.  You should know mah.  Hopefully by tomorrow dinner will feel hungry
1	Tonight pork trotter not fatty enough compared to last Saturday's. Also only got US Rock Oysters nia.
2	if talk abt the kidney mee sua the fish head..i prefer the teochew steam more lighter taste lol but i maybe wrong...
18	ya u r wrong, seng kee kidney mee sua is only giamcai soya sauce steam, i talking about another zi cha stall.  well toons, hope the sambal works your tummy
22	ZacA, you meeting us at the hawker centre right?  You have the contact of anyone in the list?  Other than your own of cos   If not, then PM me your hp bah.  Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:45pm    1. Donkey    2.     3. Denny   4. twtan   5. Toons   6. Zac   7. Evilduxy   8. sonrocker
14	Mai follow in somebody's footsteps~
398	Dunno what u talkin abt I don't speak in riddles?
33	Okay!  Read your desc until i saliva liao.  You convinced me.  Gonna try the next pop on wed liao The 'doneness' of our steaks quite okay.  Only scared if the steak is thicker, it might be tougher too.  You dun like the black pepper sauce?  Its robust wor.  I like it a lot.Not a hit with us.  Bare of ingredients n starch.  When i tasted a spoon of the broth, it tasted quite nice though.
2	Last night at Claymore got serve crocodile meat meh?   If not how come got buaya go sian the waitress?
6	Bedok Blk 511 Makan Outing on 1 March @ 6:45pm    1. Donkey    2. Donkey's guest    3. Denny   4. twtan   5. Toons   6. Zac   7. Evilduxy   8. sonrocker  My guest decided to play instead of pray
3	Why  u all jiak until buaya waitress?
37	Mouth jiak, eyes jiak too   learn from you one.
8	Not buaya her, we just wanted to show you, buaya all the person who gave the chao tar lamb. She can't remember all our orders so some orders never came. Another waitress got very good memory, even though we ordered many POT, some with sauces and some without, she can remember all the orders correctly.
1	Meat will be tough if its over-done or when the meat is obtained from an area where it is very lean (no fats).  So if you get a piece of steak with good marbling, get a thick slab and don't over-cook it.  It will be tender.  I am quite adverse to salty food.  So I usually don't like sauce unless the item is tasteless.  Plus the Angus is good enough to eat without anything else.  If its thicker, it will be a good steak.
5	You sound like you are related to someone we know.
32	You need to confirm though.  Shalome said it will be sianz lousy ribs but it turned out to be this nice leg of lamb.  Oh, I like the ravioli in cream sauce too.  I think they might have added abit of truffles in the sauce, but piglet doesn't like the sauce.  Think you all should have heard the squeal that is often the prelude to a merlion.  Lucky that merlion did not happen but the whole place was quiet for a while.
60	Denny hate the ravioli in cream sauce.
4	See, taste really subjective.  Someone also hated the ice cream, except for the 3x choc, but Piggy liked it.
9	Gum sia.  Will keep this in mind.
6	I dropped you a message
6	Yesterday no one like the ice cream with fig and walnut, tasted very artificial. The Triple Chocolate is good though. Yesterday's strawberries were good.
2	You left out donkey's gas. Whoever gets there first get those long table for 8 paxs hor.  Gum sia!
39	I also had chocolate ice cream yesterday   Awesomely Chocolate from Udders - not bad - not sweet at all
19	Sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar sugar.   Sorry. Can't resist.
203	LOL - say not sweet already what...hahah  Plus I never finish the whole scoop
15	any desserts there??  i having abit of sore throat -.-
2	Wah, we go there whack the sambal, you sore throat?  Dessert is definitely got, but dunno nice or not.  Must ask the 'local head snake' dennyz   He smsed you abt meeting up liao right?
2	Wheres Ariel pic ah??
6	All the Ariel pics are belong to moi!
5	enjoy fapping
14	yes he contacted me already.
6	See tonight I got time to post or not.
8	dessert of the day : Sambal on Ice
2	U all go back to Salta to eat??
109	Salta cmi now according to those who went back previously.
94	since he noticed chiu all, he muz be sitting welly nearby nia. his table onree he n a lady.  siang got see mah?
30	Wah, MUM you really jin li hai leh...  Still know it's only him and a lady
108	i ate ala carte not bad lehs.. still as good as before. i nv tried the brunch though.
61	Back from the outing. Nice meeting sonrocker, Zac and Donkey's friend. Homework I hand up tomorrow night.
115	lao tan where Ariel pix?!
82	He showed us liao, u will see soon
268	im shagged by the time i got home....  the massage did me more damage than help... gonna throw MC today riao...
19	I go look for the little mermaid for you.  Tonight then I post, yesterday was too sleepy to do any edit.
24	I thought Ah Tan got post before ah...  Anyway, we also kena the Ariel treatment when we went there - orders keep going missing and it was not even difficult   But I am sure Toons won't mind having to remind her
14	The buffet not really bad, just inferior to the previous one.  Before, the appertisers were free flow, including the very nice beef tongue and veal cheeks (i think).  Then they changed it to only 1 order per person.  The meats all along is inconsistent.  Order to order, the taste varies quite a bit n can be quite salty.Pai seh, cannot join you guys last nite, but i'm sure you all had a great time Wah, go bedok jiak food still got massage one? You know, its YOUR fault.  Why order so many times, tat she cannot remember?
88	Erm, you know that I eat a lot less now right?  So my orders can't be alot...hahah  Wah, can see Toons already so defensive - jiayou
24	ariel naiser or that Basilico jiejie.
3	Both also bu pia - so Beta interested liao ah? hahah  Wait Toons come after you with parang tor
4	Looks wise i tink Ariel better, but service wise definitely Basilico mei mei.Beta is interested in anything female   Wah, i'm not the one with her no. wor.
1	NPNT. Where ish the pigs?!!
218	Lets stop the mei mei/zeh zeh and OT discussions, I will post the picture tonight.
336	okay great! later see the pix! Btw, anyone went to Aquamarine recent? Any comments?
196	aqua marine de standard drop
3	Ah tan, where is your homeowork?  Please pass up before u go MY tmr
2	i wait till neck long long le
83	Finished editing and uploaded 50% already but I am so sleepy now.  zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
513	Just came back from Korean Charcoal BBQ Dinner Buffet at Hyang-To-Gol. It was terrible, definitely not worth the $36 ($5 topup for seafood + gst/service charge). The beef was BLOODY. I took a piece, placed it on my plate and it left a blood trail.  All the other food were cold. I don't understand how the food which is placed in a warmer can be cold. Only the soup was hot. Don't be fooled by the words "Korean Charcoal BBQ". The meat are BBQ'ed first and left in the open buffet style.  The prawn was tasteless and hard. My friends complained the mussels were hard. Snow crab leg wasn't fantastic either. There was a very limited variety of food.  I would recommend people who bought the deals.com.sg coupons to ask for a credit refund and not waste their money and time to go there.
17	Lao tan both zho homework..
110	So bad ah?   And the place is fully booked siah - wanted to make reservations for tonight somemore...  Looks like I better go and get a refund...go SSK is probably a better choice and cheaper too
50	when going ssk again
1	You got to ask Evil - he is our SSK king...hahah
21	Sure, will let you know later - I am still deciding between this and Todai later
20	Either one, pls give review hor.  Esp for todai's pork belly.  Btw, you tried the revamped marriott cafe liao?
28	todai will tio food poisoning again bo
8	I did for the revamped Marriott Cafe - not bad overall but we went very late 2pm and the buffet ends at 2.30...  Almost all the food items (good ones) were out and they didn't replenish   Okay, partially our fault for being late but they should at least tell us that most of the items are gone before they allowed us in and not waste our time   Roast beef was okay but we had like a slice each niah cos bo liao...  Roast lamb was so so...the roast pork according to my partner was not bad but they only have a slice left...  Cooked food - can't give comments cos most of them empty liao  Lobsters got a lot left though but only one type   End up, one of the cooks there gave me satay from the high tea cos he saw that we really got nothing else to eat
26	I think should not liao bah...hahah  Anyway, we don't eat oysters so should be quite safe
158	Wah liew!  Like tat also can???  You should ask for a 80% discount, since you're there only 30 mins out of the 2.5 hrs n the food almost all gone.  The moo moo got Basilico std?  Wats the dmg like?Actually the best time to go is right after a food poisoning case.  You can be sure the staff there all on their toes when it comes to food cleaniness.  At least until they start slacking again ... *disclaimer - not saying they will *
222	previously before the food poisoning case, i did mention that the food not fresh
92	regarding the roast beef, it was bloody, but according to what i see from the appetite of brothers here, it may be to their preference. to some one who don't really consume 'bloody' food like me, i found it to be quite good. i can't remember if some brothers here actually visited the one at tanjong pagar, but then i was kind of deluded that it was like SSK type too, with the bbq grill at table. however, this saved one being smell like bbq ownself. but then again, one would have been prepared to smell like the bbq meats if intended to visit like SSK type of restaurant in the first place. i went in to check the seafood section before decided not to top up for them. 'pre-warned' at   at $26.90 nett (price for the new deal on weekdays, without the add on for seafood and sashimi), i think it is okay, except that you have to consider the entry into sentosa too. just received sms from anz on 1-dines-free,
6	any one has tried kitagawa japanese buffet at orchid country club some where in yishun? any reviews?
14	Thanks for the feedback on Hyang-To-Gol.  The one you went was the Tanjong Pagar branch right?  Did not try Kitagawa as we're turned off by the 1 order per item per person restriction.  Not doubt they have like 80+ items in the their menu, but after you minus out all the various combos of sushi, handrolls, sobas etc, actually not much left.  Then can only order each item once per person ... really killed the deal for us, esp the low carbers.
0	u wanan go there?
49	i went to RWS branch. my friend works in RWS went there few times and told me MBS one is better. many complaints about kitagawa service.. don't know want/can get refund or not..
11	We got 50% discount because of the CIMB card haha So total is $64 I think Moo moo is not bad but we only had a decent piece each  The other piece was at the end - salty and hard
0	featuring Boston Lobsters, Mussels and Prawns.
0	The  was one of the highlight of the night. The meat was so tender which made the slicing so effortless. At the same time, it's fatty enough. We asked for the pieces of fats which the chef kept aside which was jelly like and so shiok.
0	The  was fatty enough when Denny and Piggy when digging for the fats.
0	- Toons' Little Mermaid, the one on the right.  - The lobster wasn't as good as on Saturday and Denny ate some soft and powdery ones though those that we had were ok. - See how good it was from the pictures below.
0	Denny's pasta which he doesn't like. But Piggy liked his Pasta with Roast Lamb. Evil just love his , er I meant Pork Trotter.
0	My plate. Monkey's plate.
1	- Some came with too much alcohol in it but Evil likes it.
0	- This time the sauce is more spicy instead of just sweet and was more acceptable to us. - Though we still decided to opt for no sauce.
9	- Last Saturday I only ate one piece of this but this round which seem much fatter with the skin, so I ate quite a few pieces. Piggy actually wanted to order it plain as he claimed that the sauce was salty which we found acceptable to us.
1	the little mermaid is not little loh
0	Dessert time... - The large chocolate dipped strawberries were sweet not because of the chocolate but naturally sweet.
6	- If only the pastry was crumbly but unfortunately they were sitting there adsorbing the juices from the fruits and turned soft.
13	- We only took the strawberries for eating and they were sweet. - Triple Chocolate was good but not the Fig &amp; Walnut which the others said it tasted artificial.
7	the food looked better than what i had
1	Some hits and misses. The Boston lobsters were not as good as last week's but the roast lamb made up for it.
7	ALL REALLY LOOK DAMN NICE! I jelly
1	- The pineapple are sweet as were the strawberries.
1	more foods suit my appetite ba. usually go there whack lobsters and oysters. last week one not that fresh imo, as discussed. any way ended up the hot dishes i only tried pork trotters. yes, good photos too
4	Fairmont Singapore  Prego   What better day to wake up late and indulge in brunch? Swing by Prego with family and friends this Sunday for the popular Italian Champange brunch! Not a problem if you do not take alcohol, opt for the smoothie brunch that will satisfy that sweet tooth.
15	Zho liao just that I didn't post it here.  Anyway the pictures are up and still two more homework to go.
151	duno Brunch how much..
158	nice sharing of pics there...most of the food r my favs, arghh wld love to eat them as supper now...  so carey, which bufet u chose to eat in the end today?...
281	nice sharing of pics and review. been there before and not worth the price I've paid for.
38	That was yesterday...hahah  We went back to Claymore   We went early - reached there around 5.45 and then started eating (since we didn't have lunch)...  The vinegar pork trotters was ok niah - not enough fats though  We liked the chicken in cream sauce but the beef goulash was tough  But was quite disappointed that the salt baked salmon was in fillet form this time - no belly to jiak   As for the plates of pleasure, we only concentrated on 3 - the grilled beef which came with a nice mushroom sauce, the grilled lamb (only me) and Lake Victoria Salmon (my partner mostly)...hahah  Also ordered red wine which went pretty well with the meats...  But would be go back again? Unlikely cos the rest of the plates are carb stuff
23	Salt baked salmon still nice?  Hows the new POP, esp the salmon?  Never try the 3 new penang carb dishes?  The manager there highly recommended them wor.  I tot you will at least order 1 portion n take a spoon or something?
401	It was okay but I was kinda like aiming the belly mah...hahah  The POP salmon was not bad, my partner ate like 5 plates I think   I had like 3 of that...  Nope, didn't try...had more than enough to eat...hahah  Plus I sarpoo 4 whole lobsters cos we were there early
227	must  take the lobster.. they bloody come out so slow.
41	Just ate at Sizzler yesterday. Still think its bang for the buck. Anybody else like it?
33	I kind of like their mushroom soup. Choked full of mushroom itself. And I love the toast that they serve...
27	Wah, they are still around ah? hahah Thought they went the way of the dinosaurs liao  I used to like their salad bar but otherwise, it's quite ordinary
592	not too bad.best served with mushroom soup at toa payoh and suntec  chicken very tender and quite flavorful
42	I am more of a steak person...hahah  Speaking of which, anyone tried the Hippopotamus at Marina Square before?  Reviews like not bad leh
1	Buffet town at raffles city shopping center is not bad. considering for $38.90++ for adult on wkends dinner.
3	They didn't serve the cranberry cheese that day?
2	which cards have the 4th person dine free promo now for 10@claymore huh?
16	Actually i find it very bad. Other than the teppanyaki counter, most of the food items are cold. For that price, i rather go hotel buffet.
2	Did not get to see the spread as there was a long queue on sat when i passed by, but for tat price, its close to claymore (after 4 pay 3 promo) wor.  It'll have to be really good to beat claymore.
33	UOB confirmed got.  Other cards not sure.  Why not call them at 67370811?
2	Yup but I think their lunch is more worth it
3	Last Sat I went got cranberry cheese but boh ho jiak leh   I found it too funky...  I prefer my herb cheese - I think I cleared half that dish
3	Cranberry cheese if you like sweet n boursin if you like savoury.  Best of both worlds
10	Anyone tried this b4? Anyone wanna try it with me?  Do note tat its $16.50 nett, their carving is chicken n will be small spread, but for the price, cannot hiam liao  Let me know.
2	Too much carbs for me   And if I only whack the chicken, I will be sick of chicken for a long long time...think Indian Times...hahah  I haven't tried curry chicken since then
2	Erm, thought you know I usually don't take sweet stuff these days? hahah
3	I'm going there expecting to eat chicken n ribs nia.  Anything else is bonus
82	Erm, I will pass...hahah  Ask Evil lor - catch him before he leaves for the US
3	I went in to check out their foods before, they do have more varieties but they just look like your normal foods. Give me Claymore any time.
15	They like showing more desserts than hot foods.
2	Actually for lunch is not bad, given the variety of food...  Quality is also quite decent - more importantly, it's just one MRT stop from my office...hahah
28	We went in to check out the weekend dinner buffet, very crowded and cost $38++.
28	Yes, the herb cheese also nice.   Don't think you will enjoy the sweet cranberry cheese since you can enjoy tian mi mi better
4	The muscle man chef highly recommend the Brunch too. He say they have recently revamp the menu but not the price yet.
6	Still no chance to go after the last outing for it was aborted.
3	i think their menu like all change hor.. Equinox Jaan, now Prego.. then the marketplace recently halal certified then this new jap restaurant came about.
3	Simi?   I only had a scoop of ice cream - they had the chocolate one - not bad and not too sweet   Otherwise, all the dessert boh jiak   I think I got to stop going to Claymore liao - they like know me by name
36	Actually for S$38, not too bad liao...  Confirm is better than Sakura standard...hahah  And definitely better than Kiseki lor - that one is
28	Actually i went to Sakura Jurong East branch for lunch late last year and i found it good wor.  I still miss their mutton stew.  I tink Ah Tan went to another outlet n found it okay too.  After considering its only $15 (cos of voucher), i tink its superb value.
7	Ya, for $15, it's value for money. Another one I like if they still sell the vouchers is Momiji.
18	That was the first outing i met Manyu and Swordsman    That voucher deal was a hit for me too. Momiji is really one of the best value esp with the scallop and salmon belly sashimi.
10	Carey, tat time you went for the UFO BBQ at east coast, did you manage to make reservation?  I just can't get anyone when i called.  Fed up liao.  Also, wat time did you go?  The timing on the voucher damn wierd.  Start from 2pm?  Even for lunch on weekends also from 2pm onwards ... pengz.
88	Maybe you call too early?  I call (testing number) and someone pick up now leh.  Call for reservations at 2pm-2am, 9061 2223/ 9038 5113  Mon - Fri : 2pm - 2am   Sat &amp; Sun : 2pm - 5pm  Call for reservations at 2pm-2am at 9061 2223/ 9038 5113
3	To be honest I SMS them but no reply...so just went...hahah  Since we reached there around 3pm, it was quite empty - only 1 table was occupied and then another group came in later...  Don't go with high hopes - the BBQ food come out very dry and it's definitely not healthy...hahah  Variety also very limited, especially for the BBQ - don't even have beef - and everything was marinated with the same chili powder...  Good thing it was not spicy else my partner can't eat...  The steamboat items were those mass-produced yong tao foo pieces - also didn't eat...  Just threw in some chicken and fish fillet...we also ended up eating several eggs - surprisingly quite nice because of the ginseng chicken soup (note - it's just soup - no chicken inside despite the super nice picture)...zzzz  Tiong place - so be warned   Oh, the whole place was damn hot - like aircon not working or something...kaoz
263	Well, since I didn't utilize any vouchers, it was just okay for me niah...hahah  Idea - maybe next time I will visit their JE branch since it's nearer our place   It's inside the SAFRA is it or the Science Centre? hahah
1	This Friday there is this Star Studded sushi at Meritus Hotel where there is a one for one promo using Standchart or DBS credit card. Nett price will be $151...  Just for sharing~~
25	Thanks!  I called n managed to get through also.  Looks like they expecting a crowd on sat.  You bought the voucher too?Huh?  i tot from the pic, they have this UFO stove thingy for BBQing?  This one not DIY one?  Like tat sian 0.5 liao.  Sigh, i hate hot places ...Paiseh, its the one at SAFRA Jurong near Boon Lay mrt rather than the Jurong East one.  Its much better than the JE outlet in the science centre imo.
5	Don't go with high hopes lor...hahahIt's DIY but because the oil will drain away quite fast, the food becomes very dry very fast...  Yup, super hot and there were like only 3 tables...good luck Oh okay, it's further west...hahah  Might as well I go back to Shiu   See how lor - have car will travel but depends on mood also
13	After your comments, i go there expecting the worse liao   Furthermore its only $15.90, as long as better than IT, i'm satisfied.  Dennyz even prepared to go Bedok for part 2 liao   How come you said its not healthy?  If DIY bbq, should be hot too mah.
10	It's confirmed a tiong place - remember Manyu's review? hahah  For that price, can't complain but I rather pay a bit more to eat slightly better...hahah  BTW, have you been to Chang's BBQ? I also got vouchers for that...my hopes are not high   But bring others to jiak mediocre food is Because got no oil and the meat becomes charred very fast...you say eating charcoal is healthy or not? hahah  True but they should air con the place more mah since they know it's going to be hot...hahah
20	Manyu got review the place b4?  Never see ler.  Btw, how is Manyu?  Any news from him?  Chang is only so so for me, even given the voucher price.  I prefer Ssikkek or Corner place. Even Blue garden also better imo.  Will definitely not go back if have to pay full price.  No bacon hor   The marinate too sweet, n taste the same for most of the meats.  The only outstanding meat is the pork rib (which is more like pork chop rolled up).  Its tender n fatty, but alas gets gelat fast due to the sweet marinate.  Give it a bath before cooking bah, helps a little only though as the marinate had seeped into the meat.  Some of the tables have the infared heat stove like Ssikkek Chinatown.  Try asking for those bah.  Jiak chao tar?  Heeeheee, i know some ppl will like.  Their bread also heat until chao tar one ...  When i asked abt the hotness, i meant food wise cos you said the BBQ came out cold.
33	Not this place - his famous tiong steamboat review...hahah  But if he went to this place, I suspect he would say the same...  No sound, no picture, even SSP has disappeared So bad ah? Damn - looks like I will probably give it a miss then...  Did you try Siamese Cat yet?  Was supposed to go last Sat but they got no more seats then last min called me back say got   Already decided to go Claymore liao...Oh - sian 0.5 siah...  Tomorrow then decide bah - else I always got a back up place near my place...hahahI don't quite like those infraread stove leh - also come out very dry and uneven They like can liao The stove is confirmed hot...the place is confirmed hotter...hahah  So end up don't know which meat is being BBQed
28	Oh, this one?  Lol, i get the point liao   Chek, i tot he will at least pop up at no carbs.  The 2 of them must be busy msging each other then, where got time to post on forum   Hmmm, no chance to try siamese cat yet.  Actually i'm very keen on tat one, but something else kept popping up.  Its very promisng wor, with its free flow fishes etc.  Do give a review if you go hor.  Gum sia.  Heehee, dennyz will be bacon, moi pork belly
3	Manyu is enjoying fresh produce in Australia liao.  Carey, you keep going to Claymore they didn't offer you any frequent customer discount?
139	He is in the elite tier, no need discount one.
123	Oh this place Is supposely quite good..heard some not bad reviews be4...
1	Only got 4 choice of meat woah!   And only 1 choice of carb...  Like that also good meh?
53	Nope, unless you got Buffet Club card...Woah, kena suan by Mod also...  No lah, where got elite - else I won't need to borrow FAR card liao
62	wow carey kor kor so early come reply liao
92	You are also very early woah...hahah  I start work at 7.30 (should be 7 but I bochup)...hahah  So I am usually up by 5.30
47	No did not buy, i just kpo and call number.. Thought place uplorry.wah you start work so early.  Dennyz could be still awake his night is day and day is night.  Maybe he is now sleeping.
3	I ish janitor mah, so need to go in early   12-hour days are not uncommon for me - my hourly wage is almost like Mac liao
21	dennyz almost neversleep
49	Wah...what's your secret?   Jiak and jiak and jiak ah?
4	wah janitor pay so much in your company, can qualify for CIMB World card.  so back to food topics before mod scold.  So where's your next place for your makan session..
7	I look after some very high-end bottoms   Will probably go to either Chang or Siamese Cat tonight...  Made reservations for both actually - see my dining partner's mood bah   I am just the driver niah...hahah
25	Bo jio   We also have the voucher leh.   But ok lah, let you tian mi mi   Remember give review ok.
15	Dare not because we are still undecided...hahah  Could end up not going to either   Simi tian mi mi? There also got ice cream meh? See above for disclaimer...hahah
17	I don't know wor, never been there before   You go first then tell us got tian mi mi a not ok
227	Then you say   Anyway, won't be going liao...hahah  Just got cancelled - see what I mean about being very last minute?
1	guess is quality over quanity? plus what i heard is abt the al carte lol...
24	boh jio...u wan go where eat i also can since im damn free LOL
44	some of you bought nanxiang vouchers last time and went as a group to the restaurant and reviewed positively.  but i remembered previously was $20 for $40. now is $24 for $40. just post in case you guys still want to get the vouchers.
5	I went 3 times before. Although only 4 kinds of meat (no bacon) but the meats quality very good. They also help you turn and cut the meats, but you can also DIY. Plenty of veg to wrap your meats. The sides are also very extensive. I like their ice tea. Think it's rice tea. Clears the oily feeling. You don't come out smelling like BBQ coz the ventilation and smoke suction very good.   Price wise, I think I paid $29.90++ then for lunch promo with a main dish. So I am not sure if the gmarket offer is good.
22	hmmm tempting to get... but then it's only 1 month plus... unsure if i will be able to spend it or not...   regards,  wacky
21	bought.....lol previous deal..
125	oppss, sorry. so now is better deal
946	Ya hor - forgot that you are damn eng now...hahah  Okay next time bah - now already at home liao   End up cooking stir-fried broccoli, golden mushroom and beef fats...sibei song also
1	Errrr, we just went to the UFO bbq n steamboat buffet at east coast.  Its not very good lor, although for the price, can't complain much.  Someone spotted a banner there stating tat this Aljunied BBQ n Steamboat buffet is its new outlet.  Damn lucky man ... i almost bought this Aljunied BBQ voucher.  Now can save the trip liao
605	Don't say I didn't warn you hor...hahah  Really tionged place right?
20	So when you going for the Marriott one?  13/03/2012 - Honjin  15/03/2012 - Ramen Store
20	Unfortunately, it's not true...hahah  It was small plus not fresh - I tried a small piece - yucks  But I saw some people BBQing the crab
39	wow i also interested in the aussie seafood (tonight tomorrow?) but u guys all very busy
4	You got SMS
1	After 25 Mar.  I need to survive restaurant week first, heehee.  You keen on Marriott?  Already got 2 paxs liao.  If add you, we got confirmed 3.  Then can open up another 3 more for 6 paxs. But its likely a weekday dinner hor.  Dun wanna pay extra $5++ just to dine on weekend unless weekend got extra stuff.Oh, the 3 pieces i took all quite okay.  But like you said, its a bit small to worth the effort of taking more  I like the bamboo clams though.  Juicy.  The juices really burst forth when you bit into it.
22	So when going?
2	Anyone interested in going with moi for this?  Errrr, to try out their buffet lunch?
6	You only interested in Marriott right?  Tat one is weekday dinner after Sun 25 Mar.
29	Btw, those going to Honjin on next tue, until now i am unable to make the reservation.  No one picked up my calls for the pass 3 days.  Email also not reply ... but since we going tue nite, should be okay without reservation right?
8	And this one: .Need to make reservation as it's crowded. Contact: 222 2243 /  6220 9989
32	Australian Seafood Fiesta will be Fri 9 Mar dinner. 630pm onwards.  Still got 1 slot left.  Let me know if you want in.  For Honjin, i have been calling them during day n evening for 3 days liao ...  even emailed them.  I'll go on trying.
1	if i were you, i will avoid Honjin at all costs.   Had buffet couple of months back there, the food was terrible.
22	saw the Senki promo again but the food so so nia.  not worth for me to post.  QC done hehe!!
33	Tomorrow outing, I let you know after lunch.
5	aiyah u all so fast go the Australia one. i wanna join but my bday i cant make it. going elsewhere party!
31	Btw the waitress yesterday was alert. i told evil to pay by CC..  Then the person noticed the difference in card name.  Feed at Raffles card that is.
22	Then how? Card forfeited?
2	No lah, Beta was there mah...he's the card holder
10	Don't have bamboo clams when we went   But doubt my dining companion woud dare to eat so no big loss...hahah
68	I always tell them the card belongs to my dining partner, but i paying, tats why the far card n cc card holder names different.
14	yeah! hehehe yeah.. thats the best trick or pay cash.   If two guys go .. but card is guy then problem. i heard from my other card holder friend she kena b4 when she use the hubby card. lol.
6	Ah Tan, i just heard from Kahlan tat Honjin might have closed down.  I'm waiting to speak with groupon guy ... ZzzzZZzZZzzzZZ ...  Let you know the outcome asap.  You took leave right?
17	So, is the printed name something like John, Jack, Peter, David which are obvious male names? If you use a Chinese name, printed with the 26 possible English alphabets, there is no gender obvious names. If cashier and waiter do not understand Chinese, then you are 100% safe.
2	Honjin closed down.  Voucher holders can email Groupon for refund, or better still call them n demand a refund!
8	Still got the Ramen Store to look forward to.
6	Good also since Dreamer said the food is terrible at Honjin.  Hmmm, now got empty slot on tue 13 liao ...
6	wah really closed down.  no wonder phone cannot get through.  Singtel even gave me 2 more of their numbers to try but ringing nobody picked up.
2	go for the other spanish one (Marriot) on Tuesday lor.  By the way in your recent hotel buffet any international buffet with relatively good desert spread to recommend (beside Carousel)  I like Claymore but think my friend would be unhappy about the desert.
6	Heng  ... i feel so relieved   Let's find something to replace honjin.
2	Spanish one only start from 20 Mar.  Hotel buffets with nicer desserts i can only remember melt, line n basilico.  4 seasons also not bad.  Dining room at Sheraton is okay if you like lava cake n crispy durian roll.  If okay with just having good durian pengat, then got a few more
0	Heng ah, my tummy got chance to rest.
2	Greenhouse got very good desserts.
9	oh yes, i was also thinking of melt.  I already suggested that.  Will go check out sheraton pricing.  That's also a good place for the lava cake (i like).   I like durian pengat but not my friend.
60	Greenhouse - called, they having crab buffet.  So not going to risk it cause most of all these crab buffet not so good.  Sheraton - Dining Room only serves ala carte for Monday and Tuesday.
3	I think all these crab buffets are just a mean for the suppliers to clear their "old" stock of crabs so they are usually never good.
1	Recently tried the crab buffet at Spices Cafe @ Concorde Hotel again, and still find it pretty good.  The 5-6 crab dishes were served ala carte buffet style.  I also like the cheese lobster.  Lobster can be fresher, but the cheese sauce was nice.  Although spread was small, the crabs were quite fresh, n some of the dishes like steamed, chilli, butter n black pepper crabs were good.  The petpoo curry crab though ... yucks   The name should have given us a hint ... how can poo of pets taste nice?
15	safra Member is $10.70 but not sure of they will register you under the member's name. Else difference of $2.20 but anyway more convenient for you to purchase ...i think.
195	i tried the crab buffet at Aquamarine. it was so good and u can see ppl polish them off very fast. Big mud crabs.. i have a crab nazi fella with me n he said its fresh too..
3	wow! serious! wonder what happened to the mgt.
32	oh           nose.
671	Anyone tried the Conrad champagne brunch before? Thinking of going this sun :vijay:
1147	It was a good recommendation by Toons.   By far, the best crab from hotel buffet, i dare say.   I especially like the black pepper crab.   Will GPGT later
188	--------------------------------------------------------------- if only at AMK..
85	Wah, drink 4 cups of coffee really can whole nite dun sleep.  Still feel quite energetic somemore
101	I can't really sleep either though I drank 2 cups only.
38	Then time to do homework
23	I tink konoichi ever said she tried them b4. but u can ask them to send u the latest menu
657	Already in the progress of editing them.
10	Toons, if you wanna try cooking steaks and lamb chops, MMMM is having promotion for some meats. $3.35 for 100g of Aust chilled grass-fed ribeye. $1.99 for chilled boneless leg of lamb.   Just bought 4 slabs of ribeye each 1 inch and about 300g and also a slab of the lamb today. Cooked steak yesterday so I cooked the lamb for dinner. Nice and juicy, full of flavor despite just seasoned with pepper and nothing else.   You can vacuum-seal the steaks so that they can last 5 days in the chiller. Will sow you the pics later.
152	Just finished editing all the pictures, 116 of them to be exact.
23	went to carnivore at vivo for dinner today...the meats was good, esp the beef wrap in bacon n also the beef hump, very tender and fatty nice...there was fish as well but it came out only once...the lamb n garlic pork knuckle was abit tough though...took a few pics but turned out quite blur...gd thing oso is there is no dessert there to tempt me so i can go full telt on the meats and salad sides...highly recommended, great service, will prob go back again nxt time...
17	I also enjoyed my lunch there.  Initially a bit apprehensive tat the meats will be tough or salty, but luckily my worries were unfounded.  They only had chicken with bacon for lunch, n it was not very good.  I also found their beef hump very good, juicy, tender, fatty!  Did not have pork knuckles for lunch too   No dessert can at least serve some fruits mah.  Tats wat i told them too.  Interested in trying the churrasco at 6th ave?  Heard tat one very good too.
426	so many? o_O
126	Lao tan bo hand up home work! Tsk
24	Ya lor - make us wait and wait
17	Thanks! But ended up going for the free breakfast at the poolside instead. Champagne brunch too ex
57	As usual I just take and take so ended up with many photos.I am posting it now. Sorry to keep you waiting.
3	may I ask simi elite card to qualify for the fwee breakfast?
5	unker elite, I tot u wrote somewhere recently tat marriot sundae brunch is back, but when I called them, they said tat they r no longer serving brunch, juz a normal lunch nia
8	but ur photos often take with flash so the pics not nice one.... :vijay: time to upgrade camera to MIL type...! can consider the mirrorless olympus E-PM1... so cheap... selling for S$598 with kit lens at IT show now...! regards, wacky
18	I am still deciding between a DSLR or the mirrorless type.
115	do you want to lug around a huge bulky camera everytime u go makan...? if answer is no (and this is my own answer personally... that is why i went for E-PL2..)... very clear cut choice is to go for mirrorless type..... if answer is "i don't mind" ... well u can still consider mirrorless...... anyway  today is last day of IT show.........  regards, wacky
284	I never said it was back woah - I am also waiting for it to come back   The one I went two Sundays ago was their normal lunch and surprisingly the menu was the almost the same as their dinner   Went for dinner last night - most items were similar except got extra items like snow crab legs bah
2	So you went there abt 3 times in total?  Hows their carvings?  Normally is beef or lamb right?  Fatty n tender?
9	mirrorless, so the sensor is smaller?
5	Bigger than those P&amp;S camera and can equal DSLRs' sensor except full frame.
78	ok. thanks.   i dunno what i have been reading on the net, i see the word "small" on almost every website.
11	Twice niah   First time was recce when I went to Wan Hao  Their craving is very standard - roast beef (had ribs yesterday), roast lamb (with leg) and roast pork. They also had a baked fish - quite big but I don't know what fish except it's not salmon haha  The roast is actually not bad but I only had a single serving haha - don't have I want more, have I don't want :p  The cooked food was ok niah - plus the live cooking stations are all carbs - pasta and la mian   The desserts also not fantastic - definitely lose to lore-reno selection   Verdict - so-so niah and I only went cos it was nearby and I get 50% discount haha
73	tot the chicken with bacon was decent too, but it was breast meat instead of thigh meat...they did serve chicken thighs though, quite tender and flavourful though all the meats can be a little salty at times...i still need to drink lots of water even now lol!...but the beef hump n the beef wrap bacon was the best la, i can specially go there juz for this 2.. got lei, they have this large plate of assorted fruits by the side of the salad selection one, prob they took in ur suggestion...  hmm where is 6th ave? if near the west, i can join u all if got outing there...meats, meats and more meats!
233	I stayed there so got free breakfast with my HH card lo.
261	now where got intl buffet that got promo ah ? care to share ?
169	There are many, you just need to check the respective cc's website.
18	TERMS &amp; CONDITIONS  any one interested ? got dim sum.
110	Can see that u really desperate for jap food aft our vouche deal for Honjin fail.   Btw, i email them for the refund last week and still no reply yet   Lunch price looks like a steal. If they are serving the same food as dinner, i am keen for lunch. My only worry for such buffet is, if it's not ala carte buffet, i worry the food will get cold, like buffet town.
122	Called them to check. Lunch dun have sashimi wor. Got other minor differences too. Dinner for the win. Cannot bo sashimi   But dinner pricing not attractive. I will rather go irodori or ikoi for tat price
14	Ok, just went for lunch...hahah  Yup no sashimi for lunch - also no raw sushi   But my colleague said that the quality is not bad...  My complaint - lots of carbs stuff and without sashimi, I don't have much things to jiak...  Only thing that stood out for me was the stewed pork belly slices - very soft and tender - I ended up eating the fatty part and discarding the meat...hahah  Would I go again? Nope...hahah
19	Anyone knows if the promotion for 10 at Claymore, UOB 4 pax for price of 3 is still on. What are their regular buffet fare like besides the plates of pleasure dish ?
18	Btw just to update, Mortons got bought over by Landrys and Mac &amp; Cheese is back on the menu. Prices are still the same though. Complimentary onion loaf portions have shrunk by about half. Other portion sizes remain the same.
32	Thanks for the update   How about taste wise? Mortons is still one of the better steak houses around...  Sad if their standard drop siah...  Cut is not worth the price tag honestly...zzzzz
3	Taste wise still good. However the mac &amp; cheese must share else damn jelat. Me and my gf finished half of it only. Yea I like Mortons. I try to eat it at least once a quarter
5	Onion loaf shrink by half?! Thought the mac n cheese all along on the menu liao  guess i've mistaken...
36	Yea really half. I see liao I feel deflated. Never even bother to tarpow cause nothing much left  The mac &amp; cheese is still not printed on the menu. Our waiter told us verbally.
3	Good to know that taste-wise it's still good   But I am not a carbs person - nor is my usual dining partner - so it's okay whether they have mac&amp;cheese or not...hahah  Once a quarter sounds about right - too often and you can get bored
1	Few weeks back, i went Spice Cafe @Concorde to jiak Harvest of the Sea.   Our complimentary 1/2 lobster each. We opt for 1 sambal and 1 cheese so that we can try both. Of the 2, we both prefer the cheese version. I met an old friend from M Hotel, who is the chef at Spices now. No extra lobster from him   Here is the Crab menu. 6 different cooking style. I must say that this is one of the best crab dishes (by hotel standard) that i have tried. It is by order so each dish is served hot.
4	beo morton's us website. wah their lunch set 30usd. starter/appertiser, maincourse/steak and dessert.  who using beta FAR card now ah?
5	Chilli Crab. The sauce is good.    Black Pepper Crab. My fave of the 6. I dare say as good, if not better than House of Crab. Had 3 serving of it.   Steamed Crab with Chinese Wine, siting on a bed of egg white.    Butter Crab. Nice too.    Next, Gang Pet Poo "Thai Style" Crab Curry   What a name!? Reminds me of my 3 dogs doing their business together on the pee tray, gang pet poo   Needless to say, this got the thumbs down from me.   Pai say, forgot to take pictures cos it was forgetable.   Deep Fried Soft Shell Crab was Crispy.
4	Stay away from the gang pet poo ...
7	Their cold cuts. Salmon was ok. The swordfish is still a little frozen. Oyster is ordinary. Cold crab is sweet.    Cheese is limited.   Of the cooked dish, nothing really outstanding. I only like the lamb. But it kinda dry out a little as it sits in the warmer. They also have a pasta (never try) and soup counter which i feel as good as not trying.   Overall, just go for the crab cos that is the highlight of the buffet.
299	You got take picture of the gang pet poo bo?
795	Yup the promo is still on.  I just called them today and the lady informed me about this promo over the phone.
25	oh thanks alot !
22	hey guys!  saw this offer in my email..  anyone went before?  anybody want to go together?
11	I didn't know Ghim Tim had a lunch buffet  But if weekend can use, I think should be quite worth it
28	From grouponnever say cannot use on weekends wor.. hahahaha
68	nice food there?
361	The ala carte is not bad
175	Damage? Any promotion?
2	No have.  My photos tat day all came out badly.  My tablet's photos cmi.
6	Too bad they did not include the menu.  Heard Gim Tim is quite good, but scared the menus full of carbs.
344	$45++ with 10% or 15% cc discount.
30	Anyone bought the coupons?   Was $60 cash voucher enough for 2 ppl?  Please presend printed copy of coupon for redemption: Presend to where huh?  Thanks
100	hmmm looks interesting... 90% on HGW and in MBS... but then i see 3-6pm means more for high tea..... *thinking* ...  regards,  wacky
150	I bought first, because I don't know if any one here want to go as a group. I roughly calculate those items shown in the deal and about $40+ so I got two vouchers. Please note "Cash voucher cannot offset GST &amp; service charge".  Present to the merchant ?I heard Bosses at Vivocity not bad but did not try before. Read the review that Yu might be better than Bosses and some dim sums are special. Since unlimited coupons it is not that bad if got a big group. Not sure if on par with Taste Paradise.
32	nope. nothing that i know of
54	i think ur standard ish too high... most of us when we went last time... tot that the dim sum is good (but kinda $$$)....   regards,  wacky
65	Best if on weekend as it's very far from my work place.
24	sure.  after 26 mar.  will set a date once i contact dreamer abt somethingg else.
125	Paiseh, if weekday, then from 26 Mar onwards can liao, if weekend, must be from 7 Apr onwards then can
2	actually for dim sum i like 126 at geylang. love their chee cheong fun. not the usual type with the soya sauce. not cheap though. always very crowded.
62	at groupon's facebook, many are criticizing it.
26	I don't really like the foods at Senki, there are better Japanese buffets elsewhere.
15	only the salmon sashimi is ok. the rest can forget it.
2	Luckily the company was good...hahah  The food really cannot make it siah   If we unanimously voted the otak as the best dish of the night, you can't imagine how "good" the rest of the food were
27	Night? I thought we went for lunch.
11	durian pengat no more liao.   take jelly n pudding  lamb stew  anyhow take peek.  finally, cremo ais kream. moi favbert.
6	Didn't know that they are so bad. Never try before. Luckily never buy. Thanks for pointing out.
56	Simi - Mr Mod, I was commenting on Monkey's post...hahah
52	looks very cai png standard the cooked food though got quite a few variety......i can c u guyz hoot lots of the lamb stew though which is wat i will do too......n i juz notice got beef rendang at the corner of one of the pic!!
1	Anyone tried their dim sum before?
390	yes boss, looking for me?
92	The lamb stew was lousy?  It was good the 2 times i went there wor.
30	Ok niah - they didn't refill and we got the bits and pieces sort
2	i'll die for good food...   regards,  wacky
4	Sigh, porkie also red meat wor.  So today you not eating the lamb n pork belly liao?   Oh well, everything in moderation + exercise bah.
54	Me too. Same like smoking lor, people still smoke even if it causes cancer.
15	me not boss, me odd job labour.  I can't remember our date for elements. Can remind me again? Thank you.
7	Bo jio! .........
61	When is your date for Element?
72	24 mar 2012
9	Enjoy!
36	any upcoming buffets for u guyz?  i might be goin back to carnivore vivo this fri, really miss the beef hump and beef bacon alr...actually i cld juz nom the beef hump the whole nite...
13	Lol, you're realli a carnivore.  How much is the dinner on a fri nite?  Got $40+?  You like korean bbq buffets too?
44	yupz am born a carnivore...  think is 47++ for fri n wkend includ ph...dinner shld be more exp oso cos more variety of meats i think...  got eat once b4 the ssk bbq at chinatown, love it too...anything to do wif meats, i am game on...
23	24 Mar 2012 I cannot join as I got company outing. 31 Mar can or not?
3	Before you guys go off the deep end, just read this first
7	My hero!  Bui bui pork belly!  Beef steak!! Lamb chops!!!  Here i come!!!!
0	Has anyone tried the korean buffet at Link hotel? I've heard mixed reviews about it and wasn't sure what to make of it. Apparently it's a great deal but the service is really bad?
11	cannot change. fixed.
18	We tried b4.  Do a search for blue garden for reviews bah.  Korean BBQ buffets mostly DIY, wat little service they provide is okay ah.  Plates get cleared, gas canisters get changed without much hassle.
432	Thanks! I always go to Red Pig at Amoy street. One of the best places in Sin for korean. Good food, reasonable prices and excellent service. But wanted to explore further!
543	No problem, enjoy your meal.
8	Don't eat red meats? White meats may not be that safe wo. Fish may have mercury poisoning. Those chemically-beefed up chickens are filled with growth hormones, so are they really safe? Even fruits and vegetables are coated with pesticides and plastics to ensure they look fresh and perfect, so nothing is safe for us. We are screwed.
3	Bro, can give me the info on the curry fish head place at bishan?  Loc, tel, price n operating hrs if possible?  Gum sia!
119	Lots n lots of seafood!!!  Price: $55++ ($64.80 nett, inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3.  4.  *** The End ***
13	odds the todai deal worth?
85	nope. lunch only and only weekdays.  if they hve 4 pay 3 cc promo than more worth.  if forever alone go, than worth it.
3	Take liao share share, that one quite near office, can go lunch time to try
1	If can't join them then we have to go another time liao since a few of us got the voucher.   Ah tan, homework for ramen stall   Thank you Kahlan, Dennyz, Toons, Evil and ah tan for an enjoyable dinner outing
0	Bishan near your office meh?
5	Errrr, bishan quite near office?  If you say so   I wanna compare this one with the one at beauty world.  Need to do article again   Hmmm, maybe can compare with the west coz one too.
11	Considering where i stay, it's very near liao lor.
9	Date: Tue 20 Mar 2012  Time:   Price: $40++  Participants  1. Kahlan  2. Dennyz (TBC)  3.  ***The End ***
1	Tink he a bit overwhelmed.  I post my pics first. Thanks for entertaining us last nite ... at your own expense  Love boat!!! Actually only the salmon belly is nice.  Rest of the salmon n swordfish okay nia.  Too bad the salmon belly ran out. Prawns jin sweet.  I likie!
1	I liked the pork collar cos bui bui although some pieces tad salty.  The salty not evenly sprinkled. The beef short ribs were chewy!
1	Wasabi prawns not bad although the prawns not as fresh as the mayo ones.  Wasabi quite light n compensates the fried taste well. Fried hebi, quite okay, but not much taste. Tink sprinkle a bit of salt n pepper will be nicer. Unagi.  I also likie, but tad too sweet. Spider crab!!! Jking, no idea wat crab, but looks like spider hor  By far the biggest soft shell crab i ever ate!  Not bad too.  Crispy, no oily smell n can even taste a bit of the flesh.
1	Beef terpanyaki.  Jin ho jiak.  Best dish for me for the nite.  Tender, beefy, yummy.  Too bad also ran out after our 6 or 8th plate?  Jin emo.  Someone actually erupted at the poor waitress wor.  Jin scary ...  Chicken skin Cola chicken.  Yucks ... unless you sugar addict.
1	Fish head. This one overcooked.  The 2nd one better. Grilled sotong.  Another nice dish. Fresh n springy ...  Pork belly.  Nicer than the char siew ... tender too, bagus
1	Mayo prawns.  Another star dish, although the mayo can be gelat after a while. Np, just scrap off the mayo bah  Ramen egg!  The yolk should be more runny, but these are good enough for me.  Tink i whacked 3 eggs in total.
0	Lamb.  Taste a bit weird.  Dun like. Volcano ramen level 3!!!  Good stuff.  The broth is actually not tat hot.  Just got a bit of fiery after kick nia.  Tame lar.  Fragant though. The mushroom soup version.  The volcano one still better.  For both bowls, the ramen is QQQ, n no akaline taste.  Good. Kimchi n minced meat side.  Dump into the ramen for extra kick! Ice cream ... not very nice.
2	I haven't even finished editing Olive Tree outing leh plus moi cannot edit during office hours. In the mean time just enjoy Toons' pictures.
3	toons, wat buffet is tat? why got ramen one...
0	Must thank ah tan for putting up with all my nonsense   I miss the food already. Seriously, i dont mind go back there jiak again.   Please help look out for future voucher deal
2	Looking at yours pictures make me wants to go buy a new camera. My camera low light capability really cannot make it due to the small sensor. Need to go have a hands on with the Sony NEX 7 or the Nikon D7000.
17	Ramen Stall so got ramen.  It's Japanese buffet but they don't do buffet normally. We purchase the vouchers online.
5	Ramen stall.  I dun tink the buffet is available normally.  They only offer it as part of voucher deal.  The previously one only limited to the bbq section of the menu, but this time one is almost the entire menu, cos more X too.  I got post the voucher deal mah.
3	Durian buffet!!!  Anyone keen?
2	icic...thanx for the heads up...i think its the 1st time i c u all hoot carbo items (the ramen) for buffet sia...  the meats look decent enuff though...
2	He just drink the soup nia and kapo the eggs.
2	No lar, i got eat a few strands of the ramen.  Else I will write 'Dennyz said the mee QQQ n no akaline taste liao'  Sigh, the sacrifices i make just so i can give comments ...
5	The ramen, beef terpanyaki, prawns, salmon belly, egg n grilled sotong, are all the better must order items for me.
387	But the bacon wraps (too dry) and grilled chicken wings (too wet/oily and not crispy) not that good this time round. Although the whole menu is open to us except certain items, we only concentrated on the few dishes.
98	How is buffet town compared to kushibo? Both price are around the same.
64	Date: Tue 20 Mar 2012  Time:   Price: $40++  Participants  1. Kahlan  2. Dennyz  3.  ***The End ***  ********************************************************  Lots n lots of seafood!!!  Date: Thu 22 Mar 2012  Time: 6pm  Price: $55++ (inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks - TBC)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3.  4.  *** The End ***
7	is the marine harvest bought by coupon? if not how to get 55++ so cheap? website is 88++ exclude wines/beers??
6	Where got nice Champagne brunch? Other than basillico, equinox, mezza9 ?  Got good food n all too. Any recommendations? Thanks
273	the usual 88++ is inclusive of juices and wine.  55++ from restaurant week promo if i rem correctly
56	Gd point, i better double check if the $55++ promo price includes wine, beer n juices or not.
479	A lot of places serving sunday brunch mah.  Should have alcohol options too.  Whether nice or not, you tell us lor   Grill &amp; Chill At The Knolls, Melt, Checkers, Dolce Vita (YEA!), Senso, Cherry Gardens ...
14	I hope got seafood like oysters n lobsters plus Foie Gras. Lol.  Belated beautiful treat from my pengyou.  Lol
86	Oysters most will have, but lobsters (unless you mean slipper lobsters ) n foie gras maybe not.  Call to ask?  When you going?  Tomorrow?  Then maybe we're see each other, but this time dun act act n pretend never see moi hor   PS: 333 also got sunday brunch.  Prego sun brunch tomorrow has oysters, pork ribs n suckling pig, but no foie gras n lobsters though.
135	i really nv see u man! lol..  Hmm.. Next week then i go, maybe go Melt The World.
78	any one tried this buffet recently ???
18	Chek, tot you dun wanna frighten off the jie jie   Hmmm, Melt dun have foie gras for their sun brunch wor .
63	i saw review like have lehs.lolol..
51	FAR card is with you? Anyone using on this coming Monday to Wednesday? i might need to use it for lunch.  kamsias ~
32	SMSed you.
2	My bad.  Just went n dig out the review of our sun brunch trip.  Got foie gras n lobsters.  Too bad Ah Tan's pics all cannot see liao.
51	Which thread is it? I go see if I chuck the pictures somewhere on my external HDD.
110	melt brunch..  u got it?
657	I have the photos, just need to upload them again.
413	Anymore feedback on Hyang-To-Gol.?
50	waiting for Toons brunch review n pix!
24	You post your lunch pics, i post my brunch ones
68	Date: Tue 20 Mar 2012  Time:   Price: $40++  Participants  1. Kahlan  2. Dennyz  3.  ***The End ***  ********************************************************  Lots n lots of seafood!!!  Date: Thu 22 Mar 2012  Time: 6pm  Price: $55++ (inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks - confirmed!)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3.  4.  *** The End ***
101	update on marriott...went there instead of carnivore yesterday evening cos my gal was abit sick of meats n wanted more variety...  basic cold seafood section of lobsters, crayfish, oysters n of cos the usual sashimi/swordfish...lobsters was not very fresh unfortunately, din try the crayfish n others...  cooked food was pretty good with lots of variety, think abt 10-12 dish in all...we all agree the moroccan lamb stew, pan fried salmon n the honey pork ribs were the best dish of the nite...peking duck was decent as well though salty...desserts was v.gd, ice-cream was movenpick brand, n my gal like their cream buree...i like the way tat they cooked the food in an open kitchen concept which allow us to beo and wait there for the hot food to be top up...all in all, i pretty enjoyed it...though i still think the marriott before renovation was a tad better...
63	Mata Thai. Address and number all there. No need make bookings. They open every day. It's near where I work, but the 2 times I went were on my off days.   Personally, I think only the Curry Fish Head is good. Value for money at $10. Most of the dishes are quite cheap, but the stir-fried kailan is normal. The tom yum goong is weird, too sweet for my liking. Thai ice tea is alright. Prawn tanghoon is not bad, but to screw up this dish, you must be really bad.    Max 2 pax for one curry fish head served in claypot. You can even try 1 pax for one. Not that it's small, but if you like fish head, you should have no problem finishing one.   Oh, no GST, svc or other charges.   Let me know if you happen to pop by.
4	Gum sia!  Wah, $10 is cheap wor.  Within my budget   Any other better non carb dishes to recommend?  I'll probably drop by next sun after doing brunch at toa payoh wor.  Think abt 3pm.  You working right?
27	You comparing against Marriott's previous dinner buffet?  I went b4 wor, but dun find it tat good.  Then again, its quite some time back.  Or you comparing against their previous sun brunch?
20	lunch is jiak beef noodles at Lorong 7 Toa Payoh, 1 pic in Fb.
22	I did not try much. Maybe you can ask them to recommend.
65	where's the best korean bbq buffet? 2d1n? ssieki lunch buffet only 13+? anyone been there and know what meats they serve since it's so cheap
404	yupz am comparing to Marriott's daily lunch n dinner buffet standard (have tried both their lunch n dinner buffet on a weekday b4 renovation), i have nvr tried their sunday brunch b4 so i wouldn't know though i have heard its very good...
30	tag tag tag along
38	Count you in liaoz
5	unless toa payoh really that good until fill us up badly  i am hungry.. haven't eat yet
45	$14 brunch?  Errrr, i'm going with no expectations. Just intend to eat the roast chicken n ribs nia  Anyways, piggy said the fish head quite small.  1 person also can finish, so 2 of us sharing should be a piece of cake  Aiyah, after your test, can go have a feast.  Endure!
5	We went several times already - quite decent...  The variety is slightly smaller but not too bad - just that got no bacon - not a deal breaker unless you die die must have it...hahah
79	You don't like the roast pork meh? Both the western and chinese version not bad - we didn't try the peking duck (thought it was just normal roast duck)...  Anyway, appetite quite small these days - can't anyhow whack   They definitely replenish the lobsters a lot faster - there was also crab legs for dinner - quite sweet as well   Plus we don't eat carbs so never try the hot food section - both pasta and la mian   Ice cream was not bad - we only had a scoop each - too full to eat anything else - also never try the pastries due to the sugar   I found the latest spread to be slightly better than the pre-reno one (juices not included this time though)...  Of course, their brunch was top-notch - can't wait for them to bring it back...hahah
121	buffet town having salmon theme buffet now.
5	i tried the chinese version of the roast pork, damn it was saltier than the duck!...western one i din try though i think it looks crispier than the former...yupz lobsters n oysters were replenish fast which reminds me, i forgot to take the crab legs...  had 2 large bowls of 6 scoops each of the ice-cream, feeling was damn gd...  one of my fav buffet place in my list will always be marriott, i think its better than claymore (depends on their pops) which u guyz seem to fancy more...
2	come to think of it, not wise to eat too much salmon for me during a buffet even though its gd...will feel quite oily and jelat after tat if take too much, and there will be no stomach space for other food alr...i took too much of the salmon belly tat time at carousel, almost vomitted after 2 hours trying to digest...
65	I go find you all during my 10min break at 3.30pm. Not good don't ham tum me. The curry is the green curry type but orange colour. Not the assam type.
253	I might be free late afternoon on Sunday.   Will join you all for the fish head if i can.
173	Lucky orange color, if green green then yucks.  Looks like the fish head grow moss like tat.
7	1 more slot still open for lunch at Basilico tomorrow.     Date: Tue 20 Mar 2012  Time:   Price: $40++  Participants  1. Kahlan  2. Dennyz  3.  ***The End ***  ********************************************************  Lots n lots of seafood!!!  Date: Thu 22 Mar 2012  Time: 6pm  Price: $55++ (inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks - confirmed!)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3.  4.  *** The End ***
1	Both time we sat on the 2nd floor. I did not have the pictures of every page of the menu but they are quite extensive.
0	- First time we saw such big soft shell crab!!! At least the crab are properly prepared so it doesn't have that yucky "uncleaned" taste. - Very tender cubes of beef but a tad salty.
1	- Not overcooked and the soya sauce complemented it exquisitely. - A big slice of beef to wrap up the golden mushroom and soaked in black pepper sauce is deliciously yummy.
0	- The Swordfish was too thinly sliced but otherwise good and they have got Hokki Shell which was an added bonus. - Mmmmh, sweet.... - Only got two plates and that was it.
0	- If my memory served my correctly, these were less sweet than what we had previously. Doesn't disappoint here. - Cola + chicken = thumbs down for this.
1	- Very tough according to those who ate it. - I only like the smoke duck and not the quail eggs which are kind of rubbery. - I am not sure if this is the correct name of the dish. Who ordered this?
6	- A bit oily and not as crispy as before. - Love this salmon roll with mayo.
11	- We asked for the max level they have which was level 3 and it wasn't really that hot. I quite like this ramen though I still think of it as a very expensive maggie mee.  - They have a few side dishes to accompany the ramen and this was one of it. - Don't like this, must be the marinate they used.
197	- Nice fatty and slightly chewy texture. Sweet and juicy , courtesy of Donkey. Kudos to the restaurant who help peel and slice this up. complements of the restaurant after Denny "raised" his voice against the waitress.  Service wasn't too shabby and the waitresses checked with us what orders were still not yet served. A few items were sold out like the scallop and they also ran out of beef midway though our meal. Also we may have access to an extensive menu but it seems that we are only ordering the same few dishes over and over again. Wonder why we are limiting ourselves this much? I won't mind going back again just to try out the other dishes we have not ordered.
103	ah tan, not sarawak apple, its philippines pineapple!
285	It's ah tan leh....he sure have some insider info u n I dunno de
7	Was there again last night   They had baked salmon - a bit dry but still okay  No Chinese roast pork - replaced with char siew - very dry   The Western roast pork was still okay - the beef was not fatty enough - didn't try the lamb...hahah  They had veal tongue - a bit funky but the beef cheek was very tender...  Surprisingly, they don't have lobsters last night - but got crab legs and crayfish niah...  Didn't try the desserts other than having a scoop of ice cream each - not quite sure what flavour it was though...hahah  Overall, the food there was quite decent, since we get 50% off
5	Thanks Denny, I go change.
5	Date: Wed 21 Mar 2012  Time: 645pm  Location: West Coz Cafe @ West Coast Plaza  Highlights: Curry fish head, claypot chicken, mango salad etc  Price: Likely order their set meals n split the bill.  $20+-  Participants:  1. Donkey  2. Twtan  3. Dennyz  4. Toons  5.  6.  7.  8.  *** The End ***
95	I call to make reservation later during lunch.
23	included myself...
17	I will make reservation for 8 persons then. ()  Ala Carte Dinner  Date:  (Wednesday)  Location: West Coz Cafe @ West Coast Plaza  Time: 6.45pm  Highlights: Curry fish head, claypot chicken, mango salad etc  Price: Likely order their set meals n split the bill. $20+-  Participants:  1. Donkey  2. Twtan  3. Dennyz  4. Toons  5. kahlan1003  6.  7.  8.
5	Welcome!  Bo lunch appt on wed? Wat is 1003?  Date of birth?  Weight?
8	A big minus point. No pork no lard. Tom yum comes in claypot and charcoal stove, but doesn't taste nice. But I have seen the papaya salad looking good. Strips of papaya fried to crisp and comes with dipping sauce.
3	have both it is set menu and actually not so interesting.  Want to see if i can get myself out of it.  (main is Spaghetti).  If can't get myself out, i will eat lesser.  Dinner at west coz is much more interesting for me to miss.
35	wow u seem like a big marriott fan, or becos u can get 50% off? teach me how to get lei...  i remb hooting all the beef cheek when i went before the marriott renovation, bestest dish of the day, reminds me of the beef hump at carnivore though different cut lol, very tender n flavourful i agree...maybe they only serve lobsters during fri-sun?  icecream flavours they have when i was there was yam, choc, vanilla, strawberry iirc, so u cld have eaten either one of the 4 lol...how was the hot cooked dishes, any miss n hit for u?...
18	I will make reservation for 8 persons then. West Coz Cafe (Open) Ala Carte Dinner Date: 21st March 2012 (Wednesday) Location: West Coz Cafe @ West Coast Plaza Time: 6.45pm Highlights: Curry fish head, claypot chicken, mango salad etc Price: Likely order their set meals n split the bill. $20+- Participants: 1. Donkey 2. Twtan 3. Dennyz 4. Toons 5. kahlan1003 6. raven1019 di di 7. 8.
11	He is using CIMB world card.  It offers tiered discounts similar to cards like Feed@Raffles.  Elite card with steep steep application requirements.
10	It is mostly because of the 50% discount and the food is actually quite decent at that price...plus the fact that it's within walking distance from the gym we go to   Yup the beef cheek was quite tender and much better than the veal tongue - tasted a bit funky   I didn't know that...the last two times we went were weekends - maybe that's why got lobsters...hahah  Don't think so about the ice cream - confirm it's not any of those you mentioned - it has some nuts in them with caramel if I am not wrong but it's not overly sweet...hahah  Their fruits selection is a bit disappointing though - only had 3 varieties - yesterday was longan, grapes and forgot what was the other...hahah  We didn't really try any of the Asian hot dishes - they had sliced dong po rou but not tender enough...  Other cooked food was so-so niah other than the beef cheek to be honest
3	U boh jio go jiak again...always boh jio de
9	Wooo West Coast Plaza!   Arrange more westie outings next week leh
27	7. Eastsider
23	Hi Eastsider, if you have not joined us before, please PM your contact number to either me or Toons. Reservation made for 8 persons at 6.45pm under my name. ()  Ala Carte Dinner  Date:  (Wednesday)  Location: West Coz Cafe @ West Coast Plaza  Time: 6.45pm  Highlights: Curry fish head, claypot chicken, mango salad etc  Price: Likely order their set meals n split the bill. $20+-  Participants:  1. Donkey  2. Twtan  3. Dennyz  4. Toons  5. kahlan1003  6. raven1019 di di  7. Eastsider  8.
6	yuan lai is so true, carey shu shu is a top elite....
65	i see...which gym is it? the one at taka or gym@orchard...  not a bad idea actually, after gym go buffet...
9	Anyone needs a lift from Clementi mrt station @6.30pm, let me know.   Meet at the bus stop across from Clementi Mall, towards the Dover direction.
2	Simi top elite...wait the real elites here laugh until geh kar lau
3	Last minute again - after gym mah - also took very long to decide to go jiak where...end up less than 1 hour to eat niah   Plus 3 people discount boh hua
0	PMed you le!  see you kor kors tomolo ( my virgin outing with you all)  Regards,  small boy
3	Knightsbridge   Wanted to go Open House to try but like quite pathetic leh...  They have 4 cooking stations but like CMI...  Got one serves roast (not appetizing), another does dim sum (mostly carbs), one did claypot (nothing fantastic) and the last one I forgot...hahah  End up going back to Marriotts - need to find new dining places around there liao...hahah
2	There is always the first time.
19	1 hour enough time to jiak?
8	i will walk there from work place 5-10min walk
8	We need lift! Can leave 2 slots for dennyz n moi?  Thanks.
2	Very small eater these days - even over the 1 hour, we could only manage like 3 rounds niah   More than enough
4	me and Dennyz, can?
1	Sure.   Picking Toons first then Kahlan, Dennyz and Ah tan at Clementi.
3	Wah .... i feel so kiasu now.   Normally we are first to reach and last to leave
4	You saw me eat recently mah...hahah  That's how much I can stomach these days
5	That's why u can't say u bui bui anymore hor.
1	Can - cos tummy full of lard - no more room
1	Early to eat all the good stuff incase they dun replenish, n last to leave in case they serve out new stuff.  Realli sibei KS
3	You say bo pa kay, next time must show me then i tell you got room a not
1	Plus sometime tar bao also
1	Now got 6 lumps liao, where got space for food?
8	Sssshhhhhhh ... tat one our secret
6	Wah car full Liao wanna join also no space le
4	ownself take bus go there lo. can take 51 from ur hse.
1	Siang huh? hahah  Always been there   But fasting really shrinks the stomach
1	Got - the boot
0	51 can take till dunno when..Mai la like tt Mai go better
3	im going Melt champagne Brunch.  lets see gt what ho liao. im looking forward to the roast pork,foie gras actually/.
7	Bring camera go do homework hor.
2	Got "sim", no car also can go.   Sorry, i forgot, me not elite so he don't want join
1	You want him to take photos, must arrange for a pretty mei mei to hold the food.   Then maybe he will take pics of the food, as a by product of taking pics of the mei mei ...
2	That's the part i admire you.   I tried and failed.   My weigh had stagnate for more than 1/2 year and lately, put on 1 kg due to all the cheating on bread and ice cream   But i am still happy lah.
0	See la, elite bo jio him, he complain ... we got jio him but he no come
2	I thought so too. Beta, can I join you then?
2	I lost 5kg, must be the stress of being chased for homework and at work.
4	So much ah?   Must be all the running around the coconut tree with bollywood
7	Actually was running up and down the stairs.
5	what is your name? LOL! sorry after so long i still dunno your full name
16	Cow went to West Coz Cafe yesterday, he said curry fish head is now $16 but smaller in size.
50	No need to admire - still chao bui bui satu   Not bad liao, can eat so much cheat and only put on 1kg niah...hahah  Most important is kai xin jiu hao
229	if ish buffet ok I go but jiak fish head only ish far
2	Hi you mean me ah?   I'm Brandon
8	Think he is referring to me.
352	He is my Tan Tan
137	*****************************************************  Lots n lots of seafood!!!  Date: Thu 22 Mar 2012  Time: 6pm  Price: $55++ (inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks - confirmed!)  Participants:  1. Toons  2. Donkey  3.  4.  *** The End **  Is this updated?
31	wow.... near my places... i woud like to join but have something on tomorrow... =/
74	Hi Brandon
1	Sound so gay.   Plus i thot that one is i call wan
15	So far, still the 2 of us.   Please join us if you can
36	Not BF meh?
0	Carey kor kor, u are also my BF mah ... buffet friend
3	Keke, you got first dips on Tan Tan.  I'll cede my rights to you   Anyways, its giving me goose bumps calling him tat too
1	Ah tan tan is gonna come in n say last ot le as it is out of topic
3	Sigh, this one got complications.  I accidentally cancelled my reservation last nite.  Only managed to get back reservation for 2.  Still trying to rectify my mistake ...
30	It's okay, I think I will stick with bui bui unker
76	-----------------------------------------------------------might be fated that i should not go   any way i can only sort of do a last minute confirmation tomorrow, hence check if there is a updated list in case requires confirmation now before you reduce the seats.
17	So he can have candlelight dinner without any spotlight mah.
42	still can joiin??
70	According to Toons, he "accidentally" cancelled his reservation.  See below for details.
7	My tantan can be so naughty at times.  Ooops, not mine liao.  Gave away to Donkey  Anyways, we're back in biz!!! ************************************ Date: Thu 22 Mar 2012 Time: 6.30pm Price: $55++ (inclusive of wines, beers and soft drinks - confirmed!) Participants: 1. Toons 2. Donkey 3. Dennyz 4. Shalome (TBC) Backup - Gaara (the sand monster!) *** The End *** Gaara, i try to up the reservation.  Let you know once its done.
6	got meeting cannot make it for later dinner
5	OK, remove Raven from list. So who is meeting at Clementi bus stop later? ()  Ala Carte Dinner  Date:  (Wednesday)  Location: West Coz Cafe @ West Coast Plaza  Time: 6.45pm  Highlights: Curry fish head, claypot chicken, mango salad etc  Price: Likely order their set meals n split the bill. $20+-  Participants:  1. Donkey  2. Twtan  3. Dennyz  4. Toons  5. kahlan1003  6. Eastsider  7.   8.
22	These 3 -  Twtan  Dennyz  kahlan1003
7	OK, try to be on time (6.30pm) as the place get crowded after 7pm and finding a parking space will be hard that is if one can get into the carpark in the first place.
7	Oei .. what give away, you think i garang guni meh   Happy to see more going. The more the merrier.
18	Ahem, yea lor, the light shining off someone's forehead damn glaring Errrrr, if you garang guni ... then wat does tat make T_ _ T _ _?
1	Later we must sit beside each other hor, so we can tian mi mi with each other ... nah, jk, we take photos easier, else some yao guai say we take photos until the food cold liao.  Scared he scold me too  he very the fierce
6	me, meeting at the bus-stop opposite Clementi Mall right?
2	Toons, mai kay kay lah. Actually u want ah tan sit beside you cos light can shine off somewhere and you can take better pictures right?
8	Yes, I will pick you all up from there.   Meet nearer the mrt escalator cos the bus bay can get crowded.
2	OK, I also got a fright, never knew he so fierce one.  So we don't have to use reflector and our pictures ended up brighter.
2	yao guai ? where got demon? oni? hungry demon/ghosT?
4	ok, thanks
11	saw something yummy for our fatty meat leaders!  Foong Kee Roasted Meat: Super Duper Sio Bak! Click link below to go heaven !
12	new Japanese buffet
80	Saw it previously. The reviews weren't good.
308	dennyz u wan to play game after ur dinner tonight?
3	Kali fish head, assam fish head, chye poh egg, sambal kang kong, claypot golden chix, pandan leaf chix n another one, i tink its sambal sotong (but its sweet lor).  I like both the kali n assam curry.  The assam is those thicker sweet sour kind.  Quite appetising, but the kali one more fragrant.  Very tempted to eat with those thick white loti   The pandan leaf chix n claypot chix also nice.  The sambal kang kong not nice, n the chye poh egg is slightly sweet, likely due to the chye poh used.  Some might not like it, but i find it quite nice.
3	Nice meeting you too.  Din get a chance to talk with you much though, but i had fun looking at your photos.  You're quite the foodie too   If we did not scare you off, join us more often lar.  Wan try Ssikkek at Chinatown?  The environment is much better plus got pretty lady boss too, although you can call her auntie liao
2	Yep their salmon and sword fish is decently good.. Hehe
2	Timing okay. Tat time go Basilico, took 15 mins.  Considering evening traffic, unlikely to be earlier.  So safer to let Dennyz go earlier   This kinda of buffet cannot go late one.  As for loc, will be better to meet him at the bus stop opp botanic garden mrt.  Its the same no. of stops for him, but more convenient for you as its on the way.
9	Got swordfish?  I'm sold.    Btw, did you ever try Shin Yuu at Greenwood Ave off Bukit Timah?  Its 1 of the better jap buffets imo.  If you like jap buffets, you must give it a try.
3	i heard of..  known for their beef if i not mistaken
2	yeah haha , thats just one of my albums.. i have other albums too.. lazy to transfer to this one ahahaha..  yeah quite the foodie haha , particular la   wah pretty lady boss ah.. u go eat there.. i pei u , then i go xian the lady boss la ok? ahahaha just kidding
1	Their beef is quite nice, but not as nice as the ones at En. En's beef dishes are really good, whether its the beef carpaccio, shabu shabu beef or teppanyaki beef (very tender!).  I like Shin Yuu for their sashimi, esp white tuna, n the generally tastiness of most of its dishes.
17	not so impressed by this meal.. perhaps back then it was better..  pandan leaf and claypot chix was nice tho..however claypot chix should make it completely boneless , so u can chew it shoikly   fish heads were decent  sambal kang kong fail max as mentioned..
4	be it botanic garden mrt or your workplace mrt there, i also can ~ juz let me know
2	Nice meeting  u too eastsider hope  u not go bored  sitting  next to auntie haha   btw same  as Dennyz  i also very thirsty after i reach  home   ok going to zzz  now nite
1	Been wanting to go back to eat the curry fish head at  for a long time since the last trip there was in October last year. Finally managed to gather another five makan kakis to satisfy our craving. 154 West Coast Road #02-23 West Coast Plaza Singapore 127371 Tel: 6779 1303 They have done up a new menu, made some changes to the set menu's dishes and the prices had gone up a bit. You need to be there early before 7pm else be prepared to wait for others to finish their dinner. Set Menu for 4-6 persons at . We ordered Items 1a, 2d, 3a, 4a and 5d. I missed taking picture of the other page of the menu.
0	The  are part of the set. - Slightly spicy and smooth fragrant curry came bubbling hot. The fish head was fresh and the curry drinkable as it's not salty. Lifting up the fish head for all to admire.  - This was one of the extra dish we ordered. Had expected it to be quite sourish but it turned out to be mild sourness instead. Some liked this better while others preferred the former.
0	- Whether it was BBQed or not, I can't tell but who cares if it tasted good. - I had remembered that the last time I ate this, the sauce was more sticky and chicken more crispy. This time it's more "wet" and not crispy but meat more tender.
65	- Hmmm, I can't seem to taste the pandan flavour... This was another dish we ordered outside the set menu. - I won't order this again, the sambal don't have that kick and it's far more saltier then needed. - The preserved radish actually tasted sweet so we ended eating this with the chilli which was good. The last two dishes took a long time to be served, by then I had finished two plates of rice.:
1	i don't know any one associate armpit smell to vinegar smell?   i sms you tomorrow? if nothing goes wrong i should be going. but i usually last minute will have things go wrong.   thanks for the map, but regretfully i am not able to read directions or maps. if i walk to claymore, is via isetan scotts?
5	if i going, if there is space still for car ride, can hitch?  5+pm i should be able to make it. i sms donkey tomorrow to check once i confirm.you trying to deter me from going by posting this. the receipt showed 8 pax ? i was calculating the amount each paid.  is the curry fish head available for takeaway? any surcharge?
34	I made reservation for 8 persons but only 6 persons went. I have not order takeaway before so can't answer that question.
446	okay twtan, thanks  just to share, from facebook.
4	Nice meeting you too EastSider.   Next time join out buffet then we can jiak gao gao
12	Me and you are same kaisu breed so I actually suggest 5:45pm but they question if i can reach so fast mah   I don't know the botanic garden mrt wor, not unless you show me later. Of course can
17	Early bird gets the worms mah.  I dun wanna end up with lob claws n no bodies   plus each salmon only 1 belly nia
79	NPGT - Outing with Evil at Buffet Town yesterday...  We had lunch there yesterday, where it was having a "salmon theme"...  Generally, the food quality was not bad - then again, I didn't try every dish (small stomach capacity) but those I did were certainly quite good.  Had 2 grilled salmon heads - very fresh and they were totally destroyed   The satay there was good, although the pork was better than the beef, which was too dry...  They also had semi-cooked salmon belly (no sashimi or maybe I was late - the whole place was an aunty town)...Evil said it was quite good   The braised pork was also very nice and tender - fatty too   Also had the green tea ice cream - think they use real green tea powder - so it's actually slightly bitter and tasted more like green tea ice than cream   Hmm...looks like I only ate very little huh?   Will let Evil fill in the rest, including the hot mummy...hahah
10	how much is the damage at buffet town?
5	&lt;S$30 nett for lunch   Dinner is expensive though - not worth it...hahah
226	Yup the hot mummy is 101% I wld hit on if the daughter isn't there...although I suspect might be atb but I will ignore it for her as she's srsly hot....def 1 of the hottest milf I've seen
8	May I know where did you guys buy the vouchers from?
5	But the fatty skin will.
2	Various voucher sites.  Eg, a couple of us is getting this.  It will be a sat lunch.  If you keen, can buy n pm me your contact.  When we proposing a date to go, i can sms you. Only thing is date not confirmed now   Alternatively, can wait for ad hoc outings with confirmed dates, like Basilico on tue and Line tonite.
14	Kaoz, you wanna go on sat by yourself just cos of fatty skin?  Besides, tat time i remember LJ came late, n still got lots n lots of fish.  In fact so much tat we have to help to eat. We'll fix as mon/tue/thu/sat n see which days got the 2 items bah.
34	No lah, I prefer got dining companions so will go together.
327	i'm fine with this suggestion.  Thanks for the arrangements.
50	scroll back the pages n i realise toons and gang goin to buffet today again?...  is this the third buffet for u all this week?...  hope u guyz enjoy it, and of course waiting for the aar...
11	Reviews not as good..
26	you are back from the buffet?  How was it?  Or you did not managed to make it?
3	can i ask Basilico on Tues is lunch or dinner buffet?
19	It was lunch
2	oh! over liao huh, sorry i thought next tuesday. lol
3	Donkey cannot go so she did not go. Scared the 2 guys eat her up, heehee
28	So you went with Denny only? How the foods?
10	Yea, its a men's nite today   Very very big spread.  Very very full   As usual, mixture of hits n misses, although more misses than hits, but with such a big spread, you just eat the hits also very full liao.  Like Dennyz, he machiam the whole nite just whacked the salmon belly n big scallops.  He did try other stuff, but its mostly those 2 items.  So much food tat i cannot finish the plate of really nice salmon belly tat i took.  End up just eating 0.5 lobster, n i asked for it to be grilled so tat i can take photo.  Even though only 0.5, also cannot finish it cos really too full.  Other stuff like beef cheeks, lamb korma also took just a small piece even though i liked it.  Coffee they have like 6-7 varieities.  Teas got 1 whole box of abt 8 types.  Desserts so much until i can do theme plates as in 1 plate of 4-5 items consist purely of choc desserts, another plate of shooters, another of cheese etc.  Even when i'm younger, i tink i can only sample at most 1/2 nia, not to mention now.  The food is not exceptional, but the spread as mentioned is huge.  Decor is quite chic n cozy.  Got ppl to oogle.  Its an experience lor, one which i dun mind coming back annually or abt there
8	Sound like not bad after all, awaiting for your homework. Let see if the coffee works it magic and get you up or not.
1	thanx for the review...  salmon is jin ho jiak, but from my personal experience cannot eat too much esp during a buffet, cos all the fats make us full and jelat very quickly and no space to try other food...  i still prefer quality over quantity for a buffet, as long as got nice beef/lamb/pork/fish n after desserts, i can go for many rds and feel satisfied alr...those seafoods are a bonus...  speaking of this, i hope i can go to carnivore tmr...
9	If Basilico, for every 10 items, 6-7 are good, then Line will probably be 2-3 items, but they have so many 10s n 10s of items tat you add them up also quite a no. liao   Pics see first.  The lightning there all orange orange to create a warm cozy effect, but dreadful for photo taking.  All my photos look like those 40 - 50 yrs ago yellowed photos   Dunno whether can correct them or not.
29	Yea, their salt baked salmon is good.  Tat precisely wat happened to Dennyz, too much fatty salmon belly n scallops n he peng san liao.  Not much room for other stuff.  Line has the biggest dessert spread of all the buffets i went for so far.  Normally i will agree with you abt quality over quantity, but for Line's case, the sheer quantity is overwhelming wor. Like for the seafood counter, they have crabs,crab legs, lobsters, lobster claws, scallops, mussels, oysters and prawns.  Thanks to their grill counter, you can take any of seafood stuff n ask them to grill it for you.  Not only can they do plain grilling, they can also do the cheese version, did not ask abt sambal grilled version though   This essentially more or less doubled their offerings liao.  Like i said earlier, even if there are more misses than hits food wise, its like you anyhow shoot 1000 bullets also will hit the target as compared to 1 shot 1 kill   Watever not offered, you go ask them, they will serve you if they have it.  Like initially only got lamb, chix n salmon, but i complained no beef, they went and roast a haunch of beef.  No walnuts for ice cream?  No prob, go ask the staff at the salad counter etc.  Its an experience lor.  But if your appetite is not big, then you really have to be selective lor.
18	points taken there toons...i din know i can take those seafoods and ask them to grill, tot it wld be strange as its not supposed to be eaten this way......but yeah tats the gd thing abt buffets, there r bound to be some items u dun like, n bound to be others tat u do n really like...guess u wun really lose out...  anyway i seem to remb lots of pple saying the line was very gd back then some years ago (right up there with the atas greenhouse), den now standard seem to dip alot alr...the best buffet i have tasted so far is still greenhouse followed by carousel...but of course for the price of this 2, you wld expect the quality to be there...
74	Actually it makes sense mah.  Those seafood on ice should logically be fresher than the ones used for cooking cos when you cook the seafood, you can use sauces and stuff to help mask the taste, so you can afford to slightly less fresh ingredients if you want.  Wan to eat duck noodles, then get the roasted duck from the chinese meat stn n combine with the noodles etc.  Crepe plus cheeses from the cheese platter.  Ice cream plsu crepe or bread.  Crab legs tad too salty?  then dunk into clam chowder.  Can do a lot of mix n match action.  Wat items do you like from Greenhouse?  The boiled lobsters?  But ultimately, its wat you said, quality over quantity.  The buffets which i really like are the ones with exceptional items even though it might only be 2-3 items.
12	Paiseh, the deal already sold out before i have a chance to buy it.  They only selling around 100 vouchers nia
96	I thought when it comes to buying such vouchers, you always fast hand fast leg one?
340	Sigh, looks like the coffee working very well Old n slow liao ...
185	Then confirm I go boh hua...hahah  Probably just eat like 5 items
36	They are supposedly famous for the fried chicken - but last night's one was coated with so much flour that we spent half the time removing it before eating...hahah  But the standard is still nowhere near the one I had in Korea from a shop that operated out of someone's house...hahah  Not cheap for a whole "boneless" chicken - S$30  We also had grilled beef short ribs (without bone) - not too bad but a bit bland - also not cheap S$30  Finally, we had our usual fried saba - very nice and crispy (S$13)
55	So far I only know of Greenhouse that serve the Boston lobsters freshly boiled on the spot.
3	They are selling the vouchers again.  This time bought liao
32	K, another time then.  Go try Joo Mak at beauty world lar.  Their saba is very good.  Supposedly their chix (original) also good, but i did not get to try as it was not available for lunch when i was there.Cheesecake?  Hmmm, no memories of it wor.  Gotta try it if i ever go again   Actually i quite like their hot dishes too.
14	Sold out now.
10	Ah ok, will try that one next   But the deal breaker could be that there's no Udders ice cream place there
6	Nearby only wat.  Tink at most 3 mins drive?  Can also take a slow walk there.
29	That's true...hahah  There is actually a public car park in between both places
80	Tomorrow will be trying the following :- and maybe Will go to St Smith FC for the 2 chixs first at 10am, then walk to jiak the sio bak.  Lastly, mrt down to tanjong pagar for the fish head (if onz).  Whole thing will likely span from 10am to 12pm.  Lots of nice food at Smith St FC n Amoy FC, so we might make side trips  Let me know if keen to join me
1	Let me help you with some pictures.  Foong Kee's~ The boss can get pretty vexed during peak hours so approach his employees if you do not want to be brushed off~   Ma Li Ya Virgin Chicken~
36	try here
1	Thanks!  Looking forward to Sat's trip liao
7	Yea, i already bought from there.  Thanks.
10	Oh, for Foong Kee, remember to ask for the fatty char siew as the leaner ones are a lil dry~
27	Thks for the reminder. So foong kee is worth going? How is the char siew there?
179	I would rate it as pretty good but I personally find it just a lil behind that of Fatty Cheong's &amp; Kay Lee's~
168	i didn't go   the pretty girl no go, me demoralized, no appetite won't any much bo hua than me. i eat quantity like any average kid.
514	went to vivo carnivore for dinner juz now again...pleasant experience as was the 1st time i went there 3 wks ago...this time they have a very decent tuna salad well-mixed with the corn n a kind of bean which i took aplenty in the self service section till they run out and nvr came back to refill it...n of cos had my fill of beef hump n the buttered fish......the pork n lamb leg wasn't too gd though as was like the 1st time...my gal said the pineapple n the jap sweet potato which i din try was v.gd...  jialat too full to sleep now, n abit scared of meats now alr...
26	Nice...hahah  You should try the one at 6th Avenue then - I think you will be blown away   The variety is a lot more and I absolutely love their beef ribs...hahah
48	I dated him but gena rejected.  I'm heartbroken   Come to tink of it, you also rejected my date.  Now i devastated!
26	Yes Brazil churras at sixth ave is still the best...and they were the first in Singapore as well
17	Bought too. Going have my revenge on them after missing out on Honjin. But the last trip to Himawari, I wasn't that impressed with the sashimi.
7	aiya, u each item jiak 10 times where got not hua? hua until cannot hua sia!   u so elite will like us peasants worry abt the huathiness meh?
103	do they serve free flow ice water ?
61	If they serve you wanna go?  If yes, then i call them to ask.  Very long never jiak with you liao?
156	Foong kee's char siew is quite ordinary. Roast duck is not bad. I would go there for their roast duck.   Toons, you tried Fu Shi's char siew? That's the gold standard for me. Ask for glass char siew. Glass due to the fats colour.
96	guys looking at buffets around 50-100 range for 2 person for birthday which would u all highly recommend
1225	can i join too?
70	Jiak 10 times?  You see me too up   Each item can jiak twice is already very good liao
2	yes..  if not i have to smuggle in big bottles of mineral water like that time at the novena square buffet.
16	Its common. when u whack too much of the same thing. few more days later, u will not scared of meats and continue to eat meat again.
986	Anyone knows if keyaki or nadaman got credit card discount ?
47	Don't worry, they serve free flow of water
8	you went to Brazil churras at sixth ave before ? since they serve free flow of water, thats good.
60	Yup, went several times before - the most recent was on X'mas
7	Siang liao eh?   Sorry I last minute can't go cos i was down with a nasty sore throat and flu after the powderful fish head. Miss 3 buffet outings as a result   These few days jin emo lor cos on liquid diet.
3	heard about it recently. how are you now? don't think about buffets now and rest well. : at first i thought i posted a deal, format similar to mine.
1	Anyone tried? how's the spread and food?
2	remember your daily minimum 500mg of vit C
0	Vit C is over-rated  Take Vit D instead bah...hahah  Haven't fallen sick for the past 2 years
6	I think Toons bought before - not sure if he went already...hahah
1	But from the pictures, it's basically carbo dishes.
3	U and Toons wanna go for a weekday lunch to Fu Shi lard, I mean glass char siew and then finish with a curry fish head at Mata Thai?
9	If this Wednesday, I may be able to join as I am on AL.
9	Think toons is want to whack the roast chicken and ribs...hahah  But yes, mostly carbs - hence I never bother   Even the Prego breakfast had too many carb dishes - only ate eggs and bacon mainly
18	Is it me or the picture looks like braised soya chicken rather than roast chicken.
1	Roasted ah - else the skin would split open like that...hahah  But looks badly roasted lor - my home-made chicken got more standard than that...hahah
55	Don't seem to be crispy given that there are a lot of liquid in the container.
152	Ya lor - not the crispy sort...hahah
5	Not yet.  Should be going this sat.Is the Fu Shi the roasted meats stall at Shun Fu FC?  Always wanted to try, but twice the uncker bo open.  Let you know abt the date.
4	This Friday?  I call and reserve the fatty portions.
2	Yea, $16 nia, whack some ribs n chix can liao.  I'm going with no expectations.  Just wanna try out a new place   Besides, i scheduled fish head after this brunch, so tat should tell you how much expectations i have liao
10	Wed, i dun tink donkey can make it.Hmmm, i check with my driver   *sshhhh, wait i gena ejected in the middles of AYE *  Fu Shi is the shunfu one right?  Tat one still doable for lunch.  Just dun tell me its somewhere at tampines or pasir ris, then pengz liao.
1	Near Bishan.  We can do the curry fish head too.  The muffins are not bad at Shun Fu, but its carbo.
1	Yea, like got some sauce with cloves of garlic n other spices in it.  Maybe its chix oil ... Then i have another soup dish to jiak liao  The sushi still got sun shining on it ... will the sunlight kill all the germs growing on it due to the increased heat?
9	Yea, we went there b4.  The muffins are great when they're freshly baked.  Sibei fragrant!  This Fri out though cos Donkey got something onz.  We're keen though.  Next week can?
45	Next Friday?  Let me know.  I call Uncle to book the char siew.  Otherwise go there no have liao or run out, we GG.
8	next friday is good friday tio bo? we bo chor kang leh.   can we go next week mon to thur, you choose
11	Feeling much better. So sorry I fly u aeroplane cos was on MC.   But i no go, you can still join Toons and Dennyz cos they very nice people   Dont think of buffet ah? Cannot leh. Just now lunch time already go jiak buffet liao Thank you Dennyz di di.   Just now i jiak a lot of durian pengyet liao Vit D i prefer to get it free from the sun.   My flu is allegery triggered, bo bian.   Btw, my family doctor just sent me for a blood test.   Kena scolded by him for high LDL
7	go where jiak buffet?  Tiffany?  how high is your LDL?
24	Yes, at tiffany. Kahlan zeh zeh very lucky lor. Go tiffany got satay. I went today was carrot cake, so sad   Next time i must follow u go buffet, like Basilico, got so many meat and still got lobster spag to eat.   8 months ago was close to 170.   Now is close to 180+.   But happy that body fat reduce by 2% considering the amount of high fat food i take. But i think losing at the wrong places
10	Toons, do update after you try Wavve. still thinking if I should get the voucher for mum's bday.  Or are there any recommended buffets in the range of $20++/pax?
11	it's okay, blame toons for not updating me on the headcount.   it's different, mouth eat good food, eyes see candy, esp if sit and eat with me.
22	what buffet is this ? cheap ? how many chicken can a person whack?? maybe 2.
36	Should be Wavve Frill buffet at TPY.
6	Yah i was kenna meat.  Must thank Toons lah he took pictures so i can complaint so got lobster spag (dont' thank him wait he angry )  For Tiffany ha ha i like the satay lucky mine was satay not really a fan of carrot cake.  Woah your LDL very high.
2	Sure.  For that price, Tiffany or Square at Furama Citycentre and Riverfront respectively.  But dun expect oysters, lamb, beef n lobsters hor.  If your mum like durian pengat, then definitely Tiffany, else the spread at Sq is slightly better imo.Yea, its Waave at Toa Payoh.  About $16 nett.  The cheapest chix i can find is $14 at Chinatown.  So i whack 1 chix already worth liao.  Then there is still the ribs.  Ribs not cheap wor.  Taste wise is another thing altogether though
1	Yea lor, never keep the calcium for me too.  Sigh, after all of you say the satay there nice, i also beoing it.  But until now no luck with it.  Tink i must try a sat/sun lunch liao.
1	taste at least decent ?
58	i purposely dun update the headcount cos i wanna see if you will still go or not mah   Sigh, so dennyz and me not candy for the eyes, so you dun wanna go with us
15	Venue: En Dinning @ Bukit Timah  Date: 14 Apr 2012  Time: 6pm  Price: $56nett (if i dun rem wrongly)  highlight: wagyu shabu, swordfish sashimi, beef carpacio etc  Participants  1) BigMonkey  2) Toons  3) Twtan  4)  5)  6)  7)  8)
47	Dunno, but this is the 3rd batch they selling.  Now selling 4th batch liao, so hopefully not so bad.  Come to tink of it, indian times also sold quite a few times .. siao liao  can?  But its the 'yao' in yao gui Aiyah, its the doc who dun believe mah.  Else will not have started on this lifestyle liao.  Yalor, go out more in the sun, n you can eat shells like moi Is the satay very sweet?  The ones at melting pot recently very sweet.  I condemn tat place liao.
67	Just stop by yesterday. $48++ for weekday buffet &amp; $52++ for weekend.  Sashimi is terrible, but the cooked dishes are quite decent.  Highlights are Wafu steak, beef carpaccio, and the shabu shabu. The croquette is also decent.   Don't pick the hot sake cause its extremely diluted...  Free flow shochu/beer/cocktails/juice is another 35-40 per person. However, the whole table sharing the buffet must opt in or out for the free flow drinks.   Barley Shochu is quite decent. Ask them to serve it neat or at most add the ice yourself cause when you ask them to mix with water they dilute it alot.   Ice-cream is also nice. Can ask them to serve a double or triple scoop instead of the usual 1 serving per plate.   Have fun guys!
632	() Dinner Buffet Date:  (Saturday) Location: 557 Bukit Timah Rd, Crown Centre, #01-14/16 Time: 6pm Price:  Menu:  Participants: 1) BigMonkey 2) Toons 3) Twtan 4)
4	Must jio hor, i want jiak satay too.  Better still, jio kahlan than will have ho liao.
0	Not at all   Just right and the pork came with delicious chunks of fats   But to pay S$29 to eat satay is  though...hahah  I only whacked 2 grilled salmon head, a bowl of stewed pork, a few slices of sashimi, some watermelon plus a scoop of green tea icecream
4	()  Dinner Buffet  Date:  (Saturday)  Location: 557 Bukit Timah Rd, Crown Centre, #01-14/16  Time: 6pm  Price:   Menu:   Participants:  1) BigMonkey  2) Toons  3) Twtan  4) Donkey (TBC)    5)  6)
9	They should serve the satay this wed, next mon and next sat.  I'm planning to go next sat 7 Apr.  Onz?
9	Next sat long weekend i might be going away so i can't confirm now.   The next monday satay is referring to lunch or dinner?
5	What do they serve beside satay?
12	Salmon sashimi is thick and good.   Normally will have a crab dish but I have taken bamboo clam before too.   They will also have a fish dish, either steam or baked salmon if you are lucky.   The meat usually is chicken and beef/lamb but tend to be overcooked.   They have a station for porridge or noodles.   Highlight is the duiran penyet.  Btw, durian season is coming soon. So happy.   You all want go Desaru jiak the durian buffet again?   But must wait for the season peak before we go find the god mother
14	I wanna go...hahah  But should I also drive up? Who will dare to sit my car ah?
10	I want sit your car, never sit before leh   When i go pasar malam, i will ask the god mother when is the best time to go. But i reckon should be May/June for better durians?
9	[/B] ()  Dinner Buffet  Date:  (Saturday)  Location: 557 Bukit Timah Rd, Crown Centre, #01-14/16  Time: 6pm  Price:   Menu:   Participants:  1) BigMonkey  2) Toons  3) Twtan  4) Donkey (TBC)    5) bunny (TBC)  6)  Bukit Timah....
2	Put me in. I should be bringing princess as well.
400	Tuesday or Thurday? Now you choose.
72	their recent reviews on marine harvest night, just few pages before.
21	any other good places u can reccomend for jap buffet around 40+ ++ for weekday dinner with nice sashimi?  was thinking of en dining but you said not too good.  wanted to try shin yuu but reviews werent too good.  tried the buffet at winsor hotel long time back also
1	Shin yuu is good wor. It is 1 of the better Japanese buffets  around. I find it better than ikoi or irodori.
2	Those going for elements on next Mon, its confirmed onz.  Both items will be available.
10	I agreed with Toons on Shin Yuu's sashimi which were good. The Wafu beef cubes are very nice too as was the seared salmon sushi.
19	yeah i remembered you all went there b4 so went to search for the post.  but i also went to look at the recent reviews this year on hgw and doesnt see that good already...  might wanna try himiwara at alexendra...elements at amara?
132	Yeah, at Amara Hotel.
50	Was at Shin Yuu last Sat...yup its still good.  One of the better sashimi places - generous w the cut as well! And yes, Wafu beef is good BTW anyone tried Raku around the corner?  Good?
6	hey sorry, maybe the tone in my post was wrong. En at Bukit Timah is good. Quite value for the price. But the Sashimi is terrible. More than made up for in the other meat dishes. Depends on how much importance you place on raw fish but considering the shabu shabu is quite filling...  Shin Yuu is also awesome in my opinion.  These two places are 5 mins drive from my home so I go to each place quite frequently. Shin Yuu I went 3 times in one week so I definitely give these two places two thumbs up. I prefer ShinYu a little bit more because the sashimi is quite nice there, and the alcohol is quite cheap. Ichiko at 50% off is the cheapest i've seen shochu at these kind of places.
5	Raku is nice, but more expensive (buffet is more expensive and they nickel and dime you on stuff like green tea more than others), and quite honestly don't feel their food is better than Shin Yuu. Plus service there was slow the time I was there and it wasn't that crowded.
103	Hmmm, the beef at En was so good tat i honestly had no impression of their sashimi.  Normally the outstandingly good and bad things will stand out, but like i said, no impression of the sashimi.  I tink i can remember them running out of swordfish sashimi.  Hmmm, if we can eat til they run out, should not be so bad?  Or has the std dropped?  i tink its &gt; 1 yr ago since we went there.
36	Element one of the best place to go. i dont know about now. Its quiet n relaxing.
484	toons how much for 1 pax for elements?...other than the fish, wat other dishes they have?...  the fish they everyday have de arhh...
101	If they not selling vouchers then very quiet n relaxing   But now its abt 80% full last nite.Its about $40 nett.  Not very sure cos i using voucher last nite.  Yea, they said they have the fish everyday now.  Frankly, unless you are a cod fish lover and have a small appetite so dun mind the small spread, otherwise there are better places around.  They only have a couple of hot dishes, n most are so so or lousy.  The mutton curry was so tough n the squid with otay stuffing was like chewing on rubber ...
4	ok set! will go try Shin Yuu out tonight if my other half feels like eating...
13	now having construction so can be noisy at times...  aircon also seems to be a tad warm. afew weeks ago there was a power failure and they had to use candles for dinner
66	Wow, so romantic......
60	Ah tan, when u clearing leave?   Organise Shin Yuu leh
419	No clearing at the moment. Shin Yuu need to take one day AL and I will be busy till at least April so unlikely to be taking leave now that I will operating alone.
5	Ellenborough got promo now?  2nd diner pay 50%?
11	they didnt include address. zzz
10	got ah.. is below the logo i posted  Add: 207 River Valley Rd  #01-60 UE Square Singapore 238275 Tel: 6732 6863 Opening Hours:  Mondays to Thursdays: 6pm to 2am Saturdays and Eve of PH: 6pm to 3am, Sun 6pm to 12am
178	Went to eat Momiji this afternoon. Reached around 1.30pm. Very late. Last order was supposed to be 2.30pm but they came to rush me around 2.10pm so sibeh sianz. Also, salmon sashimi run out, tempura run out. No fatty salmon belly which Toons had. Think the most memorable was the eclaire.   Don't think will go back again. Now weekday dinner got promo though. $20+ instead of $26.90++ and got crab legs too.
136	the last time i went this outlet was yum~
424	you think worth? a bit interested. no menu .   With over 30 items to choose from, be spoiled for choice! Start off with a , then, hoard your plates with the mouth-watering ! Heap as much as you can eat! Do not miss the chef recommendations- , also included in the buffet items.
79	That one must go early early then can get the salmon belly.   I am tempted to go back, just jiak the salmon belly sashimi, scallop and fish head, i happy liao
25	how early is early may i know?  and also the few items you mentioned. are they available all the time or only like weekend dinner or something/.  thanks!
19	I only went dinner before.   Being kaisu, i always try to be at the entrance when they open   Think it was 6pm if i am not wrong.  1st time, the salmon belly sashimi was limited to the first plate at the buffet counter. No refill after we hoot everything off the plate.   For my 2nd trip, it was refilled through out the night, so i guess it depends on availability.   The scallop is a fixed item.   As for the fish head, it was either that or the side fin, also nice.
0	I want to go, jio me hor. Their dinner time no crowd one.
16	thanks man. shall try soon!
5	Just in case anyone wants it but kinda not worth it i think.
5	Ya lor - I prefer Marriott Cafe
46	that one is lunch
1	$68 nett is ok. $34 per pax. Slightly more than Sakura pricing. That bit more for better service and ambience. Food quality also slightly better.
3	agree
91	Bro, I not elite to have 50% discount like you.
9	If its dinner, i will grab, but lunch dunno if they still have the seabass and wagyu beef roast or not.
69	Today is the last day for the promo ... so sad   Don't mind going tonight but i just had buffet for lunch *burp*
12	donkey had buffet for lunch again?......this time is jiak simi?....  carey shushu is regular elite at marriott lo...jin envy...
22	Frankly, the cheaper the buffet, the less likely they are going to replenish the food, esp during the last 1 hr.  They cheapo is 1 thing, but normally last hr, ppl will stop eating liao, or just eat desserts, so its a waste to continue topping up the seafood, appertisers and hot food too.  And tats not even counting the fact that the more premium items will normally be replenished just 1 or 2 rounds n tats it.  So if i can only make it to a buffet 1 hr or more, after its starting time, i won't bother going at all.  Not to be mean, but i tink its pretty amusing to read abt ppl complaining tat there is no food when they go to a buffet during the last hr or 30 mins
28	You laughing at me is it? hahah  Made that mistake once - still got an hour to "closing" but all the good food all ran out and never replenish...  If so, they shouldn't let diners in or at least warn the diners right?
13	Caveat emptor  Nevermind lar, you go with me, i reserve all the good stuff for you.  Eg, oyster shells, porkie meat without skin ...
45	its not NETT.. stated:
8	Got promo????
8	CIMB World card has a pretty decent promo   And if you go once, the next visit can get 3-for-2 pricing I think...I gave away my receipts
8	For claim? If so, then pay full price also okay leh.
23	Nope - personal entertainment   Plus my department got no entertainment budget
45	Bui bui eeyore very yao gui hor   I was clearing the Chang voucher at iluma.   Quite welcome the change to BBQ meat cos lately has been eating hotel buffet. I blame the Korean drama, everytime see they eat bbq like very delicious, make me tempted to jiak
5	hahaha i only want to go korean bbq if they got tanghoon
157	Wah, like tats only ssikkek or corner place?  Rest like dun have tanghoon or not nice.  Come to tink of it, i haven't try ssikkek chinatown yet.  Cannot let the pretty lao ban niang miss me too much
13	Daa daa dee dee da de de da ...
11	This one is your own additional outing right? You got help us buy previously bo?
2	I bought these buffet vouchers deals once before... got a bad experience and don't think i will ever buy them again
6	Yea, bought liao.  This one is a separate one
40	if u r gg for a weekdae jap lunch, may as well choose kiseki @ hereen. spread quite similar but I find it slightly better.  @$19.80++, realli jin wuhua.
19	But the dinner sucks...hahah  We went there before - even bigmonkey didn't like it
116	yardstick
16	very bad leh u, dee dee make fun of ppl de cremo ice cream   do u noe becos of tis idiotic joke, now I boycott cremo ice cream?   but back to kiseki, only the lunch ish jiakable, dinner not worth. Likewise the same for The Line, imho
406	You sound like Big Monkey is rubbish bin.   Anyway, I went to Kiseiki on their 2nd day of opening. It was very good. Went downhill from there.   As for momiji, I went coz I sent my girl for classes at City Sq Mall. Shun bian go there eat.
29	No lah, bigmonkey is very chin chai one but even he found Kiseki food to be quite bad...hahah  Went to Momiji with Toons and Donkey before - okay niah - just like Sakura lor
86	Lunch got oyster?
43	Kiseki Japanese Buffet and Chiso Zanmai got equally matched ratings at hungrygowhere.com For the lowest price point, cannot expect much good stuff. (Lunch SGD14.90++, same people working at the Fisherman's Market (closed), overall very budget buffet with limited varieties, no sashimi for Lunch) (Lunch - SGD19.90++, getting quieter than before, think location is an issue)  Momiji -  (Lunch - SGD20.80++, getting expensive than before, casual dining ok)
0	Kiseki will be shifting over to 313 in May according to my friend.
56	is this worth it?
2	which outlet ???
20	No idea which unit they will occupy.
55	Ah Tan went for this one and condemn it right?
0	Ya, the worst buffet I have eaten to date.
20	Yes.  But it is was a weekend lunch we went, and they were serving high tea rather than lunch.  So a lot of those finger food.  Even then, the food was so so nia.  Durian pengat too sweet.
117	i heard bad reviews too.
12	sorry just hijacked this thread for awhile.  Fisherman's mkt at the central , clark quay CLOSED down already?
1	Yes, closed, shop space taken over by this one: Chiso Zanmai
7	Oh!  have tried buffet town and have save up for fisherman's mkt, then happen to see one of our bro's reply on its closing. Alamak.   Is the new one good? hows the price like?
1368	No idea wor but given the $14.90 price tag, can't expect much right?
65	lol so much conditions... 1 table 1 voucher, imagine 1 family go and all split up in 2-3 per table =p
13	2 person 1 voucher quite okay, 1 person 1 voucher in my case   Other than the samsui chix, wat else is must try?  Maybe get 1 to try at clementi mall since i also dunno wat to do with all the credits from the honjin refund.
10	You getting this? Do you want to share? If not, get for me one. Wants to try their samsui chicken.
5	Yea, can order another dish to share, so abt 30+.  Just nice 2 person 1 voucher.  But i going clementi mall branch wor, you want to travel
5	The place is next to Clementi MRT right? If so I am ok.
11	3 of us went to eat about early $60.  Small chicken,  3 egg vegetables,  cai por tofu,  steamed fish slices , 2 chinese tea, 3 rice and towels. No peanuts. Ah gong potato leaves one of top order dishes but not to our liking. tofu prawns is towards tomato based, curly garlic prawns not bad but these 2 dishes on higher price tag, moreover their prawns not big.  there are other vegetable dish like broccoli with scallops. Their soups are OK. They self proclaim fish belly is good but I ate once, taste OK but personally don't like (probably with those bones) Salted yolk pork patty is average. Those lap cheong or steam chicken rice can give a miss. for those first time go-ers, the complements (ginger sauce, cabbage) can be replenished, they will give new serving.  we polished off 3 servings of the ginger sauce.
8	Thanks for the feedback.  Their chix 1 portion is abt 0.5 of a normal sized chix?  How abt their claypot salt fish with sliced belly or mui choy pork?  You also very heng wor.  i remember you said you wanted to eat their chix, then this voucher deal popped out of nowhere   Can you said you wanna eat the hot poached lobster from greenhouse?
8	i updated my post.   the big one is about $1.80 cheaper than 2 x small portion. you can ask bigmonkey about the size. i don't know how to gauge. the dish is boneless, hence no wings. but the quantity might be a normal average whole chicken  never tried the 2 dishes you mentioned.   i went already 2 days ago...  can't curb my craving. bought the voucher also since i intended to do a return visit, but have to be different branch due to limited locations.  if i really so lucky i would have turned millionaire just by saying i want strike rich or money drop from sky.   (may be i part of groupon's team and just managed to negotiate the deal  )  i reviewed before i don't like greenhouse food wor.
56	Yea, its rite beside clementi mrt.  Lucky can share 1 voucher, else have to split tables liao.  Tat one you go do with someone else
110	Ok, we share the voucher then.
32	there is wings for the samsui chicken, but they took away the bones...muz order the tomato prawns wif toufu (signature dish too), its nice n the sauce maciam those chilli crab sauce, lum wif rice is sedap...soups abit stingy portion for the price...their stir fry vermicilli is good if u wana eat carbo on tat day, but its def worth trying once...  they promote no msg use in their restaurant but im not really sure...i can feel thirstyness 15 mins after the meal...
28	This is a poisonous thread. Just bought 2. One of each.
14	gratz! u r fatter with 2 chickens now!
3	I also gena poisoned, but not as deep
11	You wanna gena poisoned too?  Can share with Donkey.  Good stuff must keep, but poisonous stuff must share share
3	Got a soup restaurant near my place. But never ate there before. It's quite ex to me. Especially when I can have cheaper alternatives in the area. So with the discount, it doesn't hurt my pockets that much to try.
10	Shun Fu char siew outing when ar? Next Tuesday or Thursday?
26	Oh ya, come to think of it, indeed got wing part. But perhaps I usually grab meaty area.  Imho,  the tofu prawn gravy is not even comparable to chilli crab. I like prawns but not thIs sauce. I prefer garlic prawn..he he. Own taste.
51	For me have to be Thu cos Tue i doing audit.  Might have to take a quick lunch depending on the progress.  Have to check with donkey though.
0	some buffet place at JB that i tried today.  somewhat similar to scholar but not exactly.  gotch cute panda bear and turtle  soup lai riao. left: 8 treasures soup, right: sour spicy soup  a lot of herbs inside the 8 treasures soup  inside sour spicy soup
1089	turtle after swimming  panda also went swimming  my first plate, still got more but lazy to take pic cos i took almost the same stuff.  this extra large meat ball has extra meat inside.
2	Christmas tree still standing tall.
1	***  Due to overwhelming demand, our offer is back!  ***  Now valid for use from 1st April to 30th April 2012
1	Leftovers from the night before...
2	Guess who head is this.
3	Whole pickled fish.
1	- If you have false dentures, avoid this at all cause.
2	Dessert time
357	Bonus pictures.
23	No wor.  Got post b4.  You still gave your feedback on the mainland branch, remember?  Go to habourfront, then either walk or take the monorail to Sentosa.  I tink the restaurant is along the waterfront area.  i intend to go for fri dinner cos maybe can see the fireworks
25	they are different restaurants..
529	Oh, pai seh, sleepy liao, so blur blur.  Got them confused.  With just 3 pork n 1 chicken available at jin shin jung, i'll rather go chinatown ssk.  SSK cheaper n more convenient to go somemore.
3	I am ok with thursday   Uncle got open?
2	yah was thinking how come u interested as only limited meat.  Also these are the type they will serve you when you asked for.  But the quality of the meat is good.
118	Anyone bought yet?
85	no i did not buy.
29	Poison deep deep.   Calling for Prince of Buffet
10	Heehee, last 2 slots to form table of 6.  It will be a weekday dinner hor, as i dun wanna crowd with others on weekends n weekend is 2 seatings *yucks!* So far, Toons, Dennyz, Donkey n Monkey liao.
3	is this nice?
4	I don't know. Never try before.   I am going there blind folded   Want to join us a not?
15	Dunno wor, wanna join us?  Very long never eat chinese ala carte buffet liao ... still dreamz of SCDH n Cathay  Plus the place like simi heritage biulding.  Looks quite nice.
3	Thinking. I have not been to ssk. But comparing blue garden to this, blue garden lower grade. But still better than seoul garden. Tempted to buy.
1	ok can, do you get for me?  or u want me to buy the voucher myself?  No get for Dennyz?
0	Bro, char siew on thu lunch okay?  You calling to book bui bui char siew for us?  You drive plus east side okay, but for most of us, its SSK FTW!  4 types of meats nia a bit sianz too.
1	I get for all.  Yea, dennyz is in too.  Currently count 5 pax liao.
36	I am keen to try also that resturant has been around for quite sometime.   My niece went before, she say is nice but jin expensive.
9	ok thanks for this
33	char siew at where on thursday lunch?? i want go~~
12	Get for me also.
4	Hokay, closed. Toons, Dennyz, Donkey, Donkey's Buffet Friend (clarification requested), Kahlan, Ah Tan n Monkey
6	Shun Fu FC.  We just going there to try the glass char siew wor.  Might be going to try the curry fish head too, depending on time.  Should be a short lunch though. You still wanna join us?
5	suure why not
28	The more the merrier.   Hopefully we have time to cover both the char siew and fish head
7	sure can lah, u drive plus u guys got super long flexi lunch hour
16	ok time to leave house.....! cya all later
142	Shhh ... not too loud, later boss scold.   Only Toons can snake so long. Oei ... so late still home ah   You take taxi or sit bullet train.
27	fwah looking good when u guys wanna go?  i miss dining with prince of buffet
8	How many pax and what time? That kind of char siew must reserve. Otherwise go there don't have sure kenna hoot by you all. The rest of the available items no need reserve. Don't bother with the roast duck and roast chicken. Nothing special. Other than the char siew, only roast pork is above average.
0	Go where eat charsiews??
17	Wah. You sabo Toons.
95	Shun Fu. You stay yio chu kang/thomson area right? Quite near.
3	Wah, so long never see liao, first thing is suan me.  When you wanna go?  See if we can make it. Else wait for our scheduling might take some time as this only expires in Jul
26	So far, is you, donkey, dennyz n me.  Abt 1230pm?  Tell the uncker .  Thanks for arranging this.Yea lor, today gena suan n saboed
1	he is so much more busy...
89	curry fish head is.... not same market right?
18	Looks good. But sexpensive. But it's a restaurant after all. I shall stick to hawker fare. Shalome wanna join us for shun fu?
568	goin to jcube tmr again n pass by this canton restaurant today, am looking forward to trying this honey pork belly (is one of their signature dish worth trying)...heard this is oso under the group of taste paradise...
4	112 katong basement also have 1 outlet... ate there once.. not bad
5	If this is the place at Shun Fu market - I've been there 4 times and all 4 times, the stall was closed....
334	Wat time you go? They normally sold out after 2pm.   Uncle health also no good. So he takes breaks often.
24	i don't remember pushing the cake into your mouth~~  oh ya. drink more water, chempedak is heaty also.
5	If its nice enough tat you dun mind hooting, then its worth it right?  But the ice cream like cempedak cake is really nice wor.  Its 1 of the few desserts i actually eat ... literally  Worse is nothing worth hooting ... n paying for it ...
37	Later i eating ma la steamboat For someone like me who manage to stay off cakes at all the buffet, this is the only buffet that i wack 3 pieces. I must say that u all have good taste
5	ma la steamboat from where? O_O
2	Ask u make passport but u never lor
30	orh, that 1. thought where  nvm la. tonite granny stir frying 2 styles of potato leaves. sambal and soya bean sauce? kekeke
2	Can you still squeeze into your swimming costume?
6	hentai shushu appears!!! run donkey ~~~
6	Alamak ah tan, although you are my BF hor but these type of questions must ask me in private one, not in forum. I will shy one you know   But i am most impress by the seabass ytd. Esp the 2 big pieces you took. Do homework hor
47	My computer graphic card got some problem. Vendor coming down tomorrow to troubleshoot/change graphic card.
2	You ask her to parade for you in private bah
46	Wah Lao Lao tan so pervert...this type of stuff u leave it in the bedroom ma...if even cannot fit also for ur eyes to feast on ma
170	If like that also pervert, then those at the swimming pools and seaside all perverts liao and I know who went swimming and who being acknowledged as someone's BSB which I think is much more perverted.
18	nw I knw y ah tan scare donkey cannot fit into swimsuit le...they goin cruise this long wkend he must be scare cannot fit in then he cant admire...
131	Anyone getting this? Don't find it value for money as it's only half rack. The original price of $37.09 seem way too overprice. Got to wait for Tony Roma's offer.
15	Lao tan humsups..   BTW the basilico brunch n lunch difference is only foie gras iz it?
100	Foie gras, slightly more desserts, eg, the delicious iced choc smoothie, more pizzas, suckling pig (with stuffing version though), better wagyu roast beef, tink got 1 more carving too, n more cheeses.  More seafood too iirc.  Hot dishes abt the same.  Definitely more eye candies ... a lot of the diners really dress up for the brunch
267	Make sure you do not leave your private videos and porn unprotected. Wait become another Edison Chen.
348	All he will find are pictures of foods and pictures of all of you.
91	Can still call the uncle to add in 1 more person for char siew not?Lol
0	not sure whether nice or not?
24	Lunch and dinner don't have.   The comparison was for lunch and brunch.
4	So evil confirm? Beta leh? I got another 2 who msg me. I will call in 15 mins time to add.
4	the char siew at shun fu really tok kong ah?...yest i went to try the fatty char siew at jcube canton restaurant...15.80 a plate n it has abt 10 slices, not say too thick or too thin...nice, tender and quite fatty with their unique char siew sauce so ordered another plate to savour, but wun go specially to eat again, too ex for me...oso ordered a plate roasted pork belly, have to say i had it better at crystal jade...the jcube branch oso serve dimsum whole day for those who like tat...  oh ya later tonite goin to carnivore again......beef hump here i come...
14	Wow ... so expensive the char siew   We can only afford food centre.   You must jio us go jiak bui bui bak together leh
2	ya lo eat tat time quite shiok, but paying tat time jin heart pain..spend it on buffets better...  wonder how the shun fu char siew taste like...but too far for me alr...heard theres a stall at redhill market selling gd char siew oso...
3	Really jin sexpensive. Think wait for those who have tried both shun fu and paradise's char siew to compare if it's worth the premium before I decide to try.
1	We just tried the char siew at Crystal Jade at Parkway - not fantastic cos the meat was a bit on the lean side   I think one of the better ones was still at Wah Lok   Anyway, since we live so close to Jcube, may venture a trip down there one of these days...hahah
5	Me cheap skate.   Actually my love is sio bak, not a fan of char siew cos tend to be too sweet.  But they say until the shu fu fatty char siew got dragon got phoenix plus Piggy bringing us, so i have to go.
6	Their sio bak not bad. I like ubi's sio bak too. Cheap and good. Eh, don't raise expectation too high. Wait cannot meet I tio hoot. It's quite sweet, not the salty type.   Oh, they did not answer. So it's still 5 pax portion. But since we going early, should have enough for us.
1	I got try their sio bak but i still like the sio bak at meiling street.   Dont worry, got fats to eat i happy liao, at most i let the char siew swim a bit before i eat it   Plus fish head is waiting for us and there is also still other food in the fc to try.
2	muz call n reserve the fatty char siew, muz be gd wor...u all try b4 the kay lee roast, the one where its selling the recipe for 2m?...overhyped?...  carey, can try the crystal jade branch at vivo, their char siew n roast pork the best among all, ask for esp the fatty parts...
9	Just nice, tomorrow i cannot make it.  Evil or Beta can take over.  Paiseh.
5	That one sexspensive too. Sio bak also super salty. Not bad but $4 portion is pathetic.
3	I think you better don't go to Akira. I also wanted to buy that deal n did some research on reviews of that place n found quite a lot of negative reviews on that.  Try this place called senki japanese restarant at killiney road instead.  I have been there twice since I bought the vouchers n have not been disappointed in the taste n quality of food at all. Service is lso reasonably good even though they are very busy.   voucherlicious.com/singapore/deal/eat-all-you-can-$21-for-japanese-buffet-with-free-flow-green-tea-@-senki-japanese-restaurant
1	We are going for their ala carte buffet dinner.
95	i went canton yesterday. the dim sums not to our liking. we rather go for crystal jade or imperial treasure, even though their standards also dropped a little. it would be quite a long time later for my next visit. about 2 hours later i was not feeling well and puked a bit when i at home, it was some dish from there. till this morning i was still slightly nausea for a while. however i won't dare to contribute that under canton's as my friend did not experience any discomfort.
204	same here...hehe
10	aiyah piggy i just woke up.. lol.. napped la.. tired.. still got slots tmr bo?
1	kaylee is good but a bit ex. Their lupcheong is epic.. will sold out de. i love it.
5	Just go lar, its a hawker centre, dun need reservation one la.  At most the glass char siew each one eat a bit less n mix with more less bui bui ones.
3	Just come.  Think now left donkey, dennyz and me, provided they don't pull out.  More than enough.  If I not picking up someone, I will pick you from Bishan MRT if its convenient for you.  Sorry, mine is lao pok chia, plus got 2 strollers and one bicycle in car boot, and 2 dragon thrones permanently fixed at the back, only the front passenger seat is available.
2	You going with your GF? But need 4 persons to dine.
54	Anyone else interested in going to pavillion?  Need another 2 more cos need to buy 4 vouchers at 1 go.
32	bishan very good for me. i stay khatib. jus 15mins ride down i think.  pm u moi lumbers.
27	wah brother... i read this.. read until drooling.....!
14	nope,my family
